#https://www.cancer.gov/publications/dictionaries/cancer-terms



A33
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
A6
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. A6 is a small piece of a protein called urokinase (an enzyme that dissolves blood clots or prevents them from forming). It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of antimetastatic agent. Also called urokinase plasminogen activator (uPA)-derived peptide A6.
AAP
An enzyme that is normally found in healthy kidneys. It may be found at high levels in the urine when there are kidney problems. It is used as a biomarker to detect damage to the kidneys caused by drugs and other agents. It may also be used to diagnose certain kidney and liver disorders. Also called alanine aminopeptidase.
AAT deficiency (… deh-FIH-shun-see)
An inherited condition in which the body either does not make enough of a protein called alpha-1 antitrypsin (AAT) or makes an abnormal form of AAT. AAT is made in the liver and helps protect the body’s organs, especially the liver and lungs, from damage. AAT deficiency can lead to serious lung conditions (including emphysema and bronchiectasis) and liver conditions (including cirrhosis, hepatitis, and liver cancer). It may also cause inflammation of the blood vessels and a rare skin condition that causes painful lumps on or under the skin. Lung problems caused by AAT deficiency almost always occur in adults, but liver and skin problems may occur in both adults and children. AAT deficiency is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called SERPINA1. Also called alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency.
abarelix listen (uh-BAYR-eh-lix)
A drug used to reduce the amount of testosterone made in patients with advanced symptomatic prostate cancer for which no other treatment options are available. It belongs to the family of drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) antagonists. Also called Plenaxis.
ABCA1 pathway listen (… PATH-way)
Describes a group of proteins in a cell that work together to help remove extra cholesterol and certain fats from tissue in the body. Changes in the ABCA1 pathway may lead to diseases of the heart and blood vessels. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are being studied in the prevention and treatment of some diseases.
ABCD rating listen (... RAY-ting)
A staging system for prostate cancer that uses ABCD. “A” and “B” refer to cancer that is confined to the prostate. “C” refers to cancer that has grown out of the prostate but has not spread to lymph nodes or other places in the body. “D” refers to cancer that has spread to lymph nodes or to other places in the body. Also called Jewett staging system and Whitmore-Jewett staging system.
abdomen listen (AB-doh-men)
The area of the body that contains the pancreas, stomach, intestines, liver, gallbladder, and other organs.
abdominal listen (ab-DAH-mih-nul)
Having to do with the abdomen, which is the part of the body between the chest and the hips that contains the pancreas, stomach, intestines, liver, gallbladder, and other organs.
abdominal ultrasound listen (ab-DAH-mih-nul UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure used to examine the organs in the abdomen. An ultrasound transducer (probe) is pressed firmly against the skin of the abdomen. High-energy sound waves from the transducer bounce off tissues and create echoes. The echoes are sent to a computer, which makes a picture called a sonogram. Also called transabdominal ultrasound.
abdominal x-ray listen (ab-DAH-mih-nul EX-ray)
An x-ray of the organs inside the abdomen. An x-ray is a type of radiation that can pass through the body and onto film, making pictures of areas inside the body. X-rays may be used to help diagnose disease.
abdominoperineal resection listen (ab-DAH-mih-noh-PAYR-ih-NEE-ul ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove the anus, the rectum, and part of the sigmoid colon through an incision made in the abdomen. The end of the intestine is attached to an opening in the surface of the abdomen and body waste is collected in a disposable bag outside of the body. This opening is called a colostomy. Lymph nodes that contain cancer may also be removed during this operation.
Abegrin listen (A-beh-grin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Abegrin binds to a protein on the surface of blood vessels and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It may also prevent the spread of cancer. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent, a type of metastasis inhibitor, and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called etaracizumab, humanized monoclonal antibody MEDI-522, and MEDI-522.
abemaciclib listen (uh-BEH-muh-SY-klib)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2-negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is used with fulvestrant in women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. Abemaciclib is also used alone in men and women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy and previous chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Abemaciclib blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called Verzenio.
aberrant crypt foci listen (uh-BAYR-unt kript FOH-sy)
Clusters of abnormal tube-like glands in the lining of the colon and rectum. Aberrant crypt foci form before colorectal polyps and are one of the earliest changes that can be seen in the colon that may lead to cancer. Also called ACF.
ABI-007
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has come back or spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with carboplatin to treat advanced non-small cell lung cancer in patients who are not able to have surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ABI-007 is a form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel and may cause fewer side effects than paclitaxel. It stops cancer cells from growing and dividing, and may kill them. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called Abraxane, nanoparticle paclitaxel, paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation, and protein-bound paclitaxel.
abiraterone acetate listen (A-bih-RA-teh-rone A-seh-tayt)
A drug used with prednisone to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels) or whose cancer is high risk and castration sensitive (has responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Abiraterone acetate lowers the amount of androgens (male hormones), such as testosterone, made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need androgens to grow. Abiraterone acetate is a type of antiandrogen. Also called Zytiga.
ablation listen (a-BLAY-shun)
In medicine, the removal or destruction of a body part or tissue or its function. Ablation may be performed by surgery, hormones, drugs, radiofrequency, heat, or other methods.
abnormal listen (ab-NOR-mul)
Not normal. Describes a state, condition, or behavior that is unusual or different from what is considered normal. An abnormal lesion or growth in or on the body may be benign (not cancer), precancerous or premalignant (likely to become cancer), or malignant (cancer).
ABO blood group system listen (… blud groop SIS-tem)
A system used to group human blood into different types, based on the presence or absence of certain markers on the surface of red blood cells. The four main blood types are A, B, O, and AB. For a blood transfusion, the ABO blood group system is used to match the blood type of the donor and the person receiving the transfusion. People with blood type O can donate blood to anyone and are called universal donors. People with blood type AB can accept blood from all donors and are called universal recipients. People with type A or B can receive matching blood or type O blood.
ABR test listen (... test)
A test used to detect some types of hearing loss, such as hearing loss caused by injury or tumors that affect nerves involved in hearing. Electrodes are placed on the head and certain tones or clicking sounds are made. The electrodes measure nerve signals in the brain when it reacts to the sounds. Also called auditory brain stem response test, BAER test, and brain stem auditory evoked response test.
Abraxane listen (uh-BRAK-sayn)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has come back or spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with carboplatin to treat advanced non-small cell lung cancer in patients who are not able to have surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Abraxane is a form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel and may cause fewer side effects than paclitaxel. It stops cancer cells from growing and dividing, and may kill them. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called ABI-007, nanoparticle paclitaxel, paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation, and protein-bound paclitaxel.
Abrikossoff tumor listen (AH-bree-KAH-sof TOO-mer)
A rare type of soft tissue tumor that usually begins in Schwann cells (cells that hold nerve cells in place). It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in or under the skin of the head and neck (especially the mouth or tongue). It may also occur in the chest, breast, esophagus, stomach, or other internal organ. Most Abrikossoff tumors are benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer) and spread quickly to nearby tissue. They usually occur in middle-aged adults. Also called granular cell tumor.
abscess listen (AB-ses)
An enclosed collection of pus in tissues, organs, or confined spaces in the body. An abscess is a sign of infection and is usually swollen and inflamed.
absolute neutrophil count listen (AB-soh-loot NOO-troh-fil kownt)
A measure of the number of neutrophils in the blood. Neutrophils are a type of white blood cell. They help the body fight infection. An absolute neutrophil count may be used to check for infection, inflammation, leukemia, and other conditions. The lower a person's absolute neutrophil count is, the higher the risk is of getting an infection. Having an absolute neutrophil count of less than 500 means there is a high risk of getting an infection. Cancer treatment, such as chemotherapy, may reduce the absolute neutrophil count. Also called ANC.
absolute risk listen (AB-soh-loot risk)
A measure of the risk of a certain event happening. In cancer research, it is the likelihood that a person who is free of a specific type of cancer at a given age will develop that cancer over a certain period of time. For example, a woman 35 years of age, with no known risk factors for breast cancer, has an absolute risk of getting breast cancer over a lifetime of 90 years of about 13.5%, meaning one out of every seven women will develop breast cancer.
absorption listen (ub-SORP-shun)
The process of taking nutrients from the digestive system into the blood so they can be used in the body.
ABT-263
A substance being studied in the treatment of lymphomas and other types of cancer. It blocks some of the enzymes that keep cancer cells from dying. It is a type of Bcl-2 family inhibitor. Also called navitoclax.
ABT-510
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
ABT-751
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called sulfonamides.
ABT-869
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. ABT-869 blocks the action of several growth factors. It may also block the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogensis inhibitor. Also called multitargeted receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor ABT-869.
ABT-888
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancers caused by mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. ABT-888 may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called PARP-1 inhibitor ABT-888 and veliparib.
ABVD
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vinblastine sulfate, and dacarbazine. Also called ABVD regimen.
ABVD regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vinblastine sulfate, and dacarbazine. Also called ABVD.
ABVE
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, and etoposide. Also called ABVE regimen, DBVE, and DBVE regimen.
ABVE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, and etoposide. Also called ABVE, DBVE, and DBVE regimen.
ABVE-PC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, etoposide, prednisone, and cyclophosphamide. Also called ABVE-PC regimen, DBVE-PC, and DBVE-PC regimen.
ABVE-PC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, etoposide, prednisone, and cyclophosphamide. Also called ABVE-PC, DBVE-PC, and DBVE-PC regimen.
ABX-EGF
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of colorectal cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or whose cancer got worse after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ABX-EGF binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some normal cells and some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. ABX-EGF is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called panitumumab and Vectibix.
AC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer, including breast cancer that has spread or come back. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide. Also called AC regimen.
AC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer, including breast cancer that has spread or come back. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide. Also called AC.
acalabrutinib listen (uh-KA-luh-BROO-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat mantle cell lymphoma in patients who have already received at least one other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Acalabrutinib blocks a protein called Bruton’s tyrosine kinase (BTK), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Calquence.
ACAPHA listen (a-KA-fuh)
A mixture of six herbs that has been used in China to prevent and treat diseases such as lung and esophageal cancers. It is being studied in the United States and Canada in the prevention of lung cancer in people who used to smoke.
accelerated partial-breast irradiation listen (ak-SEH-leh-ray-ted PAR-shul-brest ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy given only to the part of the breast that has cancer in it. Accelerated partial-breast irradiation gives a higher dose over a shorter time than is given in standard whole-breast radiation therapy. Accelerated partial-breast irradiation may be given using internal or external sources of radiation. Also called partial-breast irradiation.
accelerated phase chronic myelogenous leukemia listen (ak-SEH-leh-ray-ted fayz KRAH-nik MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A phase of chronic myelogenous leukemia in which the disease is progressing. In this phase, 10% to 19% of the cells in the blood and bone marrow are blast cells (immature blood cells).
accelerated radiation therapy listen (ak-SEH-leh-ray-ted RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is given over a shorter period of time (fewer days) compared to standard radiation therapy.
accelerated-fraction radiation therapy listen (ak-SEH-leh-ray-ted-FRAK-shun RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is divided into small doses and the treatments are given more than once a day. The total dose of radiation is also given over a shorter period of time (fewer days) compared to standard radiation therapy.
Accolate listen (A-koh-layt)
A drug used to prevent and treat symptoms of asthma. It blocks substances that cause inflammation in the lungs. It is a type of antiasthmatic agent and a leukotriene receptor antagonist. Also called zafirlukast.
ACE inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that is used to lower blood pressure. An ACE inhibitor is a type of antihypertensive agent. Also called angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor.
acetaminophen listen (uh-see-tuh-MIH-nuh-fen)
A drug that reduces pain and fever (but not inflammation). It belongs to the family of drugs called analgesics.
acetate listen (A-seh-tayt)
A form of acetic acid (an acid found in vinegar).
acetic acid listen (uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
An acid found in vinegar. Acetic acid is also used to dissolve substances needed to make some medicines and other products, such as plastics.
acetone listen (A-seh-tone)
A chemical substance found naturally in small amounts in plants, trees, volcanoes, and forest fires. Acetone is also made by the body when fats are broken down. It is also found in tobacco smoke, car exhaust, and trash landfills. In industry, acetone is used in some plastics, fibers, medicines, household cleaners, glues, and nail polish removers. Being exposed to high levels of acetone may irritate the skin, eyes, nose, throat, and lungs. It can cause headaches, nausea, vomiting, dizziness, confusion, loss of consciousness, and other health problems.
acetyl group listen (A-seh-til groop)
A small molecule made of two carbon, three hydrogen, and one oxygen atoms. Acetyl groups are added to or removed from other molecules and may affect how the molecules act in the body.
acetylation listen (a-SEH-tih-LAY-shun)
A chemical reaction in which a small molecule called an acetyl group is added to other molecules. Acetylation of proteins may affect how they act in the body.
acetylcholine listen (A-seh-til-KOH-leen)
A chemical made by some types of nerve cells. It is used to send messages to other cells, including other nerve cells, muscle cells, and gland cells. It is released from the nerve ending and carries signals to cells on the other side of a synapse (space between nerve cells and other cells). Acetylcholine helps control memory and the action of certain muscles. It is a type of neurotransmitter.
acetylcysteine listen (A-seh-til-SIS-teh-een)
A drug usually used to reduce the thickness of mucus and ease its removal. It is also used to reverse the toxicity of high doses of acetaminophen. Also called N-acetyl-L-cysteine and N-acetylcysteine.
acetyl-L-carnitine listen (A-seh-til ... KAR-nih-teen)
A form of the natural substance carnitine that is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is made in muscle and liver tissue and is found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. It is used by many cells in the body to make energy from fat. Also called acetyl-L-carnitine hydrochloride and ALCAR.
acetyl-L-carnitine hydrochloride listen (A-seh-til ... KAR-nih-teen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A form of the natural substance carnitine that is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is made in muscle and liver tissue and is found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. It is used by many cells in the body to make energy from fat. Also called acetyl-L-carnitine and ALCAR.
ACF
Clusters of abnormal tube-like glands in the lining of the colon and rectum. ACF form before colorectal polyps and are one of the earliest changes that can be seen in the colon that may lead to cancer. Also called aberrant crypt foci.
achlorhydria listen (ay-klor-HY-dree-uh)
A lack of hydrochloric acid in the digestive juices in the stomach. Hydrochloric acid helps digest food.
acid listen (A-sid)
A chemical that gives off hydrogen ions in water and forms salts by combining with certain metals. Acids have a sour taste and turn certain dyes red. Some acids made by the body, such as gastric acid, can help organs work the way they should. An example of an acid is hydrochloric acid. Acidity is measured on a scale called the pH scale. On this scale, a value of 7 is neutral, and a pH value of less than 7 to 0 shows increasing acidity.
acid-base balance listen (A-sid-bays BA-lunts)
In medicine, the state of having the right amount of acid and base in the blood and other body fluids. Keeping a normal acid-base balance is important for the body to work the way it should. Also called acid-base equilibrium.
acid-base equilibrium listen (A-sid-bays EE-kwuh-LIH-bree-um)
In medicine, the state of having the right amount of acid and base in the blood and other body fluids. Keeping a normal acid-base equilibrium is important for the body to work the way it should. Also called acid-base balance.
acidification listen (a-SIH-dih-fih-KAY-shun)
The process of making or becoming an acid. An acid is a substance that gives off hydrogen ions in water and forms salts by combining with certain metals.
acidity listen (a-SIH-dih-tee)
Describes the amount of acid in a substance. An acid is a chemical that gives off hydrogen ions in water and forms salts by combining with certain metals. Acidity is measured on a scale called the pH scale. On this scale, a pH value of 7 is neutral, and a pH value of less than 7 to 0 shows increasing acidity.
acitretin listen (A-sih-TREH-tin)
A substance that is used in the prevention of cancer and in the treatment of psoriasis. It belongs to the family of drugs called retinoids.
ACN53
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. ACN53 is a weakened adenovirus that carries the p53 gene into tumor cells, causing them to die. It is a type of gene therapy. Also called rAd/p53, recombinant adenovirus-p53, and SCH-58500.
acne listen (AK-nee)
A disorder of the skin in which oil glands and hair glands become inflamed.
acolbifene hydrochloride listen (ay-KOLE-bih-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the prevention of breast cancer in women at high risk of breast cancer. Acolbifene hydrochloride binds to estrogen receptors in the body and blocks the effects of estrogen in the breast. It is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM).
acoustic listen (uh-KOOS-tik)
Having to do with sound or hearing.
acoustic neurofibromatosis listen (uh-KOOS-tik NOOR-oh-FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis)
A genetic condition in which tumors form on the nerves of the inner ear and cause loss of hearing and balance. Tumors may also occur in the brain and on nerves in the skull and spinal cord, and may cause loss of speech, eye movement, and the ability to swallow. Also called neurofibromatosis type 2 and NF2.
acquired immunodeficiency syndrome listen (uh-KWY-erd IH-myoo-noh-deh-FIH-shun-see SIN-drome)
A disease caused by the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). People with acquired immunodeficiency syndrome are at an increased risk for developing certain cancers and for infections that usually occur only in individuals with a weak immune system. Also called AIDS.
acquired pure red cell aplasia listen (uh-KWY-erd … sel uh-PLAY-zhuh)
A rare disorder in which the bone marrow makes almost no red blood cells. It may be caused by infection or by certain drugs. Patients with this disorder may also have a thymoma (a tumor of the thymus) or an autoimmune condition such as lupus erythematosus or rheumatoid arthritis.
acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura (uh-KWY-erd throm-BAH-tik THROM-boh-sy-toh-PEE-nik PUR-pyoo-ruh)
A rare condition in which blood clots form in small blood vessels throughout the body. These clots can block the flow of blood and oxygen to the body’s organs, which leads to a lower-than-normal number of platelets in the blood. Signs and symptoms of acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura include purple bruises or tiny red or purple spots on the skin, bleeding problems, anemia, fever, chest pain, nervous system problems, and kidney problems. acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura occurs when the body starts producing antibodies that block an enzyme called ADAMTS13, which is involved in blood clotting. It may be brought on by certain diseases or conditions (such as pregnancy, cancer, lupus, HIV, or other infections), certain medicines (such as chemotherapy or hormone therapy), or certain procedures (such as surgery or a stem cell transplant). acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura usually occurs in adults. Also called aTTP.
acridine carboxamide listen (A-krih-deen kar-BOK-suh-mide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called DACA.
acromegaly listen (A-kroh-MEH-guh-lee)
A condition in which the pituitary gland makes too much growth hormone after normal growth of the skeleton is finished. This causes the bones of the hands, feet, head, and face to grow larger than normal. Acromegaly can be caused by a pituitary gland tumor.
acrylonitrile listen (ak-rih-loh-NY-tril)
A substance used to make plastics, rubber, and textiles. Being exposed to acrylonitrile may increase the risk of developing certain cancers, such as lung, brain, or prostate cancer.
AC-T
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called AC-T regimen and AC-Taxol regimen.
AC-T regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called AC-T and AC-Taxol regimen.
AC-Taxol regimen listen (… TAK-sol REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called AC-T and AC-T regimen.
Actemra listen (ak-TEM-ruh)
A drug used to treat severe or life-threatening cytokine release syndrome caused by a type of immunotherapy called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) T-cell therapy. It is used in patients aged 2 years and older. Actemra is also used to treat certain types of arthritis and a condition that causes inflammation of the lining of the arteries. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Actemra binds to receptors for a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by white blood cells and other cells in the body. This may help lower the body’s immune response and reduce inflammation. Actemra is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called tocilizumab.
ACTH
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. ACTH acts on the outer part of the adrenal gland to control its release of corticosteroid hormones. More ACTH is made during times of stress. Also called adrenocorticotropic hormone and corticotropin.
AC-TH regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol) and trastuzumab (Herceptin). Also called AC-T-T, AC-T-T regimen, and sequential AC/Taxol-Trastuzumab regimen.
Actinex listen (AK-tih-nex)
A drug put on the skin to treat growths caused by sun exposure. A form of Actinex that is taken by mouth is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. Actinex is an antioxidant, and it may block certain enzymes needed for tumor growth. Also called masoprocol, NDGA, and nordihydroguaiaretic acid.
actinic keratosis listen (ak-TIH-nik KAYR-uh-TOH-sis)
A thick, scaly patch of skin that may become cancer. It usually forms on areas exposed to the sun, such as the face, scalp, back of the hands, or chest. It is most common in people with fair skin. Also called senile keratosis and solar keratosis.
actinomycin D listen (AK-tih-noh-MY-sin …)
A drug used to treat Ewing sarcoma, gestational trophoblastic tumor, Wilms tumor, and certain types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat rhabdomyosarcoma in children. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Actinomycin D comes from the bacterium Streptomyces parvulus. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anticancer antibiotic. Also called Cosmegen and dactinomycin.
action study listen (AK-shun STUH-dee)
In cancer prevention clinical trials, a study that focuses on finding out whether actions people take can prevent cancer.
Activase listen (AK-tih-vays)
A form of tissue plasminogen activator that is made in the laboratory. It helps dissolve blood clots and is used to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called Alteplase, r-tPA, and recombinant tissue plasminogen activator.
activate listen (AK-tih-vayt)
In biology, to stimulate a cell in a resting state to become active. This causes biochemical and functional changes in the activated cell.
active surveillance listen (AK-tiv ser-VAY-lents)
A treatment plan that involves closely watching a patient’s condition but not giving any treatment unless there are changes in test results that show the condition is getting worse. Active surveillance may be used to avoid or delay the need for treatments such as radiation therapy or surgery, which can cause side effects or other problems. During active surveillance, certain exams and tests are done on a regular schedule. It may be used in the treatment of certain types of cancer, such as prostate cancer, urethral cancer, and intraocular (eye) melanoma. It is a type of expectant management.
activities of daily living listen (ak-TIH-vih-teez…DAY-lee LIH-ving)
The tasks of everyday life. These activities include eating, dressing, getting into or out of a bed or chair, taking a bath or shower, and using the toilet. Instrumental activities of daily living are activities related to independent living and include preparing meals, managing money, shopping, doing housework, and using a telephone. Also called ADL.
Actos listen (AK-tose)
A drug that is used to treat type 2 diabetes and is being studied in the prevention of head and neck cancer. It may be able to stop leukoplakia (a condition affecting the mouth ) from developing into cancer. It is a type of thiazolidinedione. Also called pioglitazone.
AC-T-T
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol) and trastuzumab (Herceptin). Also called AC-T-T regimen, AC-TH regimen, and sequential AC/Taxol-Trastuzumab regimen.
AC-T-T regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol) and trastuzumab (Herceptin). Also called AC-T-T, AC-TH regimen, and sequential AC/Taxol-Trastuzumab regimen.
acupoint listen (AK-yoo-poynt)
A specific spot on the body where an acupuncture needle may be inserted to control pain and other symptoms. Also called acupuncture point.
acupressure listen (AK-yoo-PREH-sher)
The application of pressure or localized massage to specific sites on the body to control symptoms such as pain or nausea. It is a type of complementary and alternative medicine.
acupuncture listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
The technique of inserting thin needles through the skin at specific points on the body to control pain and other symptoms. It is a type of complementary and alternative medicine.
acupuncture needle listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cher NEE-dul)
A stainless steel needle that is slightly thicker than a human hair. Acupuncture needles are inserted through the skin at specific points on the body to control pain and other symptoms.
acupuncture point listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cher poynt)
A specific spot on the body where an acupuncture needle may be inserted to control pain and other symptoms. Also called acupoint.
acupuncture point injection listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cher poynt in-JEK-shun)
A procedure in which drugs, vitamins, herbal extracts, or other fluids are injected into the body at an acupuncture point using a syringe and needle.
acupuncture-like transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cher-like tranz-kyoo-TAY-nee-us ee-LEK-trih-kul nerv STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
A procedure in which mild electric currents are applied to certain acupuncture points (spots on the body where an acupuncture needle may be inserted to control pain and other symptoms) on the skin. It is being studied in the treatment of dry mouth caused by radiation therapy for cancer. Also called ALTENS.
acupuncturist listen (AK-yoo-PUNK-cheh-rist)
A person trained in acupuncture (therapy that uses thin needles inserted through the skin at specific points on the body to control pain and other symptoms). Acupuncture is a type of complementary and alternative medicine.
acustimulation listen (AK-yoo-STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
Mild electrical stimulation of acupuncture points to control symptoms such as nausea and vomiting.
acute listen (uh-KYOOT)
Symptoms or signs that begin and worsen quickly; not chronic.
acute bacterial prostatitis listen (uh-KYOOT bak-TEER-ee-ul PROS-tuh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the prostate gland that begins suddenly and gets worse quickly. It is caused by a bacterial infection. Symptoms include fever and chills, body aches, pain in the lower back and genital area, a burning feeling during urination, and problems with emptying the bladder all the way.
acute leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A rapidly progressing cancer that starts in blood-forming tissue such as the bone marrow, and causes large numbers of white blood cells to be produced and enter the blood stream.
acute lymphoblastic leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia (blood cancer) that comes on quickly and is fast growing. In acute lymphoblastic leukemia, there are too many lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) in the blood and bone marrow. Also called acute lymphocytic leukemia and ALL.
acute lymphocytic leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia (blood cancer) that comes on quickly and is fast growing. In acute lymphocytic leukemia, there are too many lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) in the blood and bone marrow. Also called acute lymphoblastic leukemia and ALL.
acute myeloblastic leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT MY-eh-loh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myelogenous leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, acute nonlymphocytic leukemia, AML, and ANLL.
acute myelogenous leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myeloblastic leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, acute nonlymphocytic leukemia, AML, and ANLL.
acute myeloid leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT MY-eh-loyd loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myeloblastic leukemia, acute myelogenous leukemia, acute nonlymphocytic leukemia, AML, and ANLL.
acute myeloid leukemia with myelodysplasia-related changes listen (uh-KYOOT MY-eh-loyd loo-KEE-mee-uh … MY-eh-loh-dis-PLAY-zhuh-ree-LAY-ted CHAYN-jiz)
A type of acute myeloid leukemia in which at least 20% of a patient’s blood or bone marrow is myeloblasts (immature white blood cells) and the patient has one of the following conditions: 1) has had myelodysplastic syndrome (MDS) or a myelodysplastic/myeloproliferative neoplasm (MDS/MPN) before, 2) cells that have changes in certain chromosomes that are similar to those found in MDS, or 3) at least 50% of the cells (of at least two types of blood cells) are abnormal. Acute myeloid leukemia with myelodysplasia-related changes usually occurs in older adults and has a poor prognosis. Also called AML-MRC.
acute nonlymphocytic leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT non-LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myeloblastic leukemia, acute myelogenous leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, AML, and ANLL.
acute pain listen (uh-KYOOT payn)
Pain that comes on quickly, can be severe, but lasts a relatively short time.
acute promyelocytic leukemia listen (uh-KYOOT proh-MY-eh-loh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow. It is usually marked by an exchange of parts of chromosomes 15 and 17. Also called APL and promyelocytic leukemia.
acute radiation sickness listen (uh-KYOOT RAY-dee-AY-shun SIK-nes)
Serious illness caused by being exposed to high doses of certain types of radiation, usually over a short period of time. Symptoms of acute radiation sickness usually occur right after exposure but they may happen over time, and they may come and go. Symptoms include nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, dizziness, weakness, fatigue, bleeding, hair loss, swelling, itching, and redness of the skin, and other skin problems. Very large doses of radiation may cause death. Also called acute radiation syndrome, radiation poisoning, radiation sickness, and radiation sickness syndrome.
acute radiation syndrome listen (uh-KYOOT RAY-dee-AY-shun SIN-drome)
Serious illness caused by being exposed to high doses of certain types of radiation, usually over a short period of time. Symptoms of acute radiation syndrome usually occur right after exposure but they may happen over time, and they may come and go. Symptoms include nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, dizziness, weakness, fatigue, bleeding, hair loss, swelling, itching, and redness of the skin, and other skin problems. Very large doses of radiation may cause death. Also called acute radiation sickness, radiation poisoning, radiation sickness, and radiation sickness syndrome.
acyclovir listen (ay-SY-kloh-veer)
A substance used to prevent or treat cytomegalovirus and herpes simplex infections that may occur when the body is immunosuppressed. It belongs to the family of drugs called antivirals.
AD 32
A drug used to treat bladder carcinoma in situ that did not get better after treatment with bacillus Calmette-Guerin (BCG). It is used in patients who cannot have surgery right away to remove all or part of the bladder. AD 32 is given as a solution through a catheter that is placed into the bladder. It blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. AD 32 is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called valrubicin and Valstar.
ADC
A substance made up of a monoclonal antibody chemically linked to a drug. The monoclonal antibody binds to specific proteins or receptors found on certain types of cells, including cancer cells. The linked drug enters these cells and kills them without harming other cells. Some ADCs are used to treat cancer. Also called antibody-drug conjugate.
ADCC
A type of immune reaction in which a target cell or microbe is coated with antibodies and killed by certain types of white blood cells. The white blood cells bind to the antibodies and release substances that kill the target cells or microbes. Also called antibody-dependent cell-mediated cytotoxicity and antibody-dependent cellular cytotoxicity.
Adcetris listen (ad-SEH-tris)
A drug used with other anticancer drugs to treat systemic anaplastic large cell lymphoma or other peripheral T-cell lymphomas, including angioimmunoblastic T-cell lymphoma, that are CD30 positive and have not been treated with other therapy. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat stage III or stage IV classical Hodgkin lymphoma that has not been treated with other therapy. Adcetris is also used to treat certain types of Hodgkin lymphoma, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and mycosis fungoides that were treated with other therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Adcetris contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD30, which is found on some lymphoma cells. It also contains an anticancer drug, which may help kill cancer cells. Adcetris is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called brentuximab vedotin and SGN-35.
Adderall listen (A-deh-rawl)
A combination of drugs used as a treatment for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and narcolepsy (a sleep disorder). It is a type of stimulant. Also called dextroamphetamine-amphetamine.
addiction listen (uh-DIK-shun)
An uncontrollable craving, seeking, and use of a substance, such as a drug or alcohol.
Addison disease listen (A-dih-sun dih-ZEEZ)
A rare disorder in which the adrenal glands do not make enough of certain hormones. Symptoms include weight loss, loss of appetite, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, muscle weakness, fatigue, low blood sugar, low blood pressure, and patchy or dark skin. Most cases of the disorder are caused by immune system problems, but may also be caused by infection, cancer, or other diseases. Also called adrenal insufficiency.
ADE
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat childhood acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It includes the drugs cytarabine (Ara-C), daunorubicin hydrochloride, and etoposide phosphate. Also called ADE regimen.
ADE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat childhood acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It includes the drugs cytarabine (Ara-C), daunorubicin hydrochloride, and etoposide phosphate. Also called ADE.
adenine listen (A-deh-neen)
A chemical compound that is used to make one of the building blocks of DNA and RNA. It is also a part of many substances in the body that give energy to cells. Adenine is a type of purine.
adenocarcinoma listen (A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in glandular (secretory) cells. Glandular cells are found in tissue that lines certain internal organs and makes and releases substances in the body, such as mucus, digestive juices, or other fluids. Most cancers of the breast, pancreas, lung, prostate, and colon are adenocarcinomas.
adenocarcinoma in situ listen (A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the glandular tissue that lines certain internal organs, such as the uterus, cervix, lung, pancreas, and colon. Adenocarcinoma in situ, which occurs most often in the cervix, may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Also called AIS.
adenoid cystic carcinoma listen (A-deh-noyd SIS-tik KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that usually begins in the salivary glands.
adenoma listen (A-deh-NOH-muh)
A tumor that is not cancer. It starts in gland-like cells of the epithelial tissue (thin layer of tissue that covers organs, glands, and other structures within the body).
adenopathy listen (A-deh-NAH-puh-thee)
Large or swollen lymph glands.
adenosarcoma listen (A-den-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A tumor that is a mixture of an adenoma (a tumor that starts in the gland-like cells of epithelial tissue) and a sarcoma (a tumor that starts in bone, cartilage, fat, muscle, blood vessels, or other connective or supportive tissue). An example of an adenosarcoma is Wilms tumor.
adenosine triphosphate listen (uh-DEH-nuh-seen try-FOS-fayt)
A substance present in all living cells that provides energy for many metabolic processes and is involved in making RNA. Adenosine triphosphate made in the laboratory is being studied in patients with advanced solid tumors to see if it can decrease weight loss and improve muscle strength. Also called ATP.
adenosis listen (A-deh-NOH-sis)
A disease or abnormal change in a gland. Breast adenosis is a benign condition in which the lobules are larger than usual.
adenosquamous carcinoma listen (A-deh-noh-SKWAY-mus KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that contains two types of cells: squamous cells (thin, flat cells that line certain organs) and gland-like cells.
adenovirus listen (A-den-oh-VY-rus)
A member of a family of viruses that can cause infections in the respiratory tract, eye, and gastrointestinal tract. Forms of adenoviruses that do not cause disease are used in gene therapy. They carry genes that may fix defects in cells or kill cancer cells.
ADH
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the lining of breast ducts and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having ADH increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called atypical ductal breast hyperplasia and atypical ductal hyperplasia.
ADI-PEG 20
A substance being studied in the treatment of melanoma, liver cancer, and other types of cancer. It breaks down the amino acid arginine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need arginine to grow. It is a type of iminohydrolase. Also called pegylated arginine deiminase.
adjunct agent listen (A-junkt AY-jent)
In cancer therapy, a drug or substance used in addition to the primary therapy.
adjunct therapy listen (A-junkt THAYR-uh-pee)
Another treatment used together with the primary treatment. Its purpose is to assist the primary treatment. Also called adjunctive therapy.
adjunctive therapy listen (A-junk-tiv THAYR-uh-pee)
Another treatment used together with the primary treatment. Its purpose is to assist the primary treatment. Also called adjunct therapy.
adjustment disorder listen (uh-JUST-ment dis-OR-der)
A condition in which a person responds to a stressful event (such as an illness, job loss, or divorce) with extreme emotions and actions that cause problems at work and home.
adjuvant therapy listen (A-joo-vunt THAYR-uh-pee)
Additional cancer treatment given after the primary treatment to lower the risk that the cancer will come back. Adjuvant therapy may include chemotherapy, radiation therapy, hormone therapy, targeted therapy, or biological therapy.
ADL
Activities of daily living. The tasks of everyday life. Basic ADLs include eating, dressing, getting into or out of a bed or chair, taking a bath or shower, and using the toilet. Instrumental activities of daily living (IADL) are activities related to independent living and include preparing meals, managing money, shopping, doing housework, and using a telephone. Also called activities of daily living.
administration listen (ad-MIH-nih-STRAY-shun)
In medicine, the act of giving a treatment, such as a drug, to a patient. It can also refer to the way it is given, the dose, or how often it is given.
adnexal mass listen (ad-NEK-sul…)
A lump in tissue near the uterus, usually in the ovary or fallopian tube. Adnexal masses include ovarian cysts, ectopic (tubal) pregnancies, and benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) tumors.
adolescent listen (A-doh-LEH-sent)
A young person who has begun puberty but has not yet become an adult. During adolescence a child experiences physical and hormonal changes that mark the transition into adulthood. Adolescents are generally between the ages of 10 and 19 years.
adoptive cell therapy listen (uh-DOP-tiv sel THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of immunotherapy in which T cells (a type of immune cell) are given to a patient to help the body fight diseases, such as cancer. In cancer therapy, T cells are usually taken from the patient's own blood or tumor tissue, grown in large numbers in the laboratory, and then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight the cancer. Sometimes, the T cells are changed in the laboratory to make them better able to target the patient's cancer cells and kill them. Types of adoptive cell therapy include chimeric antigen receptor T-cell (CAR T-cell) therapy and tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte (TIL) therapy. Adoptive cell therapy that uses T cells from a donor is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and some infections. Also called adoptive cell transfer, cellular adoptive immunotherapy, and T-cell transfer therapy.
adoptive cell transfer listen (uh-DOP-tiv sel TRANZ-fer)
A type of immunotherapy in which T cells (a type of immune cell) are given to a patient to help the body fight diseases, such as cancer. In cancer therapy, T cells are usually taken from the patient's own blood or tumor tissue, grown in large numbers in the laboratory, and then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight the cancer. Sometimes, the T cells are changed in the laboratory to make them better able to target the patient's cancer cells and kill them. Types of adoptive cell transfer include chimeric antigen receptor T-cell (CAR T-cell) therapy and tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte (TIL) therapy. Adoptive cell transfer that uses T cells from a donor is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and some infections. Also called adoptive cell therapy, cellular adoptive immunotherapy, and T-cell transfer therapy.
ado-trastuzumab emtansine listen (A-doh-tras-TOO-zoo-mab em-TAN-seen)
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is used in certain patients who have already been treated with an anticancer drug called trastuzumab and a type of drug called a taxane. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ado-trastuzumab emtansine contains a monoclonal antibody called trastuzumab that binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some breast cancer cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called DM1, which may help kill cancer cells. Ado-trastuzumab emtansine is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Kadcyla and T-DM1.
adrenal cancer listen (uh-DREE-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the adrenal glands (two glands located just above the kidneys). The adrenal glands make hormones that control heart rate, blood pressure, and other important body functions. Adrenal cancer that starts in the outside layer of the adrenal gland is called adrenocortical carcinoma. Adrenal cancer that starts in the center of the adrenal gland is called malignant pheochromocytoma.
adrenal cortex listen (uh-DREE-nul KOR-tex)
The outer part of the adrenal gland (a small organ on top of each kidney). The adrenal cortex makes androgen and corticosteroid hormones.
adrenal gland listen (uh-DREE-nul...)
A small gland that makes steroid hormones, adrenaline, and noradrenaline. These hormones help control heart rate, blood pressure, and other important body functions. There are two adrenal glands, one on top of each kidney. Also called suprarenal gland.
adrenal insufficiency listen (uh-DREE-nul IN-suh-FIH-shen-see)
A rare disorder in which the adrenal glands do not make enough of certain hormones. Symptoms include weight loss, loss of appetite, nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, muscle weakness, fatigue, low blood sugar, low blood pressure, and patchy or dark skin. Most cases of the disorder are caused by immune system problems, but may also be caused by infection, cancer, or other diseases. Also called Addison disease.
adrenal medulla listen (uh-DREE-nul meh-DOO-luh)
The inner part of the adrenal gland (a small organ on top of each kidney). The adrenal medulla makes chemicals such as epinephrine (adrenaline) and norepinephrine (noradrenaline) which are involved in sending nerve signals.
adrenalectomy listen (uh-DREE-nul-EK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or both adrenal glands (a small organ on top of each kidney).
adrenaline listen (uh-DREH-nuh-lin)
A hormone and neurotransmitter. Also called epinephrine.
adrenocortical listen (uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul)
Having to do with or made by the outer layer of the adrenal gland, which produces steroid hormones. There is an adrenal gland on top of each kidney.
adrenocortical cancer listen (uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the outer layer of tissue of the adrenal gland (a small organ on top of each kidney that makes steroid hormones, adrenaline, and noradrenaline to control heart rate, blood pressure, and other body functions). Also called adrenocortical carcinoma and cancer of the adrenal cortex.
adrenocortical carcinoma listen (uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare cancer that forms in the outer layer of tissue of the adrenal gland (a small organ on top of each kidney that makes steroid hormones, adrenaline, and noradrenaline to control heart rate, blood pressure, and other body functions). Also called adrenocortical cancer and cancer of the adrenal cortex.
adrenocorticotropic hormone listen (uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-koh-TROH-pik HOR-mone)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. Adrenocorticotropic hormone acts on the outer part of the adrenal gland to control its release of corticosteroid hormones. More adrenocorticotropic hormone is made during times of stress. Also called ACTH and corticotropin.
AdreView listen (A-dreh-VYOO)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 123 that is used to find certain types of tumors, including pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. Radiation from I 123 may help show where cancer cells are in the body. AdreView is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 123I-MIBG, iobenguane I 123, and iodine I 123-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
Adriamycin PFS listen (AY-dree-uh-MY-sin …)
A brand name for doxorubicin hydrochloride, which is used to treat many types of cancer. Adriamycin PFS brand has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
Adriamycin RDF listen (AY-dree-uh-MY-sin …)
A brand name for doxorubicin hydrochloride, which is used to treat many types of cancer. Adriamycin RDF brand has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
adult progeria listen (uh-DULT proh-JEER-ee-uh)
An inherited disorder marked by rapid aging that begins in early adolescence. Patients may be shorter than average, and have health problems such as loss and graying of hair, hardening of the arteries, thinning of the bones, diabetes, and thin, hardened skin. They also have an increased risk of cancer, especially osteosarcoma (a type of bone cancer). Adult progeria is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene involved in cell division. It is a type of autosomal recessive gene disease. Also called Werner syndrome and WS.
adult rickets listen (uh-DULT RIH-kets)
A condition in adults in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is usually caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet, not getting enough sunlight, or a problem with the way the body uses vitamin D. Symptoms include bone pain and muscle weakness. When the condition occurs in children, it is called rickets. Also called osteomalacia.
adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma listen (uh-DULT T-sel loo-KEE-mee-uh/lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma caused by the human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 (HTLV-1). It is marked by bone and skin lesions, high calcium levels, and enlarged lymph nodes, spleen, and liver. Also called ATLL.
adulterant listen (uh-DUL-teh-runt)
A substance added to a product but not listed as an ingredient, or a substance that ends up in a product by accident when the product is made. Adulterants may be in foods, drugs, and other products. An adulterant may cause a product to be harmful, cheaper to make, or not work as it should.
adult-type fibrosarcoma listen (uh-DULT… FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue. It can occur anywhere in the body. Adult-type fibrosarcoma may spread to nearby tissue or to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or bones. It may also recur (come back) after treatment. Adult-type fibrosarcoma usually occurs in young and middle-aged adults, but it can also occur in children. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
advance directive listen (ad-VANS duh-REK-tiv)
A legal document that states a person’s wishes about receiving medical care if that person is no longer able to make medical decisions because of a serious illness or injury. An advance directive may also give a person (such as a spouse, relative, or friend) the authority to make medical decisions for another person when that person can no longer make decisions. There are different types of advance directives, including a living will, durable power of attorney (DPA) for healthcare, and do not resuscitate (DNR) orders. In the United States, the laws for advance directives may be different for each state, and each state may allow only certain types of advance directives.
advanced cancer listen (ad-VANST KAN-ser)
Cancer that is unlikely to be cured or controlled with treatment. The cancer may have spread from where it first started to nearby tissue, lymph nodes, or distant parts of the body. Treatment may be given to help shrink the tumor, slow the growth of cancer cells, or relieve symptoms.
advanced practice nurse listen (ad-VANST PRAK-tis ...)
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to diagnose and treat disease. Advanced practice nurses are licensed at the state level and certified by national nursing organizations. In cancer care, an advanced practice nurse may manage the primary care of patients and their families, based on a practice agreement with a doctor. Also called APN, NP, and nurse practitioner.
adverse effect listen (AD-vers eh-FEKT)
An unexpected medical problem that happens during treatment with a drug or other therapy. Adverse effects may be mild, moderate, or severe, and may be caused by something other than the drug or therapy being given. Also called adverse event.
adverse event listen (AD-vers eh-VENT)
An unexpected medical problem that happens during treatment with a drug or other therapy. Adverse events may be mild, moderate, or severe, and may be caused by something other than the drug or therapy being given. Also called adverse effect.
Advil listen (AD-vil)
A drug used to treat fever, swelling, pain, and redness by preventing the body from making a substance that causes inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called ibuprofen and Motrin.
AE-941
A substance made from shark cartilage that is being studied for its ability to prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
AEE788
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called protein tyrosine kinase inhibitors and angiogenesis inhibitors.
AEG35156
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. AEG35156 may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein called XIAP that helps cells live longer. It also makes cancer cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide, and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called GEM640.
aerobic listen (ayr-OH-bik)
In biochemistry, reactions that need oxygen to happen or happen when oxygen is present.
aerobic exercise listen (ayr-OH-bik EK-ser-size)
Physical activity that increases the heart rate and the body’s use of oxygen. It helps improve a person’s physical fitness.
aerobic metabolism listen (ayr-OH-bik meh-TA-buh-lih-zum)
A chemical process in which oxygen is used to make energy from carbohydrates (sugars). Also called aerobic respiration, cell respiration, and oxidative metabolism.
aerobic respiration listen (ayr-OH-bik RES-pih-RAY-shun)
A chemical process in which oxygen is used to make energy from carbohydrates (sugars). Also called aerobic metabolism, cell respiration, and oxidative metabolism.
aerodigestive tract listen (ayr-OH-dy-JES-tiv trakt)
The combined organs and tissues of the respiratory tract and the upper part of the digestive tract (including the lips, mouth, tongue, nose, throat, vocal cords, and part of the esophagus and windpipe).
aerosolize listen (AYR-oh-sah-lize)
In medicine, to turn a liquid drug into a fine mist that can be inhaled.
afatinib dimaleate listen (ay-FA-tih-nib dy-MAY-lee-AYT)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also used to treat squamous cell NSCLC that has spread to other parts of the body and got worse after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Afatinib dimaleate blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Afatinib dimaleate is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Gilotrif.
affinity listen (uh-FIH-nih-tee)
In chemistry and biology, the strength of the attaction between two substances, such as two chemicals, or an antigen and an antibody.
affinity reagent listen (uh-FIH-nih-tee ree-AY-jent)
In chemistry and biology, a compound that binds specific substances, such as proteins or nucleic acids. Many affinity reagents are antibodies. They are used to analyze tissue samples to help diagnose diseases.
Afinitor listen (uh-FIH-nih-tor)
A drug used with exemestane to treat some postmenopausal women with advanced breast cancer that is hormone receptor positive and HER2 negative. It is also used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) and certain types of pancreatic, lung, and gastrointestinal neuroendocrine tumors. Afinitor is also used to treat renal angiomyolipoma (a type of benign kidney tumor) and subependymal giant cell astrocytoma (a type of benign brain tumor) in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. It blocks a protein involved in cell division, which may help keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Afinitor contains the active ingredient everolimus. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
Afinitor Disperz listen (uh-FIH-nih-tor DIS-perz)
A drug used to treat subependymal giant cell astrocytoma (a type of benign brain tumor) and certain types of seizures in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. Afinitor Disperz blocks a protein involved in cell division, which may help keep abnormal cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It may also help prevent or treat seizures in some patients. Afinitor Disperz contains the active ingredient everolimus. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
aflatoxin listen (A-fluh-TOK-sin)
A harmful substance made by certain types of mold (Aspergillus flavus and Aspergillus parasiticus) that is often found on poorly stored grains and nuts. Consumption of foods contaminated with aflatoxin is a risk factor for primary liver cancer.
AFP
A protein normally produced by a fetus. AFP levels are usually undetectable in the blood of healthy adult men or women (who are not pregnant). An elevated level of AFP suggests the presence of either a primary liver cancer or germ cell tumor. Also called alpha-fetoprotein.
AFP464
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. AFP464 kills cancer cells or stops them from dividing. It is a type of aminoflavone.
AG-013736
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors and protein tyrosine kinase inhibitors.
AG014699
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. AG014699 is also used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes and who have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. AG014699 blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. AG014699 is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699, Rubraca, and rucaparib camsylate.
AG2037
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called glycinamide ribonucleotide formyl transferase inhibitors.
AG3340
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor and belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors. Also called prinomastat.
AG337
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors. Also called nolatrexed and Thymitaq.
aganglionic megacolon listen (ay-GANG-glee-AH-nik MEH-guh-KOH-lun)
A condition in which certain nerve cells are missing from the muscle layers of part of the large intestine. This causes severe constipation or blockage of the large intestine. Constipation is when stool becomes hard, dry, and difficult to pass and bowel movements occur less often than normal. Other symptoms include swollen abdomen, vomiting, bloody diarrhea, gas, lack of energy, and trouble gaining weight. Aganglionic megacolon is present from birth, but the symptoms may not appear until later in a child’s life. This condition has been linked to an increased risk of thyroid cancer and neuroblastoma. Also called Hirschsprung disease.
AGC
A finding of abnormal cells in a Pap test. The glandular cells come from the inner part of the cervix or the lining of the uterus. This finding may be a sign of cancer or other serious condition, and more testing may be needed. Also called atypical glandular cells.
agent study listen (AY-jent STUH-dee)
In cancer prevention, a clinical trial that studies whether taking certain medicines, vitamins, minerals, or food supplements can prevent cancer. Also called chemoprevention study.
age-related macular degeneration listen (ayj-ree-LAY-ted MA-kyoo-ler dee-JEH-neh-RAY-shun)
A condition in which there is a slow breakdown of cells in the center of the retina (the light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). This blocks vision in the center of the eye and can cause problems with activities such as reading and driving. Age-related macular degeneration is most often seen in people who are over the age of 50. Also called AMD, ARMD, and macular degeneration.
agglutinin listen (uh-GLOO-tih-nin)
A substance that makes particles (such as bacteria or cells) stick together to form a clump or a mass.
aggravating factor listen (A-gruh-VAY-ting FAK-ter)
Something that makes a condition worse. For example, tobacco smoke is an aggravating factor for asthma.
aggressive listen (uh-GREH-siv)
In medicine, describes a tumor or disease that forms, grows, or spreads quickly. It may also describe treatment that is more severe or intense than usual.
aggressive fibromatosis listen (uh-GREH-siv FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis)
A type of soft tissue tumor that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue, usually in the arms, legs, or abdomen. It may also occur in the head and neck. Aggressive fibromatoses are usually benign (not cancer). They often recur (come back) after treatment and spread to nearby tissue, but they rarely spread to other parts of the body. They may occur in adults or children. Also called desmoid tumor and desmoid-type fibromatosis.
aggressive lymphoma listen (uh-GREH-siv lim-FOH-muh)
A type of lymphoma that grows and spreads quickly and has severe symptoms. Also called high-grade lymphoma and intermediate-grade lymphoma.
aggressive systemic mastocytosis listen (uh-GREH-siv sis-TEH-mik MAS-toh-sy-TOH-sis)
A rare condition in which too many mast cells (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs in the body, including the bone marrow, lymph nodes, bone, liver, spleen, and small intestine. Aggressive systemic mastocytosis may get worse quickly and cause severe symptoms and organ damage. Sometimes, it may become mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia). Aggressive systemic mastocytosis usually occurs in adults. Also called ASM.
agitation listen (A-jih-TAY-shun)
A condition in which a person is unable to relax and be still. The person may be very tense and irritable, and become easily annoyed by small things. He or she may be eager to have an argument, and be unwilling to work with caregivers to make the situation better.
agnogenic myeloid metaplasia listen (ag-noh-JEH-nik MY-eh-loyd meh-tuh-PLAY-zhuh)
A progressive, chronic disease in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue and blood is made in organs such as the liver and the spleen, instead of in the bone marrow. This disease is marked by an enlarged spleen and progressive anemia. Also called chronic idiopathic myelofibrosis, idiopathic myelofibrosis, myelosclerosis with myeloid metaplasia, and primary myelofibrosis.
agonist listen (A-guh-nist)
A drug or substance that binds to a receptor inside a cell or on its surface and causes the same action as the substance that normally binds to the receptor.
agoraphobia listen (A-gor-uh-FOH-bee-uh)
An intense fear of being in open places or in situations where it may be hard to escape, or where help may not be available. People with agoraphobia are usually very anxious about having a panic attack in a public place. They may also have a fear of being alone or have trouble leaving their home. They usually avoid elevators, bridges, and public places. Agoraphobia is a type of phobia and a type of anxiety disorder.
agranulocyte listen (ay-GRAN-yoo-loh-SITE)
A type of white blood cell. Monocytes and lymphocytes are agranulocytes.
AGUS
A term that has been used to describe abnormal cells that come from glands in the walls of the cervix (the lower, narrow end of the uterus). These abnormal cells are found in a small number of Pap smears (a procedure used to detect cervical cancer) and may be a sign of more serious lesions or cancer. The term used now is atypical glandular cells. Also called atypical glandular cells of uncertain significance and atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance.
AHA
One of a group of substances that are found in several types of fruit and in milk. They are used in skin care products to reduce wrinkles and soften the skin. Examples of AHAs are glycolic acid, lactic acid, and citric acid. Also called alpha hydroxyl acid and fruit acid.
Aicardi syndrome listen (ay-KAR-dee SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder marked by a lack of tissue connecting the left and right halves of the brain, seizures, lesions on the back of the eye (retina), and other brain and eye abnormalities. Other problems may include unusual facial features, defects of the hands, spine, and ribs, and developmental and gastrointestinal problems. When Aicardi syndrome occurs, it is almost always in a newborn girl. People with Aicardi syndrome have an increased risk of certain tumors, such as hepatoblastoma (a type of liver cancer) and choroid plexus tumors (a rare tumor that forms in the brain).
AIDS listen
A disease caused by the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). People with AIDS are at an increased risk for developing certain cancers and for infections that usually occur only in individuals with a weak immune system. Also called acquired immunodeficiency syndrome.
AIDS-defining cancer listen (… deh-FY-ning KAN-ser)
A type of cancer that a person infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) is at high risk of developing. If a person with HIV develops one of these cancers, it means they have AIDS. AIDS-defining cancers include Kaposi sarcoma, certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma, and cervical cancer.
AIDS-related cancer listen (… ree-LAY-ted KAN-ser)
A type of cancer that is more likely to occur in people who are infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). AIDS-related cancers include Kaposi sarcoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, cervical cancer, Hodgkin lymphoma, and cancers of the mouth, throat, liver, lung, and anus.
AIS
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the glandular tissue that lines certain internal organs, such as the uterus, cervix, lung, pancreas, and colon. AIS, which occurs most often in the cervix, may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Also called adenocarcinoma in situ.
AJCC staging system listen (... STAY-jing SIS-tem)
A system to describe the amount and spread of cancer in a patient’s body, using TNM. T describes the size of the tumor and any spread of cancer into nearby tissue; N describes spread of cancer to nearby lymph nodes; and M describes metastasis (spread of cancer to other parts of the body). This system was created and is updated by the American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) and the International Union Against Cancer (UICC). The AJCC staging system is used to describe most types of cancer. Also called TNM staging system.
Akt
A group of enzymes involved in several processes related to cell growth and survival. Akt enzymes help to transfer signals inside cells. An Akt enzyme is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase. Also called protein kinase B.
Akynzeo listen (ay-KIN-zee-oh)
A combination of two drugs used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is a combination of netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride. Akynzeo blocks the action of chemicals in the brain that may trigger nausea and vomiting. Akynzeo is a type of antiemetic. Also called netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride.
Alagille syndrome listen (a-luh-JEEL SIN-drome)
A rare disorder in which there are defects in the small tubes that carry bile (fluid that helps digest fat) out of the liver. These small tubes may be narrow or have an abnormal shape, or there may be fewer of them than normal. This can cause bile to build up in the liver, which may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver damage. Alagille syndrome can also affect other parts of the body, including the heart, kidneys, blood vessels, eyes, face, and spine. It usually occurs in infants and children and may be inherited.
alanine aminopeptidase listen (A-luh-neen uh-MEE-noh-PEP-tih-days)
An enzyme that is normally found in healthy kidneys. It may be found at high levels in the urine when there are kidney problems. It is used as a biomarker to detect damage to the kidneys caused by drugs and other agents. It may also be used to diagnose certain kidney and liver disorders. Also called AAP.
alanine transferase listen (A-luh-neen TRANZ-feh-rays)
An enzyme found in the liver and other tissues. A high level of alanine transferase released into the blood may be a sign of liver damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called serum glutamate pyruvate transaminase and SGPT.
alanosine listen (uh-LAN-oh-seen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites. Also called SDX-102.
albinism listen (AL-bih-NIH-zum)
A group of genetic conditions marked by little or none of the pigment melanin in the skin, hair, and/or eyes. People with albinism may have vision problems and white or yellow hair; reddish, violet, blue or brown eyes; and pale skin.
albumin listen (al-BYOO-min)
A type of protein found in blood, egg white, milk, and other substances.
ALCAR listen (ALL-kar)
A form of the natural substance carnitine that is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is made in muscle and liver tissue and is found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. It is used by many cells in the body to make energy from fat. Also called acetyl-L-carnitine and acetyl-L-carnitine hydrochloride.
ALCL
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma that is usually of the T-cell type. The cancer cells express a marker called CD30 or Ki-1 on the surface, and may appear in the lymph nodes, skin, bones, soft tissues, lungs, or liver. Also called anaplastic large cell lymphoma.
alcohol listen (AL-kuh-hol)
A chemical substance found in drinks such as beer, wine, and liquor. It is also found in some medicines, mouthwashes, household products, and essential oils (scented liquid taken from certain plants). It is made by a chemical process called fermentation that uses sugars and yeast. There are different types of alcohol. The type used to make alcoholic drinks is called ethyl alcohol (ethanol). Drinking regular or large amounts of alcohol may increase the risk of certain types of cancer, such as cancer of the mouth, throat, esophagus, breast, liver, colon, and rectum.
alcohol ablation listen (AL-kuh-hol a-BLAY-shun)
An injection of ethanol (alcohol) through the skin directly into a tumor to kill cancer cells. Ultrasound or a CT scan is used to guide the needle into the tumor. Also called ethanol ablation, PEI, and percutaneous ethanol injection.
alcohol dependence listen (AL-kuh-hol dee-PEN-dents)
A chronic disease in which a person craves drinks that contain alcohol and is unable to control his or her drinking. A person with this disease also needs to drink greater amounts to get the same effect and has withdrawal symptoms after stopping alcohol use. Alcohol dependence affects physical and mental health, and can cause problems with family, friends, and work. Regular heavy alcohol intake increases the risk of several types of cancer. Also called alcoholism.
alcoholism listen (AL-kuh-HAW-LIH-zum)
A chronic disease in which a person craves drinks that contain alcohol and is unable to control his or her drinking. A person with this disease also needs to drink greater amounts to get the same effect and has withdrawal symptoms after stopping alcohol use. Alcoholism affects physical and mental health, and can cause problems with family, friends, and work. Regular heavy alcohol intake increases the risk of several types of cancer. Also called alcohol dependence.
Aldara listen (al-DAR-uh)
A drug used to treat early basal cell skin cancer. It is also used to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer) and genital warts. Aldara is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It may help the immune system kill abnormal cells, including cancer cells. Aldara is a type of immune response modifier. Also called imiquimod.
aldehyde listen (AL-deh-hide)
A type of chemical substance made from alcohol. Aldehydes are found in essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants).
aldesleukin listen (AL-des-LOO-kin)
A drug used to treat melanoma and renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Aldesleukin is a form of interleukin-2 that is made in the laboratory. Aldesleukin increases the activity and growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes (types of white blood cells). This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Aldesleukin is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Proleukin and recombinant human interleukin-2.
aldosterone listen (al-DOS-teh-rone)
A steroid hormone made by the adrenal cortex (the outer layer of the adrenal gland). It helps control the balance of water and salts in the kidney by keeping sodium in and releasing potassium from the body. Too much aldosterone can cause high blood pressure and a build-up of fluid in body tissues. Aldosterone is a type of mineralocorticoid hormone.
Aldrich syndrome listen (ALL-drich SIN-drome)
An inherited immune disorder that occurs in young boys. It causes eczema (a type of skin inflammation), a decrease in the number of platelets (blood cells that help prevent bleeding), and frequent bacterial infections. People with Aldrich syndrome are at increased risk of developing leukemia and lymphoma. Also called Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome.
Alecensa listen (A-leh-SEN-suh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alecensa blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Alecensa is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called alectinib.
alectinib listen (uh-LEK-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alectinib blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Alectinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Alecensa.
alefacept listen (uh-LEH-fuh-sept)
A drug that is used to treat certain skin conditions and is being studied in the treatment of cutaneous (skin-related) T-cell cancer and T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Alefacept is made by combining part of an antibody with a protein that blocks the growth some types of T cells. It is a type of fusion protein and a type of immunosuppressant. Also called Amevive.
alemtuzumab listen (A-lem-TOO-zoo-mab)
A drug used to treat B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alemtuzumab binds to a protein called CD52, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Alemtuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Campath.
alendronate sodium listen (uh-LEN-droh-nayt SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat certain bone conditions, such as osteoporosis and Paget disease of the bone. It is also being studied in the treatment of hypercalcemia (high levels of calcium in the blood) and bone pain caused by cancer. Alendronate sodium slows the breakdown of bone and prevents the loss of calcium. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called Fosamax.
ALH
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the breast lobules and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having ALH increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called atypical lobular breast hyperplasia and atypical lobular hyperplasia.
alimentary tract listen (A-lih-MEN-tuh-ree trakt)
The organs that food and liquids travel through when they are swallowed, digested, absorbed, and leave the body as feces. These organs include the mouth, pharynx (throat), esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large intestine, rectum, and anus. The alimentary tract is part of the digestive system. Also called digestive tract and gastrointestinal tract.
Alimta listen (uh-LIM-tuh)
A drug used alone or with cisplatin to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with cisplatin to treat malignant pleural mesothelioma in patients whose cancer cannot be treated with surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alimta stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of folate antagonist. Also called LY231514 and pemetrexed disodium.
Aliqopa listen (A-lih-KOH-puh)
A drug used to treat follicular lymphoma that has relapsed (come back) after treatment with at least two other anticancer therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Aliqopa blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called copanlisib hydrochloride.
ALK gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), which is involved in cell growth. Mutated (changed) forms of the ALK gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including neuroblastoma, non-small cell lung cancer, and anaplastic large cell lymphoma. These changes may increase the growth of cancer cells. Checking for changes in the ALK gene in tumor tissue may help to plan cancer treatment. Also called anaplastic lymphoma kinase gene.
ALK inhibitor listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), which helps control cell growth. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and spreading. Some ALK inhibitors are used to treat cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called anaplastic lymphoma kinase inhibitor.
ALK positive listen (… PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have a change in the structure of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gene or a higher than normal amount of ALK protein on their surface. In normal cells, ALK helps control cell growth. When cancer cells have the changed ALK gene or make too much ALK protein, the cancer cells may grow more quickly. Knowing whether a cancer is ALK positive may help plan treatment. Cancers that may be ALK positive include neuroblastoma, non-small cell lung cancer, and anaplastic large cell lymphoma. Also called anaplastic lymphoma kinase positive.
alkali listen (AL-kuh-ly)
A chemical that can dissolve in water, combine with acids to form salts, and make acids less acidic. Alkalis have a bitter taste and turn certain dyes blue. Some alkalis can help the body work the way it should. An example of an alkali is sodium hydroxide.
alkalinity listen (AL-kuh-lih-nih-tee)
Refers to the amount of alkali. An alkali is a chemical that can dissolve in water, combine with acids to form salts, and make acids less acidic.
alkalinization listen (AL-kuh-LIH-nih-ZAY-shun)
A process that lowers the amount of acid in a solution. In medicine, an alkali, such as sodium bicarbonate, may be given to patients to lower high levels of acid in the blood or urine that can be caused by certain medicines or conditions.
alkaloid listen (AL-kuh-loyd)
A member of a large group of substances found in plants and in some fungi. Alkaloids contain nitrogen and can be made in the laboratory. Nicotine, caffeine, codeine, and vincristine are alkaloids. Some alkaloids, such as vincristine, are used to treat cancer.
Alkeran listen (AL-keh-ran)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is also used to treat ovarian epithelial cancer that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alkeran may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called melphalan.
alkylating agent listen (AL-kuh-LAY-ting AY-jent)
A type of drug that is used in the treatment of cancer. It interferes with the cell's DNA and inhibits cancer cell growth.
ALL
A type of leukemia (blood cancer) that comes on quickly and is fast growing. In ALL, there are too many lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) in the blood and bone marrow. Also called acute lymphoblastic leukemia and acute lymphocytic leukemia.
Allegra listen (uh-LEH-gruh)
A drug used to treat certain allergy symptoms. It blocks a chemical released during an allergic response that causes itching, sneezing, runny nose, wheezing, and watery eyes. It is a type of antihistamine. Also called fexofenadine.
allergen listen (A-ler-jen)
A substance that causes an allergic response. Examples include pollen, molds, and certain foods.
allergic response listen (uh-LER-jik reh-SPONTS)
A hypersensitive immune reaction to a substance that normally is harmless or would not cause an immune response in most people. An allergic response may cause harmful symptoms such as itching or inflammation or tissue injury.
allogeneic listen (A-loh-jeh-NAY-ik)
Taken from different individuals of the same species. Also called allogenic.
allogeneic bone marrow transplantation listen (A-loh-jeh-NAY-ik bone MAYR-oh tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which a person receives stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop) from a genetically similar, but not identical, donor.
allogeneic stem cell transplantation listen (A-loh-jeh-NAY-ik stem sel tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which a person receives blood-forming stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop) from a genetically similar, but not identical, donor. This is often a sister or brother, but could be an unrelated donor.
allogenic listen (A-loh-JEH-nik)
Taken from different individuals of the same species. Also called allogeneic.
allograft listen (A-loh-graft)
The transplant of an organ, tissue, or cells from one individual to another individual of the same species who is not an identical twin.
allopathic medicine listen (A-loh-PA-thik MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called biomedicine, conventional medicine, mainstream medicine, orthodox medicine, and Western medicine.
allopurinol listen (a-loh-PYOOR-rih-nol)
A drug that lowers high levels of uric acid (a byproduct of metabolism) in the blood caused by some cancer treatments.
Allovectin-7 listen (A-loh-VEK-tin ...)
A substance that is being studied as a gene therapy agent in the treatment of cancer. It increases the ability of the immune system to recognize cancer cells and kill them.
all-trans retinoic acid listen (all-tranz REH-tih-NOH-ik A-sid)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. All-trans retinoic acid is made in the body from vitamin A and helps cells to grow and develop, especially in the embryo. A form of all-trans retinoic acid made in the laboratory is put on the skin to treat conditions such as acne and is taken by mouth to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (a fast-growing cancer in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow). All-trans retinoic acid is being studied in the prevention and treatment of other types of cancer. Also called ATRA, retinoic acid, tretinoin, and vitamin A acid.
aloe-emodin listen (A-loh-EH-muh-din)
A substance found in certain plants, including aloe vera. It belongs to a family of compounds called anthraquinones, which have shown anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects.
alopecia listen (A-loh-PEE-shuh)
The lack or loss of hair from areas of the body where hair is usually found. Alopecia can be a side effect of some cancer treatments.
Aloxi listen (uh-LOK-see)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Aloxi blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Aloxi is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called palonosetron hydrochloride.
alpelisib (AL-peh-LIH-sib)
A drug used with fulvestrant to treat breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and got worse during or after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used in postmenopausal women, and men, whose cancer is hormone receptor positive and HER2 negative and has a mutation in the PIK3CA gene. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Alpelisib blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called Piqray.
alpha emitter radiation therapy listen (AL-fuh ee-MIH-ter RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Therapy that uses a radioactive substance that gives off a type of high-energy radiation called an alpha-particle to kill cancer cells. The radioactive substance is injected into a vein, travels through the blood, and collects in certain tissues in the body, such as areas of bone with cancer. This type of radiation may cause less damage to nearby healthy tissue. Alpha emitter radiation therapy is used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to the bone, and it is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer.
alpha hydroxyl acid listen (AL-fuh hy-DROK-sil A-sid)
One of a group of substances that are found in several types of fruit and in milk. They are used in skin care products to reduce wrinkles and soften the skin. Examples of alpha hydroxyl acids are glycolic acid, lactic acid, and citric acid. Also called AHA and fruit acid.
alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency (AL-fuh … AN-tee-TRIP-sin deh-FIH-shun-see)
An inherited condition in which the body either does not make enough of a protein called alpha-1 antitrypsin (AAT) or makes an abnormal form of AAT. AAT is made in the liver and helps protect the body’s organs, especially the liver and lungs, from damage. Alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency can lead to serious lung conditions (including emphysema and bronchiectasis) and liver conditions (including cirrhosis, hepatitis, and liver cancer). It may also cause inflammation of the blood vessels and a rare skin condition that causes painful lumps on or under the skin. Lung problems caused by alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency almost always occur in adults, but liver and skin problems may occur in both adults and children. Alpha-1 antitrypsin deficiency is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called SERPINA1. Also called AAT deficiency.
alpha-adrenergic antagonist listen (AL-fuh-A-dreh-NER-jik an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate gland, which improves the flow of urine and blood. Alpha-adrenergic antagonists are used to treat the symptoms of many conditions, such as benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), high blood pressure, and some blood circulation problems. Also called alpha-blocker.
alpha-blocker listen (AL-fuh-BLAH-ker)
A substance that relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate gland, which improves the flow of urine and blood. Alpha-blockers are used to treat the symptoms of many conditions, such as benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), high blood pressure, and some blood circulation problems. Also called alpha-adrenergic antagonist.
alpha-fetoprotein listen (AL-fuh-FEE-toh-PROH-teen)
A protein normally produced by a fetus. Alpha-fetoprotein levels are usually undetectable in the blood of healthy adult men or women (who are not pregnant). An elevated level of alpha-fetoprotein suggests the presence of either a primary liver cancer or germ cell tumor. Also called AFP.
alpha-lipoic acid listen (AL-fuh-lih-POH-ik A-sid)
A substance that is being studied for its ability to protect normal cells from the side effects of chemotherapy and prevent peripheral neuropathy (numbness, tingling, burning, and weakness in the hands or feet). Alpha-lipoic acid is made by the body and can be found in foods such as organ meats, spinach, broccoli, peas, brussel sprouts, and rice bran. It can also be made in the laboratory. Alpha-lipoic acid is a type of antioxidant and chemoprotective agent.
alpha-tocopherol listen (AL-fuh-toh-KAH-feh-rol)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to stay healthy and work the way it should. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in seeds, nuts, leafy green vegetables, and vegetable oils. Alpha-tocopherol boosts the immune system and helps keep blood clots from forming. It also helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Alpha-tocopherol is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of antioxidant. Also called vitamin E.
alprazolam listen (al-PRAY-zoh-lam)
A drug used to treat anxiety disorders and panic attacks. It is being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called Xanax.
alprostadil listen (al-PROS-tuh-dil)
A drug that is used to treat impotence (inability to have an erection) and is being studied in the treatment of sexual problems in men who have had surgery for prostate cancer. It is a type of vasodilator. Also called PGE1 and prostaglandin E1.
ALTENS listen
A procedure in which mild electric currents are applied to certain acupuncture points (spots on the body where an acupuncture needle may be inserted to control pain and other symptoms) on the skin. It is being studied in the treatment of dry mouth caused by radiation therapy for cancer. Also called acupuncture-like transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation.
Alteplase listen (AL-teh-plays)
A form of tissue plasminogen activator that is made in the laboratory. It helps dissolve blood clots and is used to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called Activase, r-tPA, and recombinant tissue plasminogen activator.
alteration listen (all-teh-RAY-shun)
A change resulting in something that is different from the original.
alternative medicine listen (all-TER-nuh-tiv MEH-dih-sin)
Treatments that are used instead of standard treatments. Standard treatments are based on the results of scientific research and are currently accepted and widely used. Less research has been done for most types of alternative medicine. Alternative medicine may include special diets, megadose vitamins, herbal preparations, special teas, and magnet therapy. For example, a special diet may be used instead of anticancer drugs as a treatment for cancer.
altretamine listen (al-TREH-tuh-meen)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
alum listen (A-lum)
A chemical substance that contains aluminum sulfate and a second chemical, usually potassium sulfate. It is used to shrink tissues, to stop bleeding, and to boost the immune response to a vaccine.
aluminum listen (uh-LOO-mih-num)
A metallic element that is found combined with other elements in the earth’s crust. It is also found in small amounts in soil, water, and many foods. It is used in medicine and dentistry and in many products such as foil, cans, pots and pans, airplanes, siding, and roofs. High levels of aluminum in the body can be harmful.
Alunbrig listen (uh-LUN-brig)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is used in patients whose cancer has gotten worse during treatment with or who cannot take crizotinib (a type of anticancer drug). Alunbrig blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Alunbrig is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called brigatinib.
ALVAC-CEA vaccine listen (… vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of the canarypox virus that does not cause disease in people. It is being studied in the treatment of some kinds of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make a protein called carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), which is a tumor marker. ALVAC-CEA vaccine may help the immune system find and kill cancer cells that make CEA.
alveolar rhabdomyosarcoma listen (al-VEE-oh-ler RAB-doh-MY-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in older children and teenagers. It begins in embryonic muscle cells (cells that develop into muscles in the body). It can occur at many places in the body, but usually occurs in the trunk, arms, or legs. Also called ARMS.
alveolar soft part sarcoma listen (al-VEE-oh-ler … sar-KOH-muh)
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in older children and teenagers. It begins in the soft supporting tissue that connects and surrounds the organs and other tissues. Alveolar soft part sarcoma usually occurs in the legs, but can also occur in the arms, hands, head, or neck. It can cause the growth of new blood vessels that help the tumor grow and spread. Also called ASPS.
alveoli listen (al-VEE-oh-ly)
Tiny air sacs at the end of the bronchioles (tiny branches of air tubes) in the lungs. The alveoli are where the lungs and the bloodstream exchange carbon dioxide and oxygen. Carbon dioxide in the blood passes into the lungs through the alveoli. Oxygen in the lungs passes through the alveoli into the blood.
alvocidib listen (al-VOH-sih-dib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It stops cells from dividing and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase (CDK) inhibitor. Also called flavopiridol and HMR 1275.
Alzheimer dementia listen (ALTS-hy-mer deh-MEN-shuh)
A brain disorder that usually starts in late middle age or old age and gets worse over time. Symptoms include loss of memory, confusion, difficulty thinking, and changes in language, behavior, and personality. Also called Alzheimer disease.
Alzheimer disease listen (ALTS-hy-mer dih-ZEEZ)
A brain disorder that usually starts in late middle age or old age and gets worse over time. Symptoms include loss of memory, confusion, difficulty thinking, and changes in language, behavior, and personality. Also called Alzheimer dementia.
Amanita phalloides listen (a-muh-NY-tuh fuh-LOY-deez)
A type of poisonous mushroom that has harmful effects on the kidneys and liver. It is responsible for most fatal cases of mushroom poisoning. Also called death cap.
amantadine hydrochloride listen (uh-MAN-tuh-deen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat infections caused by the influenza A virus. It blocks the ability of the virus to infect cells and to make more virus particles. It is also used to treat the symptoms of Parkinson disease. Amantidine hydrochloride is a type of antiviral agent.
amatuximab listen (A-muh-TUK-sih-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of mesothelioma. Amatuximab binds to a protein called mesothelin, which is found on some cancer cells. Amatuximab may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-mesothelin monoclonal antibody MORAb-009 and MORAb-009.
Ambien listen (AM-bee-un)
A drug used to treat insomnia (inability to sleep), and anxiety. It is a type of imidazopyridine (sedative hypnotic). Also called zolpidem.
AMD
A condition in which there is a slow breakdown of cells in the center of the retina (the light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). This blocks vision in the center of the eye and can cause problems with activities such as reading and driving. AMD is most often seen in people who are over the age of 50. Also called age-related macular degeneration, ARMD, and macular degeneration.
AMD 3100
A drug used before autologous stem cell transplantation in patients with non-Hodgkin lymphoma or multiple myeloma. AMD 3100 is given together with granulocyte-colony stimulating factor (G-CSF) to help move stem cells from the bone marrow to the blood. The stem cells can then be collected, stored, and given back to the patient. AMD 3100 is a type of chemokine receptor antagonist. Also called Mozobil and plerixafor.
amelanotic melanoma listen (AY-meh-luh-NAH-tik MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
A type of skin cancer in which the cells do not make the pigment melanin. Skin lesions are often irregular and may be pink, red, or have light brown, tan, or gray at the edges.
Ameluz listen (A-meh-looz)
A drug used to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). When Ameluz is taken up by abnormal cells, including cancer cells, and then exposed to certain types of light, it becomes active and kills the cells. Ameluz contains the active ingredient aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride. It is a type of photosensitizing agent.
amethopterin listen (A-meh-THOP-teh-rin)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and severe psoriasis (a type of skin condition). Amethopterin stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. Amethopterin is a type of antimetabolite and a type of antifolate. Also called methotrexate, MTX, Rheumatrex, and Trexall.
Amevive listen (A-meh-veev)
A drug that is used to treat certain skin conditions and is being studied in the treatment of cutaneous (skin-related) T-cell cancer and T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Amevive is made by combining part of an antibody with a protein that blocks the growth some types of T cells. It is a type of fusion protein and a type of immunosuppressant. Also called alefacept.
AMG 102
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to a protein called hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), which may cause cancer cells to grow. Blocking this may cause cancer cells to die. AMG 102 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-HGF monoclonal antibody AMG 102.
AMG 162
A drug used to prevent or treat certain bone problems. It is used under the brand name Xgeva to prevent bone problems caused by multiple myeloma or by solid tumors that have spread to the bone. It is also used in certain patients to treat giant cell tumor of the bone that cannot be removed by surgery, and to treat hypercalcemia that is caused by cancer and did not get better after treatment with bisphosphonates. AMG 162 is also used under the brand name Prolia to increase bone mass in certain patients with breast cancer or prostate cancer who have a high risk of breaking bones. It is also used to treat osteoporosis in men and postmenopausal women who have a high risk of breaking bones. AMG 162 is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It binds to a protein called RANKL, which keeps RANKL from binding to another protein called RANK on the surface of certain bone cells, including bone cancer cells. This may help keep bone from breaking down and cancer cells from growing. AMG 162 may also prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called denosumab.
AMG 531
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. AMG 531 binds to the thrombopoietin receptor, which causes the bone marrow to make more platelets. It is a type of thrombopoietin receptor agonist. Also called Nplate and romiplostim.
AMG 706
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors and protein kinase inhibitors.
AMH
A hormone made by the ovaries in females and the testicles in males. AMH helps to form the male and female reproductive organs. It also helps control other hormones that act on the ovaries to make the follicles and eggs grow during a woman’s menstrual cycle. Measuring the amount of AMH in the blood may help diagnose infertility and other conditions, such as polycystic ovarian syndrome, menopause, and certain types of ovarian tumors. It may also help determine the sex of an infant, when the sex is not clear. Also called anti-Mullerian hormone.
amifostine listen (A-mih-FOS-teen)
A drug used to help protect the kidneys in patients receiving cisplatin (a type of anticancer drug) for advanced ovarian cancer. It is also used to help reduce dry mouth in patients receiving radiation therapy after surgery for head and neck cancer. Amifostine helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by certain types of cancer treatment. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of radioprotective agent. Also called Ethyol.
amikacin listen (A-mih-KAY-sin)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called aminoglycoside antibiotics.
amino acid listen (uh-MEE-noh A-sid)
One of several molecules that join together to form proteins. There are 20 common amino acids found in proteins.
amino acid sequence listen (uh-MEE-noh A-sid SEE-kwents)
The arrangement of amino acids in a protein. Proteins can be made from 20 different kinds of amino acids, and the structure and function of each protein are determined by the kinds of amino acids used to make it and how they are arranged.
aminobenzoic acid listen (uh-MEE-noh-ben-ZOH-ik-A-sid)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Bacteria that live in the intestines need aminobenzoic acid to survive. Aminobenzoic acid is found in grains and foods from animals. It is being studied as a radiosensitizer (a substance that makes tumor cells more sensitive to radiation therapy) and in the treatment of certain skin disorders. Also called PABA and para-aminobenzoic acid.
aminocamptothecin listen (uh-MEE-noh-KAMP-toh-THEH-kin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
aminoglutethimide listen (uh-MEE-noh-gloo-TETH-ih-mide)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal aromatase inhibitors. Aminoglutethimide is used to decrease the production of sex hormones (estrogen in women or testosterone in men) and suppress the growth of tumors that need sex hormones to grow.
aminoglycoside antibiotic listen (uh-MEE-noh-GLY-koh-side AN-tee-by-AH-tik)
A substance that works against many types of bacteria and includes streptomycin, gentamicin, and neomycin. An aminoglycoside antibiotic is used to treat bacterial infections.
aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride listen (uh-MEE-noh-LEH-vyoo-LIH-nik A-sid HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used under the brand names Ameluz and Levulan Kerastick to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). It is also used under the brand name Gleolan as an imaging agent during surgery for certain types of brain tumors. Aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. When aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride is taken up by abnormal cells, including cancer cells, and then exposed to certain types of light, it becomes active and kills the cells. It may also help find some types of cancer cells when they are exposed to certain types of light. Aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride is a type of photosensitizing agent.
aminopterin listen (a-mih-NOP-teh-rin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites.
amiodarone hydrochloride listen (A-mee-OH-duh-rone HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat certain types of abnormal heart rhythms that have not gotten better with other drugs. Amiodarone hydrochloride affects the electrical activity of the heart. It is a type of antiarrhythmic agent. Also called Corderone.
amitriptyline hydrochloride listen (A-mih-TRIP-tih-LEEN HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug that is used to treat depression and may be given to treat anxiety, sleep disorders, and pain. It is also being studied in an oral or gel form in the treatment of nerve pain caused by chemotherapy. Amitriptyline hydrochloride is a type of tricyclic antidepressant.
AML
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myeloblastic leukemia, acute myelogenous leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, acute nonlymphocytic leukemia, and ANLL.
AML-MRC
A type of acute myeloid leukemia in which at least 20% of a patient’s blood or bone marrow is myeloblasts (immature white blood cells) and the patient has one of the following conditions: 1) has had myelodysplastic syndrome (MDS) or a myelodysplastic/myeloproliferative neoplasm (MDS/MPN) before, 2) cells that have changes in certain chromosomes that are similar to those found in MDS, or 3) at least 50% of the cells (of at least two types of blood cells) are abnormal. AML-MRC usually occurs in older adults and has a poor prognosis. Also called acute myeloid leukemia with myelodysplasia-related changes.
ammonia listen (uh-MOH-nyuh)
A gas made of nitrogen and hydrogen. It has a strong odor and can irritate the skin, eyes, nose, throat, and lungs. Ammonia is made by bacteria and decaying plants and animals and is found in water, soil, and air. Ammonia is also made by the body when proteins break down. In the laboratory, ammonia can be changed to a liquid and used in medicines, fertilizers, household cleaning liquids, and other products. It is also added to cigarettes to increase the effect of nicotine on the body.
ammonium tetrathiomolybdate listen (uh-MOH-nee-um TEH-truh-THY-oh-muh-LIB-dayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer. Ammonium tetrathiomolybdate removes extra copper from the body. Removing the copper may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. Ammonium tetrathiomolybdate is a type of chelating agent and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
amniotic fluid listen (AM-nee-AH-tik FLOO-id)
The clear or slightly yellow fluid that surrounds and protects an unborn baby as it grows during pregnancy. Amniotic fluid cushions the baby and helps keep the temperature in the womb constant. It also helps the growing baby’s lungs, digestive system, and bones develop properly. Amniotic fluid contains some of the baby’s cells and other substances. Samples of amniotic fluid may be taken to check the health of the baby and to test for genetic changes that may be a sign of a genetic disease or condition. Amniotic fluid also may be used to learn the sex of the baby.
amonafide listen (ay-MOH-nah-fide)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors and intercalating agents.
amoxicillin listen (uh-MOK-sih-SIH-lin)
A drug used to treat some bacterial infections. Amoxicillin is a form of penicillin that is made in the laboratory. It kills certain types of bacteria. It is a type of antibiotic.
amoxicillin-clavulanate potassium listen (uh-MOK-sih-SIH-lin-kla-vyoo-LA-nayt puh-TA-see-um)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. Adding the chemical clavulanate potassium to the antibiotic amoxicillin increases the amount of time the antibiotic stays active in the body. Amoxicillin-clavulanate potassium is a type of combination antibiotic. Also called Augmentin.
amphotericin B listen (AM-fuh-TAYR-ih-sin ...)
A drug used in the treatment of infections caused by fungi. It is a type of antifungal.
Amplimexon listen (AM-plih-MEK-son)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer, including pancreatic, lung, breast, prostate, melanoma, and multiple myeloma. It belongs to the family of drugs called cyanoaziridine derivatives. Also called imexon.
ampulla listen (am-PUH-luh)
A sac-like enlargement of a canal or duct.
ampulla of Vater listen (am-PUH-luh ... VAH-ter)
An enlargement of the ducts from the liver and pancreas at the point where they enter the small intestine.
ampulla of Vater cancer listen (am-PUH-luh ... VAH-ter KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the ampulla of Vater (an enlargement of the ducts from the liver and pancreas where they join and enter the small intestine). Symptoms include jaundice, abdominal pain, nausea, vomiting, and weight loss. Also called ampullary cancer.
ampullary cancer listen (AM-puh-LAYR-ee KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the ampulla of Vater (an enlargement of the ducts from the liver and pancreas where they join and enter the small intestine). Symptoms include jaundice, abdominal pain, nausea, vomiting, and weight loss. Also called ampulla of Vater cancer.
amputation listen (am-pyoo-TAY-shun)
The removal by surgery of a limb (arm or leg) or other body part because of injury or disease, such as diabetes or cancer.
amrubicin listen (am-ROO-bih-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of lung cancer. It is a type of anthracycline analog.
amsacrine listen (AM-suh-kreen)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
amuvatinib listen (AM-yoo-VA-tih-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may block certain proteins involved in cancer cell growth and DNA repair. Blocking these proteins may make cancer cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs and radiation therapy. Amuvatinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called MP470.
amygdalin listen (uh-MIG-duh-lin)
A substance found in the pits of some fruits, such as apricots, and in raw nuts and plants. Amygdalin has been used in some countries as a treatment for cancer, but it has not been shown to work in human clinical trials. It is not approved for use in the United States. Amygdalin is sometimes called vitamin B17.
amylase listen (A-mih-lays)
An enzyme that helps the body digest starches.
amyloidosis listen (A-muh-loy-DOH-sis)
A group of diseases in which protein builds up in certain organs (localized amyloidosis) or throughout the body (systemic amyloidosis). Amyloidosis may be either primary (with no known cause), secondary (caused by another disease, including some types of cancer, such as multiple myeloma), or hereditary (passed down from parents to children). Many organs are affected by amyloidosis. The organs affected may depend on whether the amyloidosis is the primary, secondary, or hereditary form.
anabolic steroid listen (A-nuh-BAH-lik STAYR-oyd)
A type of steroid that is used in medicine to repair body tissues and to increase appetite and the growth of muscles. Anabolic steroids are made in the laboratory from testosterone (a male hormone).
anagrelide listen (an-AG-re-lide)
A drug that is used to decrease the number of platelets in the blood in order to prevent blood clotting.
anakinra listen (A-nuh-KIN-ruh)
A substance that is used to treat rheumatoid arthritis, and is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Anakinra blocks the action of interleukin 1 (IL-1). It is a type of interleukin receptor antagonist. Also called Kinaret.
anal listen (AY-nul)
Having to do with the anus. The anus is the opening of the rectum (last part of the large intestine) to the outside of the body.
anal cancer listen (AY-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the anus. The anus is the opening of the rectum (last part of the large intestine) to the outside of the body.
anal Pap smear listen (AY-nul … smeer)
A procedure in which cells are scraped from the lining of the anus (the opening of the rectum to the outside of the body) and looked at under a microscope. It is used to find cancer and changes in cells that may lead to cancer. An anal Pap smear can also show conditions that are not cancer, such as infection or inflammation. Also called anal Pap test.
anal Pap test listen (AY-nul …)
A procedure in which cells are scraped from the lining of the anus (the opening of the rectum to the outside of the body) and looked at under a microscope. It is used to find cancer and changes in cells that may lead to cancer. An anal Pap test can also show conditions that are not cancer, such as infection or inflammation. Also called anal Pap smear.
analgesia listen (A-nul-JEE-zhee-uh)
Pain relief.
analgesic listen (A-nul-JEE-zik)
A drug that reduces pain. Analgesics include aspirin, acetaminophen, and ibuprofen.
analog listen (A-nuh-log)
In chemistry, a substance that is similar, but not identical, to another.
analysis listen (uh-NA-lih-sis)
A process in which anything complex is separated into simple or less complex parts.
anaphylactic shock listen (A-nuh-fih-LAK-tik shok)
A severe and sometimes life-threatening immune system reaction to an antigen that a person has been previously exposed to. The reaction may include itchy skin, edema, collapsed blood vessels, fainting, difficulty in breathing, and death.
anaplastic listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik)
A term used to describe cancer cells that divide rapidly and have little or no resemblance to normal cells.
anaplastic large cell lymphoma listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik larj sel lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma that is usually of the T-cell type. The cancer cells express a marker called CD30 or Ki-1 on the surface, and may appear in the lymph nodes, skin, bones, soft tissues, lungs, or liver. Also called ALCL.
anaplastic lymphoma kinase listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh KY-nays)
A protein that helps control cell growth. It is made by the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gene, which may be changed in some types of cancer, such as anaplastic large cell lymphoma, neuroblastoma, and non-small cell lung cancer. These changes in the ALK gene can cause the cancer cells to grow and spread. Anaplastic lymphoma kinase is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase.
anaplastic lymphoma kinase gene listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh KY-nays jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), which is involved in cell growth. Mutated (changed) forms of the ALK gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including neuroblastoma, non-small cell lung cancer, and anaplastic large cell lymphoma. These changes may increase the growth of cancer cells. Checking for changes in the anaplastic lymphoma kinase gene in tumor tissue may help to plan cancer treatment. Also called ALK gene.
anaplastic lymphoma kinase inhibitor listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK), which helps control cell growth. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and spreading. Some anaplastic lymphoma kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called ALK inhibitor.
anaplastic lymphoma kinase positive listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh KY-nays PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have a change in the structure of the anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) gene or a higher than normal amount of ALK protein on their surface. In normal cells, ALK helps control cell growth. When cancer cells have the changed ALK gene or make too much ALK protein, the cancer cells may grow more quickly. Knowing whether a cancer is anaplastic lymphoma kinase positive may help plan treatment. Cancers that may be anaplastic lymphoma kinase positive include neuroblastoma, non-small cell lung cancer, and anaplastic large cell lymphoma. Also called ALK positive.
anaplastic thyroid cancer listen (A-nuh-PLAS-tik THY-royd KAN-ser)
A rare, aggressive type of thyroid cancer in which the malignant (cancer) cells look very different from normal thyroid cells.
anastomosis listen (uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A procedure to connect healthy sections of tubular structures in the body after the diseased portion has been surgically removed.
anastrozole listen (an-AS-troh-zole)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Anastrozole lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Anastrozole is a type of nonsteroidal aromatase inhibitor. Also called Arimidex.
anatomic listen (A-nuh-TAH-mik)
Having to do with anatomy (the study of the structure of a plant or animal).
anatomist listen (uh-NA-tuh-mist)
A person who has special training in anatomy (the study of the structures of animals or plants).
anatomy listen (uh-NA-toh-mee)
The study of the structure of a plant or animal.
ANC
A measure of the number of neutrophils in the blood. Neutrophils are a type of white blood cell. They help the body fight infection. An ANC may be used to check for infection, inflammation, leukemia, and other conditions. The lower a person's ANC is, the higher the risk is of getting an infection. Having an ANC of less than 500 means there is a high risk of getting an infection. Cancer treatment, such as chemotherapy, may reduce the ANC. Also called absolute neutrophil count.
ancestim listen (an-SES-tim)
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplasia. Ancestim is a type of recombinant stem cell growth factor. Also called r-metHuSCF, recombinant human methionyl stem cell factor, and Stemgen.
ancillary test listen (AN-sih-LAYR-ree …)
In a clinical trial, a medical test on a patient that is not a part of the original study design.
androblastoma listen (AN-droh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare type of ovarian tumor in which the tumor cells secrete a male sex hormone. This may cause virilization (the appearance of male physical characteristics in females). Also called arrhenoblastoma and Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of the ovary.
androgen listen (AN-droh-jen)
A type of hormone that promotes the development and maintenance of male sex characteristics.
androgen ablation listen (AN-droh-jen a-BLAY-shun)
Treatment to suppress or block the production or action of male hormones. This is done by having the testicles removed, by taking female sex hormones, or by taking drugs called antiandrogens. Also called androgen deprivation and androgen suppression.
androgen deprivation listen (AN-droh-jen DEH-prih-VAY-shun)
Treatment to suppress or block the production or action of male hormones. This is done by having the testicles removed, by taking female sex hormones, or by taking drugs called antiandrogens. Also called androgen ablation and androgen suppression.
androgen receptor listen (AN-droh-jen reh-SEP-ter)
A protein that binds male hormones called androgens. Androgen receptors are found inside the cells of male reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. In prostate cancer, androgens bind to androgen receptors inside the cancer cells, which causes the cancer cells to grow. Also called AR.
androgen receptor positive listen (AN-droh-jen reh-SEP-ter PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cells that have a protein that binds to androgens (male hormones). Cancer cells that are androgen receptor positive may need androgens to grow. These cells may stop growing or die when they are treated with substances that block the binding and actions of androgen hormones. Also called AR+.
androgen suppression listen (AN-droh-jen suh-PREH-shun)
Treatment to suppress or block the production or action of male hormones. This is done by having the testicles removed, by taking female sex hormones, or by taking drugs called antiandrogens. Also called androgen ablation and androgen deprivation.
androgen-independent listen (AN-droh-jen...)
Describes the ability of tumor cells to grow in the absence of androgens (hormones that promote the development and maintenance of male sex characteristics). Many early prostate cancers require androgens for growth, but advanced prostate cancers are often androgen-independent.
androstanolone listen (AN-droh-STAN-uh-lone)
A hormone made from testosterone in the prostate, testes, and certain other tissues. It is needed to develop and maintain male sex characteristics, such as facial hair, deep voice, and muscle growth. High amounts of androstanolone may increase the growth of prostate cancer and make it harder to treat. Also called DHT and dihydrotestosterone.
anecdotal report listen (A-nek-DOH-tul reh-PORT)
An incomplete description of the medical and treatment history of one or more patients. Anecdotal reports may be published in places other than peer-reviewed, scientific journals.
anemia listen (uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal.
anesthesia listen (A-nes-THEE-zhuh)
A loss of feeling or awareness caused by drugs or other substances. Anesthesia keeps patients from feeling pain during surgery or other procedures. Local anesthesia is a loss of feeling in one small area of the body. Regional anesthesia is a loss of feeling in a part of the body, such as an arm or leg. General anesthesia is a loss of feeling and a complete loss of awareness that feels like a very deep sleep.
anesthesiologist listen (A-nes-THEE-zee-AH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in giving drugs or other agents to prevent or relieve pain during surgery or other procedures.
anesthetic listen (A-nes-THEH-tik)
A drug or other substance that causes a loss of feeling or awareness. Local anesthetics cause a loss of feeling in one small area of the body. Regional anesthetics cause a loss of feeling in a part of the body, such as an arm or leg. General anesthetics cause a loss of feeling and a complete loss of awareness that feels like a very deep sleep.
anetholtrithione listen (A-neh-thol-try-THY-one)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
angelica root listen (an-JEH-lih-kuh root)
The root of any of a group of herbs called Angelica. It has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including gastrointestinal problems such as loss of appetite, feelings of fullness, and gas.
Angiocept listen (AN-jee-oh-sept)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Angiocept may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 (VEGFR-2) inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called CT-322 and VEGFR-2 inhibitor CT-322.
angiofibroma listen (AN-jee-oh-fy-BROH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor that is made up of blood vessels and fibrous (connective) tissue. Angiofibromas usually appear as small, red bumps on the face, especially on the nose and cheeks. They are common in patients with tuberous sclerosis (a genetic disorder that causes skin lesions, seizures, and mental problems). Angiofibromas are a type of vascular tumor.
angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia listen (AN-jee-oh-fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler limf node HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A rare disorder in which benign (not cancer) growths form in lymph node tissue. There are two main ways that angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia occurs: localized (unicentric) and multicentric. Unicentric angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia affects only one group of lymph nodes in one part of the body, usually in the chest or abdomen. It may not cause symptoms. Multicentric angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia affects many groups of lymph nodes and lymphoid tissue all through the body. It can weaken the immune system and cause problems such as infection, fever, weight loss, fatigue, night sweats, nerve damage, and anemia. People with angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia have an increased risk of lymphoma. Also called Castleman disease and giant lymph node hyperplasia.
angiogenesis listen (AN-jee-oh-JEH-neh-sis)
Blood vessel formation. Tumor angiogenesis is the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. This process is caused by the release of chemicals by the tumor and by host cells near the tumor.
angiogenesis inhibitor listen (AN-jee-oh-JEH-neh-sis in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug or substance that keeps new blood vessels from forming. In cancer treatment, angiogenesis inhibitors may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Also called antiangiogenesis agent.
angiogram listen (AN-jee-oh-gram)
An x-ray or computer image (CT scan or MRI) of the blood vessels and blood flow in the body. A dye may be injected through a catheter (small tube) into an artery or vein to make the blood vessels easier to see. An angiogram may be used to check for an aneurysm (a bulge in a blood vessel wall), blockages in arteries, blood clots, or other problems, such as a tumor.
angiography listen (an-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure to x-ray blood vessels. The blood vessels can be seen because of an injection of a dye that shows up in the x-ray.
angioimmunoblastic T-cell lymphoma listen (AN-jee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-BLAS-tik T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by enlarged lymph nodes and hypergammaglobulinemia (increased antibodies in the blood). Other symptoms may include a skin rash, fever, weight loss, or night sweats.
angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia listen (AN-jee-oh-LIM-foyd HY-per-PLAY-zhuh … EE-oh-SIH-noh-FIH-lee-uh)
A rare benign (not cancer) tumor of small blood vessels surrounded by lymphocytes and eosinophils (types of white blood cells). Angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia usually forms on or in the skin, especially the skin of the head, but can occur in other areas of the body, such as in bone. On the skin, it may appear as firm pink to red bumps that may be itchy or painful. If the tumor is in bone, it may cause swelling and pain. Angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia is sometimes caused by injury and often comes back after treatment. Angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia is most common in young and middle-aged adults. It is a type of vascular tumor. Also called epithelioid hemangioma and histiocytoid hemangioma.
angiomyolipoma listen (AN-jee-oh-MY-oh-lih-POH-muh)
A benign (noncancer) tumor of fat and muscle tissue that usually is found in the kidney. Angiomyolipomas rarely cause symptoms, but may bleed or grow large enough to be painful or cause kidney failure. They are common in patients with tuberous sclerosis (a genetic disorder in which benign tumors grow in the kidneys, brain, eyes, heart, lungs, and skin, causing seizures, mental problems, and skin lesions).
angioplasty listen (AN-jee-oh-PLAS-tee)
A procedure to enlarge the opening in a blood vessel that has become narrowed or blocked by plaque (a buildup of fat and cholesterol on the inner wall of the blood vessel). Examples of angioplasty are balloon angioplasty and laser angioplasty.
angiosarcoma listen (AN-jee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in the cells that line blood vessels or lymph vessels. Cancer that begins in blood vessels is called hemangiosarcoma. Cancer that begins in lymph vessels is called lymphangiosarcoma.
angiostatin listen (AN-jee-oh-STA-tin)
A protein normally made by the body. It can also be made in the laboratory, and is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Angiostatin may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor listen (AN-jee-oh-TEN-sin-kun-VER-ting EN-zime in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that is used to lower blood pressure. An angiotensin-converting enzyme inhibitor is a type of antihypertensive agent. Also called ACE inhibitor.
Angiozyme listen (AN-jee-oh-zime)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Angiozyme is a special type of RNA made in the laboratory. It stops a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor receptor (VEGFR) from being made. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor and a type of ribozyme. Also called RPI.4610.
anhidrosis listen (AN-hih-DROH-sis)
A rare condition in which the sweat glands make little or no sweat. It can affect the whole body or a small part of the body. Anhidrosis may be caused by severe burns, radiation, infection, inflammation, or other injuries to the skin. It may also be caused by certain medicines and some conditions that affect the skin, nerves, connective tissue, or sweat glands. It may be inherited as part of a genetic condition or develop later in life. Also called hypohidrosis.
anhydrovinblastine listen (an-HY-droh-vin-BLAS-teen)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors.
anidulafungin listen (uh-NIH-dyoo-luh-FUN-jin)
A drug that is used to treat infections caused by fungi. It belongs to the family of drugs called antifungals.
animal model listen (A-nih-mul MAH-dul)
An animal with a disease either the same as or like a disease in humans. Animal models are used to study the development and progression of diseases and to test new treatments before they are given to humans. Animals with transplanted human cancers or other tissues are called xenograft models.
animal study listen (A-nih-mul STUH-dee)
A laboratory experiment using animals to study the development and progression of diseases. Animal studies also test how safe and effective new treatments are before they are tested in people.
animal-assisted therapy listen (A-nih-mul-uh-SIS-ted THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses dogs or other pets to improve the physical and mental health of patients with certain acute or chronic diseases. It is being studied as a way to relieve distress in cancer patients undergoing treatment for pain. Also called pet-facilitated therapy.
aniridia listen (A-nih-RIH-dee-uh)
A disorder in which a person is born without part or all of the iris (colored tissue at the front of the eyeball). Aniridia usually affects both eyes and causes other eye problems, including being sensitive to light and loss of vision.
ANLL
An aggressive (fast-growing) disease in which too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells that are not lymphoblasts) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called acute myeloblastic leukemia, acute myelogenous leukemia, acute myeloid leukemia, acute nonlymphocytic leukemia, and AML.
annamycin listen (A-nuh-MY-sin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called anthracycline antibiotics.
anorexia listen (a-nuh-REK-see-uh)
An abnormal loss of the appetite for food. Anorexia can be caused by cancer, AIDS, a mental disorder (i.e., anorexia nervosa), or other diseases.
anorexia nervosa listen (a-nuh-REK-see-uh ner-VOH-suh)
An eating disorder marked by an intense fear of gaining weight, a refusal to maintain a healthy weight, and a distorted body image. People with anorexia nervosa have an abnormal loss of appetite for food, try to avoid eating, and eat as little as possible.
ANS
The part of the nervous system that controls muscles of internal organs (such as the heart, blood vessels, lungs, stomach, and intestines) and glands (such as salivary glands and sweat glands). One part of the ANS helps the body rest, relax, and digest food and another part helps a person fight or take flight in an emergency. Also called autonomic nervous system and involuntary nervous system.
ansamycin listen (AN-suh-MY-sin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antineoplastic antibiotics.
antagonist listen (an-TA-guh-nist)
In medicine, a substance that stops the action or effect of another substance. For example, a drug that blocks the stimulating effect of estrogen on a tumor cell is called an estrogen receptor antagonist.
antenatal listen (AN-tee-NAY-tul)
Having to do with the time a female is pregnant, before birth occurs. Also called prenatal.
anterior listen (an-TEER-ee-er)
In human anatomy, has to do with the front of a structure, or a structure found toward the front of the body.
anterior mediastinotomy listen (an-TEER-ee-er MEE-dee-A-stih-NAH-toh-mee)
A procedure in which a tube is inserted into the chest to view the tissues and organs in the area between the lungs and between the breastbone and heart. The tube is inserted through an incision next to the breastbone. This procedure is usually used to get a tissue sample from the lymph nodes on the left side of the chest. Also called Chamberlain procedure.
anterior mediastinum listen (an-TEER-ee-er MEE-dee-uh-STY-num)
The area in the front part of the chest between the lungs. Also called prevascular space.
anterior pelvic exenteration listen (an-TEER-ee-er PEL-vik eg-ZEN-teh-RAY-shun)
Surgery to remove the urethra, lower part of the ureters, uterus, cervix, vagina, and bladder.
anterior urethral cancer listen (an-TEER-ee-er yoo-REE-thrul KAN-ser)
A disease in which malignant (cancer) cells are found in the part of the urethra (the tube through which urine leaves the body) that is closest to the outside of the body.
anthracenedione listen (AN-thruh-seen-DY-one)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called anticancer antibiotics.
anthracycline listen (AN-thruh-SY-klin)
A type of antibiotic that comes from certain types of Streptomyces bacteria. Anthracyclines are used to treat many types of cancer. Anthracyclines damage the DNA in cancer cells, causing them to die. Daunorubicin, doxorubicin, and epirubicin are anthracyclines.
anthraquinone listen (AN-thruh-kwih-NONE)
A type of anticancer drug.
antiandrogen listen (AN-tee-AN-droh-jen)
A substance that keeps androgens (male hormones) from binding to proteins called androgen receptors, which can be found in prostate cells and cells of some other tissues. Treatment with antiandrogens may stop prostate cancer cells from growing. Examples of antiandrogens used to treat prostate cancer are flutamide, bicalutamide, enzalutamide, and nilutamide.
antiandrogen therapy listen (AN-tee-AN-droh-jen THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs to block the action of androgens (male hormones) in the body. Androgens, such as testosterone, bind to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in prostate cancer cells and in cells of some other tissues. Antiandrogen therapy keeps androgens from binding to these receptors and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is used to treat prostate cancer.
antiangiogenesis listen (AN-tee-AN-jee-oh-JEH-neh-sis)
Prevention of the growth of new blood vessels.
antiangiogenesis agent listen (AN-tee-AN-jee-oh-JEH-neh-sis AY-jent)
A drug or substance that keeps new blood vessels from forming. In cancer treatment, antiangiogenesis agents may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Also called angiogenesis inhibitor.
antiangiogenic listen (AN-tee-AN-jee-oh-JEH-nik)
Having to do with reducing the growth of new blood vessels.
antianxiety agent listen (AN-tee-ang-ZY-eh-tee AY-jent)
A drug used to treat symptoms of anxiety, such as feelings of fear, dread, uneasiness, and muscle tightness, that may occur as a reaction to stress. Most antianxiety agents block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called anxiolytic and anxiolytic agent.
antiapoptotic listen (AN-tee-A-pop-TAH-tik)
Something that prevents apoptosis. Apoptosis is a type of cell death in which a series of molecular steps in a cell leads to its death.
antibacterial listen (AN-tee-bak-TEER-ee-ul)
A substance that kills bacteria or stops them from growing and causing disease.
antibiotic listen (AN-tee-by-AH-tik)
A drug used to treat infections caused by bacteria and other microorganisms.
antibody listen (AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A protein made by plasma cells (a type of white blood cell) in response to an antigen (a substance that causes the body to make a specific immune response). Each antibody can bind to only one specific antigen. The purpose of this binding is to help destroy the antigen. Some antibodies destroy antigens directly. Others make it easier for white blood cells to destroy the antigen. An antibody is a type of immunoglobulin.
antibody therapy listen (AN-tee-BAH-dee THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses antibodies to help the body fight cancer, infection, or other diseases. Antibodies are proteins made by the immune system that bind to specific markers on cells or tissues. Monoclonal antibodies are a type of antibody made in the laboratory that can be used in diagnosis or treatment. In cancer treatment, monoclonal antibodies may kill cancer cells directly, they may block development of tumor blood vessels, or they may help the immune system kill cancer cells.
antibody-dependent cell-mediated cytotoxicity listen (AN-tee-BAH-dee-deh-PEN-dent sel-MEE-dee-AY-ted SY-toh-tok-SIH-sih-tee)
A type of immune reaction in which a target cell or microbe is coated with antibodies and killed by certain types of white blood cells. The white blood cells bind to the antibodies and release substances that kill the target cells or microbes. Also called ADCC and antibody-dependent cellular cytotoxicity.
antibody-dependent cellular cytotoxicity listen (AN-tee-BAH-dee-deh-PEN-dent SEL-yoo-ler SY-toh-tok-SIH-sih-tee)
A type of immune reaction in which a target cell or microbe is coated with antibodies and killed by certain types of white blood cells. The white blood cells bind to the antibodies and release substances that kill the target cells or microbes. Also called ADCC and antibody-dependent cell-mediated cytotoxicity.
antibody-drug conjugate listen (AN-tee-BAH-dee ... KON-jih-gut)
A substance made up of a monoclonal antibody chemically linked to a drug. The monoclonal antibody binds to specific proteins or receptors found on certain types of cells, including cancer cells. The linked drug enters these cells and kills them without harming other cells. Some antibody-drug conjugates are used to treat cancer. Also called ADC.
anticachexia listen (AN-tee-kuh-KEK-see-uh)
Describes a drug or effect that works against cachexia (loss of body weight and muscle mass).
anticancer antibiotic listen (AN-tee-KAN-ser AN-tee-by-AH-tik)
A type of anticancer drug that blocks cell growth by interfering with DNA, the genetic material in cells. Also called antineoplastic antibiotic and antitumor antibiotic.
anticancer therapy listen (AN-tee-KAN-ser THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment to stop or prevent cancer.
anticarcinogenic listen (AN-tee-KAR-sih-noh-JEH-nik)
Having to do with preventing or delaying the development of cancer.
anti-CCR2 monoclonal antibody MLN1202 listen (AN-tee … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied as a treatment for atherosclerosis (a build-up of fat in the arteries). It is also being studied in the treatment of cancers that spread to the bone. Anti-CCR2 monoclonal antibody MLN1202 binds to a protein called CCR2, which is found on the surface of certain bone cells, white blood cells, and cancer cells. Anti-CCR2 monoclonal antibody MLN1202 blocks the action of a substance that is involved in keeping healthy bone mass. It may help keep the cancer cells from spreading to and growing in the bone. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called MLN1202.
anti-CD19 immunotoxin listen (AN-tee … IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A monoclonal antibody linked to a toxic substance. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of B-cell cancer. Anti-CD19 immunotoxin is made in the laboratory. It binds to CD19, a protein on the surface of normal B cells and B-cell tumors, and kills the cells.
anti-CD22 immunotoxin listen (AN-tee … IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A monoclonal antibody linked to a toxic substance. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of B-cell cancer. Anti-CD22 immunotoxin is made in the laboratory. It binds to CD22, a protein on the surface of normal B cells and B-cell tumors, and kills the cells.
anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015 listen (AN-tee … IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin …)
A drug used to treat hairy cell leukemia that came back or did not get better with at least two other systemic therapies, including treatment with a purine nucleoside analog (a type of anticancer drug). Anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015 contains a monoclonal antibody called moxetumomab that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also contains a bacterial toxin called PE38, which may help kill cancer cells. Anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015 is a type of immunotoxin. Also called CAT-8015, Lumoxiti, and moxetumomab pasudotox.
anti-CD45 monoclonal antibody listen (AN-tee … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of leukemia and lymphoma. Anti-CD45 monoclonal antibody binds to a protein called CD45, which is found on most types of blood cells and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. Anti-CD45 monoclonal antibody may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
anti-CEA antibody listen (AN-tee ... AN-tee-BAH-dee)
An antibody against carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA), a protein present on certain types of cancer cells.
anticoagulant listen (AN-tee-koh-A-gyuh-lunt)
A substance that is used to prevent and treat blood clots in blood vessels and the heart. Also called blood thinner.
anticonvulsant listen (AN-tee-kun-VUL-sunt)
A drug or other substance used to prevent or stop seizures or convulsions. Also called antiepileptic.
antidepressant listen (AN-tee-dee-PREH-sunt)
A drug used to treat depression.
antidiarrheal listen (AN-tee-dy-uh-REE-ul)
A substance used to treat diarrhea (frequent and watery bowel movements).
antiemetic listen (AN-tee-eh-MEH-tik)
A drug that prevents or reduces nausea and vomiting.
anti-EpCAM-Pseudomonas-exotoxin fusion protein listen (AN-tee ... SOO-doh-MOH-nus-EK-soh-TOK-sin FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of head and neck cancer. Anti-EpCAM-Pseudomonas-exotoxin fusion protein is made by linking a monoclonal antibody fragment to a toxic protein that may kill cancer cells. It binds to EpCAM (a protein on the surface of epithelial cells and some types of cancer cells). Also called Proxinium and VB4-845.
antiepileptic listen (AN-tee-EH-pih-LEP-tik)
A drug or other substance used to prevent or stop seizures or convulsions. Also called anticonvulsant.
antiestrogen listen (AN-tee-ES-truh-jin)
A substance that keeps cells from making or using estrogen (a hormone that plays a role in female sex characteristics, the menstrual cycle, and pregnancy). Antiestrogens may stop some cancer cells from growing and are used to prevent and treat breast cancer. They are also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. An antiestrogen is a type of hormone antagonist. Also called estrogen blocker.
antifibrinolytic agent listen (AN-tee-fy-BRIH-noh-LIH-tik AY-jent)
A type of drug that helps the blood clot. It prevents the breakdown of a protein called fibrin, which is the main protein in a blood clot. Antifibrinolytic agents may be used to help prevent or treat serious bleeding in patients who have certain conditions, such as hemophilia, very heavy menstrual bleeding, or some types of vascular tumors. They may also be used to help prevent or control bleeding during or after surgery or after a traumatic injury.
antifolate listen (AN-tee-FOH-layt)
A type of drug that stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. Certain antifolates are used to treat some types of cancer and inflammatory conditions, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called folate antagonist and folic acid antagonist.
antifungal listen (AN-tee-FUN-gul)
A drug that treats infections caused by fungi.
antigen listen (AN-tih-jen)
Any substance that causes the body to make an immune response against that substance. Antigens include toxins, chemicals, bacteria, viruses, or other substances that come from outside the body. Body tissues and cells, including cancer cells, also have antigens on them that can cause an immune response. These antigens can also be used as markers in laboratory tests to identify those tissues or cells.
antigen-presenting cell listen (AN-tih-jen-preh-ZEN-ting sel)
A type of immune cell that boosts immune responses by showing antigens on its surface to other cells of the immune system. An antigen-presenting cell is a type of phagocyte. Also called APC.
antigen-presenting cell vaccine listen (AN-tih-jen-preh-ZEN-ting sel vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made of antigens and antigen-presenting cells (APCs). APCs boost an immune response by presenting antigens on their surfaces to other cells of the immune system. Also called APC vaccine.
antiglobulin test listen (AN-tee-GLAH-byoo-lin ...)
A laboratory test to identify antibodies that can bind to the surface of red blood cells or platelets and destroy them. This test is used to diagnose certain blood disorders in which patients make antibodies to their own red blood cells or platelets. It is also used to determine blood type. Also called Coombs test.
anti-HGF monoclonal antibody AMG 102 listen (AN-tee … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to a protein called hepatocyte growth factor (HGF), which may cause cancer cells to grow. Blocking this may cause cancer cells to die. Anti-HGF monoclonal antibody AMG 102 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called AMG 102.
antihistamine listen (AN-tee-HIS-tuh-meen)
A type of drug that blocks the action of histamines, which can cause fever, itching, sneezing, a runny nose, and watery eyes. Antihistamines are used to prevent fevers in patients receiving blood transfusions and to treat allergies, coughs, and colds.
antihormone therapy listen (AN-tee-HOR-mone THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs, surgery, or radiation in order to block the production or action of a hormone. Antihormone therapy may be used in cancer treatment because certain hormones are able to stimulate the growth of some types of tumors.
antihypertensive agent listen (AN-tee-HY-per-TEN-siv AY-jent)
A type of drug used to treat high blood pressure. There are many different types of antihypertensive agents, and they work in different ways to lower blood pressure. Some remove extra fluid and salt from the body. Others relax and widen the blood vessels or slow the heartbeat. A person may respond better and have fewer side effects with one drug than with another. Some patients need more than one antihypertensive agent to lower their blood pressure.
anti-idiotype vaccine listen (AN-tee-IH-dee-oh-TIPE vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made of antibodies that see other antibodies as the antigen and bind to it. Anti-idiotype vaccines can stimulate the body to produce antibodies against tumor cells.
anti-IGF1R recombinant monoclonal antibody MK-0646 listen (AN-tee … ree-KOM-bih-nunt MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer. Anti-IGF1R recombinant monoclonal antibody MK-0646 binds to a protein called insulin-like growth factor receptor (IGFR) on the surface of cells. This may prevent the cells from growing when IGF is present. It may also kill cancer cells. Anti-IGF1R recombinant monoclonal antibody MK-0646 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called MK-0646.
anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody listen (AN-tee ... ky-MEER-ik MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A drug used to treat a rare condition called Castleman disease in patients who do not have HIV or human herpesvirus 8. It is also being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. Anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody binds to a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by some white blood cells and other cells in the body. Anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody may help reduce inflammation and stop the growth of cancer cells or abnormal blood cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called cCLB8, CNTO 328, siltuximab, and Sylvant.
anti-inflammatory listen (AN-tee-in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee)
Having to do with reducing inflammation.
anti-inflammatory agent listen (AN-tee-in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee AY-jent)
A drug or substance that reduces inflammation (redness, swelling, and pain) in the body. Anti-inflammatory agents block certain substances in the body that cause inflammation. They are used to treat many different conditions. Some anti-inflammatory agents are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer.
antilymphocyte globulin listen (AN-tee-LIM-foh-site GLAH-byoo-lin)
Serum from blood that contains antibodies that bind to human T cells. Antilymphocyte globulin is given to a patient before a stem cell transplant to kill T cells and lower the risk of graft-versus-host disease (GVHD). It is also used to treat GVHD and after a kidney transplant to help keep the body from rejecting the kidney. Also called antithymocyte globulin.
anti-mesothelin monoclonal antibody MORAb-009 listen (AN-tee-MEH-zoh-THEE-lin MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee…)
A substance being studied in the treatment of mesothelioma. Anti-mesothelin monoclonal antibody MORAb-009 binds to a protein called mesothelin, which is found on some cancer cells. Anti-mesothelin monoclonal antibody MORAb-009 may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called amatuximab and MORAb-009.
antimetabolite listen (AN-tee-meh-TA-boh-lite)
A drug that is very similar to natural chemicals in a normal biochemical reaction in cells but different enough to interfere with the normal division and functions of cells.
antimicrobial listen (AN-tee-my-KROH-bee-ul)
A substance that kills microorganisms such as bacteria or mold, or stops them from growing and causing disease.
antimicrotubule agent listen (AN-tee-MY-kroh-TOO-byool AY-jent)
A type of drug that blocks cell growth by stopping mitosis (cell division). Antimicrotubule agents interfere with microtubules (cellular structures that help move chromosomes during mitosis). They are used to treat cancer.
antimitotic agent listen (AN-tee-my-TAH-tik AY-jent)
A type of drug that blocks cell growth by stopping mitosis (cell division). They are used to treat cancer. Also called mitotic inhibitor.
anti-Mullerian hormone listen (AN-tee-myoo-LAYR-ee-un HOR-mone)
A hormone made by the ovaries in females and the testicles in males. Anti-Mullerian hormone helps to form the male and female reproductive organs. It also helps control other hormones that act on the ovaries to make the follicles and eggs grow during a woman’s menstrual cycle. Measuring the amount of anti-Mullerian hormone in the blood may help diagnose infertility and other conditions, such as polycystic ovarian syndrome, menopause, and certain types of ovarian tumors. It may also help determine the sex of an infant, when the sex is not clear. Also called AMH.
antineoplastic listen (AN-tee-NEE-oh-PLAS-tik)
Blocking the formation of neoplasms (growths that may become cancer).
antineoplastic antibiotic listen (AN-tee-NEE-oh-PLAS-tik AN-tee-by-AH-tik)
A type of anticancer drug that blocks cell growth by interfering with DNA, the genetic material in cells. Also called anticancer antibiotic and antitumor antibiotic.
antineoplaston listen (AN-tee-NEE-oh-PLAS-ton)
A substance isolated from normal human blood and urine that is being tested as a type of treatment for some tumors and AIDS.
antioncogene listen (AN-tee-ON-koh-jeen)
A type of gene that makes a protein called a tumor suppressor protein that helps control cell growth. Mutations (changes in DNA) in antioncogenes may lead to cancer. Also called tumor suppressor gene.
antioxidant listen (AN-tee-OK-sih-dent)
A substance that protects cells from the damage caused by free radicals (unstable molecules made by the process of oxidation during normal metabolism). Free radicals may play a part in cancer, heart disease, stroke, and other diseases of aging. Antioxidants include beta-carotene, lycopene, vitamins A, C, and E, and other natural and manufactured substances.
antiparasitic listen (AN-tee-PAYR-uh-SIH-tik)
A drug used to treat infections caused by bacteria and parasites. It is also used in the treatment of some cancers.
anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 listen (AN-tee … AL-fuh MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A drug used with doxorubicin to treat soft tissue sarcoma that cannot be treated with radiation therapy or surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated with an anthracycline (a type of anticancer drug). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 binds to a receptor for a protein called platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein receptor may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, IMC-3G3, Lartruvo, and olaratumab.
anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 listen (AN-tee-PLAYT-let-deh-RIVED grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter AL-fuh MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A drug used with doxorubicin to treat soft tissue sarcoma that cannot be treated with radiation therapy or surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated with an anthracycline (a type of anticancer drug). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 binds to a receptor for a protein called platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein receptor may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, IMC-3G3, Lartruvo, and olaratumab.
antiprogestin listen (AN-tee-proh-JES-tin)
A substance that prevents cells from making or using progesterone (a hormone that plays a role in the menstrual cycle and pregnancy). Antiprogestins may stop some cancer cells from growing and they are being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. An antiprogestin is a type of hormone antagonist.
antipsychotic listen (AN-tee-sy-KAH-tik)
A type of drug used to treat symptoms of psychosis. These include hallucinations (sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or touches that a person believes to be real but are not real), delusions (false beliefs), and dementia (loss of the ability to think, remember, learn, make decisions, and solve problems). Most antipsychotics block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called antipsychotic agent and neuroleptic agent.
antipsychotic agent listen (AN-tee-sy-KAH-tik AY-jent)
A type of drug used to treat symptoms of psychosis. These include hallucinations (sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or touches that a person believes to be real but are not real), delusions (false beliefs), and dementia (loss of the ability to think, remember, learn, make decisions, and solve problems). Most antipsychotic agents block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called antipsychotic and neuroleptic agent.
antiretroviral therapy listen (AN-tee-REH-troh-VY-rul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs that inhibit the ability of the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) or other types of retroviruses to multiply in the body.
antisense agent listen (AN-tee-sents AY-jent)
Small pieces of DNA or RNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA. This blocks the ability of the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense agents may be used to block the production of proteins needed for cell growth. They are being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Also called antisense oligonucleotide.
antisense c-fos listen (AN-tee-sents ...)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer and is being studied in the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis and certain skin conditions. It blocks the production of a protein called c-fos, which helps control cell growth. This may kill cancer cells that need c-fos to grow. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide. Also called c-fos antisense oligonucleotide.
antisense DNA listen (AN-tee-sents …)
Small pieces of DNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA and block the cell’s ability to use the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense DNA may be used to block the production of proteins needed for cell growth. It is being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer.
antisense oligonucleotide listen (AN-tee-sents AH-lih-goh-NOO-klee-oh-tide)
Small pieces of DNA or RNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA. This blocks the ability of the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense oligonucleotides may be used to block the production of proteins needed for cell growth. They are being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Also called antisense agent.
antisense oligonucleotide therapy listen (AN-tee-sents AH-lih-goh-NOO-klee-oh-tide THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with antisense oligonucleotides. These are small pieces of DNA or RNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA. This blocks the cell’s ability to use the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense oligonucleotides are being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer. Also called antisense therapy.
antisense RNA listen (AN-tee-sents …)
Small pieces of RNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA and block the cell’s ability to use the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense RNA may be used to block the production of proteins needed for cell growth. It is being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer.
antisense therapy listen (AN-tee-sents THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with antisense oligonucleotides. These are small pieces of DNA or RNA that can bind to specific molecules of RNA. This blocks the cell’s ability to use the RNA to make a protein or work in other ways. Antisense oligonucleotides are being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer. Also called antisense oligonucleotide therapy.
antisocial listen (AN-tee-SOH-shul)
Describes behavior that ignores the rights of others and the practices and laws of society.
anti-TGF-beta monoclonal antibody GC1008 listen (AN-tee ... BAY-tuh MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other cancers and conditions. Anti-TGF-beta monoclonal antibody GC1008 binds to a protein called transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-beta), which is found on some cancer cells. Anti-TGF-beta monoclonal antibody GC1008 may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called fresolimumab and GC1008.
antithymocyte globulin listen (AN-tee-THY-moh-site GLAH-byoo-lin)
Serum from blood that contains antibodies that bind to human T cells. Antithymocyte globulin is given to a patient before a stem cell transplant to kill T cells and lower the risk of graft-versus-host disease (GVHD). It is also used to treat GVHD and after a kidney transplant to help keep the body from rejecting the kidney. Also called antilymphocyte globulin.
anti-TRAIL R1-mAb listen (AN-tee ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL R1 on the surface of some tumor cells. This may kill the tumor cells. Anti-TRAIL R1-mAb is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called HGS-ETR1 and mapatumumab.
anti-TRAIL R2 mAb HGS-ETR2 listen (AN-tee ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL-R2 on the surface of some tumor cells, which may kill the tumor cells. Anti-TRAIL R2 mAb HGS-ETR2 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called HGS-ETR2 and lexatumumab.
antituberculosis listen (AN-tee-too-BER-kyoo-LOH-sis)
Describes a drug or effect that works against tuberculosis (a contagious bacterial infection that usually affects the lungs).
antitumor listen (AN-tee-TOO-mer)
Having to do with stopping abnormal cell growth.
antitumor antibiotic listen (AN-tee-TOO-mer AN-tee-by-AH-tik)
A type of anticancer drug that blocks cell growth by interfering with DNA, the genetic material in cells. Also called anticancer antibiotic and antineoplastic antibiotic.
anti-VEGFR monoclonal antibody listen (AN-tee … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A substance that binds to receptors for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF), which may be found on some types of cancer cells. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. There are different types of anti-VEGFR monoclonal antibodies being studied in the treatment of cancer. These substances are a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody.
anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B listen (AN-tee … ful-ee HYOO-mun MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A drug used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) in certain patients who have already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used alone or with another drug to treat cancer of the stomach or gastroesophageal junction (the area where the esophagus connects to the stomach) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B binds to receptors for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor, which may be found on some types of cancer cells. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Cyramza, IMC-1121B, and ramucirumab.
antiviral listen (AN-tee-VY-rul)
A drug used to treat infections caused by viruses.
anus listen (AY-nus)
The opening of the rectum to the outside of the body.
anxiety listen (ang-ZY-eh-tee)
Feelings of fear, dread, and uneasiness that may occur as a reaction to stress. A person with anxiety may sweat, feel restless and tense, and have a rapid heart beat. Extreme anxiety that happens often over time may be a sign of an anxiety disorder.
anxiety disorder (ang-ZY-eh-tee dis-OR-der)
A condition in which a person has excessive worry and feelings of fear, dread, and uneasiness. Other symptoms may include sweating, restlessness, irritability, fatigue, poor concentration, trouble sleeping, trouble breathing, a fast heartbeat, and dizziness. The symptoms can get worse over time and affect a person’s day-to-day life. Anxiety disorders may be caused by a medical problem, a traumatic or stressful event, certain medicines, or other factors. There are many types of anxiety disorders, including generalized anxiety disorder, social anxiety disorder, panic disorder, post-traumatic stress disorder, and phobia-related disorders.
anxiolysis listen (ANG-zee-AH-lih-sis)
A level of sedation in which a person is very relaxed and may be awake. The person is able to answer questions and follow instructions. Anxiolysis is caused by special drugs and is used to help relieve anxiety during certain medical or surgical procedures. Also called minimal sedation.
anxiolytic listen (ANG-zee-oh-LIH-tik)
A drug used to treat symptoms of anxiety, such as feelings of fear, dread, uneasiness, and muscle tightness, that may occur as a reaction to stress. Most anxiolytics block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called antianxiety agent and anxiolytic agent.
anxiolytic agent listen (ANG-zee-oh-LIH-tik AY-jent)
A drug used to treat symptoms of anxiety, such as feelings of fear, dread, uneasiness, and muscle tightness, that may occur as a reaction to stress. Most anxiolytic agents block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called antianxiety agent and anxiolytic.
aorta listen (ay-OR-tuh)
The largest artery in the body. It carries oxygen-rich blood away from the heart to vessels that reach the rest of the body.
aortocoronary bypass listen (ay-OR-toh-KOR-uh-NAYR-ee BY-pass)
Surgery in which a healthy blood vessel taken from another part of the body is used to make a new path for blood around a blocked artery leading to the heart. This restores the flow of oxygen and nutrients to the heart. Also called CAB and coronary artery bypass.
AP23573
A substance being studied in the treatment of soft tissue and bone cancers. It is also being studied in the treatment of other solid tumors and hematologic cancer. AP23573 stops cells from dividing and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of mTOR inhibitor. Also called ridaforolimus.
AP5346
A substance being studied in the treatment of head and neck cancer. It may kill cancer cells by carrying an anticancer drug into the tumor. It is a type of platinum compound.
apalutamide listen (A-puh-LOO-tuh-mide)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has not spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Apalutamide binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Apalutamide blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called Erleada.
APC
A type of immune cell that boosts immune responses by showing antigens on its surface to other cells of the immune system. An APC is a type of phagocyte. Also called antigen-presenting cell.
APC vaccine listen (… vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made of antigens and antigen-presenting cells (APCs). APCs boost an immune response by presenting antigens on their surfaces to other cells of the immune system. Also called antigen-presenting cell vaccine.
APC8015
A vaccine used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who have few or no symptoms and whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). APC8015 is made from a patient’s immune cells that have been treated in the laboratory with GM-CSF (a type of growth factor) and a protein found on prostate cancer cells. APC8015 may help the immune system kill prostate cancer cells. It is a type of cellular adoptive immunotherapy. Also called Provenge and sipuleucel-T.
APC8015F
A vaccine made from immune system cells taken from a patient with prostate cancer and frozen for future use. The cells are treated in the laboratory with a growth factor attached to a protein called prostatic-acid phosphatase (PAP), which is found on prostate cancer cells. When APC8015F is injected into the patient, it may cause T cells (a type of white blood cell) to kill tumor cells that have PAP on them.
apheresis listen (a-feh-REE-sis)
A procedure in which blood is collected, part of the blood such as platelets or white blood cells is taken out, and the rest of the blood is returned to the donor. Also called pheresis.
Apidra listen (uh-PEE-druh)
A drug used to control the amount of sugar in the blood of patients with diabetes mellitus. It is a form of the hormone insulin that is made in the laboratory. Apidra gets into the blood faster than insulin when it is injected under the skin before or shortly after a meal. It is a type of therapeutic insulin. Also called insulin glulisine.
APL
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow. It is usually marked by an exchange of parts of chromosomes 15 and 17. Also called acute promyelocytic leukemia and promyelocytic leukemia.
aplastic anemia listen (AY-PLAS-tik uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the bone marrow is unable to produce blood cells.
aplidine listen (AP-lih-deen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is obtained from a marine organism.
APN
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to diagnose and treat disease. APNs are licensed at the state level and certified by national nursing organizations. In cancer care, an APN may manage the primary care of patients and their families, based on a practice agreement with a doctor. Also called advanced practice nurse, NP, and nurse practitioner.
Apo-2L listen (AY-poh …)
A cell protein that can attach to certain molecules in some cancer cells and may kill the cells. Apo-2L is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called TNF-related apoptosis-inducing ligand, TRAIL, and tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand.
apocrine gland listen (A-poh-krin ...)
A type of gland that is found in the skin, breast, eyelid, and ear. Apocrine glands in the breast secrete fat droplets into breast milk and those in the ear help form earwax. Apocrine glands in the skin and eyelid are sweat glands. Most apocrine glands in the skin are in the armpits, the groin, and the area around the nipples of the breast. Apocrine glands in the skin are scent glands, and their secretions usually have an odor. Another type of gland (eccrine gland or simple sweat gland) produces most sweat.
apolizumab listen (a-puh-LIZ-yoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of hematologic (blood) cancers. Apolizumab binds to a protein called ID10, which is found on the surface of some types of immune cells and cancer cells. It may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
apoptosis listen (A-pop-TOH-sis)
A type of cell death in which a series of molecular steps in a cell lead to its death. This is one method the body uses to get rid of unneeded or abnormal cells. The process of apoptosis may be blocked in cancer cells. Also called programmed cell death.
appendage listen (uh-PEN-dij)
In medicine, a body part (such as an arm or leg) that is attached to the main part of the body.
appendectomy listen (A-pen-DEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the appendix (small finger-shaped pouch at the end of the first part of the large intestine).
appendix listen (uh-PEN-dix)
A small, fingerlike pouch that sticks out from the cecum (the first part of the large intestine near the end of the small intestine).
appetite listen (A-peh-tite)
A desire to satisfy a physical or mental need, such as for food, sex, or adventure.
aprepitant listen (uh-PREH-pih-tunt)
A drug used with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Aprepitant blocks the action of a certain chemical in the brain that may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking this chemical may lessen nausea and vomiting. Aprepitant is a type of antiemetic and a type of substance P/neurokinin 1 receptor antagonist. Also called Emend.
Aptivus listen (AP-tih-vus)
A drug used with another drug, ritonavir, to treat patients who are infected with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS) and have been treated with other anti-HIV drugs. Aptivus blocks the HIV virus from making copies of itself. It is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called tipranavir sodium.
aqueous listen (A-kwee-us)
Having to do with water.
AR
A protein that binds male hormones called androgens. ARs are found inside the cells of male reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. In prostate cancer, androgens bind to ARs inside the cancer cells, which causes the cancer cells to grow. Also called androgen receptor.
AR+ listen
Describes cells that have a protein that binds to androgens (male hormones). Cancer cells that are AR+ may need androgens to grow. These cells may stop growing or die when they are treated with substances that block the binding and actions of androgen hormones. Also called androgen receptor positive.
ARA-C
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL), acute myeloid leukemia (AML), and chronic myeloid leukemia (CML). It is also used to prevent and treat a type of leukemia that has spread to the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ARA-C blocks cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called cytarabine.
Aranesp listen (AYR-uh-nesp)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease and some types of chemotherapy. Aranesp is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Aranesp is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called darbepoetin alfa.
arctigenin listen (ARK-tih-JEH-nin)
A substance found in certain plants, including burdock. It has shown antiviral and anticancer effects. Arctigenin belongs to a group of substances called lignans.
arctiin listen (ARK-tine)
A substance found in certain plants, including burdock. It has shown anticancer effects. Arctiin belongs to a group of substances called lignans.
Aredia listen (uh-REH-dee-uh)
A drug used to treat hypercalcemia (high blood levels of calcium) caused by certain types of cancer. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat multiple myeloma and breast cancer that has spread to bone. It is also used to treat Paget disease of the bone. Aredia may help keep bone from breaking down and prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called pamidronate disodium.
areola listen (ayr-EE-oh-luh)
The area of dark-colored skin on the breast that surrounds the nipple.
arginine listen (AR-jih-neen)
One of the twenty common amino acids (building blocks of proteins). Arginine is being studied as a nutritional supplement in the treatment and prevention of cancer and other conditions. Also called L-arginine.
arginine butyrate listen (AR-jih-neen BYOO-tuh-rayt)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
argon beam coagulator ablation listen (AR-gon beem coh-A-gyuh-LAY-ter a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure that destroys tissue with an electrical current passed through a stream of argon gas to the tissue. It is used to treat endometriosis and other conditions, and to stop blood loss during surgery.
Arimidex listen (uh-RIH-mih-dex)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Arimidex lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Arimidex is a type of nonsteroidal aromatase inhibitor. Also called anastrozole.
Arixtra listen (uh-RIK-struh)
A drug used to prevent blood clots from forming inside blood vessels in the leg. It is being studied in the prevention of blood clots in some cancer patients, including women having surgery for cancer of the reproductive tract. It is a type of anticoagulant. Also called fondaparinux sodium.
ARMD
A condition in which there is a slow breakdown of cells in the center of the retina (the light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). This blocks vision in the center of the eye and can cause problems with activities such as reading and driving. ARMD is most often seen in people who are over the age of 50. Also called age-related macular degeneration, AMD, and macular degeneration.
armodafinil listen (ar-moh-DA-fih-nil)
A drug that is used to treat certain sleep disorders, such as narcolepsy. It makes patients feel more alert and awake. It is also being studied in the treatment of insomnia and fatigue in patients treated for cancer. Armodafinil acts in a part of the brain that controls sleep and wakefulness. It is a type of wakefulness-promoting agent. Also called Nuvigil.
ARMS
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in older children and teenagers. It begins in embryonic muscle cells (cells that develop into muscles in the body). It can occur at many places in the body, but usually occurs in the trunk, arms, or legs. Also called alveolar rhabdomyosarcoma.
Aromasin listen (uh-ROH-muh-sin)
A drug used to treat advanced breast cancer or early-stage breast cancer that is estrogen receptor positive (ER+). It is used in postmenopausal women whose cancer has already been treated with tamoxifen. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Aromasin lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Aromasin is a type of aromatase inhibitor. Also called exemestane.
aromatase inhibitor listen (uh-ROH-muh-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that prevents the formation of estradiol, a female hormone, by interfering with an aromatase enzyme. Aromatase inhibitors are used as a type of hormone therapy for postmenopausal women who have hormone-dependent breast cancer.
aromatherapist listen (uh-ROH-muh-THAYR-uh-pist)
A person who practices a type of complementary medicine called aromatherapy. This therapy uses plant oils that give off strong, pleasant smells to promote relaxation and a sense of well-being. The plant oils are usually inhaled or put on the skin using wet cloths, baths, or massage.
aromatherapy listen (uh-ROH-muh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of complementary and alternative medicine that uses plant oils that give off strong pleasant aromas (smells) to promote relaxation, a sense of well-being, and healing.
aromatherapy infusion listen (uh-ROH-muh-THAYR-uh-pee in-FYOO-zhun)
The process of heating (without boiling) a mixture of water and an essential oil (scented liquid taken from a plant) to release a pleasant aroma. Aromatherapy infusion may also refer to the process of heating an herb in liquid to release the essential oils. Inhaled oxygen scented by aromatherapy infusion is being studied as a complementary therapy (used in addition to standard treatments) to relieve pain and shorten recovery time in patients undergoing colonoscopy.
aromatherapy massage listen (uh-ROH-muh-THAYR-uh-pee muh-SAZH)
A type of complementary and alternative medicine that uses rubbing and kneading of the skin with plant oils that give off strong, pleasant aromas (smells) to promote relaxation, a sense of well-being, and healing.
aromatic listen (AYR-oh-MA-tik)
Having an odor, which often is pleasant or spicy.
arousal listen (uh-ROW-zul)
The state of being alert and ready to respond, or waking from sleep.
Arranon listen (AYR-rah-non)
A drug used to treat T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell lymphoblastic lymphoma. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better or has recurred (come back) after treatment with other anticancer drugs. Arranon stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 506U78 and nelarabine.
arrhenoblastoma listen (uh-REE-noh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare type of ovarian tumor in which the tumor cells secrete a male sex hormone. This may cause virilization (the appearance of male physical characteristics in females). Also called androblastoma and Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of the ovary.
arsenic listen (ARS-nik)
A poisonous chemical used to kill weeds and pests. Also used in cancer therapy.
arsenic trioxide listen (AR-seh-nik try-OK-side)
A drug used to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (APL) that has a certain chromosome abnormality or a fusion gene called PML/RAR-alpha. It is used with tretinoin in some newly diagnosed patients. It is used alone in patients whose cancer has not gotten better or has come back after treatment with other anticancer drugs. Arsenic trioxide is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Arsenic trioxide damages a fusion protein made by the PML/RAR-alpha fusion gene. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Also called Trisenox.
art therapy listen (… THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses the making of art and the response to art to improve one’s physical, mental, and emotional well-being. Art therapy is sometimes used together with psychotherapy (talk therapy).
arterial embolization listen (ar-TEER-ee-ul EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor or an abnormal area of tissue is blocked. During arterial embolization, a small incision (cut) is made in the inner thigh and a catheter (thin, flexible tube) is inserted and guided into an artery near the tumor or abnormal tissue. Once the catheter is in place, small particles made of tiny gelatin sponges or beads are injected. This blocks the artery and stops the flow of blood to the tumor or abnormal area of tissue. Arterial embolization is used to treat some types of liver cancer, kidney cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors. It may also be used to treat uterine fibroids, aneurysms, and other conditions. Also called TAE and transarterial embolization.
arteriogram listen (ar-TEER-ee-oh-gram)
An x-ray of arteries. The person receives an injection of a dye that outlines the vessels on the x-ray.
arteriography listen (ar-TEER-ee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure to x-ray arteries. The arteries can be seen because of an injection of a dye that outlines the vessels on the x-ray.
artery listen (AR-tuh-ree)
A blood vessel that carries blood from the heart to tissues and organs in the body.
arthralgia listen (ar-THRAL-juh)
Joint pain.
arthritis listen (ar-THRY-tis)
A disease that causes inflammation and pain in the joints.
artificial pacemaker listen (AR-tih-FIH-shul PAYS-may-ker)
An electronic device that is implanted in the body to monitor heart rate and rhythm. It gives the heart electrical stimulation when it does not beat normally. It runs on batteries and has long, thin wires that connect it to the heart. Also called cardiac pacemaker and pacemaker.
Arzerra listen (ar-ZAYR-uh)
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Arzerra binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. Arzerra may block CD20 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called HuMax-CD20 and ofatumumab.
arzoxifene hydrochloride listen (ar-ZOK-sih-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of osteoporosis and breast cancer. Arzoxifene hydrochloride is made in the laboratory and binds to estrogen receptors in the body. It is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called LY353381 hydrochloride.
asbestos listen (as-BES-tus)
A group of minerals that take the form of tiny fibers. Asbestos has been used as insulation against heat and fire in buildings. Loose asbestos fibers breathed into the lungs can cause several serious diseases, including lung cancer and malignant mesothelioma (cancer found in the lining of the lungs, chest, or abdomen). Asbestos that is swallowed may cause cancer of the gastrointestinal tract.
asbestosis listen (as-bes-TOH-sis)
A lung disease caused by breathing in particles of asbestos (a group of minerals that take the form of tiny fibers). Symptoms include coughing, trouble breathing, and chest pain caused by scarring and permanent damage to lung tissue. Asbestosis increases the risk of lung cancer and malignant mesothelioma (cancer found in the lining of the lungs, chest, or abdomen).
ASC-H
A finding of abnormal cells in a Pap test. It means there are abnormal squamous cells in the tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. ASC-H may be a sign of a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL), which may become cervical cancer if untreated. More testing may be needed. Also called atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade lesion.
ascites listen (uh-SY-teez)
Abnormal buildup of fluid in the abdomen that may cause swelling. In late-stage cancer, tumor cells may be found in the fluid in the abdomen. Ascites also occurs in patients with liver disease.
ascorbic acid listen (uh-SKOR-bik A-sid)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Ascorbic acid helps fight infections, heal wounds, and keep tissues healthy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Ascorbic acid is found in all fruits and vegetables, especially citrus fruits, strawberries, cantaloupe, green peppers, tomatoes, broccoli, leafy greens, and potatoes. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Ascorbic acid is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called vitamin C.
ASCUS listen
A finding of abnormal cells in the tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. ASCUS is the most common abnormal finding in a Pap test. It may be a sign of infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It may also be a sign of a benign (not cancer) growth, such as a cyst or polyp or, in menopausal women, of low hormone levels. More testing, such as an HPV test, may be needed. Also called ASC-US and atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.
ASC-US
A finding of abnormal cells in the tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. ASC-US is the most common abnormal finding in a Pap test. It may be a sign of infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It may also be a sign of a benign (not cancer) growth, such as a cyst or polyp or, in menopausal women, of low hormone levels. More testing, such as an HPV test, may be needed. Also called ASCUS and atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance.
aseptic necrosis listen (ay-SEP-tik neh-KROH-sis)
A condition in which there is a loss of blood flow to bone tissue, which causes the bone to die. It is most common in the hips, knees, shoulders, and ankles. It may be caused by long-term use of steroid medicines, alcohol abuse, joint injuries, and certain diseases, such as cancer and arthritis. It may also occur at some point in time after cancer treatment that included methotrexate, bisphosphonates, or corticosteroids. Also called avascular necrosis, ischemic necrosis, and osteonecrosis.
Ashkenazi Jews listen (ASH-keh-NAH-zee jooz)
One of two major ancestral groups of Jewish individuals. The ancestors of Ashkenazi Jews lived in Central and Eastern Europe (e.g., Germany, Poland, Russia). The other group is called Sephardic Jews and includes those whose ancestors lived in North Africa, the Middle East, and Spain. Most Jews living in the United States are of Ashkenazi descent.
ASM
A rare condition in which too many mast cells (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs in the body, including the bone marrow, lymph nodes, bone, liver, spleen, and small intestine. ASM may get worse quickly and cause severe symptoms and organ damage. Sometimes, it may become mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia). ASM usually occurs in adults. Also called aggressive systemic mastocytosis.
asparaginase listen (as-PAYR-uh-jih-NAYS)
A drug that is used to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) and is being studied in the treatment of some other types of cancer. It is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of tumor cells that need asparagine to grow. Also called Elspar and L-asparaginase.
asparaginase Erwinia chrysanthemi listen (as-PAYR-uh-jih-NAYS er-WIH-nee-uh krih-SAN-theh-my)
A drug used with other anticancer drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is an enzyme that comes from the Erwinia chrysanthemi bacterium. It is used in patients who cannot take a similar drug that comes from the E. coli bacterium. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. It may also kill cancer cells. Also called Erwinaze.
Asparlas listen (AS-par-las)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic lymphoma in children and young adults aged 1 month to 21 years. Asparlas is a form of the drug L-asparaginase that is linked to a substance called SC-PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. L-asparaginase is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may stop the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. Asparlas is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called calaspargase pegol, EZN-2285, and SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase.
aspartate transaminase listen (as-PAR-tayt tranz-A-mih-nays)
An enzyme found in the liver, heart, and other tissues. A high level of aspartate transaminase released into the blood may be a sign of liver or heart damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase and SGOT.
aspergillosis listen (AS-per-jih-LOH-sis)
An infectious fungal disease that occurs most often in the skin, ears, nasal sinuses, and lungs of people with suppressed immune systems.
Aspergillus listen (AS-per-JIH-lus)
Fungi commonly found in soil. Certain types of Aspergillus may cause disease, especially in people who have suppressed immune systems.
aspirate
Aspirate (pronounced AS-pih-rit) refers to fluid, tissue, or other substance that is withdrawn from a body cavity, cyst, or tumor. Aspirate (pronounced AS-pih-rayt) refers to the act of withdrawing the fluid, tissue, or other substance through a needle. It also refers to the accidental breathing in of food or fluid into the lungs. This can cause serious problems, such as pneumonia and other lung problems.
aspiration listen (AS-pih-RAY-shun)
Removal of fluid or tissue through a needle. Also, the accidental breathing in of food or fluid into the lungs.
aspirin listen (AS-pih-rin)
A drug that reduces pain, fever, inflammation, and blood clotting. Aspirin belongs to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory agents. It is also being studied in cancer prevention.
ASPS
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in older children and teenagers. It begins in the soft supporting tissue that connects and surrounds the organs and other tissues. ASPS usually occurs in the legs, but can also occur in the arms, hands, head, or neck. It can cause the growth of new blood vessels that help the tumor grow and spread. Also called alveolar soft part sarcoma.
assay listen (A-say)
A laboratory test to find and measure the amount of a specific substance.
assent process listen (uh-SENT PRAH-ses)
A process that is required by law in which children or adolescents are given easy-to-understand information about a clinical trial to help them decide if they want to take part in the trial. The patient is given a chance to ask questions about what will happen during the trial, why it’s being done, and what they will be asked to do. Formal consent to enter the trial comes from the parent or guardian.
assessment listen (uh-SES-ment)
In healthcare, a process used to learn about a patient’s condition. This may include a complete medical history, medical tests, a physical exam, a test of learning skills, tests to find out if the patient is able to carry out the tasks of daily living, a mental health evaluation, and a review of social support and community resources available to the patient.
asset listen (A-set)
Something that has financial value and that a person owns, benefits from, or has use of. Money, jewelry, artwork, investments, real estate, and cars are examples of assets.
assistive device listen (uh-SIS-tiv dee-VISE)
A tool that helps a person with a disability to do a certain task. Examples are a cane, wheelchair, scooter, walker, hearing aid, or special bed.
assistive technology listen (uh-SIS-tiv tek-NAH-loh-jee)
Any device or technology that helps a disabled person. Examples are special grips for holding utensils, computer screen monitors to help a person with low vision read more easily, computers controlled by talking, telephones that make the sound louder, and lifters to help a person rise out of a chair.
asthenia listen (as-THEE-nee-uh)
Weakness; lack of energy and strength.
asthma listen (AZ-muh)
A chronic disease in which the bronchial airways in the lungs become narrowed and swollen, making it difficult to breathe. Symptoms include wheezing, coughing, tightness in the chest, shortness of breath, and rapid breathing. An asthma attack may be brought on by pet hair, dust, smoke, pollen, mold, exercise, cold air, or stress.
astrocyte listen (AS-troh-site)
A large, star-shaped cell that holds nerve cells in place and helps them develop and work the way they should. An astrocyte is a type of glial cell.
astrocytoma listen (AS-troh-sy-TOH-muh)
A tumor that begins in the brain or spinal cord in small, star-shaped cells called astrocytes.
asymmetry listen (ay-SIH-meh-tree)
Lack or absence of balanced proportions between parts of a thing.
asymptomatic listen (AY-sim-toh-MA-tik)
Having no signs or symptoms of disease.
asymptomatic inflammatory prostatitis listen (AY-sim-toh-MA-tik in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee PROS-tuh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the prostate gland where the only symptom is the presence of white blood cells in the prostate fluid.
AT/RT
An aggressive cancer of the central nervous system, kidney, or liver that occurs in very young children. Also called ATT/RHT and atypical teratoid/rhabdoid tumor.
AT7519M
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. AT7519M blocks enzymes needed for cells to divide. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called CDK inhibitor AT7519M.
AT9283
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks enzymes (Aurora kinases) involved in cell division and may kill cancer cells. AT9283 is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase inhibitor. Also called Aurora kinase inhibitor AT9283.
atamestane listen (uh-TA-meh-stayn)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Atamestane blocks the production of the hormone estrogen in the body. It belongs to the family of drugs called antiestrogens.
ataxia listen (uh-TAK-see-uh)
Loss of muscle coordination.
ataxia-telangiectasia listen (uh-TAK-see-uh-teh-LAN-jee-ek-TAY-zhuh)
A rare, inherited, progressive, degenerative disease of childhood that causes loss of muscle control, a weakened immune system, and an increased risk of cancer.
ataxic gait listen (uh-TAK-sik gayt)
Awkward, uncoordinated walking.
atelectasis listen (A-teh-LEK-tuh-sis)
Failure of the lung to expand (inflate) completely. This may be caused by a blocked airway, a tumor, general anesthesia, pneumonia or other lung infections, lung disease, or long-term bedrest with shallow breathing. Sometimes called a collapsed lung.
atezolizumab listen (A-teh-zoh-LIZ-yoo-mab)
A drug used to treat certain types of small cell lung cancer, breast cancer, non-small cell lung cancer, and urothelial cancer (a type of bladder cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Atezolizumab binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Atezolizumab may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Tecentriq.
athymic nude mouse listen (ay-THY-mik nood ...)
A type of laboratory mouse that is hairless, lacks a normal thymus gland, and has a defective immune system because of a genetic mutation. Athymic nude mice are often used in cancer research because they do not reject tumor cells, from mice or other species.
atiprimod listen (uh-TIH-prih-mod)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain multiple myelomas and other advanced cancers. Atiprimod may block the growth of tumors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Atiprimod is a type of signal transduction inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called azaspirane and SK&F106615.
ATLL
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma caused by the human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 (HTLV-1). It is marked by bone and skin lesions, high calcium levels, and enlarged lymph nodes, spleen, and liver. Also called adult T-cell leukemia/lymphoma.
ATN-161
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. ATN-161 may prevent the spread of tumor cells and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
ATN-224
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. ATN-224 also blocks enzymes that cells need to divide and grow, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of superoxide dismutase inhibitor. Also called SOD1 inhibitor ATN-224.
atom listen (A-tum)
The smallest part of a substance that cannot be broken down chemically. Each atom has a nucleus (center) made up of protons (positive particles) and neutrons (particles with no charge). Electrons (negative particles) move around the nucleus. Atoms of different elements contain different numbers of protons, neutrons, and electrons.
atorvastatin calcium listen (uh-TOR-vuh-STA-tin KAL-see-um)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood and to prevent stroke, heart attack, and angina (chest pain). It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Atorvastatin calcium blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It also causes an increase in the breakdown of cholesterol. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called Lipitor.
ATP
A substance present in all living cells that provides energy for many metabolic processes and is involved in making RNA. ATP made in the laboratory is being studied in patients with advanced solid tumors to see if it can decrease weight loss and improve muscle strength. Also called adenosine triphosphate.
ATRA listen
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. ATRA is made in the body from vitamin A and helps cells to grow and develop, especially in the embryo. A form of ATRA made in the laboratory is put on the skin to treat conditions such as acne and is taken by mouth to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (a fast-growing cancer in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow). ATRA is being studied in the prevention and treatment of other types of cancer. Also called all-trans retinoic acid, retinoic acid, tretinoin, and vitamin A acid.
atrasentan listen (A-truh-SEN-tan)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called endothelin-1 protein receptor antagonists.
atrophic vaginitis listen (ay-TROH-fik va-jih-NY-tis)
A condition in which the tissues lining the inside of the vagina (birth canal) become thin, dry, and inflamed. This is caused by a decrease in the amount of estrogen (a female hormone) made by the body. Symptoms of atrophic vaginitis include vaginal dryness, itching, and burning, and pain during sexual intercourse. Other symptoms include a burning feeling while urinating, feeling a need to urinate often or right away, and being unable to control the flow of urine. Atrophic vaginitis most commonly occurs in women who have gone through menopause naturally or who have early menopause caused by certain types of cancer treatment (such as radiation therapy to the pelvis or chemotherapy) or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. Also called vaginal atrophy.
atropine sulfate listen (A-troh-peen SUL-fayt)
A drug used to block nerve stimulation of muscles and glands and relax smooth muscles. It is also used to increase heart rate, reduce secretions, and treat the effects of certain poisons. It is a type of antimuscarinic agent and a type of tropane alkaloid.
atropine suppression test listen (A-troh-peen suh-PREH-shun …)
A test used to help find out if secretion of pancreatic polypeptide (a protein released by the pancreas) is normal or caused by a tumor. A drug called atropine sulfate is injected into the patient’s vein and level of pancreatic polypeptide in the blood is measured. If there is a tumor, the injection will not change the level of pancreatic polypeptide. If there is no tumor, the level of pancreatic polypeptide will drop.
ATT/RHT
An aggressive cancer of the central nervous system, kidney, or liver that occurs in very young children. Also called AT/RT and atypical teratoid/rhabdoid tumor.
attending physician listen (uh-TEN-ding fih-ZIH-shun)
A medical doctor who is responsible for the overall care of a patient in a hospital or clinic setting. An attending physician may also supervise and teach medical students, interns, and residents involved in the patient’s care.
attenuated listen (uh-TEN-yoo-way-ted)
Weakened or thinned. Attenuated strains of disease-causing bacteria and viruses are often used as vaccines. The weakened strains are used as vaccines because they stimulate a protective immune response while causing no disease or only mild disease in the person receiving the vaccine.
aTTP
A rare condition in which blood clots form in small blood vessels throughout the body. These clots can block the flow of blood and oxygen to the body’s organs, which leads to a lower-than-normal number of platelets in the blood. Signs and symptoms of aTTP include purple bruises or tiny red or purple spots on the skin, bleeding problems, anemia, fever, chest pain, nervous system problems, and kidney problems. aTTP occurs when the body starts producing antibodies that block an enzyme called ADAMTS13, which is involved in blood clotting. It may be brought on by certain diseases or conditions (such as pregnancy, cancer, lupus, HIV, or other infections), certain medicines (such as chemotherapy or hormone therapy), or certain procedures (such as surgery or a stem cell transplant). aTTP usually occurs in adults. Also called acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura.
atypia listen (ay-TIH-pee-uh)
State of being not typical or normal. In medicine, atypia is an abnormality in cells in tissue.
atypical ductal breast hyperplasia listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul DUK-tul brest HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the lining of breast ducts and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having atypical ductal breast hyperplasia increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called ADH and atypical ductal hyperplasia.
atypical ductal hyperplasia listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul DUK-tul HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the lining of breast ducts and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having atypical ductal hyperplasia increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called ADH and atypical ductal breast hyperplasia.
atypical glandular cells listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul GLAN-juh-ler sels)
A finding of abnormal cells in a Pap test. The glandular cells come from the inner part of the cervix or the lining of the uterus. This finding may be a sign of cancer or other serious condition, and more testing may be needed. Also called AGC.
atypical glandular cells of uncertain significance listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul GLAN-juh-ler sels … UN-ser-tun sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A term that has been used to describe abnormal cells that come from glands in the walls of the cervix (the lower, narrow end of the uterus). These abnormal cells are found in a small number of Pap smears (a procedure used to detect cervical cancer) and may be a sign of more serious lesions or cancer. The term used now is atypical glandular cells. Also called AGUS and atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance.
atypical glandular cells of undetermined significance listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul GLAN-juh-ler sels … UN-deh-TER-mind sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A term that has been used to describe abnormal cells that come from glands in the walls of the cervix (the lower, narrow end of the uterus). These abnormal cells are found in a small number of Pap smears (a procedure used to detect cervical cancer) and may be a sign of more serious lesions or cancer. The term used now is atypical glandular cells. Also called AGUS and atypical glandular cells of uncertain significance.
atypical hyperplasia listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which cells look abnormal under a microscope and are increased in number.
atypical lobular breast hyperplasia listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul LAH-byoo-ler brest HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the breast lobules and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having atypical lobular breast hyperplasia increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called ALH and atypical lobular hyperplasia.
atypical lobular hyperplasia listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul LAH-byoo-ler HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which there are more cells than normal in the breast lobules and the cells look abnormal under a microscope. Having atypical lobular hyperplasia increases the risk of breast cancer. Also called ALH and atypical lobular breast hyperplasia.
atypical mole listen (ay-TIH-pih-kul mole)
A type of mole that looks different from a common mole. Several different types of moles are called atypical. Atypical moles are often larger than common moles and have regular or ragged or blurred borders that are not easy to see. Colors of atypical moles may be the same as the rest of the skin, or lighter, darker, or uneven. Parts or all of the mole may be raised above the skin surface. It is rare, but some atypical moles can develop into melanoma (a type of skin cancer). An atypical mole is sometimes called a Spitz nevus, a congenital nevus, a birthmark, or a dysplastic nevus.
atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul SKWAY-mus sels … UN-deh-TER-mind sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A finding of abnormal cells in the tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. Atypical squamous cells of undetermined significance is the most common abnormal finding in a Pap test. It may be a sign of infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It may also be a sign of a benign (not cancer) growth, such as a cyst or polyp or, in menopausal women, of low hormone levels. More testing, such as an HPV test, may be needed. Also called ASC-US and ASCUS.
atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade lesion listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul SKWAY-mus sels, KA-not ek-SKLOOD … hy-grayd LEE-zhun)
A finding of abnormal cells in a Pap test. It means there are abnormal squamous cells in the tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. Atypical squamous cells, cannot exclude a high-grade lesion may be a sign of a high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL), which may become cervical cancer if untreated. More testing may be needed. Also called ASC-H.
atypical teratoid/rhabdoid tumor listen (AY-TIH-pih-kul TAYR-uh-toyd/RAB-doyd TOO-mer)
An aggressive cancer of the central nervous system, kidney, or liver that occurs in very young children. Also called AT/RT and ATT/RHT.
auditory listen (AW-duh-TOR-ee)
Having to do with the ear and the sense of hearing.
auditory brain stem response test listen (AW-duh-TOR-ee brayn stem reh-SPONTS …)
A test used to detect some types of hearing loss, such as hearing loss caused by injury or tumors that affect nerves involved in hearing. Electrodes are placed on the head and certain tones or clicking sounds are made. The electrodes measure nerve signals in the brain when it reacts to the sounds. Also called ABR test, BAER test, and brain stem auditory evoked response test.
Augmentin listen (awg-MEN-tin)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. Adding the chemical clavulanate potassium to the antibiotic amoxicillin increases the amount of time the antibiotic stays active in the body. Augmentin is a type of combination antibiotic. Also called amoxicillin-clavulanate potassium.
augmerosen listen (awg-MEH-roh-sen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein that makes cancer cells live longer and by making them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligodeoxyribonucleotide. Also called bcl-2 antisense oligodeoxynucleotide G3139, Genasense, and oblimersen sodium.
auricular listen (aw-RIH-kyoo-ler)
Having to do with the ear.
auricular acupuncture listen (aw-RIH-kyoo-ler AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A type of acupuncture in which thin needles are inserted at specific points on the outer ear to control pain and other symptoms. It is thought that the outer ear contains a “map” of the whole body and that specific points on this map match up with certain parts of the body. Also called ear acupuncture.
Aurimmune listen (AW-rih-MYOON)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Aurimmune is made in the laboratory by binding a cancer-killing protein called tumor necrosis factor (TNF) to the surface of very tiny particles of gold. These TNF-gold particles may kill cancer cells without harming healthy tissue. Also called colloidal gold-bound tumor necrosis factor and TNF-bound colloidal gold.
Aurora B/C kinase inhibitor GSK1070916A listen (uh-ROR-uh … KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes (Aurora kinases) involved in cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase inhibitor. Also called GSK1070916A.
Aurora kinase inhibitor AT9283 listen (uh-ROR-uh KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks enzymes (Aurora kinases) involved in cell division and may kill cancer cells. Aurora kinase inhibitor AT9283 is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase inhibitor. Also called AT9283.
aurotherapy listen (AW-roh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses gold salts (a salt form of the metal element gold) to treat diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis. The gold salts stop cells from releasing chemicals that can harm tissues. Also called chrysotherapy and gold therapy.
autoantibody listen (AW-toh-AN-tee-BAH-dee)
An antibody made against substances formed by a person’s own body. Autoantibodies can directly destroy cells that have the substances on them or can make it easier for other white blood cells to destroy them. Some autoimmune diseases are caused by autoantibodies.
autoclave listen (AW-toh-KLAYV)
A device that uses steam under high pressure to sterilize medical and laboratory supplies and equipment.
autoclave-resistant factor listen (AW-toh-klayv-reh-ZIH-stunt FAK-ter)
A substance found in soybeans that may slow down or stop the spread of cancer. This substance does not break down in an autoclave (a device that uses steam under high pressure to sterilize medical and laboratory supplies and equipment).
autoimmune disease listen (AW-toh-ih-MYOON dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which the body recognizes its own tissues as foreign and directs an immune response against them.
autoimmune enteropathy listen (AW-toh-ih-MYOON en-teh-RAH-puh-thee)
A rare disease in which certain cells in the intestine are destroyed by a patient’s immune system. It causes severe, chronic, diarrhea and usually occurs in children.
autoimmune hemolytic anemia listen (AW-toh-ih-MYOON hee-moh-LIH-tik uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the body’s immune system stops red blood cells from forming or causes them to clump together. Autoimmune hemolytic anemia can occur in patients who have chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). Also called immune complex hemolytic anemia and immunohemolytic anemia.
autoimmune thyroiditis listen (AW-toh-ih-MYOON thy-roy-DY-tis)
An autoimmune condition of the thyroid gland (a gland located beneath the larynx). It is caused by the formation of antibodies that attack the thyroid gland and it usually causes hypothyroidism (too little thyroid hormone). Symptoms include fatigue, weight gain, constipation, dry skin, depression, and the inability to exercise. It is more common in females and can run in families. Also called Hashimoto disease and Hashimoto thyroiditis.
autologous listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus)
Taken from an individual's own tissues, cells, or DNA.
autologous bone marrow listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus bone MAYR-oh)
In transplantation, refers to a person's own bone marrow. Bone marrow is the soft, sponge-like tissue in the center of most large bones that produces white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets.
autologous bone marrow transplantation listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus bone MAYR-oh tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which bone marrow is removed from a person, stored, and then given back to the person after intensive treatment.
autologous expanded mesenchymal stem cells OTI-010 listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus … meh-ZEN-kih-mul …)
A product that is made of special stem cells taken from a patient’s bone marrow and grown in the laboratory. After a patient’s bone marrow is destroyed by treatment with whole body irradiation or chemotherapy, these cells are injected back into the patient to help rebuild bone marrow. Autologous expanded mesenchymal stem cells OTI-010 has been studied in the prevention of graft-versus-host disease during stem cell transplant in patients receiving treatment for cancer. Autologous expanded mesenchymal stem cells OTI-010 is used in cellular therapy. Also called Stromagen.
autologous lymphocyte listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus LIM-foh-site)
In transplantation, refers to a person’s own white blood cells. Lymphocytes have a number of roles in the immune system, including the production of antibodies and other substances that fight infections and other diseases.
autologous stem cell transplantation listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus ... tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which blood-forming stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop) are removed, stored, and later given back to the same person.
autologous tumor cell listen (aw-TAH-luh-gus TOO-mer sel)
A cancer cell from an individual's own tumor.
autonomic nervous system listen (AW-toh-NAH-mik NER-vus SIS-tem)
The part of the nervous system that controls muscles of internal organs (such as the heart, blood vessels, lungs, stomach, and intestines) and glands (such as salivary glands and sweat glands). One part of the autonomic nervous system helps the body rest, relax, and digest food and another part helps a person fight or take flight in an emergency. Also called ANS and involuntary nervous system.
autophagy listen (aw-TAH-fuh-jee)
A normal process in which a cell destroys proteins and other substances in its cytoplasm (the fluid inside the cell membrane but outside the nucleus), which may lead to cell death. Autophagy may prevent normal cells from developing into cancer cells, but it may also protect cancer cells by destroying anticancer drugs or substances taken up by them.
autosomal dominant inheritance listen (AW-toh-SOH-mul DAH-mih-nunt in-HAYR-ih-tunts)
One of the ways a genetic trait or a genetic condition can be passed down (inherited) from parent to child. In autosomal dominant inheritance, a genetic condition can occur when the child inherits one copy of a mutated (changed) gene from one parent. A child who has a parent with the mutated gene has a 50% chance of inheriting that mutated gene.
autosomal recessive inheritance listen (AW-toh-SOH-mul reh-SEH-siv in-HAYR-ih-tunts)
One of the ways a genetic trait or a genetic condition can be passed down (inherited) from parent to child. In autosomal recessive inheritance, a genetic condition occurs when the child inherits one mutated copy of a gene from each parent. The parents usually do not have the condition. The parents are called carriers because they each carry one copy of the mutated gene and can pass it to their children.
Avage listen (AY-vazh)
A drug used on the skin to treat several skin conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of basal cell skin cancer and basal cell nevus syndrome. Avage is related to vitamin A and is made in the laboratory. It turns on a gene that may help stop the growth of skin cancer cells. Avage is a type of synthetic retinoid. Also called tazarotene and Tazorac.
Avandia listen (uh-VAN-dee-uh)
A drug that helps control the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Avandia stops cells from growing and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of thiazolidinedione and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called rosiglitazone maleate.
avascular necrosis listen (ay-VAS-kyoo-ler neh-KROH-sis)
A condition in which there is a loss of blood flow to bone tissue, which causes the bone to die. It is most common in the hips, knees, shoulders, and ankles. It may be caused by long-term use of steroid medicines, alcohol abuse, joint injuries, and certain diseases, such as cancer and arthritis. It may also occur at some point in time after cancer treatment that included methotrexate, bisphosphonates, or corticosteroids. Also called aseptic necrosis, ischemic necrosis, and osteonecrosis.
Avastin listen (uh-VAS-tin)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of cervical, colorectal, lung, and kidney cancer, and glioblastoma (a type of brain cancer). It is also used to treat certain types of ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, and primary peritoneal cancer. Avastin is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It binds to a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Avastin contains the active ingredient bevacizumab. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody.
Avelox listen (A-veh-lox)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. It is a type of fluoroquinolone. Also called moxifloxacin hydrochloride.
avelumab listen (a-VEL-yoo-mab)
A drug used with axitinib to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that has not already been treated. It is also used to treat urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer) that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose disease got worse during or after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Avelumab is also used to treat Merkel cell carcinoma (a rare type of skin cancer) that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Avelumab binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Avelumab may block PD-L1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Bavencio.
Aventyl listen (A-ven-til)
A drug used to treat depression. It may also be used to treat panic or anxiety disorders and certain types of pain, and to help people quit smoking. Aventyl increases the levels of norepinephrine and other natural chemicals in the brain. This helps improve mood and may reduce a person’s craving for nicotine. It is a type of tricyclic antidepressant. Also called nortriptyline and Pamelor.
Avita listen (uh-VEE-tuh)
A topical preparation of tretinoin that is used to treat acne. Tretinoin is a form of vitamin A.
AVN944
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks cells from making DNA and RNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of inosine monophosphate dehydrogenase (IMPDH) inhibitor.
Avodart listen (A-vuh-dart)
A drug used to treat symptoms of an enlarged prostate gland. It is being studied in the treatment of male hair loss and prostate cancer. Avodart blocks enzymes the body needs to make male sex hormones. It is a type of 5-alpha reductase inhibitor. Also called dutasteride and GG745.
avoidance listen (uh-VOY-dunts)
The act of staying away from people, places, and thoughts that may cause anxiety, pain, or unpleasant feelings. Some types of cancer-related avoidance include refusing to accept a cancer diagnosis or get treatment, and using alcohol or other drugs to forget about having cancer.
axicabtagene ciloleucel listen (AK-see-KAB-tuh-jeen sy-loh-LOO-sel)
A drug used to treat certain types of large B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that relapsed (came back) or did not get better after treatment with at least two other types of anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Axicabtagene ciloleucel is made using a patient’s T cells (a type of immune system cell). A gene for a special receptor called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) is added to the T cells in the laboratory. These changed T cells called CAR T cells are grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. Axicabtagene ciloleucel binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on most B cell lymphoma cells. This helps the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Axicabtagene ciloleucel is a type of CAR T-cell therapy. Also called Yescarta.
axilla listen (ak-SIH-luh)
The underarm or armpit.
axillary listen (AK-sih-LAYR-ee)
Pertaining to the armpit area, including the lymph nodes that are located there.
axillary dissection listen (AK-sih-LAYR-ee dy-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove lymph nodes found in the armpit region. Also called axillary lymph node dissection.
axillary lymph node listen (AK-sih-LAYR-ee limf node)
A lymph node in the armpit region that drains lymph from the breast and nearby areas.
axillary lymph node dissection listen (AK-sih-LAYR-ee limf node dy-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove lymph nodes found in the armpit region. Also called axillary dissection.
axitinib listen (AK-sih-TIH-nib)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (the most common type of kidney cancer). It is used in patients who have not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Axitinib blocks the action of proteins called growth factor receptors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Inlyta.
Ayurveda listen (i-yer-VAY-duh)
A medical system from India that has been used for thousands of years. The goal is to cleanse the body and to restore balance to the body, mind, and spirit. It uses diet, herbal medicines, exercise, meditation, breathing, physical therapy, and other methods. It is a type of Complementary and Alternative Medicine (CAM) therapy. Also called Ayurvedic medicine.
Ayurvedic medicine listen (I-yer-VAY-dik MEH-dih-sin)
A medical system from India that has been used for thousands of years. The goal is to cleanse the body and to restore balance to the body, mind, and spirit. It uses diet, herbal medicines, exercise, meditation, breathing, physical therapy, and other methods. It is a type of Complementary and Alternative Medicine (CAM) therapy. Also called Ayurveda.
azacitidine listen (ay-zuh-SY-tih-deen)
A drug used to treat myelodysplastic syndromes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Azacitidine stops cells from making DNA and may kill abnormal blood cells or cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Vidaza.
azaspirane listen (AY-zuh-SPEER-ayn)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain multiple myelomas and other advanced cancers. Azaspirane may block the growth of tumors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Azaspirane is a type of signal transduction inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called atiprimod and SK&F106615.
azathioprine sodium listen (AY-zuh-THY-oh-preen SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to keep a patient from rejecting a transplanted kidney. It is also used in the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis that does not get better with other types of treatment. Azathioprine sodium blocks the growth of white blood cells and the synthesis of DNA, RNA, and protein. It is a type of immunosuppressant.
AZD0530
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. AZD0530 blocks enzymes needed for cancer growth. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
AZD2171
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. AZD2171 may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called cediranib maleate and Recentin.
AZD2281
A drug used to treat certain types of HER2-negative breast cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. AZD2281 is also used to treat certain types of advanced ovarian, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer. It is used in patients with certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. AZD2281 blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. AZD2281 is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called Lynparza, olaparib, and PARP inhibitor AZD2281.
AZD6244
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. AZD6244 blocks proteins needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of protein kinase inhibitor. Also called MEK inhibitor AZD6244 and selumetinib.
Azedra listen (uh-ZED-ruh)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 131 that is used to treat malignant pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma. It is used in patients who need treatment with systemic anticancer therapy and whose tumor cells take up radioactive iobenguane and are detected by a scanner. Azedra is used to treat pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma that cannot be removed by surgery, are locally advanced, or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Azedra builds up in tumor cells and gives off radiation that may kill the tumor cells. It is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 131I-MIBG, iobenguane I 131, and iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
azoospermia listen (AY-zoh-oh-SPER-mee-uh)
A condition in which there are no sperm in the semen when a man ejaculates. This may be because the man does not make sperm or because the sperm is blocked from entering the semen. Azoospermia may be caused by hormone problems, certain genetic conditions, previous vasectomy or other surgery, or other conditions. It may also be caused by certain cancer treatments. Azoospermia can cause infertility (the inability to produce children).
azoxymethane listen (ay-ZOK-see-MEH-thayn)
A substance that is used in cancer research to cause colon tumors in laboratory animals. This is done to test new diets, drugs, and procedures for use in cancer prevention and treatment.
AZQ
An anticancer drug that is able to cross the blood-brain barrier and kill cancer cells in the central nervous system. Also called diaziquone.
AZT
A drug that inhibits the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) that causes AIDS. Also called zidovudine.
azygos vein listen (ay-ZY-gus vayn)
A blood vessel that carries blood from the back walls of the chest and abdomen to the heart. The azygos vein is on the right side of the middle part of the spine.
B cell listen (… sel)
A type of white blood cell that makes antibodies. B cells are part of the immune system and develop from stem cells in the bone marrow. Also called B lymphocyte.
B lymphocyte listen (... LIM-foh-site)
A type of white blood cell that makes antibodies. B lymphocytes are part of the immune system and develop from stem cells in the bone marrow. Also called B cell.
B3 monoclonal antibody listen (… MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A substance that binds to a molecule called Lewis Y antigen that is found on many types of tumor cells and some normal cells. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer that express the Lewis Y antigen. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
B43-PAP immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
B7-1
A protein found on the surface of some immune system cells, including B cells and monocytes. Cells with B7-1 on their surface cause T cells to make substances that help control immune responses. Also called CD80.
bacillus Calmette-Guérin listen (buh-SIH-lus KAL-met-gay-RIN)
A weakened form of the bacterium Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin) that does not cause disease. Bacillus Calmette-Guérin is used in a solution to stimulate the immune system in the treatment of bladder cancer and as a vaccine to prevent tuberculosis. Also called BCG.
bacillus Calmette-Guérin solution listen (buh-SIH-lus KAL-met-gay-RIN suh-LOO-shun)
A type of biologic therapy used to treat early stage bladder cancer. The solution is made from a weakened form of a bacterium called Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin) that does not cause disease. It is given through a catheter that is placed into the bladder where the solution is held for about two hours. Bacillus Calmette-Guérin solution may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Also called BCG solution.
bacillus Calmette-Guérin vaccine listen (buh-SIH-lus KAL-met-gay-RIN vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent tuberculosis (TB) in people who are at a high risk of TB or where TB is common. It is rarely given in the U.S. It is made from a weakened form of a bacterium called Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin), which is similar to the bacteria that cause TB. The vaccine may help the body’s immune system make antibodies to destroy the TB bacteria. It also may help the immune system kill cancer cells and is being studied in the treatment of melanoma. Also called BCG vaccine.
backbone listen (BAK-bone)
The bones, muscles, tendons, and other tissues that reach from the base of the skull to the tailbone. The backbone encloses the spinal cord and the fluid surrounding the spinal cord. Also called spinal column, spine, and vertebral column.
baclofen listen (BAK-loh-fen)
A drug that is used to treat certain types of muscle spasms and is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. Baclofen relaxes muscles by blocking certain nerve receptors in the spinal cord. It is a type of antispasmodic. Also called Kemstro and Lioresal.
baclofen/amitriptyline/ketamine gel listen (BAK-loh-fen A-mih-TRIP-tih-leen KEE-tuh-meen jel)
A substance being studied in the treatment of peripheral neuropathy (pain, numbness, tingling, burning, or weakness in the hands or feet) caused by chemotherapy. It contains three drugs, baclofen, amitriptyline, and ketamine, that relax muscles by blocking nerve receptors. The gel is applied to the skin of affected areas. It is a type of analgesic. Also called BAK gel.
bacteria listen (bak-TEER-ee-uh)
A large group of single-cell microorganisms. Some cause infections and disease in animals and humans. The singular of bacteria is bacterium.
bacterial toxin listen (bak-TEER-ee-ul TOK-sin)
A harmful substance made by bacteria that can cause illness. Bacterial toxins can also be made in the laboratory and attached to monoclonal antibodies that bind to cancer cells. These toxins may help kill cancer cells without harming normal cells.
BAER test listen (... test)
A test used to detect some types of hearing loss, such as hearing loss caused by injury or tumors that affect nerves involved in hearing. Electrodes are placed on the head and certain tones or clicking sounds are made. The electrodes measure nerve signals in the brain when it reacts to the sounds. Also called ABR test, auditory brain stem response test, and brain stem auditory evoked response test.
BAK gel listen (… jel)
A substance being studied in the treatment of peripheral neuropathy (pain, numbness, tingling, burning, or weakness in the hands or feet) caused by chemotherapy. It contains three drugs, baclofen, amitriptyline, and ketamine, that relax muscles by blocking nerve receptors. The gel is applied to the skin of affected areas. It is a type of analgesic. Also called baclofen/amitriptyline/ketamine gel.
balloon angioplasty listen (buh-LOON AN-jee-oh-PLAS-tee)
A procedure to enlarge the opening in a blood vessel that has become narrowed or blocked by plaque (a buildup of fat and cholesterol on the inner wall of the blood vessel). A small balloon is filled with air inside the blood vessel to push the plaque against the blood vessel wall and increase the opening.
balloon catheter radiation listen (buh-LOON KA-theh-ter RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A system used to deliver internal radiation therapy to breast cancer patients after surgery to remove their cancer. Balloon catheter radiation targets only the part of the breast where the cancer was found. After a patient has had a lumpectomy to remove the cancer, a small balloon on the end of a catheter (thin tube) is inserted into the empty space left by the surgery. The balloon is then filled with liquid and left in place. Using the catheter, radioactive seeds are put into the balloon twice a day for five days and removed each time. Once treatment has ended, the catheter and balloon are removed. Balloon catheter radiation is a type of intracavitary brachytherapy and partial breast irradiation therapy (PBRT). Also called MammoSite.
Balversa (bal-VER-suh)
A drug used to treat urothelial cancer (a type of bladder cancer) that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in adults whose cancer has certain mutations in the FGFR3 gene or a fusion gene involving the FGFR3 or FGFR2 gene and has gotten worse during or after treatment with at least one type of platinum chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Balversa blocks a protein called FGFR, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called erdafitinib.
bankruptcy listen (BANK-rup-see)
The situation that occurs when a person or business is not able to pay back debts. Filing for bankruptcy is a legal process that is handled by a U.S. federal court. This process can help people get rid of their debt or reduce their debt through a repayment plan. Certain events, such as job loss, divorce, a long illness, or hospitalization, can affect a person’s ability to pay bills and lead to debt and bankruptcy. Filing for bankruptcy helps people get a fresh start financially, but it also affects their ability to borrow money or have credit in the future.
barbiturate listen (bar-BIH-chuh-rayt)
A type of drug that causes a decrease in brain activity. Barbiturates may be used to treat insomnia, seizures, and convulsions, and to relieve anxiety and tension before surgery. A barbiturate is a type of central nervous system (CNS) depressant.
barium enema listen (BAYR-ee-um EH-neh-muh)
A procedure in which a liquid that contains barium sulfate is put through the anus into the rectum and colon. Barium sulfate is a silver-white metallic compound that helps show pictures of the colon, rectum, and anus on an x-ray.
barium solution listen (BAYR-ee-um suh-LOO-shun)
A liquid that contains barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). It is used to show pictures of parts of the digestive system in x-rays.
barium sulfate listen (BAYR-ee-um SUL-fayt)
A silver-white metallic compound made from the mineral barite. It is mixed with water and used in barium swallows and barium enemas to help show parts of the digestive system on an x-ray.
barium swallow listen (BAYR-ee-um SWAH-loh)
The process of getting x-ray pictures of the esophagus or the upper gastrointestinal (GI) tract (esophagus, stomach, and duodenum). The x-ray pictures are taken after the patient drinks a liquid that contains barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). The barium sulfate coats and outlines the inner walls of the esophagus and the upper GI tract so that they can be seen on the x-ray pictures.
barium-meal photofluorography listen (BAYR-ee-um … FOH-toh-floor-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take a series of pictures of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum (the first part of the small intestine). The x-ray pictures are taken after the patient drinks a liquid that contains barium (a silver-white metallic compound). The barium coats and outlines the inner walls of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum so they can be seen on the x-ray pictures. Photographs are then taken of the x-ray images and made into a short film to make the organs easier to see. This makes it possible to see the motion of the organs and exposes the patient to less radiation.
Barrett esophagus listen (BAYR-et ee-SAH-fuh-gus)
A condition in which the cells lining the lower part of the esophagus have changed or been replaced with abnormal cells that could lead to cancer of the esophagus. The backing up of stomach contents (reflux) may irritate the esophagus and, over time, cause Barrett esophagus.
barrier listen (BAYR-ee-er)
Something that blocks, prevents, separates, or limits.
basal cell listen (BAY-sul sel)
A small, round cell found in the lower part (or base) of the epidermis, the outer layer of the skin.
basal cell cancer listen (BAY-sul sel KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in the lower part of the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin). It may appear as a small white or flesh-colored bump that grows slowly and may bleed. Basal cell cancers are usually found on areas of the body exposed to the sun. Basal cell cancers rarely metastasize (spread) to other parts of the body. They are the most common form of skin cancer. Also called basal cell carcinoma.
basal cell carcinoma listen (BAY-sul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in the lower part of the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin). It may appear as a small white or flesh-colored bump that grows slowly and may bleed. Basal cell carcinomas are usually found on areas of the body exposed to the sun. Basal cell carcinomas rarely metastasize (spread) to other parts of the body. They are the most common form of skin cancer. Also called basal cell cancer.
basal cell nevus syndrome listen (BAY-sul sel NEE-vus SIN-drome)
A genetic condition that causes unusual facial features and disorders of the skin, bones, nervous system, eyes, and endocrine glands. People with this syndrome have a higher risk of basal cell carcinoma. Also called Gorlin syndrome and nevoid basal cell carcinoma syndrome.
base listen (bays)
In chemistry, a substance that can accept hydrogen ions in water and can neutralize an acid. Bases feel soapy or slippery on the skin and they can turn certain dyes blue. An example of a base is sodium hydroxide. Basicity is measured on a scale called the pH scale. On this scale, a pH value of 7 is neutral, and a pH value of more than 7 to 14 shows increasing basicity.
base pair listen (bays payr)
Molecules called nucleotides, on opposite strands of the DNA double helix, that form chemical bonds with one another. These chemical bonds act like rungs in a ladder and help hold the two strands of DNA together. There are four nucleotides, or bases, in DNA: adenine (A), cytosine (C), guanine (G), and thymine (T). These bases form specific pairs (A with T, and G with C).
baseline listen (BAYS-line)
An initial measurement of a condition that is taken at an early time point and used for comparison over time to look for changes. For example, the size of a tumor will be measured before treatment (baseline) and then afterwards to see if the treatment had an effect.
basicity listen (bay-SIH-sih-tee)
In chemistry, the quality of being a base (not an acid). A base is a substance that can accept hydrogen ions in water and can neutralize an acid. Basicity is measured on a scale called the pH scale. On this scale, a pH value of 7 is neutral, and a pH value of more than 7 to 14 shows increasing basicity.
basket trial (BAS-ket TRY-ul)
A type of clinical trial that tests how well a new drug or other substance works in patients who have different types of cancer that all have the same mutation or biomarker. In basket trials, patients all receive the same treatment that targets the specific mutation or biomarker found in their cancer. Basket trials may allow new drugs to be tested and approved more quickly than traditional clinical trials. Basket trials may also be useful for studying rare cancers and cancers with rare genetic changes. Also called bucket trial.
basophil listen (BAY-soh-fil)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during allergic reactions and asthma. A basophil is a type of white blood cell and a type of granulocyte.
batimastat listen (ba-TIH-muh-stat)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors. Batimastat is a matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor.
batracylin listen (BA-truh-SY-lin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may kill cancer cells by causing damage to the DNA. Batracylin is a type of heterocyclic aryl amine.
Bavencio listen (buh-VEN-see-oh)
A drug used with axitinib to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that has not already been treated. It is also used to treat urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer) that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose disease got worse during or after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Bavencio is also used to treat Merkel cell carcinoma (a rare type of skin cancer) that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bavencio binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Bavencio may block PD-L1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called avelumab.
bavituximab listen (ba-vih-TUK-sih-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer and infections caused by certain viruses. It binds to substances on the surface of tumor cells, certain viruses, and cells infected with a virus. The immune system detects bavituximab on the cells and the viruses and may destroy them. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called Tarvacin.
BAY 43-9006
A drug used to treat advanced kidney cancer and a type of liver cancer that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also used to treat a type of advanced thyroid cancer that did not get better with radioactive iodine treatment. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BAY 43-9006 stops cancer cells from dividing and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Nexavar and sorafenib tosylate.
BAY 56-3722
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called camptothecins.
BAY 59-8862
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called taxanes.
BB-10901
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer, including Wilms tumor, neuroblastoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, and other types of soft tissue sarcoma. BB-10901 contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD56 on some types of cancer cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called DM1, which may help kill cancer cells after BB-10901 binds to them. BB-10901 is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called lorvotuzumab mertansine.
BBB
A network of blood vessels and tissue that is made up of closely spaced cells and helps keep harmful substances from reaching the brain. The BBB lets some substances, such as water, oxygen, carbon dioxide, and general anesthetics, pass into the brain. It also keeps out bacteria and other substances, such as many anticancer drugs. Also called blood-brain barrier.
BBBD
The use of drugs to create openings between cells in the blood-brain barrier. The blood-brain barrier is a protective network of blood vessels and tissue that protects the brain from harmful substances, but can also prevent anticancer drugs from reaching the brain. Once the barrier is opened, anticancer drugs may be infused into an artery that goes to the brain, in order to treat brain tumors. Also called blood-brain barrier disruption.
BBIC
A substance that is made from soybeans and is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It blocks the action of enzymes that are needed for cancer cells to form. It is a type of protease inhibitor. Also called Bowman-Birk inhibitor concentrate.
BBR 2778
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antitumor antibiotics. Also called pixantrone.
BBR 3464
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of platinum-based drugs.
B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia listen (... sel uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many B-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. It is the most common type of acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). Also called B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia and precursor B-lymphoblastic leukemia.
B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia listen (... sel uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many B-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. It is the most common type of acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). Also called B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and precursor B-lymphoblastic leukemia.
B-cell leukemia/lymphoma 2 protein listen (... sel loo-KEE-mee-uh/lim-FOH-muh 2 PROH-teen)
A protein that helps control whether a cell lives or dies by blocking a type of cell death called apoptosis. The gene for the B-cell leukemia/lymphoma 2 protein is found on chromosome 18, and transfer of the B-cell leukemia/lymphoma 2 gene to a different chromosome is seen in many B-cell leukemias and lymphomas. This causes the B-cell leukemia/lymphoma 2 protein to be made in larger amounts, which may keep cancer cells from dying. Also called BCL2.
B-cell lymphoma listen (…lim-FOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in B cells (a type of immune system cell). B-cell lymphomas may be either indolent (slow-growing) or aggressive (fast-growing). Most B-cell lymphomas are non-Hodgkin lymphomas. There are many different types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas. These include Burkitt lymphoma, chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma (CLL/SLL), diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, follicular lymphoma, and mantle cell lymphoma. Prognosis and treatment depend on type and stage of the cancer.
BCG
A weakened form of the bacterium Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin) that does not cause disease. BCG is used in a solution to stimulate the immune system in the treatment of bladder cancer and as a vaccine to prevent tuberculosis. Also called bacillus Calmette-Guérin.
BCG solution listen (… suh-LOO-shun)
A type of biologic therapy used to treat early stage bladder cancer. The solution is made from a weakened form of a bacterium called Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin) that does not cause disease. It is given through a catheter that is placed into the bladder where the solution is held for about two hours. BCG solution may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Also called bacillus Calmette-Guérin solution.
BCG vaccine listen (... vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent tuberculosis (TB) in people who are at a high risk of TB or where TB is common. It is rarely given in the U.S. It is made from a weakened form of a bacterium called Mycobacterium bovis (bacillus Calmette-Guérin), which is similar to the bacteria that cause TB. The vaccine may help the body’s immune system make antibodies to destroy the TB bacteria. It also may help the immune system kill cancer cells and is being studied in the treatment of melanoma. Also called bacillus Calmette-Guérin vaccine.
BCL2
A protein that helps control whether a cell lives or dies by blocking a type of cell death called apoptosis. The gene for BCL2 is found on chromosome 18, and transfer of the BCL2 gene to a different chromosome is seen in many B-cell leukemias and lymphomas. This causes the BCL2 protein to be made in larger amounts, which may keep cancer cells from dying. Also called B-cell leukemia/lymphoma 2 protein.
bcl-2 antisense oligodeoxynucleotide G3139 listen (... AN-tee-sents AH-lih-goh-dee-OK-see-NOO-klee-oh-tide ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein that makes cancer cells live longer and by making them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligodeoxyribonucleotide. Also called augmerosen, Genasense, and oblimersen sodium.
BCNU
A drug used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is also used with prednisone to treat multiple myeloma and with other drugs to treat Hodgkin lymphoma and non-Hodgkin lymphoma that have not gotten better with other treatment or have come back. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BCNU damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea. Also called BiCNU and carmustine.
BCOP
A licensed pharmacist with special training in how to design, give, monitor, and change chemotherapy for cancer patients. Also called board certified oncology pharmacy specialist and oncology pharmacy specialist.
BCR-ABL fusion gene listen (... FYOO-zhun jeen)
A gene formed when pieces of chromosomes 9 and 22 break off and trade places. The ABL gene from chromosome 9 joins to the BCR gene on chromosome 22, to form the BCR-ABL fusion gene. The changed chromosome 22 with the fusion gene on it is called the Philadelphia chromosome. The BCR-ABL fusion gene is found in most patients with chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), and in some patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) or acute myelogenous leukemia (AML).
BCR-ABL fusion protein listen (... FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
A protein made from pieces of two genes that get joined together. It is found in most patients with chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), and in some patients with acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) or acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). Inside the leukemia cells, the ABL gene from chromosome 9 joins to the BCR gene on chromosome 22 to form the BCR-ABL fusion gene, which makes the BCR-ABL fusion protein.
BCRP
A protein that is involved in making cancer cells resistant (unable to respond) to anticancer drugs. Normally, BCRP works with other proteins to help move many different substances, including drugs and other chemicals, in and out of cells. It is found in stem cells and in normal tissues, including the intestine, liver, brain, and placenta. However, it may also be found in higher than normal amounts in some cancer cells, which can cause them to be unable to respond to certain anticancer drugs. Drugs that block BCRP are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. BCRP was first identified in breast cancer cells. Also called breast cancer resistance protein.
BCX-1777
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of leukemia and lymphoma. It is a type of purine nucleoside phosphorylase (PNP) inhibitor. Also called forodesine hydrochloride.
BDC
A rare type of kidney cancer that grows and spreads quickly. It begins in the duct of Bellini in the kidney. Also called Bellini duct carcinoma.
BEACOPP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called BEACOPP regimen.
BEACOPP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called BEACOPP.
Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome listen (BEK-with-VEE-deh-mahn SIN-drome)
A rare, overgrowth disorder in which babies are large at birth and may develop low blood sugar. Other common symptoms are a large tongue, large internal organs, and defects of the abdominal wall near the navel. Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome increases the risk of developing certain cancers, especially Wilms tumor.
beclin 1 listen (BEH-klin …)
A protein involved in autophagy (the process by which a cell destroys proteins and other substances in its cytoplasm). Beclin 1 is found at lower levels in several types of cancer cells than in normal cells. It is a type of tumor suppressor.
beclomethasone listen (beh-kloh-MEH-thuh-sone)
A drug being studied in the treatment of graft-versus-host disease. It belongs to a family of drugs called corticosteroids.
behavior modification listen (beh-HAY-vyer MAH-dih-fih-KAY-shun)
A technique used to help people change the way they react to certain triggers in the environment that cause a negative reaction. In cancer treatment, behavior modification may be used to help patients who have become nauseous during previous cancer treatments cope with nausea they feel when they enter the therapy room to begin a new round of treatment.
Behcet disease listen (beh-SHET dih-ZEEZ)
A rare disorder that causes the blood vessels to become inflamed. Symptoms include sores in the mouth and on the sex organs and other skin problems, inflammation in parts of the eye, and pain, swelling, and stiffness of the joints. Other serious symptoms include blood clots, blindness, and inflammation of the brain, spinal cord, and digestive system. The symptoms may come and go on their own. Behcet disease is most common in young adults and its cause is unknown. Also called Behcet syndrome.
Behcet syndrome listen (beh-SHET SIN-drome)
A rare disorder that causes the blood vessels to become inflamed. Symptoms include sores in the mouth and on the sex organs and other skin problems, inflammation in parts of the eye, and pain, swelling, and stiffness of the joints. Other serious symptoms include blood clots, blindness, and inflammation of the brain, spinal cord, and digestive system. The symptoms may come and go on their own. Behcet syndrome is most common in young adults and its cause is unknown. Also called Behcet disease.
Beleodaq listen (BEE-lee-oh-dak)
A drug used to treat peripheral T-cell lymphoma that has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Beleodaq blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may help make cancer cells easier to kill with other anticancer drugs. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, a type of angiogenesis inhibitor, and a type of chemosensitizer. Also called belinostat and PXD101.
belinostat listen (beh-LIH-noh-stat)
A drug used to treat peripheral T-cell lymphoma that has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Belinostat blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may help make cancer cells easier to kill with other anticancer drugs. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, a type of angiogenesis inhibitor, and a type of chemosensitizer. Also called Beleodaq and PXD101.
Bellini duct carcinoma listen (beh-LEE-nee dukt KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of kidney cancer that grows and spreads quickly. It begins in the duct of Bellini in the kidney. Also called BDC.
belotecan hydrochloride listen (BEH-loh-TEE-kun HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of small cell lung cancer and other types of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of camptothecin analog and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
Bence Jones protein listen (bents jones PROH-teen)
A small protein made by plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). It is found in the urine of most people with multiple myeloma (cancer that begins in plasma cells).
bench-to-bedside listen (bench ... BED-side)
A term used to describe the process by which the results of research done in the laboratory are directly used to develop new ways to treat patients.
bendamustine hydrochloride listen (BEN-duh-MUS-teen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also used to treat slow-growing B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) that got worse during or within 6 months after treatment with rituximab. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bendamustine hydrochloride damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Bendeka and Treanda.
Bendeka listen (ben-DEH-kuh)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also used to treat slow-growing B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) that got worse during or within 6 months after treatment with rituximab. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bendeka damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called bendamustine hydrochloride and Treanda.
benign listen (beh-NINE)
Not cancerous. Benign tumors may grow larger but do not spread to other parts of the body. Also called nonmalignant.
benign breast disease listen (beh-NINE brest dih-ZEEZ)
A group of conditions marked by changes in breast tissue that are benign (not cancer). There are different types of benign breast disease, including some types caused by an increase in the number of cells or by the growth of abnormal cells in the breast ducts or lobes. Signs and symptoms of benign breast disease include irregular lumps or cysts, breast swelling or discomfort, skin redness or thickening, and nipple discharge. Most benign breast conditions do not increase the risk of breast cancer. Also called mammary dysplasia.
benign proliferative breast disease listen (beh-NINE proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv brest dih-ZEEZ)
A group of noncancerous conditions marked by an increase in the growth of certain cells in the breast. Having one of these conditions may increase the risk of breast cancer. Examples include ductal hyperplasia, lobular hyperplasia, and papillomas.
benign prostatic hyperplasia listen (beh-NINE prah-STA-tik HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which an overgrowth of prostate tissue pushes against the urethra and the bladder, blocking the flow of urine. Also called benign prostatic hypertrophy and BPH.
benign prostatic hypertrophy listen (beh-NINE prah-STA-tik hy-PER-troh-fee)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which an overgrowth of prostate tissue pushes against the urethra and the bladder, blocking the flow of urine. Also called benign prostatic hyperplasia and BPH.
benign tumor listen (beh-NINE TOO-mer)
A growth that is not cancer. It does not invade nearby tissue or spread to other parts of the body.
benign vascular tumor listen (beh-NINE VAS-kyoo-ler TOO-mer)
A type of benign (not cancer) tumor that forms from cells that make blood vessels or lymph vessels. Benign vascular tumors may occur anywhere in the body, and a patient may have several tumors in different parts of the body. They may grow large and sometimes spread to nearby tissue. The most common type of benign vascular tumor is hemangioma, which usually occurs in infants and goes away on its own.
benzaldehyde listen (ben-ZAL-deh-hide)
A chemical used in flavorings and in some dyes, perfumes, and medicines. It is found in essential oils made from almonds and peach pits and in other foods. It can also be made in the laboratory.
benzene listen (BEN-zeen)
A chemical that is used widely by the chemical industry, and is also found in tobacco smoke, vehicle emissions, and gasoline fumes. Exposure to benzene may increase the risk of developing leukemia.
benzo(a)pyrene listen (BEN-zoh-ay-PY-reen)
A chemical that comes from certain substances when they are not burned completely. It is found in car exhaust, smoke from wood fires, tobacco, oil and gas products, charred or grilled foods, and other sources. It may also be found in water and soil. Benzo(a)pyrene can cause a skin rash, a burning feeling, skin color changes, warts, and bronchitis. It may also cause cancer. It is a type of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon. Also called 3,4-benzpyrene.
benzodiazepine listen (BEN-zoh-dy-A-zeh-peen)
A type of drug used to relieve anxiety and insomnia (trouble sleeping). Benzodiazepines are also used to relax muscles and prevent seizures. They increase the effect of a chemical in the brain called GABA, which is a neurotransmitter (a substance that nerves use to send messages to one another). This causes brain activity to slow down. Benzodiazepines are a type of CNS depressant.
benzoylphenylurea listen (BEN-zoyl-FEH-nil-yoo-REE-uh)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of antitubulin agent. Also called BPU.
benzydamine listen (ben-ZIH-duh-meen)
A substance being studied as a mouth rinse treatment for oral mucositis (painful mouth sores) caused by cancer therapy. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID).
BEP
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat ovarian and testicular germ cell tumors. It includes the drugs bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called BEP regimen.
BEP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat ovarian and testicular germ cell tumors. It includes the drugs bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called BEP.
bereavement listen (beh-REEV-ment)
A state of sadness, grief, and mourning after the loss of a loved one.
bergamot listen (BER-guh-mot)
A type of orange tree grown in Italy. The essential oil from the peel of this orange is used in perfume, to get rid of insects, and to flavor tea. Bergamot oil is also used in aromatherapy for depression, anxiety, and poor digestion. The scientific name for the bergamot orange tree is Citrus bergamia.
Besponsa listen (beh-SPON-suh)
A drug used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) that has not gotten better with other treatment or has recurred (come back). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Besponsa contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on some leukemia cells. It also contains a toxic substance, which may help kill cancer cells. Besponsa is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called inotuzumab ozogamicin.
best practice listen (... PRAK-tis)
Treatment that is accepted by medical experts as a proper treatment for a certain type of disease and that is widely used by healthcare professionals. Also called standard medical care, standard of care, and standard therapy.
beta alethine listen (BAY-tuh a-LEH-theen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to a family of chemicals called disulfides.
beta carotene listen (BAY-tuh KAYR-uh-teen)
A substance found in yellow and orange fruits and vegetables and in dark green, leafy vegetables. The body can make vitamin A from beta carotene. Beta carotene is being studied in the prevention of some types of cancer. It is a type of antioxidant.
beta cell neoplasm listen (BAY-tuh sel NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
An abnormal mass that grows in the beta cells of the pancreas that make insulin. Beta cell neoplasms are usually benign (not cancer). They secrete insulin and are the most common cause of low blood sugar caused by having too much insulin in the body. Also called beta cell tumor of the pancreas, insulinoma, and pancreatic insulin-producing tumor.
beta cell tumor of the pancreas listen (BAY-tuh sel TOO-mer … PAN-kree-us)
An abnormal mass that grows in the beta cells of the pancreas that make insulin. Beta cell tumors of the pancreas are usually benign (not cancer). They secrete insulin and are the most common cause of low blood sugar caused by having too much insulin in the body. Also called beta cell neoplasm, insulinoma, and pancreatic insulin-producing tumor.
beta hemolytic streptococcus group B listen (BAY-tuh HEE-moh-LIH-tik STREP-toh-KAH-kus ...)
A type of bacterium often found in the vagina. It can cause systemic infections in people with suppressed immune systems.
beta-2-microglobulin listen (BAY-tuh-2-MY-kroh-GLAH-byoo-lin)
A small protein normally found on the surface of many cells, including lymphocytes, and in small amounts in the blood and urine. An increased amount in the blood or urine may be a sign of certain diseases, including some types of cancer, such as multiple myeloma or lymphoma.
beta-adrenergic antagonist listen (BAY-tuh-A-dreh-NER-jik an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug that blocks the action of substances, such as adrenaline, on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to relax and dilate (widen). This allows blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure and the heart rate. Beta-adrenergic antagonists are used to treat high blood pressure, chest pain (angina), abnormal heart rate (arrhythmia), congestive heart failure, and several other conditions. They may also shrink certain types of vascular tumors, such as hemangiomas. Also called beta-adrenergic blocking agent and beta-blocker.
beta-adrenergic blocking agent listen (BAY-tuh-A-dreh-NER-jik BLAH-king AY-jent)
A type of drug that blocks the action of substances, such as adrenaline, on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to relax and dilate (widen). This allows blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure and the heart rate. Beta-adrenergic blocking agents are used to treat high blood pressure, chest pain (angina), abnormal heart rate (arrhythmia), congestive heart failure, and several other conditions. They may also shrink certain types of vascular tumors, such as hemangiomas. Also called beta-adrenergic antagonist and beta-blocker.
beta-blocker listen (BAY-tuh-BLAH-ker)
A type of drug that blocks the action of substances, such as adrenaline, on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to relax and dilate (widen). This allows blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure and the heart rate. Beta-blockers are used to treat high blood pressure, chest pain (angina), abnormal heart rate (arrhythmia), congestive heart failure, and several other conditions. They may also shrink certain types of vascular tumors, such as hemangiomas. Also called beta-adrenergic antagonist and beta-adrenergic blocking agent.
beta-endorphin listen (BAY-tuh en-DOR-fin)
A substance produced in the brain, especially in the pituitary gland, that blocks the sensation of pain. It is produced in response to pain, exercise, and other forms of stress. It is a type of polypeptide hormone.
beta-glucan listen (BAY-tuh-GLOO-kan)
A substance found in bacteria, plants, and certain foods, such as baker’s yeast, cereal grains, and mushrooms. It is a type of polysaccharide that is made of a string of glucose (sugar) molecules joined together. Beta-glucan may stimulate the immune system and help kill cancer cells. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of biological response modifier.
beta-hCG listen (BAY-tuh...)
A hormone found in the blood and urine during pregnancy. It may also be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including testicular, ovarian, liver, stomach, and lung cancers, and in other disorders. Measuring the amount of beta-hCG in the blood or urine of cancer patients may help to diagnose cancer and find out how well cancer treatment is working. Beta-hCG is a type of tumor marker. Also called beta-human chorionic gonadotropin.
beta-human chorionic gonadotropin listen (BAY-tuh-HYOO-mun KOR-ee-AH-nik goh-NA-doh-TROH-pin)
A hormone found in the blood and urine during pregnancy. It may also be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including testicular, ovarian, liver, stomach, and lung cancers, and in other disorders. Measuring the amount of beta-human chorionic gonadotropin in the blood or urine of cancer patients may help to diagnose cancer and find out how well cancer treatment is working. Beta-human chorionic gonadotropin is a type of tumor marker. Also called beta-hCG.
beta-sitosterol listen (BAY-tuh-sy-TOS-teh-rol)
A substance found in various nuts, beans, seeds, fruits, and vegetables. It may also be used in dietary supplements. Beta-sitosterol may help lower cholesterol levels in the blood by decreasing the amount of cholesterol absorbed from the diet. It may also slow the growth of some types of cancer cells and kill them. It is a type of phytosterol.
betel quid with tobacco listen (BEE-til kwid … tuh-BA-koh)
A type of smokeless tobacco that is made in India and is widely used throughout Asia. It is a mixture of tobacco, crushed areca nut (also called betel nut), spices, and other ingredients. It is used like chewing tobacco and is placed in the mouth, usually between the gum and cheek. Betel quid with tobacco contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the lip, mouth, tongue, throat, and esophagus. Also called gutka.
bevacizumab listen (beh-vuh-SIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of cervical, colorectal, lung, and kidney cancer, and glioblastoma (a type of brain cancer). It is used under the brand name Mvasi to treat these cancers. Bevacizumab is also used under the brand name Avastin to treat these cancers and to treat certain types of ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, and primary peritoneal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bevacizumab binds to a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Bevacizumab is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody.
bexarotene listen (bek-SAYR-uh-teen)
A drug used to treat skin problems caused by cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that have not gotten better after other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bexarotene is a type of retinoid. Also called LGD1069 and Targretin.
BG00001
A gene therapy agent that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called biological response modifiers.
BI 2536
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It prevents cells from dividing and may block the growth of some tumors. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor.
Biafine cream listen (BY-uh-feen …)
A substance that is put on the skin to help repair damaged skin. It may be used on certain wounds and burns, and to treat the redness, burning, and peeling caused by radiation therapy.
bias listen (BY-us)
In a scientific research study or clinical trial, a flaw in the study design or the method of collecting or interpreting information. Biases can lead to incorrect conclusions about what the study or clinical trial showed.
BIBF 1120
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. BIBF 1120 blocks enzymes needed for cells to grow, and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called tyrosine kinase inhibitor BIBF 1120.
BIBX 1382
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) inhibitors.
bicalutamide listen (BY-kuh-LOO-tuh-mide)
A drug used with another drug to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. Bicalutamide binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Bicalutamide blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called Casodex.
BiCNU
A drug used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is also used with prednisone to treat multiple myeloma and with other drugs to treat Hodgkin lymphoma and non-Hodgkin lymphoma that have not gotten better with other treatment or have come back. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BiCNU damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea. Also called BCNU and carmustine.
bidi listen (BEE-dee)
A cigarette made by rolling tobacco by hand in a dried leaf from the tendu tree (a member of the ebony family). Most bidis are made in India, and they come in different flavors.
bilateral listen (by-LA-teh-rul)
Affecting both the right and left sides of the body.
bilateral cancer listen (by-LA-teh-rul KAN-ser)
Cancer that occurs in both of a pair of organs, such as both breasts, ovaries, eyes, lungs, kidneys, or adrenal glands, at the same time.
bilateral nephrectomy listen (by-LA-teh-rul neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove both kidneys.
bilateral prophylactic mastectomy listen (by-LA-teh-rul PROH-fih-LAK-tik ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove both breasts in order to reduce the risk of developing breast cancer.
bilateral salpingo-oophorectomy listen (by-LA-teh-rul sal-PIN-goh-oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove both ovaries and both fallopian tubes.
bile listen (bile)
A fluid made by the liver and stored in the gallbladder. Bile is excreted into the small intestine, where it helps digest fat.
bile duct listen (bile dukt)
A tube through which bile passes in and out of the liver.
bile duct cancer listen (bile dukt KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the bile ducts. A bile duct is a tube that carries bile (fluid made by the liver) between the liver and gallbladder and the small intestine. Intrahepatic bile duct cancer is found inside the liver. Extrahepatic bile duct cancer is found outside the liver. Also called cholangiocarcinoma.
biliary listen (BIH-lee-AYR-ee)
Having to do with the liver, bile ducts, and/or gallbladder.
biliary bypass listen (BIH-lee-AYR-ee BY-pas)
Surgery done to help relieve symptoms caused by a blocked bile duct. During a biliary bypass, the gallbladder or a part of the bile duct before the blockage is connected to either a part of the bile duct that is past the blockage or to the small intestine. This allows bile (fluid made by the liver) to flow around the blockage to the gallbladder or small intestine. A blocked bile duct may be caused by cancer or other conditions, such as gallstones, infection, or scar tissue. A biliary bypass is usually done in patients who have bile duct tumors that cannot be completely removed by surgery.
biliary cirrhosis listen (BIH-lee-AYR-ee seh-ROH-sis)
A type of chronic liver disease in which the tubes that carry bile (fluid that helps digest fat) out of the liver become damaged or blocked over time. This can cause bile and toxic substances to build up in the liver, which may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver failure. It may also increase the risk of liver cancer. Biliary cirrhosis may be caused by gallstones, injury to the bile ducts, autoimmune disorders, and certain other conditions.
biliary system listen (BIH-lee-AYR-ee SIS-tem)
The organs and ducts that make and store bile (a fluid made by the liver that helps digest fat), and release it into the small intestine. The biliary system includes the gallbladder and bile ducts inside and outside the liver. Also called biliary tract.
biliary tract listen (BIH-lee-AYR-ee …)
The organs and ducts that make and store bile (a fluid made by the liver that helps digest fat), and release it into the small intestine. The biliary tract includes the gallbladder and bile ducts inside and outside the liver. Also called biliary system.
bilirubin listen (BIH-lih-ROO-bin)
Substance formed when red blood cells are broken down. Bilirubin is part of the bile, which is made in the liver and is stored in the gallbladder. The abnormal buildup of bilirubin causes jaundice.
bimatoprost listen (bih-MA-toh-prost)
A drug used under the name Latisse to increase the length, thickness, and darkness of eyelashes. It is being studied as a way to increase the growth of eyelashes and eyebrows in patients given chemotherapy for cancer. Bimatoprost is also used under the name Lumigan to treat glaucoma (a build-up of fluid in the eye). It lowers pressure in the eye by increasing the flow of natural eye fluids out of the eye. It is a type of prostaglandin analog.
binding agent listen (BINE-ding AY-jent)
A substance that makes a loose mixture stick together. For example, binding agents can be used to make solid pills from loose powders.
binimetinib listen (BIH-nee-MEH-tih-nib)
A drug used with encorafenib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Binimetinib blocks proteins called MEK1 and MEK2, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Mektovi.
bioactive compound listen (BY-oh-AK-tiv KOM-pownd)
A type of chemical found in small amounts in plants and certain foods (such as fruits, vegetables, nuts, oils, and whole grains). Bioactive compounds have actions in the body that may promote good health. They are being studied in the prevention of cancer, heart disease, and other diseases. Examples of bioactive compounds include lycopene, resveratrol, lignan, tannins, and indoles.
bioavailable listen (BY-oh-uh-VAY-luh-bul)
The ability of a drug or other substance to be absorbed and used by the body. Orally bioavailable means that a drug or other substance that is taken by mouth can be absorbed and used by the body.
biochanin A listen (BY-oh-KAH-nin ...)
An isoflavone found in soy products. Soy isoflavones (estrogen-like substances made by some plants) are being studied to see if they help prevent cancer.
biochemical reactions listen (BY-oh-KEH-mih-kul ree-AK-shuns)
In living cells, chemical reactions that help sustain life and allow cells to grow.
biochemical recurrence listen (BY-oh-KEH-mih-kul ree-KER-ents)
A rise in the blood level of PSA (prostate-specific antigen) in prostate cancer patients after treatment with surgery or radiation. Biochemical recurrence may occur in patients who do not have symptoms. It may mean that the cancer has come back. Also called biochemical relapse and PSA failure.
biochemical relapse listen (BY-oh-KEH-mih-kul REE-laps)
A rise in the blood level of PSA (prostate-specific antigen) in prostate cancer patients after treatment with surgery or radiation. Biochemical relapse may occur in patients who do not have symptoms. It may mean that the cancer has come back. Also called biochemical recurrence and PSA failure.
biochemist listen (BY-oh-KEH-mist)
A scientist who has special training in the study of the chemicals and processes that occur in all living things.
biofeedback listen (BY-oh-FEED-bak)
A method of learning to voluntarily control certain body functions such as heartbeat, blood pressure, and muscle tension with the help of a special machine. This method can help control pain.
biofilm listen (BY-oh-FILM)
A layer of bacteria or other microbes that grows on and sticks to the surface of a structure. A biofilm may cover natural surfaces, such as teeth. They may also grow in or on medical devices, such as catheters or artificial joints. Bacteria growing as a biofilm are hard to treat with antibiotics.
bioinformatics listen (BY-oh-in-for-MA-tix)
A field of science that uses computers, databases, math, and statistics to collect, store, organize, and analyze large amounts of biological, medical, and health information. Information may come from many sources, including genetic and molecular research studies, patient statistics, tissue specimens, clinical trials, and scientific journals. Also called computational biology.
biologic agent listen (BY-oh-LAH-jik AY-jent)
A substance that is made from a living organism or its products and is used in the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of cancer and other diseases. Biologic agents include antibodies, interleukins, and vaccines. Also called biological agent and biological drug.
biological listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul)
Pertaining to biology or to life and living things. In medicine, refers to a substance made from a living organism or its products. Biologicals may be used to prevent, diagnose, treat or relieve of symptoms of a disease. For example, antibodies, interleukins, and vaccines are biologicals. Biological also refers to parents and children who are related by blood.
biological agent listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul AY-jent)
A substance that is made from a living organism or its products and is used in the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of cancer and other diseases. Biological agents include antibodies, interleukins, and vaccines. Also called biologic agent and biological drug.
biological drug listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul...)
A substance that is made from a living organism or its products and is used in the prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of cancer and other diseases. Biological drugs include antibodies, interleukins, and vaccines. Also called biologic agent and biological agent.
biological profile listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul PROH-file)
A summary of the biological actions of a substance. A biological profile may come from patient data or from tests done in the laboratory or in animals.
biological response modifier therapy listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul reh-SPONTS MAH-dih-FY-er THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses substances made from living organisms to treat disease. These substances may occur naturally in the body or may be made in the laboratory. Some biological response modifier therapies stimulate or suppress the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, and other diseases. Other biological response modifier therapies attack specific cancer cells, which may help keep them from growing or kill them. They may also lessen certain side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Types of biological response modifier therapy include immunotherapy (such as vaccines, cytokines, and some antibodies), gene therapy, and some targeted therapies. Also called biological therapy, biotherapy, and BRM therapy.
biological therapy listen (BY-oh-LAH-jih-kul THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses substances made from living organisms to treat disease. These substances may occur naturally in the body or may be made in the laboratory. Some biological therapies stimulate or suppress the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, and other diseases. Other biological therapies attack specific cancer cells, which may help keep them from growing or kill them. They may also lessen certain side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Types of biological therapy include immunotherapy (such as vaccines, cytokines, and some antibodies), gene therapy, and some targeted therapies. Also called biological response modifier therapy, biotherapy, and BRM therapy.
biomarker listen (BY-oh-MAR-ker)
A biological molecule found in blood, other body fluids, or tissues that is a sign of a normal or abnormal process, or of a condition or disease. A biomarker may be used to see how well the body responds to a treatment for a disease or condition. Also called molecular marker and signature molecule.
Biomed 101 listen (BY-oh-MED …)
A substance that is being studied for its ability to decrease the side effects of interleukin-2 (IL-2).
biomedicine listen (BY-oh-MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called allopathic medicine, conventional medicine, mainstream medicine, orthodox medicine, and Western medicine.
biometrics listen (BY-oh-MEH-trix)
The science of collecting and analyzing biologic or health data using statistical methods. Biometrics may be used to help learn the possible causes of a cancer or how often a cancer occurs in a certain group of people. Also called biometry and biostatistics.
biometry listen (by-AH-meh-tree)
The science of collecting and analyzing biologic or health data using statistical methods. Biometry may be used to help learn the possible causes of a cancer or how often a cancer occurs in a certain group of people. Also called biometrics and biostatistics.
biopsy listen (BY-op-see)
The removal of cells or tissues for examination by a pathologist. The pathologist may study the tissue under a microscope or perform other tests on the cells or tissue. There are many different types of biopsy procedures. The most common types include: (1) incisional biopsy, in which only a sample of tissue is removed; (2) excisional biopsy, in which an entire lump or suspicious area is removed; and (3) needle biopsy, in which a sample of tissue or fluid is removed with a needle. When a wide needle is used, the procedure is called a core biopsy. When a thin needle is used, the procedure is called a fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
biopsy specimen listen (BY-op-see SPEH-sih-men)
Tissue removed from the body and examined under a microscope to determine whether disease is present.
biorepository listen (BY-oh-reh-PAH-zih-TOR-ee)
A facility that collects, catalogs, and stores samples of biological material, such as urine, blood, tissue, cells, DNA, RNA, and protein, from humans, animals, or plants for laboratory research. If the samples are from people, medical information may also be stored along with a written consent to use the samples in laboratory studies.
biosimilar drug listen (BY-oh-SIH-mih-ler …)
A biological drug that is very much like another biological drug (called the reference drug) that has already been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Biosimilar drugs and reference drugs are made from living organisms but they may be made in different ways and of slightly different substances. To be called a biosimilar drug, a biological drug must be shown to be as safe as, work as well as, and work in the same way as its reference drug. It must also be used in the same way, at the same dose, and for the same condition as the reference drug. Biosimilar drugs must be approved by FDA, and may cost less than the reference drugs.
biospecimen listen (BY-oh-SPEH-sih-men)
Samples of material, such as urine, blood, tissue, cells, DNA, RNA, and protein from humans, animals, or plants. Biospecimens are stored in a biorepository and are used for laboratory research. If the samples are from people, medical information may also be stored along with a written consent to use the samples in laboratory studies.
biostatistics listen (BY-oh-stuh-TIS-tix)
The science of collecting and analyzing biologic or health data using statistical methods. Biostatistics may be used to help learn the possible causes of a cancer or how often a cancer occurs in a certain group of people. Also called biometrics and biometry.
biotherapy listen (BY-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses substances made from living organisms to treat disease. These substances may occur naturally in the body or may be made in the laboratory. Some biotherapies stimulate or suppress the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, and other diseases. Other biotherapies attack specific cancer cells, which may help keep them from growing or kill them. They may also lessen certain side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Types of biotherapy include immunotherapy (such as vaccines, cytokines, and some antibodies), gene therapy, and some targeted therapies. Also called biological response modifier therapy, biological therapy, and BRM therapy.
biotin listen (BY-oh-tin)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Biotin helps some enzymes break down substances in the body for energy and helps tissues develop. It is found in yeast, whole milk, egg yolks, and organ meats. Biotin is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough biotin can cause skin, nerve, and eye disorders. Biotin is present in larger amounts in some cancer tissue than in normal tissue. Attaching biotin to substances used to treat some types of cancer helps them find cancer cells. Also called vitamin H.
BI-RADS listen
A method used by radiologists to interpret and report in a standardized manner the results of mammography, ultrasound, and MRI used in breast cancer screening and diagnosis. Also called Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System.
birth canal listen (berth kuh-NAL)
The muscular canal that goes from the uterus to the outside of the body. During birth, the baby passes through the birth canal. Also called vagina.
birth control listen (berth kun-TROLE)
The use of drugs, devices, or surgery to prevent pregnancy. There are many different types of birth control. These include barrier methods to keep sperm from fertilizing the egg, hormone methods, intrauterine devices (IUDs), and surgery to close the fallopian tubes in women or close off the two tubes that carry sperm out of the testicles in men. Also called contraception.
birth control pill listen (berth kun-TROLE pil)
A pill used to prevent pregnancy. It contains hormones that block the release of eggs from the ovaries. Most birth control pills include estrogen and progestin. Also called oral contraceptive pill.
Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome listen (birt-hog-doob SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which benign (not cancer) skin lesions called fibrofolliculomas form in the hair follicles on the face, neck, and chest. Patients with Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome have an increased risk of kidney cancer and benign kidney tumors. They may also have lung cysts and a condition called a pneumothorax, in which all or part of the lung collapses. The signs and symptoms of Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome usually do not appear until young adulthood. It is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called FLCN.
bismuth listen (BIZ-mooth)
A silver-white metal used in medicines and other products. Certain forms of bismuth are used to treat diarrhea, heartburn, and upset stomach. Bismuth is also used with certain other drugs to treat stomach ulcers.
bispecific antibody listen (BY-speh-SIH-fik AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A type of antibody that can bind to two different antigens at the same time. Bispecific antibodies are being studied in the imaging and treatment of cancer. They are made in the laboratory.
bispecific monoclonal antibody listen (BY-speh-SIH-fik MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
An antibody that can bind to two different antigens at the same time. Bispecific monoclonal antibodies are being studied in the imaging and treatment of cancer. They are made in the laboratory.
bisphosphonate listen (bis-FOS-foh-nayt)
A drug or substance used to treat hypercalcemia (abnormally high blood calcium) and bone pain caused by some types of cancer. Forms of bisphosphonates are also used to treat osteoporosis and for bone imaging. Bisphosphonates inhibit a type of bone cell that breaks down bone. Also called diphosphonate.
bisphosphonate-associated osteonecrosis listen (bis-FOS-foh-nayt-uh-SOH-see-ay-ted OS-tee-oh-neh-KROH-sis)
The necrosis (death) of bone tissue caused by treatment with a bisphosphonate (a drug or substance used to treat osteoporosis, bone pain caused by some types of cancer, and high blood calcium). It commonly occurs in the jaw bones. There may be pain, swelling and infection in the areas of necrosis. Also called BON.
bivalent vaccine listen (by-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine that works by stimulating an immune response against two different antigens, such as two different viruses or other microorganisms. For example, Cervarix is a bivalent vaccine that helps protect the body against infection with two different types of human papillomaviruses (HPV).
bizelesin listen (by-ZEH-leh-sin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents. It is also an antitumor antibiotic.
BL22 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A bacterial toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to cancer cells and kills them. It belongs to the family of drugs called bacterial immunotoxins.
black cohosh listen (blak KOH-osh)
An eastern North American perennial herb. A substance obtained from the root of the plant has been used in some cultures to treat a number of medical problems. It is being studied in the treatment of hot flashes and other symptoms of menopause. The scientific name is Cimicifuga racemosa. Also called black snakeroot, bugbane, bugwort, and rattlesnake root.
black snakeroot listen (blak SNAYK-root)
An eastern North American perennial herb. A substance obtained from the root of the plant has been used in some cultures to treat a number of medical problems. It is being studied in the treatment of hot flashes and other symptoms of menopause. The scientific name is Cimicifuga racemosa. Also called black cohosh, bugbane, bugwort, and rattlesnake root.
Blackfan–Diamond anemia listen (BLAK-fan-DY-uh-mund uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with Blackfan–Diamond anemia may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called congenital hypoplastic anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, DBA, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, erythrogenesis imperfecta, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
bladder listen (BLA-der)
The organ that stores urine.
bladder cancer listen (BLA-der KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the bladder (the organ that stores urine). Most bladder cancers are transitional cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in cells that normally make up the inner lining of the bladder). Other types include squamous cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in thin, flat cells) and adenocarcinoma (cancer that begins in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids). The cells that form squamous cell carcinoma and adenocarcinoma develop in the inner lining of the bladder as a result of chronic irritation and inflammation.
blast listen (blast)
An immature blood cell.
blast crisis listen (blast KRY-sis)
A phase of chronic myelogenous leukemia in which tiredness, fever, and an enlarged spleen occur during the blastic phase, when more than 30% of the cells in the blood or bone marrow are blast cells (immature blood cells).
blastic phase chronic myelogenous leukemia listen (BLAS-tik fayz KRAH-nik MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A phase of chronic myelogenous leukemia in which 20% or more of the cells in the blood or bone marrow are blast cells (immature blood cells). When tiredness, fever, and an enlarged spleen occur during the blastic phase, it is called blast crisis.
blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm listen (BLAS-tik PLAZ-muh-SY-toyd den-DRIH-tik sel NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
A rare, fast-growing cancer that affects the blood, bone marrow, and skin. It can also affect the lymph nodes, spleen, and central nervous system. Most patients with blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm have red-brown or deep purple skin lesions on one or more areas of the body. Blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm usually occurs in older adults and is difficult to diagnose and treat. Also called BPDCN.
bleomycin listen (blee-oh-MY-sin)
The active ingredient in a drug used to treat many types of cancer, including Hodgkin lymphoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, penile cancer, testicular cancer, and squamous cell carcinoma of the cervix, head and neck, and vulva. It is also used to treat malignant pleural effusion. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bleomycin comes from the bacterium Streptomyces verticillus. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic.
bleomycin sulfate listen (blee-oh-MY-sin SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer, including Hodgkin lymphoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, penile cancer, testicular cancer, and squamous cell carcinoma of the cervix, head and neck, and vulva. It is also used to treat malignant pleural effusion. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bleomycin sulfate comes from the bacterium Streptomyces verticillus. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic.
blessed thistle listen (... THIH-sul)
A plant whose leaves, stems, and flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Blessed thistle may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Cnicus benedictus. Also called cardin, holy thistle, spotted thistle, and St. Benedict's thistle.
blinatumomab listen (blih-nuh-TOO-moh-mab)
A drug used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia that is in complete remission (all signs and symptoms of cancer have disappeared after previous treatment). It is also used in patients whose cancer has come back or has not gotten better with other anticancer treatment. Blinatumomab binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on most B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also binds to a protein called CD3, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Blinatumomab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Blincyto.
Blincyto listen (blin-SY-toh)
A drug used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia that is in complete remission (all signs and symptoms of cancer have disappeared after previous treatment). It is also used in patients whose cancer has come back or has not gotten better with other anticancer treatment. Blincyto binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on most B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also binds to a protein called CD3, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Blincyto is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called blinatumomab.
blinded study listen (BLINE-ded STUH-dee)
A type of study in which the patients (single-blinded) or the patients and their doctors (double-blinded) do not know which drug or treatment is being given. The opposite of a blinded study is an open label study.
blister listen (BLIH-ster)
A fluid-filled sac in the outer layer of skin. It can be caused by rubbing, heat, or diseases of the skin. Also called skin vesicle.
bloating listen (BLOH-ting)
A swelling or feeling of fullness in the abdomen. Bloating is usually the result of gas in the intestines and can be caused by many things, including overeating, lactose intolerance, and constipation. Bloating can also be a side effect of cancer or cancer treatment.
blood listen (blud)
A tissue with red blood cells, white blood cells, platelets, and other substances suspended in fluid called plasma. Blood takes oxygen and nutrients to the tissues, and carries away wastes.
blood cancer listen (blud KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in blood-forming tissue, such as the bone marrow, or in the cells of the immune system. Examples of blood cancer are leukemia, lymphoma, and multiple myeloma. Also called hematologic cancer.
blood cell count listen (blud sel kownt)
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood. The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A blood cell count is used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions. Also called CBC, complete blood count, and full blood count.
blood cell count with differential listen (blud sel kownt … dih-feh-REN-shul)
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood, including the different types of white blood cells (neutrophils, lymphocytes, monocytes, basophils, and eosinophils). The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A blood cell count with differential is used to help diagnose and monitor many different conditions, including anemia and infection. Also called CBC with differential.
blood chemistry study listen (blud KEH-mih-stree STUH-dee)
A test done on a sample of blood to measure the amount of certain substances in the body. These substances include electrolytes (such as sodium, potassium, and chloride), fats, proteins, glucose (sugar), and enzymes. Blood chemistry studies give important information about how well a person’s kidneys, liver, and other organs are working. An abnormal amount of a substance in the blood can be a sign of disease or side effect of treatment. Blood chemistry studies are used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions before, during, and after treatment. Also called blood chemistry test.
blood chemistry test listen (blud KEH-mih-stree …)
A test done on a sample of blood to measure the amount of certain substances in the body. These substances include electrolytes (such as sodium, potassium, and chloride), fats, proteins, glucose (sugar), and enzymes. Blood chemistry tests give important information about how well a person’s kidneys, liver, and other organs are working. An abnormal amount of a substance in the blood can be a sign of disease or side effect of treatment. Blood chemistry tests are used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions before, during, and after treatment. Also called blood chemistry study.
blood clot listen (blud klot)
A mass of blood that forms when blood platelets, proteins, and cells stick together. When a blood clot is attached to the wall of a blood vessel, it is called a thrombus. When it moves through the bloodstream and blocks the flow of blood in another part of the body, it is called an embolus.
blood culture listen (blud KUL-cher)
A laboratory test to check for bacteria, yeast, fungi, or other microorganisms in the blood. Blood cultures can help identify the type of microorganism that is causing an infection. This helps determine the best treatment. They may be used to help diagnose septicemia (a serious blood infection) and other conditions.
blood draw listen (blud …)
A procedure in which a needle is used to take blood from a vein, usually for laboratory testing. A blood draw may also be done to remove extra red blood cells from the blood, to treat certain blood disorders. Also called phlebotomy and venipuncture.
blood poisoning listen (blud POY-zuh-ning)
Disease caused by the spread of bacteria and their toxins in the bloodstream. Also called septicemia and toxemia.
blood pressure listen (blud PREH-sher)
The force of circulating blood on the walls of the arteries. Blood pressure is taken using two measurements: systolic (measured when the heart beats, when blood pressure is at its highest) and diastolic (measured between heart beats, when blood pressure is at its lowest). Blood pressure is written with the systolic blood pressure first, followed by the diastolic blood pressure (for example 120/80).
blood stasis listen (blud STAY-sis)
In traditional Chinese medicine, a condition described as slowing or pooling of blood, which may cause pain or other symptoms.
blood stem cell listen (blud stem sel)
An immature cell that can develop into all types of blood cells, including white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets. Blood stem cells are found in the peripheral blood and the bone marrow. Also called hematopoietic stem cell.
blood sugar listen (blud SHUH-ger)
Glucose (a type of sugar) found in the blood. Also called glycemia.
blood test listen (blud test)
A test done on a sample of blood to measure the amount of certain substances in the blood or to count different types of blood cells. Blood tests may be done to look for signs of disease or agents that cause disease, to check for antibodies or tumor markers, or to see how well treatments are working.
blood thinner listen (blud THIH-ner)
A substance that is used to prevent and treat blood clots in blood vessels and the heart. Also called anticoagulant.
blood transfusion listen (blud tranz-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure in which whole blood or parts of blood are put into a patient’s bloodstream through a vein. The blood may be donated by another person or it may have been taken from the patient and stored until needed. Also called transfusion.
blood urea nitrogen listen (blud yoo-REE-uh NY-troh-jen)
Nitrogen in the blood that comes from urea (a substance formed by the breakdown of protein in the liver). The kidneys filter urea out of the blood and into the urine. A high level of urea nitrogen in the blood may be a sign of a kidney problem. Also called BUN and urea nitrogen.
blood vessel listen (blud VEH-sel)
A tube through which the blood circulates in the body. Blood vessels include a network of arteries, arterioles, capillaries, venules, and veins.
blood-brain barrier listen (blud-brayn BAYR-ee-er)
A network of blood vessels and tissue that is made up of closely spaced cells and helps keep harmful substances from reaching the brain. The blood-brain barrier lets some substances, such as water, oxygen, carbon dioxide, and general anesthetics, pass into the brain. It also keeps out bacteria and other substances, such as many anticancer drugs. Also called BBB.
blood-brain barrier disruption listen (blud-brayn BAYR-ee-er dis-RUP-shun)
The use of drugs to create openings between cells in the blood-brain barrier. The blood-brain barrier is a protective network of blood vessels and tissue that protects the brain from harmful substances, but can also prevent anticancer drugs from reaching the brain. Once the barrier is opened, anticancer drugs may be infused into an artery that goes to the brain, in order to treat brain tumors. Also called BBBD.
Bloom syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by height that is shorter than average, a narrow face with redness and a rash, a high-pitched voice, and fertility problems. Patients with this disorder have an increased risk of cancer, especially leukemia and osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Bloom syndrome is caused by changes in a protein that normally helps cells make copies of the DNA. Changes in this protein cause many breaks, rearrangements, and other mutations in the DNA. It is a type of autosomal recessive genetic disease. Also called Bloom-Torre-Machacek syndrome.
Bloom-Torre-Machacek syndrome listen (... TOR-ay-muh-HA-chek SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by height that is shorter than average, a narrow face with redness and a rash, a high-pitched voice, and fertility problems. Patients with this disorder have an increased risk of cancer, especially leukemia and osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Bloom-Torre-Machacek syndrome is caused by changes in a protein that normally helps cells make copies of the DNA. Changes in this protein cause many breaks, rearrangements, and other mutations in the DNA. It is a type of autosomal recessive genetic disease. Also called Bloom syndrome.
BMD
A measure of the amount of minerals (mostly calcium and phosphorous) contained in a certain volume of bone. BMD measurements are used to diagnose osteoporosis (a condition marked by decreased bone mass), to see how well osteoporosis treatments are working, and to predict how likely the bones are to break. Low BMD can occur in patients treated for cancer. Also called bone density, bone mass, and bone mineral density.
BMD scan listen (… skan)
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called bone mineral density scan, DEXA, DEXA scan, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, dual x-ray absorptiometry, and DXA.
BMI
Body mass index. A measure that relates body weight to height. BMI is sometimes used to measure total body fat and whether a person is a healthy weight. Excess body fat is linked to an increased risk of some diseases including heart disease and some cancers. Also called body mass index.
BMS-182751
A substance being studied in the treatment of prostate and other types of cancer. It contains the metal platinum and may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called JM 216 and satraplatin.
BMS-184476
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors.
BMS-188797
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called taxane analogs.
BMS-214662
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called farnesyltransferase inhibitors.
BMS-247550
A drug used to treat metastatic or locally advanced breast cancer that has not improved after treatment with certain other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BMS-247550 stops the growth of tumor cells by blocking cell division. It is a type of epothilone analog. Also called ixabepilone and Ixempra.
BMS-275291
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called matrix metalloproteinase inhibitors (MMPIs).
BMS-354825
A drug used to treat children with chronic phase chronic myeloid leukemia (CML) that is Philadelphia chromosome positive (Ph+). It is also used to treat adults with certain types of CML and acute lymphoblastic leukemia that are Ph+. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BMS-354825 blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called dasatinib and Sprycel.
BMS-599626
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called protein tyrosine kinase inhibitors.
BMT
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own stem cells that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the bone marrow of the patient or a donor. A BMT may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected from the marrow and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin). Also called bone marrow transplant.
BNCT
A type of radiation therapy. A substance that contains boron is injected into a blood vessel. The boron collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron to kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. BNCT is being studied as a treatment for glioblastoma multiforme and recurrent head and neck cancer. Also called boron neutron capture therapy.
board certified oncology pharmacy specialist listen (bord SER-tih-fide on-KAH-loh-jee FAR-muh-see SPEH-shuh-list)
A licensed pharmacist with special training in how to design, give, monitor, and change chemotherapy for cancer patients. Also called BCOP and oncology pharmacy specialist.
body image listen (BAH-dee IH-mij)
The way a person thinks about his or her body and how it looks to others.
body mass index listen (BAH-dee mas IN-dex)
A measure that relates body weight to height. BMI is sometimes used to measure total body fat and whether a person is a healthy weight. Excess body fat is linked to an increased risk of some diseases including heart disease and some cancers. Also called BMI.
bolus dose listen (BOH-lus...)
A single dose of a drug or other substance given over a short period of time. It is usually given by infusion or injection into a blood vessel. It may also be given by mouth.
bombesin listen (BOM-beh-sin)
A peptide (small protein) found in the brain, gastrointestinal tract, and lungs. It causes the release of certain hormones and enzymes. It also causes smooth muscles to contract. Bombesin is found at high levels on small cell lung cancer cells and on other types of cancer cells. It is a type of neuropeptide and a type of hormone.
BON
The necrosis (death) of bone tissue caused by treatment with a bisphosphonate (a drug or substance used to treat osteoporosis, bone pain caused by some types of cancer, and high blood calcium). It commonly occurs in the jaw bones. There may be pain, swelling and infection in the areas of necrosis. Also called bisphosphonate-associated osteonecrosis.
bone cancer listen (bone KAN-ser)
Primary bone cancer is cancer that forms in cells of the bone. Some types of primary bone cancer are osteosarcoma, Ewing sarcoma, malignant fibrous histiocytoma, and chondrosarcoma. Secondary bone cancer is cancer that spreads to the bone from another part of the body (such as the prostate, breast, or lung).
bone density listen (...DEN-sih-tee)
A measure of the amount of minerals (mostly calcium and phosphorous) contained in a certain volume of bone. Bone density measurements are used to diagnose osteoporosis (a condition marked by decreased bone mass), to see how well osteoporosis treatments are working, and to predict how likely the bones are to break. Low bone density can occur in patients treated for cancer. Also called BMD, bone mass, and bone mineral density.
bone marrow listen (bone MAYR-oh)
The soft, sponge-like tissue in the center of most bones. It produces white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets.
bone marrow ablation listen (bone MAYR-oh a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure to destroy bone marrow using radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs. It is done before a bone marrow or blood stem cell transplant to kill cancer cells and bone marrow cells. This makes room for healthy stem cells.
bone marrow aspiration listen (bone MAYR-oh AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A procedure in which a small sample of bone marrow is removed, usually from the hip bone, breastbone, or thigh bone. A small area of skin and the surface of the bone underneath are numbed with an anesthetic. Then, a special wide needle is pushed into the bone. A sample of liquid bone marrow is removed with a syringe attached to the needle. The bone marrow is sent to a laboratory to be looked at under a microscope. This procedure may be done at the same time as a bone marrow biopsy.
bone marrow aspiration and biopsy listen (bone MAYR-oh AS-pih-RAY-shun ... BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a small sample of bone marrow (soft, sponge-like tissue in the center of most bones) and bone is removed. A small area of skin and the surface of the bone underneath are numbed with an anesthetic. Then a special wide needle is pushed into the bone. A sample of liquid bone marrow is removed with a syringe attached to the needle. The syringe is then removed and the needle is rotated to remove a sample of the bone and the bone marrow. Both the bone marrow and bone samples are sent to a laboratory to be looked at under a microscope.
bone marrow biopsy listen (bone MAYR-oh BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a small sample of bone with bone marrow inside it is removed, usually from the hip bone. A small area of skin and the surface of the bone underneath are numbed with an anesthetic. Then, a special, wide needle is pushed into the bone and rotated to remove a sample of bone with the bone marrow inside it. The sample is sent to a laboratory to be looked at under a microscope. This procedure may be done at the same time as a bone marrow aspiration.
bone marrow cancer listen (bone MAYR-oh KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the blood-forming stem cells of the bone marrow (soft sponge-like tissue in the center of most bones). Bone marrow cancer includes leukemias and multiple myeloma.
bone marrow metastasis listen (bone MAYR-oh meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the bone marrow.
bone marrow transplant listen (bone MAYR-oh TRANZ-plant)
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own stem cells that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the bone marrow of the patient or a donor. A bone marrow transplant may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected from the marrow and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin). Also called BMT.
bone mass listen (bone mas)
A measure of the amount of minerals (mostly calcium and phosphorous) contained in a certain volume of bone. Bone mass measurements are used to diagnose osteoporosis (a condition marked by decreased bone mass), to see how well osteoporosis treatments are working, and to predict how likely the bones are to break. Low bone mass can occur in patients treated for cancer. Also called BMD, bone density, and bone mineral density.
bone metastasis listen (...meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the bone.
bone mineral density listen (... MIH-neh-rul DEN-sih-tee)
A measure of the amount of minerals (mostly calcium and phosphorous) contained in a certain volume of bone. Bone mineral density measurements are used to diagnose osteoporosis (a condition marked by decreased bone mass), to see how well osteoporosis treatments are working, and to predict how likely the bones are to break. Low bone mineral density can occur in patients treated for cancer. Also called BMD, bone density, and bone mass.
bone mineral density scan listen (... MIH-neh-rul DEN-sih-tee skan)
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, DEXA, DEXA scan, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, dual x-ray absorptiometry, and DXA.
bone scan listen (bone skan)
A procedure to check for abnormal areas or damage in the bones. A very small amount of radioactive material is injected into a vein and travels through the blood. The radioactive material collects in the bones and is detected by a scanner (a special camera that takes pictures of the inside of the body). A bone scan may be used to diagnose bone tumors or cancer that has spread to the bone. It may also be used to help diagnose fractures, bone infections, or other bone problems. Also called bone scintigraphy.
bone scintigraphy listen (... sin-TIH-gruh-fee)
A procedure to check for abnormal areas or damage in the bones. A very small amount of radioactive material is injected into a vein and travels through the blood. The radioactive material collects in the bones and is detected by a scanner (a special camera that takes pictures of the inside of the body). A bone scintigraphy may be used to diagnose bone tumors or cancer that has spread to the bone. It may also be used to help diagnose fractures, bone infections, or other bone problems. Also called bone scan.
bone-seeking radioisotope listen (bone-SEE-king RAY-dee-oh-I-soh-tope)
A radioactive substance that is given through a vein, and collects in bone cells and in tumor cells that have spread to the bone. It kills cancer cells by giving off low-level radiation.
booster listen (BOO-ster)
In medicine, refers to a vaccination given after a previous vaccination. A booster helps maintain or increase a protective immune response.
borderline personality disorder listen (BOR-der-LINE PER-suh-NA-lih-tee dis-OR-der)
A serious mental illness marked by unstable moods and impulsive behavior. People with BPD have problems with relationships, family and work life, long-term planning, and self-identity. Symptoms include intense bouts of anger, depression, and anxiety that may lead to self-injury or suicide, drug or alcohol abuse, excessive spending, binge eating, or risky sex. A person with BPD who is diagnosed with cancer may be at an increased risk of suicide. Also called BPD.
boron neutron capture therapy listen (BOR-on NOO-tron KAP-cher THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy. A substance that contains boron is injected into a blood vessel. The boron collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron to kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Boron neutron capture therapy is being studied as a treatment for glioblastoma multiforme and recurrent head and neck cancer. Also called BNCT.
boron phenylalanine listen (BOR-on feh-nil-A-luh-neen)
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. Boron phenylalanine is injected into a blood vessel and collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with boron phenylalanine to kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called BPA.
boronophenylalanine-fructose complex listen (BOR-on-oh-feh-nil-A-luh-neen-FROOK-tose KOM-plex)
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. Boronophenylalanine-fructose complex is injected into a blood vessel and collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron in boronophenylalanine-fructose complex, producing radioactive particles that kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called BPA-F.
bortezomib listen (bor-TEH-zoh-mib)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is also used to treat mantle cell lymphoma in patients who have already received at least one other type of treatment and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bortezomib blocks several molecular pathways in a cell and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor and a type of dipeptidyl boronic acid. Also called PS-341 and Velcade.
Bosulif listen (BAH-soo-lif)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that is Philadelphia chromosome positive. It is used in some newly diagnosed patients. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with or have not gotten better after other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bosulif blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called bosutinib.
bosutinib listen (bah-SOO-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that is Philadelphia chromosome positive. It is used in some newly diagnosed patients. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with or have not gotten better after other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Bosutinib blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Bosulif.
Boswellia serrata listen (bos-WEH-lee-uh seh-RAY-tuh)
A tree that belongs to the incense tree family. The tree’s amber-colored resin is used in incense. The resin has anti-inflammatory effects and has been used to treat arthritis, asthma, and ulcerative colitis. It is also being studied in the treatment of brain tumors. Also called frankincense tree.
botanical listen (buh-TA-nih-kul)
Having to do with, or derived from, plants.
Botox listen (BOH-tox)
A toxin made by the bacterium Clostridium botulinum. It can cause food poisoning. The drug Botox is a form of the toxin that can be used in small amounts to treat certain medical conditions. These include severe underarm sweating and severe muscle spasms in the neck and shoulders. Botox is also used to smooth wrinkles on the face. It is being studied in the treatment of pain in patients with skin leiomyomas (benign smooth muscle tumors) and other conditions. Also called botulinum toxin A and botulinum toxin type A.
botulinum toxin A listen (BAH-choo-LY-num TOK-sin …)
A toxin made by the bacterium Clostridium botulinum. It can cause food poisoning. The drug Botox is a form of the toxin that can be used in small amounts to treat certain medical conditions. These include severe underarm sweating and severe muscle spasms in the neck and shoulders. Botulinum toxin A is also used to smooth wrinkles on the face. It is being studied in the treatment of pain in patients with skin leiomyomas (benign smooth muscle tumors) and other conditions. Also called Botox and botulinum toxin type A.
botulinum toxin type A listen (BAH-choo-LY-num TOK-sin ...)
A toxin made by the bacterium Clostridium botulinum. It can cause food poisoning. The drug Botox is a form of the toxin that can be used in small amounts to treat certain medical conditions. These include severe underarm sweating and severe muscle spasms in the neck and shoulders. Botulinum toxin type A is also used to smooth wrinkles on the face. It is being studied in the treatment of pain in patients with skin leiomyomas (benign smooth muscle tumors) and other conditions. Also called Botox and botulinum toxin A.
bowel listen (BOW-ul)
The long, tube-shaped organ in the abdomen that completes the process of digestion. The bowel has two parts, the small bowel and the large bowel. Also called intestine.
bowel function listen (BOW-ul FUNK-shun)
The way the intestines work in terms of how often there are bowel movements, the ability to control when to have a bowel movement, and whether the stools are hard and dry as in constipation or watery as in diarrhea.
bowel movement listen (BOW-ul MOOV-ment)
Movement of feces (undigested food, bacteria, mucus, and cells from the lining of the intestines) through the bowel and out the anus. Also called defecation.
bowel obstruction listen (BOW-ul ub-STRUK-shun)
A partial or complete block of the small or large intestine that keeps food, liquid, gas, and stool from moving through the intestines in a normal way. Bowel obstructions may be caused by a twist in the intestines, hernias, inflammation, scar tissue from surgery, and certain types of cancer, such as cancers of the stomach, colon, and ovary. They may also be caused by conditions that affect the muscles of the intestine, such as paralysis. Signs and symptoms may include pain and swelling in the abdomen, constipation, diarrhea, vomiting, and problems passing gas. Most bowel obstructions occur in the small intestine. Also called intestinal obstruction.
Bowen disease listen (BOH-en dih-ZEEZ)
A skin disease marked by scaly or thickened patches on the skin and often caused by prolonged exposure to arsenic. The patches often occur on sun-exposed areas of the skin and in older white men. These patches may become malignant (cancer). Also called precancerous dermatitis and precancerous dermatosis.
Bowman-Birk inhibitor concentrate listen (BOH-man-birk in-HIH-bih-ter KON-sen-TRAYT)
A substance that is made from soybeans and is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It blocks the action of enzymes that are needed for cancer cells to form. It is a type of protease inhibitor. Also called BBIC.
BPA
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. BPA is injected into a blood vessel and collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with BPA to kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called boron phenylalanine.
BPA-F
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. BPA-F is injected into a blood vessel and collects in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation therapy with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron in BPA-F, producing radioactive particles that kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called boronophenylalanine-fructose complex.
BPD
Borderline personality disorder. A serious mental illness marked by unstable moods and impulsive behavior. People with BPD have problems with relationships, family and work life, long-term planning, and self-identity. Symptoms include intense bouts of anger, depression, and anxiety that may lead to self-injury or suicide, drug or alcohol abuse, excessive spending, binge eating, or risky sex. A person with BPD who is diagnosed with cancer may be at an increased risk of suicide. Also called borderline personality disorder.
BPDCN
A rare, fast-growing cancer that affects the blood, bone marrow, and skin. It can also affect the lymph nodes, spleen, and central nervous system. Most patients with BPDCN have red-brown or deep purple skin lesions on one or more areas of the body. BPDCN usually occurs in older adults and is difficult to diagnose and treat. Also called blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm.
BPH
A benign (not cancer) condition in which an overgrowth of prostate tissue pushes against the urethra and the bladder, blocking the flow of urine. Also called benign prostatic hyperplasia and benign prostatic hypertrophy.
BPU
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of antitubulin agent. Also called benzoylphenylurea.
brachial plexopathy listen (BRAY-kee-ul plek-SAH-puh-thee)
A condition marked by numbness, tingling, pain, weakness, or limited movement in the arm or hand. It is caused by an impairment of the brachial plexus, a network of nerves that affect the arm and hand.
brachial plexus listen (BRAY-kee-ul PLEK-sus)
A network of nerves that sends signals from the spine to the arm and hand.
brachytherapy listen (BRAY-kee-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into or near a tumor. Also called implant radiation therapy, internal radiation therapy, and radiation brachytherapy.
BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426 listen (… KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A drug used to treat Erdheim-Chester disease (a very rare type of histiocytosis) and advanced melanoma. It is used in patients whose disease has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426 blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called PLX4032, RG7204, vemurafenib, and Zelboraf.
BRAF (V600E) mutation listen (… myoo-TAY-shun)
A specific mutation (change) in the BRAF gene, which makes a protein that is involved in sending signals in cells and in cell growth. This BRAF gene mutation may be found in some types of cancer, including melanoma and colorectal cancer. It may increase the growth and spread of cancer cells. Checking for this BRAF mutation in tumor tissue may help to plan cancer treatment.
BRAF gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called B-RAF, which is involved in sending signals in cells and in cell growth. This gene may be mutated (changed) in many types of cancer, which causes a change in the B-RAF protein. This can increase the growth and spread of cancer cells.
BRAF kinase inhibitor listen (… KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks a protein called BRAF. BRAF is a kinase enzyme that helps control cell growth and signaling. It may be found in a mutated (changed) form in some types of cancer, including melanoma and colorectal cancer. Blocking mutated BRAF kinase proteins may help keep cancer cells from growing. Some BRAF kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer.
Braftovi listen (braf-TOH-vee)
A drug used with binimetinib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Braftovi blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called encorafenib.
brain metastasis listen (brayn meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the brain.
brain stem listen (brayn stem)
The part of the brain that is connected to the spinal cord.
brain stem auditory evoked response test listen (brayn stem AW-duh-TOR-ee eh-VOKT reh-SPONTS …)
A test used to detect some types of hearing loss, such as hearing loss caused by injury or tumors that affect nerves involved in hearing. Electrodes are placed on the head and certain tones or clicking sounds are made. The electrodes measure nerve signals in the brain when it reacts to the sounds. Also called ABR test, auditory brain stem response test, and BAER test.
brain stem glioma listen (brayn stem glee-OH-muh)
A tumor located in the part of the brain that connects to the spinal cord (the brain stem). It may grow rapidly or slowly, depending on the grade of the tumor.
brain stem tumor listen (brayn stem TOO-mer)
A tumor in the part of the brain that connects to the spinal cord (the brain stem).
brain tumor listen (brayn TOO-mer)
The growth of abnormal cells in the tissues of the brain. Brain tumors can be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer).
Brassica vegetable listen (BRA-sih-kuh VEJ-tuh-bul)
A member of the family of vegetables that includes broccoli, Brussels sprouts, cabbage, cauliflower, collard greens, kale, and turnips. These vegetables contain substances that may protect against cancer. Also called cruciferous vegetable.
BRCA1
A gene on chromosome 17 that normally helps to suppress cell growth. A person who inherits certain mutations (changes) in a BRCA1 gene has a higher risk of getting breast, ovarian, prostate, and other types of cancer.
BRCA2
A gene on chromosome 13 that normally helps to suppress cell growth. A person who inherits certain mutations (changes) in a BRCA2 gene has a higher risk of getting breast, ovarian, prostate, and other types of cancer.
BRCAPro listen
A computer program that uses statistics to predict whether a person has an inherited mutation (change) in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes. People who have certain mutations in these genes have a higher than normal risk of breast, ovarian, prostate, and other types of cancer. The program is based on personal and family medical histories of breast and ovarian cancer.
breakthrough pain listen (BRAYK-throo payn)
A sudden increase in pain that may occur in patients who already have chronic pain from cancer, arthritis, fibromyalgia, or other conditions. Breakthrough pain usually lasts for a short time. During breakthrough pain, the level of pain may be severe but the type of pain and where it is in the body are usually the same as the patient’s chronic pain. Breakthrough pain may occur with stress, illness, and certain activities, such as exercising or coughing, or when the dose of pain medicine that the patient is taking wears off. Breakthrough pain is usually not a symptom of a new condition or a condition that has gotten worse. Also called pain flare.
breast listen (brest)
Glandular organ located on the chest. The breast is made up of connective tissue, fat, and breast tissue that contains the glands that can make milk. Also called mammary gland.
breast cancer listen (brest KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the breast. The most common type of breast cancer is ductal carcinoma, which begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple). Another type of breast cancer is lobular carcinoma, which begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast. Invasive breast cancer is breast cancer that has spread from where it began in the breast ducts or lobules to surrounding normal tissue. Breast cancer occurs in both men and women, although male breast cancer is rare.
breast cancer resistance protein listen (brest KAN-ser reh-ZIH-stunts PROH-teen)
A protein that is involved in making cancer cells resistant (unable to respond) to anticancer drugs. Normally, breast cancer resistance protein works with other proteins to help move many different substances, including drugs and other chemicals, in and out of cells. It is found in stem cells and in normal tissues, including the intestine, liver, brain, and placenta. However, it may also be found in higher than normal amounts in some cancer cells, which can cause them to be unable to respond to certain anticancer drugs. Drugs that block breast cancer resistance protein are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Breast cancer resistance protein was first identified in breast cancer cells. Also called BCRP.
breast carcinoma in situ listen (brest KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the tissues of the breast. There are 2 types of breast carcinoma in situ: ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS) and Paget disease of the nipple. DCIS is a condition in which the abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct. The abnormal cells have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. Paget disease of the nipple is a condition in which abnormal cells are found in the skin cells of the nipple and may spread to the areola. Patients with Paget disease of the nipple may also have DCIS or invasive breast cancer in the same breast. Also called stage 0 breast carcinoma in situ.
breast density listen (brest DEN-sih-tee)
A term used to describe the amount of dense tissue compared to the amount of fatty tissue in the breast on a mammogram. Dense breast tissue has more fibrous and glandular tissue than fat. There are different levels of breast density, ranging from little or no dense tissue to very dense tissue. The more density, the harder it may be to find tumors or other changes on a mammogram.
breast duct listen (brest dukt)
A thin tube in the breast that carries milk from the breast lobules to the nipple. Also called milk duct.
breast duct ectasia listen (brest dukt ek-TAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which a milk duct under the nipple widens and thickens. This can cause the milk duct to become blocked and fluid to build up inside it. There are usually no symptoms, but sometimes there may be a thick nipple discharge or redness or tenderness of the nipple and nearby breast tissue. Breast duct ectasia is most common in women who are near menopause or have gone through it. Also called mammary duct ectasia.
breast duct endoscopy listen (brest dukt en-DOS-koh-pee)
A method used to examine the lining of the breast ducts to look for abnormal tissue. A very thin, flexible, lighted tube attached to a camera is inserted through the nipple, and threaded into the breast ducts deep in the breast. Tissue and fluid samples may be removed during the procedure.
Breast Imaging Reporting and Data System listen (brest IH-muh-jing reh-port-ing ... SIS-tem)
A method used by radiologists to interpret and report in a standardized manner the results of mammography, ultrasound, and MRI used in breast cancer screening and diagnosis. Also called BI-RADS.
breast implant listen (brest IM-plant)
A silicone gel-filled or saline-filled sac placed under the chest muscle to restore breast shape.
breast lobe listen (brest …)
A section of the breast that contains the lobules (the glands that make milk).
breast lobule listen (brest LAH-byool)
A small part of a lobe in the breast. A breast lobule is a gland that makes milk.
breast reconstruction listen (brest REE-kun-STRUK-shun)
Surgery to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy.
breast self-exam listen (brest self-eg-ZAM)
An exam by a woman of her breasts to check for lumps or other changes.
breast tomosynthesis listen (brest toh-moh-SIN-thuh-sis)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take a series of pictures of the inside of the breast from many different angles. A computer is used to make 3-D pictures of the breast from these x-rays. Breast tomosynthesis is used to check for breast cancer and other changes in the breast, such as abnormal lumps, cysts, or calcifications (calcium deposits). It may allow doctors to see breast tissue, including dense breast tissue, more clearly than with 2-D mammography. This may make breast tumors or other changes in the breast easier to find. Also called 3-D mammography and 3-dimensional mammography.
breastbone listen (brest-bone)
The long flat bone that forms the center front of the chest wall. The breastbone is attached to the collarbone and the first seven ribs. Also called sternum.
breast-conserving surgery listen (brest-kun-SER-ving SER-juh-ree)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-sparing surgery, lumpectomy, partial mastectomy, quadrantectomy, and segmental mastectomy.
breast-sparing surgery listen (brest-SPAYR-ing SER-juh-ree)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-conserving surgery, lumpectomy, partial mastectomy, quadrantectomy, and segmental mastectomy.
brentuximab vedotin listen (bren-TUK-sih-mab veh-DOH-tin)
A drug used with other anticancer drugs to treat systemic anaplastic large cell lymphoma or other peripheral T-cell lymphomas, including angioimmunoblastic T-cell lymphoma, that are CD30 positive and have not been treated with other therapy. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat stage III or stage IV classical Hodgkin lymphoma that has not been treated with other therapy. Brentuximab vedotin is also used to treat certain types of Hodgkin lymphoma, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and mycosis fungoides that were treated with other therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Brentuximab vedotin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD30, which is found on some lymphoma cells. It also contains an anticancer drug, which may help kill cancer cells. Brentuximab vedotin is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Adcetris and SGN-35.
Breslow depth listen (BRES-loh …)
A measure of how deeply a melanoma tumor has grown into the skin. The tumor thickness (depth) is usually measured from the top of the tumor to the deepest tumor cells. If the tumor is ulcerated (the skin is broken), it is measured from the base of the ulcer to the deepest tumor cells. Breslow depth is used to help determine the stage of cancer. Thicker tumors are linked with lower survival rates. Also called Breslow thickness.
Breslow thickness listen (BRES-loh THIK-nes)
A measure of how deeply a melanoma tumor has grown into the skin. The tumor thickness (depth) is usually measured from the top of the tumor to the deepest tumor cells. If the tumor is ulcerated (the skin is broken), it is measured from the base of the ulcer to the deepest tumor cells. Breslow thickness is used to help determine the stage of cancer. Thicker tumors are linked with lower survival rates. Also called Breslow depth.
Brief Pain Inventory listen (breef payn IN-ven-TOR-ee)
A questionnaire used to measure pain.
brigatinib listen (brih-GA-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is used in patients whose cancer has gotten worse during treatment with or who cannot take crizotinib (a type of anticancer drug). Brigatinib blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Brigatinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Alunbrig.
brivanib alaninate listen (brih-VAN-ib a-luh-NIH-nayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Brivanib alaninate may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor 2 inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
brivudine listen (BRIH-vyoo-deen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of infections caused by herpesvirus, including herpes-zoster (shingles). It belongs to the family of drugs called antivirals.
BRM therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses substances made from living organisms to treat disease. These substances may occur naturally in the body or may be made in the laboratory. Some BRM therapies stimulate or suppress the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, and other diseases. Other BRM therapies attack specific cancer cells, which may help keep them from growing or kill them. They may also lessen certain side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Types of BRM therapy include immunotherapy (such as vaccines, cytokines, and some antibodies), gene therapy, and some targeted therapies. Also called biological response modifier therapy, biological therapy, and biotherapy.
broad ligament listen (brod LIH-guh-ment)
The layer of tissue that connects the sides of the uterus to the walls and floor of the pelvis. The broad ligament covers the uterus, ovaries, and fallopian tubes. It also includes nerves and blood vessels to these organs.
broccoli sprout extract listen (BRAH-kuh-lee … EK-strakt)
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. Broccoli sprout extract comes from newly sprouted broccoli. It causes cells to make enzymes that may protect them against cancer-causing toxins in the body, and it may also block the growth of cancer cells.
bromelain listen (BROH-meh-layn)
An enzyme found in pineapples that breaks down other proteins, such as collagen and muscle fiber, and has anti-inflammatory properties. It is used as a meat tenderizer in the food industry.
bronchi listen (BRONG-ky)
The large air passages that lead from the trachea (windpipe) to the lungs.
bronchial listen (BRON-kee-ul)
Having to do with the bronchi, which are the larger air passages of the lungs, including those that lead from the trachea (windpipe) to the lungs and those within the lungs.
bronchial adenoma listen (BRON-kee-ul A-deh-NOH-muh)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the bronchi (large air passages in the lungs including those that lead to the lungs from the windpipe).
bronchial brush biopsy listen (BRON-kee-ul brush BY-op-see)
A procedure in which cells are taken from the inside of the airways that lead to the lungs. A bronchoscope (a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing) is inserted through the nose or mouth into the lungs. A small brush is then used to remove cells from the airways. These cells are then looked at under a microscope. A bronchial brush biopsy is used to find cancer and changes in cells that may lead to cancer. It is also used to help diagnose other lung conditions. Also called bronchial brushing.
bronchial brushing listen (BRON-kee-ul BRUH-shing)
A procedure in which cells are taken from the inside of the airways that lead to the lungs. A bronchoscope (a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing) is inserted through the nose or mouth into the lungs. A small brush is then used to remove cells from the airways. These cells are then looked at under a microscope. A bronchial brushing is used to find cancer and changes in cells that may lead to cancer. It is also used to help diagnose other lung conditions. Also called bronchial brush biopsy.
bronchial washing listen (BRON-kee-ul WAH-shing)
A procedure in which cells are taken from the inside of the airways that lead to the lungs. A bronchoscope (a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing) is inserted through the nose or mouth into the lungs. A mild salt solution is washed over the surface of the airways to collect cells, which are then looked at under a microscope. Bronchial washing is used to find infections. It may also help find cancer or changes in cells that may lead to cancer.
bronchiole listen (BRONG-kee-ole)
A tiny branch of air tubes in the lungs.
bronchiolitis obliterans listen (BRONG-kee-oh-LY-tis ob-LIH-teh-ranz)
A condition in which the bronchioles (tiny branches of air tubes in the lungs) become inflamed and blocked. It may be caused by breathing in gases or particles that irritate the bronchioles. This irritation causes scar tissue to form, and makes breathing difficult. Bronchiolitis olbiterans may be caused by other factors, and can also occur after a transplant with an organ or stem cells from a matched donor.
bronchitis listen (bron-KY-tis)
Inflammation (swelling and reddening) of the bronchi.
bronchodilator listen (BRON-koh-DY-lay-ter)
A type of drug that causes small airways in the lungs to open up. Bronchodilators are inhaled and are used to treat breathing disorders, such as asthma or emphysema.
bronchogenic carcinoma listen (BRON-koh-JEH-nik KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in the tissue that lines or covers the airways of the lungs, including small cell and non-small cell lung cancer.
bronchoscope listen (BRON-koh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the trachea, bronchi (air passages that lead to the lungs), and lungs. A bronchoscope has a light and a lens for viewing, and may have a tool to remove tissue.
bronchoscopy listen (bron-KOS-koh-pee)
A procedure that uses a bronchoscope to examine the inside of the trachea, bronchi (air passages that lead to the lungs), and lungs. A bronchoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. The bronchoscope is inserted through the nose or mouth. Bronchoscopy may be used to detect cancer or to perform some treatment procedures.
bronchus listen (BRON-kus)
A large airway that leads from the trachea (windpipe) to a lung. The plural of bronchus is bronchi.
brostallicin hydrochloride listen (brah-STAH-lih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Brostallicin hydrochloride binds to DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also help other drugs kill cancer cells. It is a type of DNA minor groove binding agent.
broxuridine listen (brox-YOOR-ih-deen)
A drug that makes cancer cells more sensitive to radiation and is also used as a diagnostic agent to determine how fast cancer cells grow.
bryostatin 1 listen (BRY-uh-STA-tin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer and certain brain conditions such as Alzheimer disease and stroke. It binds to an enzyme involved in cell growth and it may help anticancer drugs work better. Bryostatin 1 comes from a marine organism. It is a type of protein kinase C modulator.
BSH
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. BSH is injected into a vein and becomes concentrated in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation treatment with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron in BSH and make radioactive particles that kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called sodium borocaptate.
BSI-201
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. BSI-201 may kill cancer cells. Also called iniparib.
buccal mucosa listen (BUH-kul myoo-KOH-suh)
The inner lining of the cheeks.
bucket trial (BUH-ket TRY-ul)
A type of clinical trial that tests how well a new drug or other substance works in patients who have different types of cancer that all have the same mutation or biomarker. In bucket trials, patients all receive the same treatment that targets the specific mutation or biomarker found in their cancer. Bucket trials may allow new drugs to be tested and approved more quickly than traditional clinical trials. Bucket trials may also be useful for studying rare cancers and cancers with rare genetic changes. Also called basket trial.
budesonide listen (byoo-DEH-suh-nide)
A drug used in the treatment of asthma and rhinitis. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. Budesonide belongs to the family of drugs called steroids.
bugbane listen (BUG-bayn)
An eastern North American perennial herb. A substance obtained from the root of the plant has been used in some cultures to treat a number of medical problems. It is being studied in the treatment of hot flashes and other symptoms of menopause. The scientific name is Cimicifuga racemosa. Also called black cohosh, black snakeroot, bugwort, and rattlesnake root.
bugwort listen (BUG-wort)
An eastern North American perennial herb. A substance obtained from the root of the plant has been used in some cultures to treat a number of medical problems. It is being studied in the treatment of hot flashes and other symptoms of menopause. The scientific name is Cimicifuga racemosa. Also called black cohosh, black snakeroot, bugbane, and rattlesnake root.
bulk-forming agent listen (...FOR-ming AY-jent)
A substance, such as fiber in food, that adds bulk and water to stools so that they can pass more easily through the intestines (lower part of the digestive tract).
BuMel listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to prepare patients with high-risk neuroblastoma for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BuMel includes the drugs busulfan and melphalan hydrochloride. Also called BuMel regimen.
BuMel regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to prepare patients with high-risk neuroblastoma for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. BuMel regimen includes the drugs busulfan and melphalan hydrochloride. Also called BuMel.
BUN
Nitrogen in the blood that comes from urea (a substance formed by the breakdown of protein in the liver). The kidneys filter urea out of the blood and into the urine. A high level of urea nitrogen in the blood may be a sign of a kidney problem. Also called blood urea nitrogen and urea nitrogen.
bupivacaine hydrochloride listen (byoo-PIH-vuh-kane HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to relieve pain by blocking signals at nerve endings. It is being studied in the relief of pain following surgery for cancer. It is a type of local anesthetic. Also called Marcaine and Sensorcaine.
buprenorphine hydrochloride listen (BYOO-preh-NOR-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It is also used to treat addiction to heroin and other opiates, such as morphine. Buprenorphine hydrochloride binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid.
bupropion hydrochloride listen (byoo-PROH-pee-on HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat depression and certain other disorders. It is also used to help people stop smoking. Bupropion hydrochloride increases the levels of the chemicals dopamine, serotonin, and norepinephrine in the brain. This helps improve mood and can lessen cravings for nicotine. It is a type of antidepressant and a type of nicotine receptor antagonist. Also called Wellbutrin and Zyban.
burdock listen (BUR-dok)
A plant whose seeds and root have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. The scientific name is Arctium lappa. Also called happy major and lappa.
Burkitt leukemia listen (BER-kit loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A rare, fast-growing type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many white blood cells called B lymphocytes form in the blood and bone marrow. It may start in the lymph nodes as Burkitt lymphoma and then spread to the blood and bone marrow, or it may start in the blood and bone marrow without involvement of the lymph nodes. Both Burkitt leukemia and Burkitt lymphoma have been linked to infection with the Epstein-Barr virus.
Burkitt lymphoma listen (BER-kit lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that occurs most often in children and young adults. The disease may affect the jaw, central nervous system, bowel, kidneys, ovaries, or other organs. There are three main types of Burkitt lymphoma (sporadic, endemic, and immunodeficiency related). Sporadic Burkitt lymphoma occurs throughout the world, and endemic Burkitt lymphoma occurs in Africa. Immunodeficiency-related Burkitt lymphoma is most often seen in AIDS patients.
burr hole listen (bur hole)
A small opening in the skull made with a surgical drill.
bursitis listen (ber-SY-tis)
Inflammation (swelling, pain, and warmth) of a bursa. A bursa is a flat, fluid-filled sac found between a bone and a tendon or muscle. It forms a cushion to help the tendon or muscle slide smoothly over the bone. Bursitis may be caused by long-term overuse, trauma, rheumatoid arthritis, gout, or infection. It usually affects the shoulder, knee, elbow, hip, or foot.
buserelin listen (BYOO-seh-REH-lin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormones. In prostate cancer therapy, buserelin blocks the production of testosterone in the testicles.
buspirone listen (byoo-SPY-rone)
A drug that is used to treat certain anxiety disorders. It belongs to the family of drugs called antianxiety agents.
busulfan listen (byoo-SUL-fan)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML). It is also used with other drugs to prepare patients with CML for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Busulfan attaches to DNA in cells and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Busulfex and Myleran.
Busulfex listen (byoo-SUL-fex)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML). It is also used with other drugs to prepare patients with CML for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Busulfex attaches to DNA in cells and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called busulfan and Myleran.
butane listen (BYOO-tayn)
A colorless gas that catches fire easily and is used as fuel. It is found in gasoline, lighter fluid, and some aerosol sprays. Butane is also one of many harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke.
buthionine sulfoximine listen (byoo-THY-oh-neen sul-FOK-sih-meen)
A drug that may help prevent resistance to some anticancer drugs.
bypass listen (BY-pas)
A surgical procedure in which the doctor creates a new pathway for the flow of body fluids.
C cell listen (… sel)
A type of cell in the thyroid. C cells make calcitonin, a hormone that helps control the calcium level in the blood.
CA 15-3
A protein found on epithelial cells that is part of a larger protein called MUC 1. CA 15-3 may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including breast cancer. Measuring the amount of CA 15-3 in the blood may be useful in checking how well cancer treatment is working or if cancer has come back. CA 15-3 is a type of tumor marker.
CA 19-9
A substance released into the bloodstream by both cancer cells and normal cells. Too much CA 19-9 in the blood can be a sign of pancreatic cancer or other types of cancer or conditions. The amount of CA 19-9 in the blood can be used to help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. It is a type of tumor marker.
CA 19-9 assay listen (... A-say)
A laboratory test that measures the level of CA 19-9 in the blood. CA 19-9 is a substance released into the blood by both cancer cells and normal cells. Higher than normal amounts of CA 19-9 in the blood can be a sign of pancreatic or other types of cancer or other conditions. The amount of CA 19-9 in the blood can be used to help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. CA 19-9 is a type of tumor marker.
CA 27.29
A protein found on epithelial cells, which line the inside and outside surfaces of the body. It is part of a larger protein called MUC 1. CA 27.29 may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including breast cancer. Measuring the amount of CA 27.29 in the blood may help to find out how well cancer treatment is working or if cancer has come back. CA 27.29 is a type of tumor marker.
CA-125
A substance that may be found in high amounts in the blood of patients with certain types of cancer, including ovarian cancer. CA-125 levels may also help monitor how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. Also called cancer antigen 125.
CAB
Surgery in which a healthy blood vessel taken from another part of the body is used to make a new path for blood around a blocked artery leading to the heart. This restores the flow of oxygen and nutrients to the heart. Also called aortocoronary bypass and coronary artery bypass.
CAB
In medicine, a group of non-scientist volunteers that serves as a link between a community and clinical trial researchers. A CAB may review and monitor clinical trials and help teach the community about the trials. Also called Community Advisory Board.
cabazitaxel listen (kuh-BA-zih-TAK-sil)
A drug used with prednisone to treat hormone-resistant prostate cancer that has spread and that had been treated with docetaxel. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cabazitaxel blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimitotic agent. Also called Jevtana and taxoid XRP6258.
c-ABL
An enzyme that is involved in many cell processes, such as cell division. The gene for c-ABL is on chromosome 9. In most patients with chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), the part of chromosome 9 with c-ABL has broken off and traded places with part of chromosome 22 to form the BCR-ABL fusion gene.
Cablivi listen (cab-LIH-vee)
A drug used with plasma exchange and immunosuppressive therapy to treat acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura (aTTP). aTTP is a rare blood disorder in which blood clots form in small blood vessels throughout the body. Cablivi binds to a protein called VWF, which may help keep blood clots from forming. It is a type of nanobody (a tiny antibody). Also called caplacizumab.
Cabometyx listen (KA-boh-MEH-tix)
A drug used to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that has already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cabometyx blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Cabometyx contains the active ingredient cabozantinib-s-malate. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
cabozantinib-s-malate listen (KA-boh-ZAN-tih-nib ... MA-layt)
A drug used to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that has already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is used under the brand name Cabometyx to treat these cancers. It is also used under the brand name Cometriq to treat progressive medullary thyroid cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. Cabozantinib-s-malate is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Cabozantinib-s-malate is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
cachexia listen (kuh-KEK-see-uh)
Loss of body weight and muscle mass, and weakness that may occur in patients with cancer, AIDS, or other chronic diseases.
CAD
A disease in which there is a narrowing or blockage of the coronary arteries (blood vessels that carry blood and oxygen to the heart). CAD is usually caused by atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries). The disease may cause chest pain, shortness of breath during exercise, and heart attacks. The risk of CAD is increased by having a family history of CAD before age 50, older age, smoking tobacco, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, diabetes, lack of exercise, and obesity. Also called coronary artery disease and coronary heart disease.
cadmium listen (KAD-mee-um)
A metallic element that occurs naturally in tiny amounts in air, water, soil, and food. It is a byproduct of zinc refining and is used to make batteries, pigments, plastics, alloys, and electroplate. It is also found in tobacco and tobacco smoke. Exposure to high levels of cadmium may cause certain cancers and other health problems.
CAF
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or together with other therapies to treat breast cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and fluorouracil. Also called CAF regimen.
CAF regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or together with other therapies to treat breast cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and fluorouracil. Also called CAF.
caffeine listen (ka-FEEN)
A substance found in the leaves and beans of the coffee tree, in tea, yerba mate, guarana berries, and in small amounts in cocoa. It can also be made in the laboratory, and is added to some soft drinks, foods, and medicines. Caffeine increases brain activity, alertness, attention, and energy. It may also increase blood pressure, heart rate, breathing rate, and the loss of water from the body in urine.
calaspargase pegol listen (kal-AS-par-jays PEH-gol)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic lymphoma in children and young adults aged 1 month to 21 years. Calaspargase pegol is a form of the drug L-asparaginase that is linked to a substance called SC-PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. L-asparaginase is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may stop the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. Calaspargase pegol is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called Asparlas, EZN-2285, and SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase.
calbindin listen (KAL-bine-din)
A group of proteins that bind calcium and move it into cells. Calbindins are found in many different tissues in the body.
calcification listen (KAL-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
Deposits of calcium in the tissues. Calcification in the breast can be seen on a mammogram, but cannot be detected by touch. There are two types of breast calcification, macrocalcification and microcalcification. Macrocalcifications are large deposits and are usually not related to cancer. Microcalcifications are specks of calcium that may be found in an area of rapidly dividing cells. Many microcalcifications clustered together may be a sign of cancer.
calcinosis listen (KAL-sih-NOH-sis)
A condition in which abnormal amounts of calcium salts are found in soft tissue, such as muscle.
calcitonin listen (KAL-sih-TOH-nin)
A hormone formed by the C cells of the thyroid gland. It helps maintain a healthy level of calcium in the blood. When the calcium level is too high, calcitonin lowers it.
calcitriol listen (KAL-sih-TRY-ol)
The active form of vitamin D. Calcitriol is formed in the kidneys or made in the laboratory. It is used as a drug to increase calcium levels in the body in order to treat skeletal and tissue-related calcium deficiencies caused by kidney or thyroid disorders.
calcium listen (KAL-see-um)
A mineral needed for healthy teeth, bones, and other body tissues. It is the most common mineral in the body. A deposit of calcium in body tissues, such as breast tissue, may be a sign of disease.
calcium antagonist listen (KAL-see-um an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug that keeps calcium from entering the muscle cells of the heart and blood vessels. This causes the blood vessels to relax and widen, which allows the blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure. Some calcium antagonists may also slow the heartbeat. Calcium antagonists are used to treat high blood pressure, chest pain (angina), abnormal heartbeat (arrhythmia), and several other conditions. Also called calcium channel blocker.
calcium Ca 41-chloride aqueous solution listen (KAL-see-um … KLOR-ide AY-kwee-us suh-LOO-shun)
A substance used to diagnose and monitor cancer that has spread to the bones. It is also used to study the turnover of bone tissue and to diagnose other conditions that affect the bones, such as osteoporosis. Calcium Ca 41 is a form of calcium that gives off radiation. It is passed from the body in the urine.
calcium Ca 46-chloride aqueous solution listen (KAL-see-um … KLOR-ide AY-kwee-us suh-LOO-shun)
A substance used to study the turnover of bone tissue in certain diseases, such as osteoporosis or cancer that has spread to the bone. Calcium Ca 46 is a form of calcium that gives off radiation. It is passed from the body in the urine.
calcium carbonate listen (KAL-see-um KAR-buh-nayt)
A form of the mineral calcium that is used to prevent or treat osteoporosis (a decrease in bone mass and density) and to treat heartburn and upset stomach. It is also being studied in the prevention of bone problems in people with cancer. It is a type of dietary supplement.
calcium channel blocker listen (KAL-see-um CHA-nul BLAH-ker)
A type of drug that keeps calcium from entering the muscle cells of the heart and blood vessels. This causes the blood vessels to relax and widen, which allows the blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure. Some calcium channel blockers may also slow the heartbeat. Calcium channel blockers are used to treat high blood pressure, chest pain (angina), abnormal heartbeat (arrhythmia), and several other conditions. Also called calcium antagonist.
calcium gluconate listen (KAL-see-um GLOO-koh-nayt)
The mineral calcium combined with a form of the sugar glucose. It is used to prevent and treat osteoporosis (a decrease in bone mass and density). It is also being studied in the treatment of bone loss and nerve damage caused by chemotherapy. It is a type of dietary supplement.
calcium infusion test listen (KAL-see-um in-FYOO-zhun …)
A test used to help diagnose a type of pancreatic islet cell tumor called a gastrinoma. The patient receives a 3-hour infusion of a substance called calcium gluconate and the amount of gastrin in the blood is measured. An increase in the level of gastrin in the blood after the infusion may be a sign of a gastrinoma.
calcium levoleucovorin listen (KAL-see-um LEE-voh-LOO-koh-VOR-in)
A drug used to lessen the toxic effects of the anticancer drug methotrexate or other substances that block the action of folic acid. It is also used to treat some types of anemia and is used with fluorouracil to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Calcium levoleucovorin is a form of folic acid. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called citrovorum factor, folinic acid, Fusilev, and leucovorin calcium.
calendula ointment listen (kuh-LEN-juh-luh OYNT-ment)
A substance made from the flower of the marigold plant Calendula officinalis. Calendula-based skin products have been used to treat minor cuts, burns, and skin irritation. The products that are available in the United States may not contain the same amount or mixture of ingredients and may not be effective. Another product, Calendula ointment, is being studied in France in the prevention of dermatitis in patients having radiation therapy for breast cancer. The ointment being studied is not available in the United States.
calgranulin A listen (kal-GRAN-yoo-lin ...)
A protein that is made by many different types of cells and is involved in processes that take place both inside and outside of the cell. It is made in larger amounts in inflammatory diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis, and in some types of cancer. It is being studied as a biomarker for breast cancer. Also called S100 calcium binding protein A8.
calgranulin B listen (kal-GRAN-yoo-lin ...)
A protein that is made by many different types of cells and is involved in processes that take place both inside and outside of the cell. It is made in larger amounts in inflammatory diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis, and in some types of cancer. It is being studied as a biomarker for breast cancer. Also called S100 calcium binding protein A9.
caloric intake listen (kuh-LOR-ik In-tayk)
Refers to the number of calories (energy content) consumed.
calorie listen (KA-luh-ree)
A measurement of the energy content of food. The body needs calories as to perform its functions, such as breathing, circulating the blood, and physical activity. When a person is sick, their body may need extra calories to fight fever or other problems.
Calquence listen (KAL-kwents)
A drug used to treat mantle cell lymphoma in patients who have already received at least one other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Calquence blocks a protein called Bruton’s tyrosine kinase (BTK), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called acalabrutinib.
CALR gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called calreticulin, which is involved in many cell functions. Calreticulin helps control the amount of calcium that is stored in cells. This is thought to play a role in the control of gene activity, cell growth and movement, the attachment of cells to one another, and cell death. Mutated (changed) forms of the CALR gene have been found in some types of blood conditions, including essential thrombocythemia and primary myelofibrosis.
CAM listen
Forms of treatment that are used in addition to (complementary) or instead of (alternative) standard treatments. These practices generally are not considered standard medical approaches. Standard treatments go through a long and careful research process to prove they are safe and effective, but less is known about most types of CAM. CAM may include dietary supplements, megadose vitamins, herbal preparations, special teas, acupuncture, massage therapy, magnet therapy, spiritual healing, and meditation. Also called complementary and alternative medicine.
Campath listen (KAM-path)
A drug used to treat B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Campath binds to a protein called CD52, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Campath is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called alemtuzumab.
camphor listen (KAM-fer)
A substance that comes from the wood and bark of the camphor tree or is made in the laboratory. It has a very unique smell and taste and is used in commercial products (for example, mothballs). Camphor is used in topical anti-infective and anti-pruritic (anti-itching) agents.
Camptosar listen (KAMP-toh-sar)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat colon cancer or rectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after treatment with fluorouracil. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Camptosar blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called CPT 11 and irinotecan hydrochloride.
camptothecin listen (KAMP-toh-THEH-kin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
camptothecin analog listen (KAMP-toh-THEH-kin A-nuh-log)
An anticancer drug related in structure to camptothecin, a topoisomerase inhibitor. One such drug is aminocamptothecin.
Cancell listen (kan-SEL)
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in Cancell have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. Cancell is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, JS–114, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
cancer listen (KAN-ser)
A term for diseases in which abnormal cells divide without control and can invade nearby tissues. Cancer cells can also spread to other parts of the body through the blood and lymph systems. There are several main types of cancer. Carcinoma is a cancer that begins in the skin or in tissues that line or cover internal organs. Sarcoma is a cancer that begins in bone, cartilage, fat, muscle, blood vessels, or other connective or supportive tissue. Leukemia is a cancer that starts in blood-forming tissue, such as the bone marrow, and causes large numbers of abnormal blood cells to be produced and enter the blood. Lymphoma and multiple myeloma are cancers that begin in the cells of the immune system. Central nervous system cancers are cancers that begin in the tissues of the brain and spinal cord. Also called malignancy.
cancer antigen 125 listen (KAN-ser AN-tih-jen...)
A substance that may be found in high amounts in the blood of patients with certain types of cancer, including ovarian cancer. Cancer antigen 125 levels may also help monitor how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. Also called CA-125.
cancer cell line listen (KAN-ser sel line)
Cancer cells that keep dividing and growing over time, under certain conditions in a laboratory. Cancer cell lines are used in research to study the biology of cancer and to test cancer treatments.
cancer cluster listen (KAN-ser KLUS-ter)
The occurrence of a larger-than-expected number of cases of cancer within a group of people in a geographic area over a period of time.
Cancer Information Service listen (KAN-ser in-fer-MAY-shun SER-vis)
The Cancer Information Service is the National Cancer Institute's link to the public, interpreting and explaining research findings in a clear and understandable manner, and providing personalized responses to specific questions about cancer. Access the CIS by calling 1-800-4-CANCER (1-800-422-6237), or by using the LiveHelp instant-messaging service at https://livehelp.cancer.gov. Also called CIS.
Cancer Intervention and Surveillance Modeling Network listen (KAN-ser IN-ter-VEN-shun … ser-VAY-lents MAH-duh-ling NET-wurk)
A group of researchers supported by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) who use statistical models to help understand how cancer prevention, screening, and treatment programs can affect the number of new cases of cancer diagnosed each year and the number of deaths from cancer each year. The Cancer Intervention and Surveillance Modeling Network is now studying breast, colorectal, esophageal, lung, and prostate cancers. The models they create help guide future cancer control strategies, research priorities, policies, and decision making. Also called CISNET.
cancer of the adrenal cortex listen (KAN-ser ... uh-DREE-nul KOR-tex)
A rare cancer that forms in the outer layer of tissue of the adrenal gland (a small organ on top of each kidney that makes steroid hormones, adrenaline, and noradrenaline to control heart rate, blood pressure, and other body functions). Also called adrenocortical cancer and adrenocortical carcinoma.
cancer of unknown primary origin listen (KAN-ser ... UN-none PRY-mayr-ee OR-ih-jin)
A case in which cancer cells are found in the body, but the place where the cells first started growing (the origin or primary site) cannot be determined. Also called carcinoma of unknown primary and CUP.
cancer predisposing gene mutation listen (KAN-ser PREE-dih-SPOH-zing jeen myoo-TAY-shun)
A term used to describe mutations (changes) in certain genes that may increase a person’s risk of some types of cancer. For example, a person who has certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene has higher than normal risks of developing breast cancer and ovarian cancer. Cancer predisposing gene mutations are usually inherited (passed from parent to child) and may be seen within families. Knowing if a person has a cancer predisposing gene mutation may help prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. Not all people who have a cancer predisposing gene mutation will develop cancer. Also called cancer susceptibility gene mutation.
cancer subtype listen (KAN-ser SUB-tipe)
Describes the smaller groups that a type of cancer can be divided into, based on certain characteristics of the cancer cells. These characteristics include how the cancer cells look under a microscope and whether there are certain substances in or on the cells or certain changes to the DNA of the cells. It is important to know the subtype of a cancer in order to plan treatment and determine prognosis.
cancer susceptibility gene mutation listen (KAN-ser suh-SEP-tih-BIH-lih-tee jeen myoo-TAY-shun)
A term used to describe mutations (changes) in certain genes that may increase a person’s risk of some types of cancer. For example, a person who has certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene has higher than normal risks of developing breast cancer and ovarian cancer. Cancer susceptibility gene mutations are usually inherited (passed from parent to child) and may be seen within families. Knowing if a person has a cancer susceptibility gene mutation may help prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. Not all people who have a cancer susceptibility gene mutation will develop cancer. Also called cancer predisposing gene mutation.
cancer treatment vaccine listen (KAN-ser TREET-ment vak-SEEN)
A type of vaccine that is usually made from a patient’s own tumor cells or from substances taken from tumor cells. A cancer vaccine may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Also called cancer vaccine.
cancer vaccine listen (KAN-ser vak-SEEN)
A type of vaccine that is usually made from a patient’s own tumor cells or from substances taken from tumor cells. A cancer vaccine may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Also called cancer treatment vaccine.
cancer-related post-traumatic stress listen (KAN-ser-ree-LAY-ted post-traw-MA-tik stress)
A condition that develops in some people who are diagnosed with cancer. Symptoms of cancer-related post-traumatic stress (PTS) include having frightening thoughts or trouble sleeping, being distracted or overexcited, feeling alone, or losing interest in daily activities. Symptoms may also include feelings of shock, fear, helplessness, or horror. Cancer-related PTS can occur anytime after diagnosis, including during or after treatment. Relaxation training, counseling, support groups, and certain medicines may be used to reduce symptoms of PTS.
candidiasis listen (KAN-dih-DY-uh-sis)
A condition in which Candida albicans, a type of yeast, grows out of control in moist skin areas of the body. It is usually a result of a weakened immune system, but can be a side effect of chemotherapy or treatment with antibiotics. Candidiasis usually affects the mouth (oral candidiasis); however, rarely, it spreads throughout the entire body. Also called candidosis and thrush.
candidosis listen (KAN-dih-DOH-sis)
A condition in which Candida albicans, a type of yeast, grows out of control in moist skin areas of the body. It is usually a result of a weakened immune system, but can be a side effect of chemotherapy or treatment with antibiotics. Candidosis usually affects the mouth (oral candidosis); however, rarely, it spreads throughout the entire body. Also called candidiasis and thrush.
canertinib dihydrochloride listen (can-ER-tih-nib dy-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Canertinib dihydrochloride blocks the action of proteins called epidermal growth factor receptors, and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called CI-1033.
cannabinoid listen (kuh-NA-bih-noyd)
A type of chemical in marijuana that causes drug-like effects all through the body, including the central nervous system and the immune system. The main active cannabinoid in marijuana is delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC). Cannabinoids may help treat the symptoms of cancer or the side effects of cancer treatment.
Cannabis listen (KA-nuh-bis)
The dried leaves and flowering tops of the Cannabis sativa or Cannabis indica plant. Cannabis contains active chemicals called cannabinoids that cause drug-like effects all through the body, including the central nervous system and the immune system. Cannabis may help treat the symptoms of cancer or the side effects of cancer treatment, such as nausea and vomiting, pain, and cachexia (loss of body weight and muscle mass). Also called marijuana.
Cantron listen (KAN-tron)
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in Cantron have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. Cantron is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, JS–114, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
CAP-1
A small piece of a tumor marker called carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). CEA may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer, other types of cancer or diseases, or who smoke tobacco. CAP-1 is used to make a vaccine that may help stimulate the body’s immune system to kill cancer cells. Also called carcinoembryonic antigen peptide-1 and CEA peptide-1.
capecitabine listen (ka-peh-SY-tuh-been)
A drug used to treat stage III colorectal cancer that was removed by surgery and colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Capecitabine is taken up by cancer cells and breaks down into 5-fluorouracil, a substance that kills cancer cells. Capecitabine is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Xeloda.
capillary listen (KA-pih-layr-ee)
The smallest type of blood vessel. A capillary connects an arteriole (small artery) to a venule (small vein) to form a network of blood vessels in almost all parts of the body. The wall of a capillary is thin and leaky, and capillaries are involved in the exchange of fluids and gases between tissues and the blood.
capillary leak syndrome listen (KA-pih-layr-ee leek SIN-drome)
A condition in which fluid and proteins leak out of tiny blood vessels and flow into surrounding tissues, resulting in dangerously low blood pressure. Capillary leak syndrome may lead to multiple organ failure and shock.
CAPIRI listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called CAPIRI regimen, XELIRI, and XELIRI regimen.
CAPIRI regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called CAPIRI, XELIRI, and XELIRI regimen.
caplacizumab listen (KAP-luh-SIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used with plasma exchange and immunosuppressive therapy to treat acquired thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura (aTTP). aTTP is a rare blood disorder in which blood clots form in small blood vessels throughout the body. Caplacizumab binds to a protein called VWF, which may help keep blood clots from forming. It is a type of nanobody (a tiny antibody). Also called Cablivi.
CAPOX listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs capecitabine and oxaliplatin. Also called CAPOX regimen.
CAPOX regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs capecitabine and oxaliplatin. Also called CAPOX.
Caprelsa listen (ka-PREL-suh)
A drug used to treat medullary thyroid cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Caprelsa prevents the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It also blocks enzymes needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. Caprelsa is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called vandetanib and ZD6474.
capromab pendetide listen (KAP-roh-mab PEN-deh-tide)
A substance used to detect prostate cancer. It contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to prostate cells, linked to a substance that can bind radioisotopes. Capromab pendetide is combined with indium 111 and injected into the body. A gamma camera (a special camera that detects radioactivity) is used to find prostate cancer cells in the body. Capromab pendetide is a type of immunoconjugate. Also called ProstaScint.
capsaicin listen (kap-SAY-ih-sin)
A component of certain plants, including cayenne and red pepper, used topically for peripheral nerve pain. It is also being studied for controlling mucositis pain after chemotherapy and radiation therapy.
capsule listen (KAP-sul)
In medicine, a sac of tissue and blood vessels that surrounds an organ, joint, or tumor. A capsule is also a form used for medicine that is taken by mouth. It usually has a shell made of gelatin with the medicine inside.
capsule endoscope listen (KAP-sul EN-doh-SKOPE)
A device used to look at the inside of the intestines and other parts of the digestive tract. It is a capsule that is about the size of a large pill, with a lens, a light, a camera, a radio transmitter, and a battery inside. The patient swallows the capsule and it takes pictures as it travels through the digestive tract. The pictures are sent to a small recorder that is worn on the patient’s waist or shoulder. The pictures are then viewed on a computer by the doctor to check for signs of disease. The capsule endoscope passes out of the body during a bowel movement. Also called wireless capsule endoscope.
capsule endoscopy listen (KAP-sul en-DOS-koh-pee)
A procedure used to look at the inside of the intestines and other parts of the digestive tract. The patient swallows a capsule about the size of a large pill. The capsule contains a tiny wireless camera that travels through the digestive tract. It takes pictures of the inside of the digestive tract and sends them to a small recorder that is worn on the patient’s waist or shoulder. The pictures are then viewed on a computer by the doctor to check for signs of disease. The capsule passes out of the body during a bowel movement.
captopril listen (KAP-toh-pril)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure that is also being studied in the prevention of side effects caused by radiation therapy used in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called ACE inhibitors.
CAR
A special receptor created in the laboratory that is designed to bind to certain proteins on cancer cells. The CAR is then added to immune cells called T cells. This helps the T cells find and kill cancer cells that have the specific protein that the receptor is designed to bind. These changed T cells called CAR T cells are then grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to cancer patients. CAR T cells are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Also called chimeric antigen receptor.
CAR T-cell therapy listen (kar T-sel THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment in which a patient's T cells (a type of immune system cell) are changed in the laboratory so they will attack cancer cells. T cells are taken from a patient’s blood. Then the gene for a special receptor that binds to a certain protein on the patient’s cancer cells is added in the laboratory. The special receptor is called a chimeric antigen receptor (CAR). Large numbers of the CAR T cells are grown in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. CAR T-cell therapy is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Also called chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy.
Carac listen (KAYR-ak)
A drug used as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). Carac stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It contains the active ingredient fluorouracil. Carac is a type of antimetabolite.
carbamide listen (KAR-buh-MIDE)
A substance formed by the breakdown of protein in the liver. The kidneys filter carbamide out of the blood and into the urine. Carbamide can also be made in the laboratory. A topical form of carbamide is being studied in the treatment of hand-foot syndrome (pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet that may occur as a side effect of certain anticancer drugs). Also called urea.
carbendazim listen (kar-BEN-duh-zim)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antifungal agents.
carbogen listen (KAR-boh-jen)
An inhaled form of oxygen and carbon dioxide that has more oxygen than air has. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. It may increase the amount of oxygen in cancer cells, which may make them easier to kill with radiation therapy. Carbogen is a type of radiosensitizing agent.
carbohydrate listen (KAR-boh-HY-drayt)
A sugar molecule. Carbohydrates can be small and simple (for example, glucose) or they can be large and complex (for example, polysaccharides such as starch, chitin or cellulose).
carbolic acid listen (kar-BAH-lik A-sid)
A very poisonous chemical substance made from tar and also found in some plants and essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants). Carbolic acid is used to make plastics, nylon, epoxy, medicines, and to kill germs. Also called phenol.
carbon C 11-acetate listen (KAR-bun ... A-seh-tayt)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging. Carbon C 11-acetate gets taken up by cells in the body, and a PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken it up. Since more carbon C 11-acetate is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells, it can be used to help find cancer in the body and diagnose disease. Also called 11C-acetate.
carbon C 11-choline listen (KAR-bun ... KOH-leen)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. Carbon C 11-choline gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up carbon C 11-choline. Also called 11C-choline.
carbon C 11-choline PET-CT scan listen (KAR-bun … KOH-leen … skan)
A procedure in which a small amount of carbon C 11-choline (a radioactive form of the vitamin choline) is injected into a vein. A scanner and a computer are used to make detailed pictures of areas inside the body where the carbon C 11-choline collects. Cancer cells take up more carbon C 11-choline than normal cells, so the pictures can be used to find cancer cells in the body. Also called 11C-choline PET-CT scan.
carbon dioxide listen (KAR-bun dy-OK-side)
A colorless, odorless gas. It is a waste product made by the body. Carbon dioxide travels in the blood from the body’s tissues to the lungs. Breathing out clears carbon dioxide from the lungs.
carbon monoxide listen (KAR-bun muh-NOK-side)
A poisonous gas that has no color or odor. It is given off by burning fuel (as in exhaust from cars or household heaters) and tobacco products. Carbon monoxide prevents red blood cells from carrying enough oxygen for cells and tissues to live.
carboplatin listen (KAR-boh-pla-tin)
A drug used to treat advanced ovarian cancer that has never been treated or has come back after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Carboplatin is a form of the anticancer drug cisplatin and causes fewer side effects. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of platinum compound.
carboplatin-paclitaxel-bevacizumab regimen listen (KAR-boh-pla-tin-PA-klih-TAK-sil-beh-vuh-SIH-zoo-mab REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced, nonsquamous non-small cell lung cancer. It includes the drugs carboplatin, paclitaxel (Taxol), and bevacizumab. Also called carboplatin-Taxol-bevacizumab regimen.
carboplatin-Taxol listen (KAR-boh-pla-tin-TAK-sol)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat endometrial, ovarian, and head and neck cancers, and non-small cell lung cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin and paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called Carbo-Tax regimen, carboplatin-Taxol regimen, and PC regimen.
carboplatin-Taxol regimen listen (KAR-boh-pla-tin-TAK-sol REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat endometrial, ovarian, and head and neck cancers, and non-small cell lung cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin and paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called Carbo-Tax regimen, carboplatin-Taxol, and PC regimen.
carboplatin-Taxol-bevacizumab regimen listen (KAR-boh-pla-tin-TAK-sol-beh-vuh-SIH-zoo-mab REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced, nonsquamous non-small cell lung cancer. It includes the drugs carboplatin, paclitaxel (Taxol), and bevacizumab. Also called carboplatin-paclitaxel-bevacizumab regimen.
Carbo-Tax regimen listen (KAR-boh-tax REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat endometrial, ovarian, and head and neck cancers, and non-small cell lung cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin and paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called carboplatin-Taxol, carboplatin-Taxol regimen, and PC regimen.
carboxyamidotriazole listen (kar-BOK-see-uh-MEE-doh-TRY-uh-zole)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors.
carboxypeptidase-G2 listen (kar-BOK-see-PEP-tih-days …)
A drug used to treat toxic levels of methotrexate (an anticancer drug) in the blood of patients with kidney problems. It is a bacterial enzyme that breaks down proteins and other substances, such as methotrexate. Carboxypeptidase-G2 may also help certain drugs kill cancer cells. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of prodrug activator. Also called glucarpidase and Voraxaze.
carcinoembryonic antigen listen (KAR-sih-noh-EM-bree-AH-nik AN-tih-jen)
A substance that may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer, other types of cancer or diseases, or who smoke tobacco. Carcinoembryonic antigen levels may help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called CEA.
carcinoembryonic antigen assay listen (KAR-sih-noh-EM-bree-AH-nik AN-tih-jen A-say)
A laboratory test that measures the level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the blood. An increased amount of CEA may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer or other types of cancer, certain other diseases, or who smoke. The amount of CEA in the blood may also help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. CEA is a type of tumor marker. Also called CEA assay.
carcinoembryonic antigen peptide-1 listen (KAR-sih-noh-EM-bree-AH-nik AN-tih-jen PEP-tide-1)
A small piece of a tumor marker called carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). CEA may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer, other types of cancer or diseases, or who smoke tobacco. Carcinoembryonic antigen peptide-1 is used to make a vaccine that may help stimulate the body’s immune system to kill cancer cells. Also called CAP-1 and CEA peptide-1.
carcinogen listen (kar-SIH-noh-jin)
Any substance that causes cancer.
carcinogenesis listen (KAR-sih-noh-JEH-neh-sis)
The process by which normal cells are transformed into cancer cells.
carcinoid syndrome listen (KAR-sih-noyd SIN-drome)
A combination of symptoms caused by the release of serotonin and other substances from carcinoid tumors of the gastrointestinal tract. Symptoms may include flushing of the face, flat angiomas (small collections of dilated blood vessels) of the skin, diarrhea, bronchial spasms, rapid pulse, and sudden drops in blood pressure.
carcinoid tumor listen (KAR-sih-noyd TOO-mer)
A slow-growing type of tumor usually found in the gastrointestinal system (most often in the small intestine and rectum), and sometimes in the lungs or other sites. Carcinoid tumors may spread to the liver or other sites in the body, and they may secrete substances such as serotonin or prostaglandins, causing carcinoid syndrome.
carcinoma listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in the skin or in tissues that line or cover internal organs.
carcinoma in situ listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A group of abnormal cells that remain in the place where they first formed. They have not spread. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called stage 0 disease.
carcinoma of unknown primary listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh ... UN-none PRY-mayr-ee)
A case in which cancer cells are found in the body, but the place where the cells first started growing (the origin or primary site) cannot be determined. Also called cancer of unknown primary origin and CUP.
carcinomatosis listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A condition in which cancer is spread widely throughout the body, or, in some cases, to a relatively large region of the body. Also called carcinosis.
carcinomatous lymphangitis listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh-tus LIM-fan-JY-tis)
A condition in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor and invade lymph vessels (thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells through the body’s lymph system). The invaded lymph vessels then fill up with cancer cells and become blocked. Although carcinomatous lymphangitis can occur anywhere in the body, it commonly happens in the lungs. It can happen in many types of cancer but is most common in breast, lung, colon, stomach, pancreatic, and prostate cancer. Also called lymphangitic carcinomatosis.
carcinomatous meningitis listen (KAR-sih-NOH-muh-tus MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal carcinomatosis, meningeal metastasis, and neoplastic meningitis.
carcinosarcoma listen (KAR-sih-noh-sar-KOH-muh)
A malignant tumor that is a mixture of carcinoma (cancer of epithelial tissue, which is skin and tissue that lines or covers the internal organs) and sarcoma (cancer of connective tissue, such as bone, cartilage, and fat).
carcinosis listen (KAR-sih-noh-sis)
A condition in which cancer is spread widely throughout the body, or, in some cases, to a relatively large region of the body. Also called carcinomatosis.
carcinostatic listen (KAR-sih-noh-STAT-ik)
Pertaining to slowing or stopping the growth of cancer.
cardia listen (KAR-dee-uh)
The part of the stomach that is closest to the esophagus. Food and liquids pass through the cardia to enter the stomach from the esophagus. A valve near the cardia helps keep stomach contents from backing up into the esophagus.
cardiac listen (KAR-dee-ak)
Having to do with the heart.
cardiac pacemaker listen (KAR-dee-ak PAYS-may-ker)
An electronic device that is implanted in the body to monitor heart rate and rhythm. It gives the heart electrical stimulation when it does not beat normally. It runs on batteries and has long, thin wires that connect it to the heart. Also called artificial pacemaker and pacemaker.
cardiac sarcoma listen (KAR-dee-ak sar-KOH-muh)
A rare cancer that develops in tissues of the heart. Also called heart cancer.
cardin listen (KAR-din)
A plant whose leaves, stems, and flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Cardin may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Cnicus benedictus. Also called blessed thistle, holy thistle, spotted thistle, and St. Benedict's thistle.
cardiologist listen (KAR-dee-AH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training to diagnose and treat diseases of the heart and blood vessels.
cardiology listen (KAR-dee-AH-loh-jee)
A branch of medicine that specializes in diagnosing and treating diseases of the heart, blood vessels, and circulatory system. These diseases include coronary artery disease, heart rhythm problems, and heart failure.
cardiopulmonary listen (KAR-dee-oh-PUL-muh-NAYR-ee)
Having to do with the heart and lungs.
cardiopulmonary resuscitation listen (KAR-dee-oh-PUL-muh-NAYR-ee ree-SUH-sih-TAY-shun)
An emergency procedure used to restart a person’s heartbeat and breathing after one or both have stopped. It involves giving strong, rapid pushes to the chest to keep blood moving through the body. Usually, it also involves blowing air into the person’s mouth to help with breathing and send oxygen to the lungs. Also called CPR.
cardiotoxicity listen (KAR-dee-oh-tok-SIH-sih-tee)
Toxicity that affects the heart.
cardiovascular listen (KAR-dee-oh-VAS-kyoo-ler)
Having to do with the heart and blood vessels.
cardiovascular disease listen (KAR-dee-oh-VAS-kyoo-ler dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disease that affects the heart or blood vessels. The risk of certain cardiovascular diseases may be increased by smoking, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, unhealthy diet, lack of exercise, and obesity. The most common cardiovascular disease is coronary artery disease (narrow or blocked coronary arteries), which can lead to chest pain, heart attacks, or stroke. Other cardiovascular diseases include congestive heart failure, heart rhythm problems, congenital heart disease (heart disease at birth), and endocarditis (inflamed inner layer of the heart). Also called heart disease.
Cardura listen (kar-DOO-ruh)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. It relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate. Cardura is a type of alpha blocker. Also called doxazosin mesylate.
caregiver listen (KAYR-gih-ver)
A person who gives care to people who need help taking care of themselves. Examples include children, the elderly, or patients who have chronic illnesses or are disabled. Caregivers may be health professionals, family members, friends, social workers, or members of the clergy. They may give care at home or in a hospital or other health care setting.
carfilzomib listen (kar-FIL-zoh-mib)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat multiple myeloma that has gotten worse or came back after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Carfilzomib blocks the action of enzymes called proteasomes, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor. Also called Kyprolis.
carina of trachea listen (kuh-RY-nuh ... TRAY-kee-uh)
A ridge at the base of the trachea (windpipe) that separates the openings of the right and left main bronchi (the large air passages that lead from the trachea to the lungs). Also called tracheal carina.
carmustine listen (kar-MUS-teen)
A drug used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is also used with prednisone to treat multiple myeloma and with other drugs to treat Hodgkin lymphoma and non-Hodgkin lymphoma that have not gotten better with other treatment or have come back. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Carmustine damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea. Also called BCNU and BiCNU.
carmustine implant listen (kar-MUS-teen IM-plant)
A drug used with surgery and radiation therapy to treat malignant glioma that is high grade and has not already been treated. It is also used with surgery to treat glioblastoma multiforme that has recurred (come back). Carmustine implant is a form of carmustine contained in a wafer. The wafer has a coating that dissolves slowly and releases carmustine directly into the area where the brain tumor was removed. This form may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of carmustine. Carmustine implant is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Gliadel Wafer and polifeprosan 20 carmustine implant.
Carney complex listen (KAR-nee KOM-plex)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by dark spots on the skin and tumors in the heart, endocrine glands, skin, and nerves. There are two types of Carney complex, which are caused by mutations (changes) in different genes. Also called Carney syndrome.
Carney dyad listen (KAR-nee DY-ad)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by tumors of the gastrointestinal tract and tumors that form in embryonic nervous tissue in the head, neck, and torso. Also called Carney-Stratakis dyad and Carney-Stratakis syndrome.
Carney syndrome listen (KAR-nee SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by dark spots on the skin and tumors in the heart, endocrine glands, skin, and nerves. There are two types of Carney syndrome, which are caused by mutations (changes) in different genes. Also called Carney complex.
Carney triad listen (KAR-nee TRY-ad)
A very rare disorder marked by tumors of the gastrointestinal tract (usually the stomach), tumors that form in embryonic nervous tissue in the head, neck, and torso, and tumors that form in cartilage in the lungs. Sometimes tumors also form in the adrenal glands and esophagus. Carney triad is most common in young females.
Carney-Stratakis dyad listen (KAR-nee-STRA-tuh-kis DY-ad)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by tumors of the gastrointestinal tract and tumors that form in embryonic nervous tissue in the head, neck, and torso. Also called Carney dyad and Carney-Stratakis syndrome.
Carney-Stratakis syndrome listen (KAR-nee-STRA-tuh-kis SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by tumors of the gastrointestinal tract and tumors that form in embryonic nervous tissue in the head, neck, and torso. Also called Carney dyad and Carney-Stratakis dyad.
carnitine listen (KAR-nih-teen)
A substance made in the muscle and liver tissue and found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. It is used by many cells in the body to make energy from fatty acids.
Carnitor listen (KAR-nih-tor)
A form of carnitine, which is a substance made in muscle and liver tissue and found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. Carnitor is also a drug that is used to treat patients who do not make enough carnitine and is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is a type of dietary supplement. Also called L-carnitine and levocarnitine.
carotenoid listen (kuh-RAH-teh-noyd)
A yellow, red, or orange substance found mostly in plants, including carrots, sweet potatoes, dark green leafy vegetables, and many fruits, grains, and oils. Some carotenoids are changed into vitamin A in the body and some are being studied in the prevention of cancer. A carotenoid is a type of antioxidant and a type of provitamin.
carotid artery listen (kuh-RAH-tid AR-tuh-ree)
A major artery that carries blood from the heart to the head. There is a carotid artery on each side of the neck, and each one splits into two branches. The interior branch carries blood to the brain and eyes, and the exterior branch carries blood to the face, tongue, and outside parts of the head.
carrier oil listen (KAYR-ee-er oyl)
An oil with little or no scent that is used to dilute or “carry” essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants).
cART
Treatment that uses a combination of three or more drugs to treat HIV infection. cART stops the virus from making copies of itself in the body. This may lessen the damage to the immune system caused by HIV and may slow down the development of AIDS. It may also help prevent transmission of HIV to others, including from mother to child during birth. Also called combination antiretroviral therapy, HAART, and highly active antiretroviral therapy.
cartilage listen (KAR-tih-lij)
A tough, flexible tissue that lines joints and gives structure to the nose, ears, larynx, and other parts of the body.
carvedilol phosphate listen (KAR-vuh-DIH-lol FOS-fayt)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and certain heart problems. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of side effects caused by some anticancer drugs. Carvedilol phosphate blocks certain receptors on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to dilate (widen). It is a type of antihypertensive agent and a type of antianginal agent. Also called Coreg.
carzelesin listen (kar-ZEH-leh-sin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
case management nurse listen (... MA-nij-ment ...)
A registered nurse who has special training in how to plan, manage, and evaluate all aspects of patient care, especially for patients who get treatment over a long time. Also called nurse case manager.
case report listen (kays reh-PORT)
A detailed report of the diagnosis, treatment, and follow-up of an individual patient. Case reports also contain some demographic information about the patient (for example, age, gender, ethnic origin).
case series listen (kays SEER-eez)
A group or series of case reports involving patients who were given similar treatment. Reports of case series usually contain detailed information about the individual patients. This includes demographic information (for example, age, gender, ethnic origin) and information on diagnosis, treatment, response to treatment, and follow-up after treatment.
case-control study listen (kays-kun-TROLE STUH-dee)
A study that compares two groups of people: those with the disease or condition under study (cases) and a very similar group of people who do not have the disease or condition (controls). Researchers study the medical and lifestyle histories of the people in each group to learn what factors may be associated with the disease or condition. For example, one group may have been exposed to a particular substance that the other was not. Also called retrospective study.
Casodex listen (KA-soh-dex)
A drug used with another drug to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. Casodex binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Casodex blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called bicalutamide.
caspofungin acetate listen (KAS-poh-fun-jin A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to prevent or treat infections caused by a fungus (a type of microorganism). It belongs to the family of drugs called antifungal agents.
Castleman disease listen (KA-sel-man dih-ZEEZ)
A rare disorder in which benign (not cancer) growths form in lymph node tissue. There are two main ways that Castleman disease occurs: localized (unicentric) and multicentric. Unicentric Castleman disease affects only one group of lymph nodes in one part of the body, usually in the chest or abdomen. It may not cause symptoms. Multicentric Castleman disease affects many groups of lymph nodes and lymphoid tissue all through the body. It can weaken the immune system and cause problems such as infection, fever, weight loss, fatigue, night sweats, nerve damage, and anemia. People with Castleman disease have an increased risk of lymphoma. Also called angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia and giant lymph node hyperplasia.
castrate-resistant prostate cancer listen (KAS-trayt-reh-ZIH-stunt PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Prostate cancer that keeps growing even when the amount of testosterone in the body is reduced to very low levels. Many early-stage prostate cancers need normal levels of testosterone to grow, but castrate-resistant prostate cancers do not. Also called CRPC.
castration listen (kas-TRAY-shun)
Removal or destruction of the testicles or ovaries using radiation, surgery, or drugs. Medical castration refers to the use of drugs to suppress the function of the ovaries or testicles.
CAT scan listen (… skan)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are used to create 3-dimensional (3-D) views of tissues and organs. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the tissues and organs show up more clearly. A CAT scan may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called computed tomography scan, computerized axial tomography scan, computerized tomography, and CT scan.
CAT-8015
A drug used to treat hairy cell leukemia that came back or did not get better with at least two other systemic therapies, including treatment with a purine nucleoside analog (a type of anticancer drug). CAT-8015 contains a monoclonal antibody called moxetumomab that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also contains a bacterial toxin called PE38, which may help kill cancer cells. CAT-8015 is a type of immunotoxin. Also called anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015, Lumoxiti, and moxetumomab pasudotox.
Catapres listen (KA-tuh-pres)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure. It is also being studied in the treatment of certain types of cancer pain and as an aid to stop smoking. It blocks the release of chemicals from nerve endings that make blood vessels constrict (get narrower). Catapres is a type of antihypertensive agent and a type of alpha-adrenergic agonist. Also called clonidine hydrochloride.
cataract listen (KA-tuh-RAKT)
A condition in which the lens of the eye becomes cloudy. Symptoms include blurred, cloudy, or double vision; sensitivity to light; and difficulty seeing at night. Without treatment, cataracts can cause blindness. There are many different types and causes of cataracts. They may occur in people of all ages, but are most common in the elderly.
catechin listen (KA-teh-kin)
A substance found in tea that helps protect cells from damage caused by free radicals. Free radicals are unstable molecules that are made during normal cell metabolism (chemical changes that take place in a cell). They can build up in cells and cause damage to other molecules. This damage may increase the risk of cancer and other diseases. Catechins are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer. A catechin is a type of antioxidant.
catechol listen (ka-teh-KOL)
A chemical originally isolated from a type of mimosa tree. Catechol is used as an astringent, an antiseptic, and in photography, electroplating, and making other chemicals. It can also be made in the laboratory.
catecholamine listen (ka-teh-KOH-luh-meen)
A type of neurohormone (a chemical that is made by nerve cells and used to send signals to other cells). Catecholamines are important in stress responses. High levels cause high blood pressure which can lead to headaches, sweating, pounding of the heart, pain in the chest, and anxiety. Examples of catecholamines include dopamine, epinephrine (adrenaline), and norepinephrine (noradrenaline).
catheter listen (KA-theh-ter)
A flexible tube used to deliver fluids into or withdraw fluids from the body.
cause-specific survival listen (kawz-speh-SIH-fik ser-VY-vul)
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, to the date of death from the disease. Patients who die from causes unrelated to the disease are not counted in this measurement. In a clinical trial, measuring the cause-specific survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called CSS.
cauterize listen (KAW-teh-RIZE)
To destroy tissue using a hot or cold instrument, an electrical current, or a chemical that burns or dissolves the tissue. This process may be used to kill certain types of small tumors or to seal off blood vessels to stop bleeding.
cavity listen (KA-vih-tee)
A hollow area or hole. It may describe a body cavity (such as the space within the abdomen) or a hole in a tooth caused by decay.
CBC
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood. The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A CBC is used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions. Also called blood cell count, complete blood count, and full blood count.
CBC with differential listen (… dih-feh-REN-shul)
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood, including the different types of white blood cells (neutrophils, lymphocytes, monocytes, basophils, and eosinophils). The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A CBC with differential is used to help diagnose and monitor many different conditions, including anemia and infection. Also called blood cell count with differential.
CBE
A physical exam of the breast performed by a health care provider to check for lumps or other changes. Also called clinical breast exam.
CBT
A type of psychotherapy that helps patients change their behavior by changing the way they think and feel about certain things. It is used to treat mental, emotional, personality, and behavioral disorders. Also called cognitive behavior therapy and cognitive therapy.
CBT-1
A substance taken from plants that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may help drugs kill tumor cells that have become resistant to drugs. It is a type of multidrug resistance inhibitor and a type of P-glycoprotein antagonist. Also called MDR modulator CBT-1.
cc listen
A measure of volume in the metric system. One thousand ccs equal one liter. Also called cubic centimeter, milliliter, and mL.
CC-1088
A drug that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is similar but not identical to thalidomide. CC-1088 belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors.
CC-4047
A drug that is a form of thalidomide, and is used to treat multiple myeloma that has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. CC-4047 may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of immunomodulating agent and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called pomalidomide and Pomalyst.
CC-49
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
CC49-streptavidin listen (… strep-TA-vih-din)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by combining the monoclonal antibody CC49 with a chemical called streptavidin. It can find tumor cells that have the protein TAG-72 on their surface, including colon, prostate, breast, and ovary cancer cells. After CC49-streptavidin binds to cancer cells, a radioactive compound called yttrium Y 90 DOTA-biotin will find those cells and kill them.
CC-5013
A drug that is similar to thalidomide, and is used with rituximab to treat follicular lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma in adults who have already received other treatment. It is also used alone or with dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma in adults. CC-5013 is also used in adults to treat anemia caused by certain types of myelodysplastic syndromes and to treat mantle cell lymphoma that came back or got worse after treatment that included bortezomib. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. CC-5013 may help the immune system kill abnormal blood cells or cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. CC-5013 is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of immunomodulating agent. Also called lenalidomide and Revlimid.
CC-8490
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of brain cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called benzopyrans.
CCI-779
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. CCI-779 blocks a protein involved in cell division, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of rapamycin analog and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Also called temsirolimus and Torisel.
cCLB8
A drug used to treat a rare condition called Castleman disease in patients who do not have HIV or human herpesvirus 8. It is also being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. CCLB8 binds to a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by some white blood cells and other cells in the body. CCLB8 may help reduce inflammation and stop the growth of cancer cells or abnormal blood cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody, CNTO 328, siltuximab, and Sylvant.
CCNU
A drug used to treat brain tumors that have already been treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma that has not gotten better with other types of treatment or has come back. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. CCNU damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Gleostine and lomustine.
CCSG
Funds awarded to certain U.S. institutions by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) for them to become cancer centers in the United States, based on scientific merit. The funds help the cancer centers improve the way they are run and develop new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. To receive the award, one goal of the cancer center must be to turn clinical and basic research into better health care. Also called P30 Cancer Center Support Grant.
CD117
A protein found on the surface of many different types of cells. It binds to a substance called stem cell factor (SCF), which causes certain types of blood cells to grow. CD117 may also be found in higher than normal amounts, or in a changed form, on some types of cancer cells, including gastrointestinal stromal tumors and melanoma. Measuring the amount of CD117 in tumor tissue may help diagnose cancer and plan treatment. CD117 is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase and a type of tumor marker. Also called c-kit and stem cell factor receptor.
CD134
A protein being studied in the treatment of cancer. Substances that attach to CD134 on the surface of T cells (a type of white blood cell) may help the T cells grow and kill more cancer cells. CD134 is a type of tumor necrosis factor (TNF) receptor. Also called OX-40.
CD20
A protein found on B cells (a type of white blood cell). It may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain types of B-cell lymphomas and leukemias. Measuring the amount of CD20 on blood cells may help to diagnose cancer or plan cancer treatment. CD20 is a type of tumor marker. Also called CD20 antigen.
CD20 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein found on B cells (a type of white blood cell). It may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain types of B-cell lymphomas and leukemias. Measuring the amount of CD20 antigen on blood cells may help to diagnose cancer or plan cancer treatment. CD20 antigen is a type of tumor marker. Also called CD20.
CD30 protein listen (… PROH-teen)
A protein found on some T cells and B cells (two types of white blood cells). It is a receptor for a protein called tumor necrosis factor, which is involved in cell growth and cell survival. The CD30 protein may be found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells, including lymphoma cells. Knowing how much CD30 protein is on a patient’s cancer cells may help diagnose cancer and plan treatment. The CD30 protein is a type of tumor necrosis factor receptor and a type of tumor marker.
CD34 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein found on the surface of some bone marrow and blood cells.
CD40-ligand listen (... LIH-gund)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to certain immune cells and may suppress cancer growth.
CD4-positive T lymphocyte listen (… PAH-zih-tiv … LIM-foh-site)
A type of immune cell that stimulates killer T cells, macrophages, and B cells to make immune responses. A CD4-positive T lymphocyte is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called helper T cell.
CD80
A protein found on the surface of some immune system cells, including B cells and monocytes. Cells with CD80 on their surface cause T cells to make substances that help control immune responses. Also called B7-1.
CDC
A U.S. federal government agency whose mission is to protect public health by preventing and controlling disease, injury, and disability. The CDC promotes healthy behaviors and safe, healthy environments. It keeps track of health trends, tries to find the cause of health problems and outbreaks of disease, and responds to new public health threats. The CDC works with state health departments and other organizations throughout the country and the world to help prevent and control disease. The CDC is part of the U.S. Public Health Service of the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS). Also called Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
CDDO
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. CDDO may block enzymes involved in inflammation and cancer growth. It is a type of antineoplastic plant product.
CDK inhibitor AT7519M listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. CDK inhibitor AT7519M blocks enzymes needed for cells to divide. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called AT7519M.
CDK inhibitor SCH 727965 listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced melanoma (a type of skin cancer) and other types of cancer. It blocks cell division and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called dinaciclib.
CEA
A substance that may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer, other types of cancer or diseases, or who smoke tobacco. CEA levels may help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called carcinoembryonic antigen.
CEA assay listen (... A-say)
A laboratory test that measures the level of carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) in the blood. An increased amount of CEA may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer or other types of cancer, certain other diseases, or who smoke. The amount of CEA in the blood may also help keep track of how well cancer treatments are working or if cancer has come back. CEA is a type of tumor marker. Also called carcinoembryonic antigen assay.
CEA peptide-1 listen (...PEP-tide-1)
A small piece of a tumor marker called carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA). CEA may be found in the blood of people who have colon cancer, other types of cancer or diseases, or who smoke tobacco. CEA peptide-1 is used to make a vaccine that may help stimulate the body’s immune system to kill cancer cells. Also called CAP-1 and carcinoembryonic antigen peptide-1.
cecum listen (SEE-kum)
A pouch that forms the first part of the large intestine. It connects the small intestine to the colon, which is part of the large intestine.
cedarwood listen (SEE-der-WOOD)
A type of evergreen tree with hard fragrant wood that is a member of the cypress family. The oil from the wood is used in soaps, shampoos, bath salts, perfumes, aromatherapy, and to keep insects away. The scientific name is Juniperus virginiana. Also called Eastern red cedar and red cedar.
cediranib maleate listen (seh-DEER-uh-nib MAY-lee-AYT)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Cediranib maleate may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called AZD2171 and Recentin.
cefepime listen (SEH-feh-peem)
A drug used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called cephalosporin antibiotics.
cefixime listen (seh-FIK-seem)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called cephalosporins.
ceftriaxone listen (SEF-try-AK-sone)
A drug used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called cephalosporin antibiotics.
celecoxib listen (SEH-luh-KOK-sib)
A drug that reduces pain. Celecoxib belongs to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory agents. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer.
Celexa listen (seh-LEK-suh)
A drug used to treat depression. It belongs to the families of drugs called antidepressant agents and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs). Also called citalopram.
celiac disease listen (SEE-lee-ak dih-ZEEZ)
A digestive disease that is caused by an immune response to a protein called gluten, which is found in wheat, rye, barley, and oats. Celiac disease damages the lining of the small intestine and interferes with the absorption of nutrients from food. A person with celiac disease may become malnourished no matter how much food is consumed.
cell listen (sel)
In biology, the smallest unit that can live on its own and that makes up all living organisms and the tissues of the body. A cell has three main parts: the cell membrane, the nucleus, and the cytoplasm. The cell membrane surrounds the cell and controls the substances that go into and out of the cell. The nucleus is a structure inside the cell that contains the nucleolus and most of the cell’s DNA. It is also where most RNA is made. The cytoplasm is the fluid inside the cell. It contains other tiny cell parts that have specific functions, including the Golgi complex, the mitochondria, and the endoplasmic reticulum. The cytoplasm is where most chemical reactions take place and most proteins get made. The human body has more than 30 trillion cells.
cell culture listen (sel KUL-cher)
The growth of microorganisms such as bacteria and yeast, or human, plant, or animal cells in the laboratory. Cell cultures may be used to diagnose infections, to test new drugs, and in research.
cell cycle listen (sel SY-kul)
The process a cell goes through each time it divides. The cell cycle consists of a series of steps during which the chromosomes and other cell material double to make two copies. The cell then divides into two daughter cells, each receiving one copy of the doubled material. The cell cycle is complete when each daughter cell is surrounded by its own outer membrane. Also called mitotic cycle.
cell cycle inhibitor listen (sel SY-kul in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance used to block the cell division cycle, which is a series of steps a cell goes through each time it divides. There are many different types of cell cycle inhibitors. Some only work at specific steps in the cell cycle. Others work at any point in the cell cycle. Certain drugs that inhibit the cell cycle are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
cell differentiation listen (sel DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-shun)
The process during which young, immature (unspecialized) cells take on individual characteristics and reach their mature (specialized) form and function.
cell motility listen (sel moh-TIH-lih-tee)
The ability of a cell to move.
cell proliferation listen (sel proh-LIH-feh-RAY-shun)
An increase in the number of cells as a result of cell growth and cell division.
cell respiration listen (sel RES-pih-RAY-shun)
A chemical process in which oxygen is used to make energy from carbohydrates (sugars). Also called aerobic metabolism, aerobic respiration, and oxidative metabolism.
cell type listen (sel tipe)
Describes the kinds of cells found in normal or cancer tissue. The cell type is usually identified by looking under a microscope. Some examples of cell types are lymphocytes, melanocytes, and squamous cells. In cancer, it is important to know the cell type in order to diagnose the cancer, plan treatment, and determine prognosis.
cell-cell signaling listen (sel-sel SIG-nuh-ling)
The transfer of information from one cell to another. Cells signal each other by direct contact with each other or by the release of a substance from one cell that is taken up by another cell. Cell-cell signaling is important for cells to grow and work normally. Cells that lose the ability to respond to signals from other cells may become cancer cells. Also called cell-to-cell signaling and intercellular communication.
CellCept listen (SEL-sept)
A drug used to prevent graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) after organ transplants. It is also being studied in the prevention of GVHD after stem cell transplants for cancer, and in the treatment of some autoimmune disorders. CellCept is a type of immunosuppressive agent. Also called mycophenolate mofetil.
cell-cycle regulation listen (sel-SY-kul REH-gyoo-LAY-shun)
Any process that controls the series of events by which a cell goes through the cell cycle. During the cell cycle, a cell makes a copy of its DNA and other contents, and divides in two. When cell cycle regulation doesn’t happen correctly, cells may divide in an uncontrolled way, and diseases such as cancer can occur.
cell-to-cell signaling listen (sel-too-sel SIG-nuh-ling)
The transfer of information from one cell to another. Cells signal each other by direct contact with each other or by the release of a substance from one cell that is taken up by another cell. Cell-to-cell signaling is important for cells to grow and work normally. Cells that lose the ability to respond to signals from other cells may become cancer cells. Also called cell-cell signaling and intercellular communication.
cellular adhesion listen (SEL-yoo-ler ad-HEE-zhun)
The close adherence (bonding) to adjoining cell surfaces.
cellular adoptive immunotherapy listen (SEL-yoo-ler uh-DOP-tiv IH-myoo-noh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of immunotherapy in which T cells (a type of immune cell) are given to a patient to help the body fight diseases, such as cancer. In cancer therapy, T cells are usually taken from the patient's own blood or tumor tissue, grown in large numbers in the laboratory, and then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight the cancer. Sometimes, the T cells are changed in the laboratory to make them better able to target the patient's cancer cells and kill them. Types of cellular adoptive immunotherapy include chimeric antigen receptor T-cell (CAR T-cell) therapy and tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte (TIL) therapy. Cellular adoptive immunotherapy that uses T cells from a donor is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and some infections. Also called adoptive cell therapy, adoptive cell transfer, and T-cell transfer therapy.
cellular metabolism listen (SEL-yoo-ler meh-TA-buh-lih-zum)
The sum of all chemical changes that take place in a cell through which energy and basic components are provided for essential processes, including the synthesis of new molecules and the breakdown and removal of others.
cellulitis listen (sel-yoo-LY-tis)
An acute, spreading infection of the deep tissues of the skin and muscle that causes the skin to become warm and tender and may also cause fever, chills, swollen lymph nodes, and blisters.
cellulose listen (SEL-yoo-lose)
A building block of plant cells and fiber. Cellulose cannot be digested by people, and is used to add bulk to the diet.
CEM
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It includes the drugs carboplatin, etoposide, and melphalan. Also called CEM regimen.
CEM regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It includes the drugs carboplatin, etoposide, and melphalan. Also called CEM.
cemiplimab listen (seh-MIP-lih-mab)
A drug used to treat cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be cured by radiation therapy or surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cemiplimab binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Cemiplimab may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Libtayo.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention listen (SEN-terz … dih-ZEEZ kun-TROLE … pree-VEN-shun)
A U.S. federal government agency whose mission is to protect public health by preventing and controlling disease, injury, and disability. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention promotes healthy behaviors and safe, healthy environments. It keeps track of health trends, tries to find the cause of health problems and outbreaks of disease, and responds to new public health threats. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention works with state health departments and other organizations throughout the country and the world to help prevent and control disease. The Centers for Disease Control and Prevention is part of the U.S. Public Health Service of the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS). Also called CDC.
centimeter listen (SEN-tih-MEE-ter)
A measure of length in the metric system. There are 100 centimeters in a meter and 2½ centimeters in an inch.
central nervous system listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem)
The brain and spinal cord. Also called CNS.
central nervous system depressant listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem dee-PREH-sunt)
A type of drug that slows down brain activity, which causes the muscles to relax and calms and soothes a person. Central nervous system depressants are used to treat insomnia (trouble sleeping), anxiety, panic attacks, and seizures. They may also be used to relieve anxiety and tension before surgery. Examples of central nervous system depressants are benzodiazepines, barbiturates, and certain sleep medicines. Central nervous system depressants are sometimes called sedatives or tranquilizers. Also called CNS depressant.
central nervous system metastasis listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the central nervous system (CNS). Also called CNS metastasis.
central nervous system primitive neuroectodermal tumor listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem PRIH-muh-tiv NOOR-oh-EK-toh-DER-mul TOO-mer)
A type of cancer that arises from a particular type of cell within the brain or spinal cord. Also called CNS PNET.
central nervous system prophylaxis listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem PROH-fih-LAK-sis)
A type of treatment that uses intrathecal chemotherapy (chemotherapy injected directly into the fluid-filled space between the thin layers of tissue that cover the brain and spinal cord) or high-dose chemotherapy injected into a vein to kill cancer cells in the central nervous system (CNS). Radiation therapy is also sometimes used. Central nervous system prophylaxis is given when the cancer is diagnosed because standard chemotherapy cannot get into the CNS and kill cancer cells that may be hiding in there. It is used to lessen the chance cancer will come back in the CNS after the first treatment. Central nervous system prophylaxis is used with other therapy to treat certain types of leukemia and lymphoma that may spread to the CNS. Also called CNS prophylaxis.
central nervous system stimulant listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tum STIM-yoo-lunt)
A type of drug that increases the levels of certain chemicals in the brain and increases alertness, attention, energy, and physical activity. Central nervous system stimulants also raise blood pressure and increase heart rate and breathing rate. They are used to treat depression, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (a disorder in which a person has problems paying attention, controlling actions, and remaining still or quiet), and narcolepsy (a sleep disorder). Also called CNS stimulant.
central nervous system tumor listen (SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem TOO-mer)
A tumor of the central nervous system, including brain stem glioma, craniopharyngioma, medulloblastoma, and meningioma. Also called CNS tumor.
central venous access catheter listen (SEN-trul VEE-nus AK-ses KA-theh-ter)
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. A thin, flexible tube is inserted into a vein, usually below the collarbone. It is guided (threaded) into a large vein above the right side of the heart called the superior vena cava. A needle is inserted into a port outside of the body to draw blood or give fluids. A central venous access catheter may stay in place for weeks or months and helps avoid the need for repeated needle sticks. There are several types of central venous access catheters.
CEP-2563 dihydrochloride listen (... dy-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. CEP-2563 dihydrochloride blocks certain proteins involved in the growth of some tumors and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
CEP-701
A drug being studied in the treatment of acute leukemias and some other types of cancer. It binds to a protein that is present on the surface of some types of cancer cells and stops them from dividing. CEP-701 is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of indolocarbazole alkaloid. Also called lestaurtinib.
cephalexin listen (seh-fuh-LEK-sin)
An antibiotic drug that belongs to the family of drugs called cephalosporins.
cephalosporin listen (SEH-fuh-loh-SPOR-in)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibiotics.
ceramide listen (SAYR-uh-mide)
A type of lipid (fat) found in the membranes of cells and the covers of nerves. Some ceramides are important in signal transduction (the process by which a cell responds to substances in its environment) and may cause some types of cells to die. Ceramides are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
c-erbB-2
A protein involved in normal cell growth. C-erbB-2 may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer cells, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Checking the amount of c-erbB-2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. Also called HER2, HER2/neu, human EGF receptor 2, and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2.
c-erbB-2 positive listen (… PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have too much of a protein called HER2 on their surface. In normal cells, HER2 helps to control cell growth. When it is made in larger than normal amounts by cancer cells, the cells may grow more quickly and be more likely to spread to other parts of the body. Checking to see if a cancer is c-erbB-2 positive may help plan treatment, which may include drugs that kill c-erbB-2 positive cancer cells. Cancers that may be c-erbB-2 positive include breast, bladder, pancreatic, ovarian, and stomach cancers. Also called HER2 positive and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive.
cerebellar hemangioblastoma listen (SAYR-eh-BEH-ler hee-MAN-jee-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A benign, slow-growing tumor in the cerebellum (part of the brain at the back of the head), made up of abnormal blood vessel growth. People with von Hippel-Landau disease have an increased risk of developing hemangioblastomas.
cerebellar mutism syndrome listen (SAYR-eh-BEH-ler MYOO-tih-zum SIN-drome)
A condition that may occur in patients who have had surgery to remove a tumor in certain parts of the brain, including the cerebellum. Cerebellar mutism syndrome usually appears 1 or 2 days after surgery. Symptoms include loss of speech, trouble swallowing and eating, loss of balance, trouble walking, loss of muscle tone, mood swings, and changes in personality. Many of these symptoms go away over time. Also called CMS.
cerebellopontine listen (SAYR-eh-BEH-loh-PON-teen)
Having to do with two structures of the brain, the cerebellum (located at the lower back of the brain) and the pons (located at the base of the brain in front of the cerebellum) and the area between them.
cerebellum listen (SAYR-eh-BEH-lum)
The portion of the brain in the back of the head between the cerebrum and the brain stem. The cerebellum controls balance for walking and standing, and other complex motor functions.
cerebral hemisphere listen (seh-REE-brul HEH-mis-feer)
One half of the cerebrum, the part of the brain that controls muscle functions and also controls speech, thought, emotions, reading, writing, and learning. The right hemisphere controls the muscles on the left side of the body, and the left hemisphere controls the muscles on the right side of the body.
cerebrospinal fluid listen (seh-REE-broh-SPY-nul FLOO-id)
The fluid that flows in and around the hollow spaces of the brain and spinal cord, and between two of the meninges (the thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). Cerebrospinal fluid is made by tissue called the choroid plexus in the ventricles (hollow spaces) in the brain. Also called CSF.
cerebrospinal fluid diversion listen (seh-REE-broh-SPY-nul FLOO-id dih-VER-zhun)
A process used to drain fluid that has built up around the brain and spinal cord. A shunt (a long, thin tube) is placed in a ventricle of the brain and threaded under the skin to another part of the body, usually the abdomen. The shunt carries excess fluid away from the brain so it may be absorbed elsewhere in the body.
cerebrovascular accident listen (seh-REE-broh-VAS-kyoo-ler AK-sih-dent)
In medicine, a loss of blood flow to part of the brain, which damages brain tissue. Cerebrovascular accidents are caused by blood clots and broken blood vessels in the brain. Symptoms include dizziness, numbness, weakness on one side of the body, and problems with talking, writing, or understanding language. The risk of cerebrovascular accident is increased by high blood pressure, older age, smoking, diabetes, high cholesterol, heart disease, atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries), and a family history of cerebrovascular accident. Also called CVA and stroke.
cerebrum listen (seh-REE-brum)
The largest part of the brain. It is divided into two hemispheres, or halves, called the cerebral hemispheres. Areas within the cerebrum control muscle functions and also control speech, thought, emotions, reading, writing, and learning.
ceremony listen (SAYR-eh-MOH-nee)
A series of acts performed for a special occasion or to mark a rite of passage. Ceremonies can be casual or formal.
ceritinib listen (seh-RIH-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ceritinib blocks the protein made by the ALK gene. Blocking this protein may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Ceritinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Zykadia.
Cerubidine listen (seh-ROO-bih-deen)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia and acute myeloid leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cerubidine blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called daunomycin hydrochloride and daunorubicin hydrochloride.
Cervarix listen (SER-vuh-rix)
A vaccine used to prevent cervical cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16 and 18. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to cervical cancer. Cervarix is approved for use in females aged 9 to 25 years. It is a type of bivalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against two different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called recombinant human papillomavirus bivalent vaccine.
cervical listen (SER-vih-kul)
Relating to the neck, or to the neck of any organ or structure. Cervical lymph nodes are located in the neck. Cervical cancer refers to cancer of the uterine cervix, which is the lower, narrow end (the “neck”) of the uterus.
cervical adenocarcinoma listen (SER-vih-kul A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of cervical cancer that begins in the glandular cells of the cervix. These cells make mucus and are found in tissue that lines the inner part of the cervix and the uterus. Cervical adenocarcinoma is less common than cervical squamous cell carcinoma.
cervical cancer listen (SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the cervix (the organ connecting the uterus and vagina). It is usually a slow-growing cancer that may not have symptoms but can be found with regular Pap tests (a procedure in which cells are scraped from the cervix and looked at under a microscope). Cervical cancer is almost always caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection.
cervical dysplasia listen (SER-vih-kul dis-PLAY-zhuh)
The abnormal growth of cells on the surface of the cervix. Cervical dysplasia is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a Pap test or cervical biopsy is done. It can be mild, moderate, or severe, depending on how abnormal the cells look under a microscope and how much of the cervical tissue is affected. Cervical dysplasia is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue.
cervical intraepithelial neoplasia listen (SER-vih-kul IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. It is graded on a scale of 1 to 3, based on how abnormal the cells look under a microscope and how much of the cervical tissue is affected. For example, CIN 1 has slightly abnormal cells and is less likely to become cancer than CIN 2 or CIN 3. Also called CIN.
cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2/3 listen (SER-vih-kul IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh …)
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2/3 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. Cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2/3 has features of CIN 2 and CIN 3. It is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue if not treated. Treatment for cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2/3 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. Also called CIN 2/3.
cervical squamous cell carcinoma listen (SER-vih-kul SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of cervical cancer that begins in squamous cells of the cervix. Cervical squamous cells are found in tissue that lines the outer part of the cervix. They are thin, flat cells that look like fish scales under a microscope. Most cervical cancers are squamous cell carcinomas.
cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 1 listen (SER-vih-kul SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ...)
Slightly abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 1 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 1 is not cancer and usually goes away on its own without treatment. Sometimes it becomes cancer and spreads to nearby normal tissue. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 1 is sometimes called low-grade or mild dysplasia. Also called CIN 1.
cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2 listen (SER-vih-kul SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ...)
Moderately abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2 is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue if not treated. Treatment for cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2 is sometimes called high-grade or moderate dysplasia. Also called CIN 2.
cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 listen (SER-vih-kul SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh …)
Severely abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. If not treated, these abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Treatment for cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. Cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 is sometimes called high-grade or severe dysplasia. Also called CIN 3 and stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ.
cervicectomy listen (SER-vih-SEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the cervix (the end of the uterus that forms a canal between the uterus and the vagina).The upper part of the vagina and certain pelvic lymph nodes may also be removed. Also called trachelectomy.
CerviPrep listen (SER-vih-PREP)
A device used to deliver drugs directly to the cervix (the lower, narrow end of the uterus that forms a canal between the uterus and vagina). The CerviPrep covers the cervix and protects surrounding tissue. Drugs may be injected into the inner part of the cervix through a syringe attached to the device.
cervix listen (SER-vix)
The lower, narrow end of the uterus that forms a canal between the uterus and vagina.
Cesamet listen (SEH-suh-met)
A synthetic pill form of an active chemical in marijuana called delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC). Cesamet is used to treat nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy in patients who have not been helped by other therapy. It is a type of cannabinoid. Also called nabilone.
cetuximab listen (seh-TUK-sih-mab)
A drug used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer, and a certain type of colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cetuximab binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is on the surface of some types of cancer cells. This may stop cancer cells from growing. Cetuximab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Erbitux.
CEV
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat retinoblastoma in children. It includes the drugs carboplatin, etoposide, and vincristine. Also called CEV regimen.
CEV regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat retinoblastoma in children. It includes the drugs carboplatin, etoposide, and vincristine. Also called CEV.
cevimeline hydrochloride listen (seh-VIH-meh-leen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat certain disorders of the salivary gland. It is also being studied as a treatment for dry mouth caused by radiation therapy to the head and neck. It increases the amount of saliva and sweat made by saliva and sweat glands. Cevimeline hydrochloride is a type of cholinergic agonist. Also called Evoxac.
c-fos antisense oligonucleotide listen (… AN-tee-sents AH-lih-goh-NOO-klee-oh-tide)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer and is being studied in the treatment of rheumatoid arthritis and certain skin conditions. It blocks the production of a protein called c-fos, which helps control cell growth. This may kill cancer cells that need c-fos to grow. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide. Also called antisense c-fos.
CFS
A condition that lasts for more than 6 months in which a person feels tired most of the time. They may also have trouble concentrating and carrying out daily activities. Other symptoms include sore throat, fever, muscle weakness, headache, and joint pain. Also called chronic fatigue syndrome.
CgA
A protein found inside neuroendocrine cells, which release CgA and certain hormones into the blood. CgA may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain neuroendocrine tumors, small cell lung cancer, prostate cancer, and other conditions. Measuring the amount of CgA in the blood may help to diagnose cancer or other conditions or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. CgA is a type of tumor marker. Also called chromogranin A.
CGP 48664
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called S-adenosylmethionine decarboxylase inhibitors.
Ch14.18
A drug used with granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), aldesleukin (IL-2), and 13-cis-retinoic acid to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It is used in children whose disease has improved with other anticancer treatment. Ch14.18 binds to a substance called GD2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Ch14.18 may block GD2 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called dinutuximab, MOAB Ch14.18, monoclonal antibody Ch14.18, and Unituxin.
Chamberlain procedure listen (CHAYM-ber-len proh-SEE-jer)
A procedure in which a tube is inserted into the chest to view the tissues and organs in the area between the lungs and between the breastbone and heart. The tube is inserted through an incision next to the breastbone. This procedure is usually used to get a tissue sample from the lymph nodes on the left side of the chest. Also called anterior mediastinotomy.
chamomile listen (KA-muh-mile)
A family of plants with daisy-like flowers. Two types are German chamomile and Roman or English chamomile. These are used in teas to calm and relax, to improve sleep, and to help with stomach problems. The essential oil (scented liquid taken from plants) of chamomile is used in perfumes, shampoos, lotions, and aromatherapy.
Chantix listen (CHAN-tix)
A drug used to help people stop smoking by acting the same way nicotine acts in the brain. It is a type of nicotine receptor partial agonist. Also called varenicline tartrate.
chaplain listen (CHA-plin)
A member of the clergy in charge of a chapel or who works with the military or with an institution, such as a hospital.
charged-particle radiation therapy listen (… PAR-tih-kul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses a special machine to make invisible, high-energy particles (protons or helium ions) that kill cancer cells. This type of radiation may cause less damage to nearby healthy tissue than radiation therapy with high-energy x-rays.
chaste tree berry listen (chayst ... BAYR-ee)
An extract made from the fruit of the chaste tree (Vitex agnus-castus) found in parts of Asia and Europe. It is claimed to treat infertility and to lessen symptoms that may occur before or during a woman’s menstrual period, such as headaches and irregular bleeding. Chaste tree berry may affect levels of reproductive hormones in the blood. It is a type of phytomedicine. Also called monk’s pepper and Vitex.
chelating agent listen (KEE-lay-ting AY-jent)
A chemical compound that binds tightly to metal ions. In medicine, chelating agents are used to remove toxic metals from the body. They are also being studied in the treatment of cancer.
chemabrasion listen (KEE-muh-BRAY-zhun)
A procedure used to improve the way certain skin problems look. These problems include acne scars, wrinkles, or skin changes caused by long-term sun exposure. A chemical solution is put on the skin to dissolve the top layers of skin cells. Also called chemexfoliation and chemical peel.
chemexfoliation listen (KEH-mex-FOH-lee-AY-shun)
A procedure used to improve the way certain skin problems look. These problems include acne scars, wrinkles, or skin changes caused by long-term sun exposure. A chemical solution is put on the skin to dissolve the top layers of skin cells. Also called chemabrasion and chemical peel.
chemical listen (KEH-mih-kul)
A substance made up of elements, such as hydrogen or sodium.
chemical imbalance listen (KEH-mih-kul im-BA-lunts)
Too much or too little of any substance that helps the body work the way it should. A chemical imbalance may be caused by certain tumors and can cause changes in behavior or emotion.
chemical peel listen (KEH-mih-kul …)
A procedure used to improve the way certain skin problems look. These problems include acne scars, wrinkles, or skin changes caused by long-term sun exposure. A chemical solution is put on the skin to dissolve the top layers of skin cells. Also called chemabrasion and chemexfoliation.
chemoembolization listen (KEE-moh-EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor is blocked after anticancer drugs are given in blood vessels near the tumor. Sometimes, the anticancer drugs are attached to small beads that are injected into an artery that feeds the tumor. The beads block blood flow to the tumor as they release the drug. This allows a higher amount of drug to reach the tumor for a longer period of time, which may kill more cancer cells. It also causes fewer side effects because very little of the drug reaches other parts of the body. Chemoembolization is used to treat liver cancer. Also called TACE and transarterial chemoembolization.
chemoimmunotherapy listen (KEE-moh-IH-myoo-noh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Chemotherapy combined with immunotherapy. Chemotherapy uses different drugs to kill or slow the growth of cancer cells; immunotherapy uses treatments to stimulate or restore the ability of the immune system to fight cancer.
chemoprevention listen (KEE-moh-pree-VEN-shun)
The use of drugs, vitamins, or other agents to try to reduce the risk of, or delay the development or recurrence of, cancer.
chemoprevention study listen (KEE-moh-pree-VEN-shun STUH-dee)
In cancer prevention, a clinical trial that studies whether taking certain medicines, vitamins, minerals, or food supplements can prevent cancer. Also called agent study.
chemoprotective agent listen (KEE-moh-proh-TEK-tiv AY-jent)
A type of drug that helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. For example, in patients receiving certain anticancer drugs, amifostine helps protect the kidneys, mesna helps protect the bladder, and dexrazoxane (Zinecard) helps reduce heart damage.
chemoradiation listen (KEE-moh-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Treatment that combines chemotherapy with radiation therapy. Also called chemoradiotherapy.
chemoradiotherapy listen (KEE-moh-RAY-dee-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that combines chemotherapy with radiation therapy. Also called chemoradiation.
chemoreduction listen (KEE-moh-ree-DUK-shun)
Chemotherapy given to shrink a retinoblastoma tumor before treatment with radiation or surgery. It is a type of neoadjuvant therapy.
chemosensitivity listen (KEE-moh-SEN-sih-TIH-vih-tee)
The susceptibility of tumor cells to the cell-killing effects of anticancer drugs.
chemosensitivity assay listen (KEE-moh-SEN-sih-TIH-vih-tee A-say)
A laboratory test that measures the number of tumor cells that are killed by a cancer drug. The test is done after the tumor cells are removed from the body. A chemosensitivity assay may help in choosing the best drug or drugs for the cancer being treated.
chemosensitizer listen (KEE-moh-SEN-sih-TY-zer)
A drug that makes tumor cells more sensitive to the effects of chemotherapy.
chemotherapeutic agent listen (KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik AY-jent)
A drug used to treat cancer.
chemotherapy listen (KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses drugs to stop the growth of cancer cells, either by killing the cells or by stopping them from dividing. Chemotherapy may be given by mouth, injection, or infusion, or on the skin, depending on the type and stage of the cancer being treated. It may be given alone or with other treatments, such as surgery, radiation therapy, or biologic therapy.
chest wall listen
The skin, fat, muscles, bones, and other tissues that form a protective structure around vital organs in the area between the neck and the abdomen, including the heart, major blood vessels, lungs, and liver. The bones in the chest wall include the ribs, sternum (breastbone), and spine. The chest wall also helps support breathing and movement of the upper arms and shoulders.
chest x-ray listen (chest EX-ray)
An x-ray of the structures inside the chest. An x-ray is a type of high-energy radiation that can go through the body and onto film, making pictures of areas inside the chest, which can be used to diagnose disease.
chewing tobacco listen (CHOO-ing tuh-BA-koh)
A type of smokeless tobacco made from cured tobacco leaves. It may be sweetened and flavored with licorice and other substances. It comes in the form of loose tobacco leaves, pellets or “bits” (leaf tobacco rolled into small pellets), plugs (leaf tobacco pressed and held together with some type of sweetener), or twists (leaf tobacco rolled into rope-like strands and twisted). It is placed in the mouth, usually between the cheek and lower lip, and may be chewed. Chewing tobacco contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, throat, esophagus, and pancreas. Chewing tobacco use may also cause gum disease, heart disease, stroke, and other health problems. Also called spit tobacco.
CHF
A condition in which the heart has trouble pumping blood through the body. It may develop over a long period of time. Symptoms include shortness of breath, problems exercising, fatigue, and swelling of the feet, ankles, and abdomen. CHF may be caused by coronary artery disease, a heart attack, or high blood pressure. It usually occurs in people aged 65 years or older. Also called chronic heart failure.
chiasma listen (ky-AZ-muh)
An anatomy term for an X-shaped crossing (for example, of nerves or tendons).
childhood acute lymphoblastic leukemia risk group system listen (... uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh risk groop SIS-tem)
A way of grouping patients that is used to plan treatment for children with acute lymphoblastic leukemia. A risk group is based on the patient’s age and white blood cell count at diagnosis. Risk groups are described as either standard (low) risk or high risk. Other factors that affect the risk group include the type of leukemia cells, whether there are certain chromosome changes, and how quickly the leukemia responds to treatment.
childhood cancer listen (… KAN-ser)
A term used to describe cancers that occur between birth and 15 years of age. Childhood cancers are very rare and may differ from adult cancers in the way they grow and spread, how they are treated, and how they respond to treatment. Common types of childhood cancer include leukemia (begins in blood-forming tissue such as bone marrow), lymphoma (begins in the cells of the immune system), neuroblastoma (begins in certain nerve cells), retinoblastoma (begins in the tissues of the retina), Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer), and cancers of the brain, bone, and soft tissue. Also called pediatric cancer.
childhood cancer risk group listen (… KAN-ser risk groop)
A group of children with cancer that has been formed based on certain characteristics of the children and their disease. These may include age at diagnosis, stage of cancer, and cancer biology. Risk groups may also be based on the chance of being cured or the chance that the cancer will come back. Childhood cancer risk groups are used to plan treatment and follow-up care for certain types of cancer, such as neuroblastoma and rhabdomyosarcoma. Risk groups may be described as low risk, intermediate risk, or high risk.
child-life specialist listen (… SPEH-shuh-list)
A healthcare professional who is trained in the emotional and developmental needs of children. The child-life specialist helps children and their families understand medical issues and gives psychological and emotional support. Also called child-life worker.
child-life worker listen (… WUR-ker)
A healthcare professional who is trained in the emotional and developmental needs of children. The child-life worker helps children and their families understand medical issues and gives psychological and emotional support. Also called child-life specialist.
Children's Oncology Group listen (… on-KAH-loh-jee …)
A large group of researchers, hospitals, and cancer centers that get support from the National Cancer Institute (NCI) to study childhood cancers. The main goal of the Children's Oncology Group is to conduct clinical trials that test new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer in children and adolescents. These clinical trials also include supportive care and childhood cancer survivorship studies. The Children's Oncology Group has hospitals and cancer centers in the United States, Canada, Europe, Australia, and New Zealand. It is part of the National Clinical Trials Network (NCTN). Also called COG.
chimeric listen (ky-MEER-ik)
Having parts of different origins. In medicine, refers to a person, organ, or tissue that contains cells with different genes than the rest of the person, organ, or tissue. This may happen because of a mutation (genetic change) that occurs during development, or as a result of a transplant of cells, organs, or tissues from another person or from a different species. In the laboratory, a chimeric protein can be made by combining two different genes. For example, a chimeric antibody is made by joining antibody genes from two different species, such as human and mouse.
chimeric antigen receptor listen (ky-MEER-ik AN-tih-jen reh-SEP-ter)
A special receptor created in the laboratory that is designed to bind to certain proteins on cancer cells. The chimeric antigen receptor is then added to immune cells called T cells. This helps the T cells find and kill cancer cells that have the specific protein that the receptor is designed to bind. These changed T cells called chimeric antigen receptor T cells are then grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to cancer patients. Chimeric antigen receptor T cells are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Also called CAR.
chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy listen (ky-MEER-ik AN-tih-jen reh-SEP-ter T-sel THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment in which a patient's T cells (a type of immune system cell) are changed in the laboratory so they will attack cancer cells. T cells are taken from a patient’s blood. Then the gene for a special receptor that binds to a certain protein on the patient’s cancer cells is added in the laboratory. The special receptor is called a chimeric antigen receptor (CAR). Large numbers of the CAR T cells are grown in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. Chimeric antigen receptor T-cell therapy is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Also called CAR T-cell therapy.
Chinese meridian theory listen (chy-NEEZ meh-RIH-dee-un THEER-ee)
In traditional Chinese medicine, meridians are channels that form a network in the body, through which qi (vital energy) flows. Blocked qi causes pain or illness. The flow of qi is restored by using pressure, needles, suction, or heat at hundreds of specific points along the meridians.
Chinese rhubarb listen (chy-NEEZ ROO-barb)
The root of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rheum palmatum or Rheum officinale. Also called da-huang, Indian rhubarb, rhubarb, and Turkish rhubarb.
CHIR-265
A substance being studied in the treatment of melanoma. CHIR-265 may block the growth of tumors and the growth of blood vessels from surrounding tissue to the tumor. It is a type of Raf kinase inhibitor and angiogenesis inhibitor.
ChiRhoStim listen (KY-roh-stim)
A drug used to help diagnose gastrinomas (tumors that cause too much gastric acid to be made) and other problems with the pancreas. It is also used to increase secretions from the pancreas and to help identify a duct called the ampulla of Vater. ChiRhoStim is a form of secretin that is made in the laboratory. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release substances that help digest food. Also called secretin human and synthetic human secretin.
chiropractic therapy listen (KY-roh-PRAK-tik THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy in which the hands are used to manipulate the spine or other parts of the body. Sometimes, heat and ice, relaxation techniques, exercise, and other treatments are also used. Chiropractic therapy may be used to treat conditions such as back pain, neck pain, headache, and hand or foot problems, and to improve overall health. It is a type of complementary and alternative medicine (CAM).
chitin listen (KY-tin)
A type of polysaccharide (sugar molecule) that is made by some plants and animals. The hard outer shell of shrimp, lobsters, and many insects is made of chitin.
Chlamydophila psittaci listen (kluh-mih-doh-FIH-luh see-TAH-chee)
A type of bacterium that can infect humans and animals. It spreads to humans from infected birds and can cause a lung infection called psittacosis. It may also cause an infection of the conjunctiva (the membrane that lines the eyelids and covers the white part of the eye). This may increase the risk of a type of lymphoma called ocular adnexa MALT lymphoma, which is a type of B-cell lymphoma.
chlorambucil listen (klor-AM-byoo-sil)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, Hodgkin lymphoma, and certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Chlorambucil damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Leukeran.
chlorambucil-prednisone listen (klor-AM-byoo-sil-PRED-nih-sone)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs chlorambucil hydrochloride and prednisone. Also called chlorambucil-prednisone regimen, CP, and CP regimen.
chlorambucil-prednisone regimen listen (klor-AM-byoo-sil-PRED-nih-sone REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs chlorambucil hydrochloride and prednisone. Also called chlorambucil-prednisone, CP, and CP regimen.
chlorine listen (KLOR-een)
A chemical used in manufacturing, as a bleach, and to kill bacteria and other organisms in water.
chloroma listen (kloh-ROH-muh)
A malignant, green-colored tumor of myeloid cells (a type of immature white blood cell). This tumor is usually associated with myelogenous leukemia. Also called granulocytic sarcoma.
chloroquinoxaline sulfonamide listen (KLOR-oh-kwih-NOK-sah-leen sul-FAH-nuh-MIDE)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called CQS.
chlorotoxin listen (KLOR-oh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the diagnosis and treatment of glioma (a type of brain cancer) and other types of cancer. It binds to cancer cells in the brain and peripheral nervous system and may keep them from spreading. Chlorotoxin comes from the venom of a type of scorpion. A form of chlorotoxin made in the laboratory is called TM-601. Chlorotoxin is a type of neurotoxin. Also called CTX.
cholangiocarcinoma listen (koh-LAN-jee-oh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare cancer that forms in the bile ducts. A bile duct is a tube that carries bile (fluid made by the liver) between the liver and gallbladder and the small intestine. Intrahepatic cholangiocarcinoma is found inside the liver. Extrahepatic cholangiocarcinoma is found outside the liver. Also called bile duct cancer.
cholangiosarcoma listen (koh-LAN-jee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A tumor of the connective tissues of the bile ducts.
cholecalciferol listen (KOH-leh-kal-SIH-feh-rol)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Cholecalciferol helps the body use calcium and phosphorus to make strong bones and teeth. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, egg yolks, and dairy products. Skin exposed to sunshine can also make cholecalciferol. Not enough cholecalciferol can cause a bone disease called rickets. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called vitamin D.
cholelith listen (KOH-leh-lith)
Solid material that forms in the gallbladder or common bile duct. Choleliths are made of cholesterol or other substances found in the gallbladder. They may occur as one large stone or as many small ones, and vary from the size of a golf ball to a grain of sand. Also called gallstone.
cholestasis listen (koh-leh-STAY-sis)
Any condition in which the release of bile from the liver is blocked. The blockage can occur in the liver (intrahepatic cholestasis) or in the bile ducts (extrahepatic cholestasis).
cholesterol listen (koh-LES-teh-rol)
A waxy, fat-like substance made in the liver, and found in the blood and in all cells of the body. Cholesterol is important for good health and is needed for making cell walls, tissues, hormones, vitamin D, and bile acid. Cholesterol also comes from eating foods taken from animals such as egg yolks, meat, and whole-milk dairy products. Too much cholesterol in the blood may build up in blood vessel walls, block blood flow to tissues and organs, and increase the risk of developing heart disease and stroke.
choline listen (KOH-leen)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Choline helps cells make membranes, make a neurotransmitter (a chemical that helps nerve cells communicate with other cells), and remove fat from the liver. It is found in whole milk, beef liver, eggs, soy foods, and peanuts. Choline is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough choline can cause diseases of the heart and blood vessels and damage to the liver. A form of choline is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and to reduce pain and fever. Choline is also being studied together with vitamin B12 in the prevention and treatment of cancer.
choline magnesium trisalicylate listen (KOH-leen mag-NEE-see-um TRY-suh-LIH-sih-LAYT)
A substance used to treat arthritis and relieve pain, inflammation, and fever. It is also being studied in the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Choline magnesium trisalicylate blocks the action of a substance that sends a pain message to the brain. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called Trilisate.
chondrocyte listen (KON-droh-site)
Cartilage cell. Chondrocytes make the structural components of cartilage.
chondroitin sulfate listen (kon-DROY-tin SUL-fayt)
The major glycosaminoglycan (a type of sugar molecule) in cartilage.
chondrosarcoma listen (KON-droh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in bone cartilage. It usually starts in the pelvis (between the hip bones), the shoulder, the ribs, or at the ends of the long bones of the arms and legs. A rare type of chondrosarcoma called extraskeletal chondrosarcoma does not form in bone cartilage. Instead, it forms in the soft tissues of the upper part of the arms and legs. Chondrosarcoma can occur at any age but is more common in people older than 40 years. It is a type of bone cancer.
CHOP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), and prednisone. Also called CHOP regimen.
CHOP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), and prednisone. Also called CHOP.
CHOPE listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, and etoposide phosphate. Also called CHOPE regimen.
CHOPE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, and etoposide phosphate. Also called CHOPE.
chordoma listen (kor-DOH-muh)
A type of bone cancer that usually starts in the lower spinal column or at the base of the skull.
chorioadenoma destruens listen (KOR-ee-oh-A-deh-NOH-muh des-TROO-ens)
A type of cancer that grows into the muscular wall of the uterus. It is formed after conception (fertilization of an egg by a sperm). It may spread to other parts of the body, such as the vagina, vulva, and lung. Also called invasive hydatidiform mole.
chorioallantoic membrane listen (KOR-ee-oh-uh-lan-TOH-ik MEM-brayn)
The membrane in hens' eggs that helps chicken embryos get enough oxygen and calcium for development. The calcium comes from the egg shell.
chorioblastoma listen (KOR-ee-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A malignant, fast-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta). Almost all chorioblastomas form in the uterus after fertilization of an egg by a sperm, but a small number form in a testis or an ovary. Chorioblastomas spread through the blood to other organs, especially the lungs. They are a type of gestational trophoblastic disease. Also called choriocarcinoma, chorioepithelioma, and chorionic carcinoma.
choriocarcinoma listen (KOR-ee-oh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A malignant, fast-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta). Almost all choriocarcinomas form in the uterus after fertilization of an egg by a sperm, but a small number form in a testis or an ovary. Choriocarcinomas spread through the blood to other organs, especially the lungs. They are a type of gestational trophoblastic disease. Also called chorioblastoma, chorioepithelioma, and chorionic carcinoma.
chorioepithelioma listen (KOR-ee-oh-EH-pih-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A malignant, fast-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta). Almost all chorioepitheliomas form in the uterus after fertilization of an egg by a sperm, but a small number form in a testis or an ovary. Chorioepitheliomas spread through the blood to other organs, especially the lungs. They are a type of gestational trophoblastic disease. Also called chorioblastoma, choriocarcinoma, and chorionic carcinoma.
chorionic carcinoma listen (KOR-ee-AH-nik KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A malignant, fast-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta). Almost all chorionic carcinomas form in the uterus after fertilization of an egg by a sperm, but a small number form in a testis or an ovary. Chorionic carcinomas spread through the blood to other organs, especially the lungs. They are a type of gestational trophoblastic disease. Also called chorioblastoma, choriocarcinoma, and chorioepithelioma.
choroid listen (KOR-oyd)
A thin layer of tissue that is part of the middle layer of the wall of the eye, between the sclera (white outer layer of the eye) and the retina (the inner layer of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). The choriod is filled with blood vessels that bring oxygen and nutrients to the eye.
choroid plexus listen (KOR-oyd PLEK-sus)
A network of blood vessels and cells in the ventricles (fluid-filled spaces) of the brain. The blood vessels are covered by a thin layer of cells that make cerebrospinal fluid.
choroid plexus tumor listen (KOR-oyd PLEK-sus TOO-mer)
A rare tumor that forms in the choroid plexus (a network of blood vessels and cells in the fluid-filled spaces of the brain). These tumors are most common in children younger than 2 years. Choroid plexus tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer).
CHPP
A procedure that bathes the abdominal cavity in fluid that contains anticancer drugs. This fluid is warmer than body temperature. This procedure appears to kill cancer cells without harming normal cells. Also called continuous hyperthermic peritoneal perfusion.
chromaffin cell listen (KROH-muh-fin ...)
A type of cell that makes neurohormones (chemicals that are made by nerve cells and used to send signals to other cells) and releases them into the blood. Chromaffin cells make epinephrine (adrenaline) and norepinephrine (noradrenaline). They are found in the adrenal glands or in groups of nerve cells called ganglia.
chromatography listen (KROH-muh-TAH-gruh-fee)
A laboratory technique used to separate different substances in a mixture. A gas or a liquid is used to pass the mixture through a column, paper, or special plate that contains absorbing materials. The substances in the mixture are separated based on how far they move through the material. The different substances may be visible to the eye or detected by a special machine.
chromogranin A listen (KROH-moh-GRA-nin …)
A protein found inside neuroendocrine cells, which release chromogranin A and certain hormones into the blood. Chromogranin A may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain neuroendocrine tumors, small cell lung cancer, prostate cancer, and other conditions. Measuring the amount of chromogranin A in the blood may help to diagnose cancer or other conditions or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. Chromogranin A is a type of tumor marker. Also called CgA.
chromosome listen (KROH-muh-some)
Part of a cell that contains genetic information. Except for sperm and eggs, all human cells contain 46 chromosomes.
chromosome 17 listen (KROH-muh-some …)
One of a pair of chromosomes that is part of the 46 chromosomes found in the nucleus of most human cells. Specific changes in chromosome 17 may be found in patients with certain genetic conditions and some types of cancer, including bladder cancer, brain cancer, and leukemia. Checking for these changes may help diagnose cancer or find out if cancer has come back. Chromosome 17 is a type of tumor marker.
chromosome 3 listen (KROH-muh-some …)
One of a pair of chromosomes that is part of the 46 chromosomes found in the nucleus of most human cells. Specific changes in chromosome 3 may be found in patients with certain genetic conditions or some types of cancer, including bladder cancer. Checking for these changes may help diagnose cancer or find out if cancer has come back. Chromosome 3 is a type of tumor marker.
chromosome 7 listen (KROH-muh-some …)
One of a pair of chromosomes that is part of the 46 chromosomes found in the nucleus of most human cells. Specific changes in chromosome 7 may be found in patients with certain genetic conditions or some types of cancer, including bladder cancer, leukemia, and lymphoma. Checking for these changes may help diagnose cancer or find out if cancer has come back. Chromosome 7 is a type of tumor marker.
chronic bacterial prostatitis listen (KRAH-nik bak-TEER-ee-ul PROS-tuh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the prostate gland that is caused by a bacterial infection and that continues or gets worse over a long period of time. The infection may seem to go away but keeps coming back. Symptoms include body aches, pain in the lower back and genital area, a burning feeling during urination, and problems with emptying the bladder all the way.
chronic bronchitis listen (KRAH-nik bron-KY-tis)
A lung condition that develops over time in which the bronchi (large air passages that lead to the lungs) become inflamed and scarred. This causes the bronchi to make large amounts of mucus and can lead to a chronic cough and breathing problems. The most common cause of chronic bronchitis is cigarette smoking. It may also be caused by infection or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, chemical fumes, or other forms of air pollution. Chronic bronchitis usually does not go away completely. It is a type of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD).
chronic cough listen (KRAH-nik kof)
A cough that lasts for 8 weeks or longer. It may occur with other symptoms, including a runny or stuffy nose, extra mucus in the back of the throat, wheezing, shortness of breath, or heartburn. A chronic cough may be caused by allergies, sinus infections, asthma, gastroesophageal reflux disease (GERD), or other conditions. It may also be caused by smoking tobacco or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke over a long period of time. It usually improves when the problem that caused the cough is treated. For example, a chronic cough may get better when a person quits smoking.
chronic disease listen (KRAH-nik dih-ZEEZ)
A disease or condition that usually lasts for 3 months or longer and may get worse over time. Chronic diseases tend to occur in older adults and can usually be controlled but not cured. The most common types of chronic disease are cancer, heart disease, stroke, diabetes, and arthritis.
chronic eosinophilic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik EE-oh-SIH-noh-FIH-lik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A disease in which too many eosinophils (a type of white blood cell) are found in the bone marrow, blood, and other tissues. Chronic eosinophilic leukemia may stay the same for many years, or it may progress quickly to acute leukemia.
chronic fatigue syndrome listen (KRAH-nik fuh-TEEG SIN-drome)
A condition that lasts for more than 6 months in which a person feels tired most of the time. They may also have trouble concentrating and carrying out daily activities. Other symptoms include sore throat, fever, muscle weakness, headache, and joint pain. Also called CFS.
chronic granulocytic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik GRAN-yoo-loh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many myeloblasts are found in the blood and bone marrow. Myeloblasts are a type of immature blood cell that makes white blood cells called myeloid cells. Chronic granulocytic leukemia may get worse over time as the number of myeloblasts increases in the blood and bone marrow. This may cause fever, fatigue, easy bleeding, anemia, infection, a swollen spleen, bone pain, or other signs and symptoms. Chronic granulocytic leukemia is usually marked by a chromosome change called the Philadelphia chromosome, in which a piece of chromosome 9 and a piece of chromosome 22 break off and trade places with each other. It usually occurs in older adults and rarely occurs in children. Also called chronic myelogenous leukemia, chronic myeloid leukemia, and CML.
chronic heart failure listen (KRAH-nik hart FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the heart has trouble pumping blood through the body. It may develop over a long period of time. Symptoms include shortness of breath, problems exercising, fatigue, and swelling of the feet, ankles, and abdomen. Chronic heart failure may be caused by coronary artery disease, a heart attack, or high blood pressure. It usually occurs in people aged 65 years or older. Also called CHF.
chronic idiopathic myelofibrosis listen (KRAH-nik IH-dee-oh-PA-thik MY-eh-loh-fy-BROH-sis)
A progressive, chronic disease in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue and blood is made in organs such as the liver and the spleen, instead of in the bone marrow. This disease is marked by an enlarged spleen and progressive anemia. Also called agnogenic myeloid metaplasia, idiopathic myelofibrosis, myelosclerosis with myeloid metaplasia, and primary myelofibrosis.
chronic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A slowly progressing cancer that starts in blood-forming tissues such as the bone marrow, and causes large numbers of white blood cells to be produced and enter the blood stream.
chronic lung disease listen (KRAH-nik … dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disorder that affects the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. It usually develops slowly, and may get worse over time. Chronic lung disease may be caused by smoking tobacco or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, chemical fumes, dust, or other forms of air pollution. Types of chronic lung disease include asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, asbestosis, pneumonitis, and other lung conditions. Also called CLD.
chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found mostly in the blood and bone marrow. Sometimes, in later stages of the disease, cancer cells are found in the lymph nodes and the disease is called small lymphocytic lymphoma. Also called CLL.
chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma listen (KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh/… LIM-foh-SIH-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found in the blood and bone marrow and/or in the lymph nodes. Chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) and small lymphocytic lymphoma (SLL) are the same disease, but in CLL cancer cells are found mostly in the blood and bone marrow. In SLL cancer cells are found mostly in the lymph nodes. Chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma is a type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called CLL/SLL.
chronic myelogenous leukemia listen (KRAH-nik MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many myeloblasts are found in the blood and bone marrow. Myeloblasts are a type of immature blood cell that makes white blood cells called myeloid cells. Chronic myelogenous leukemia may get worse over time as the number of myeloblasts increases in the blood and bone marrow. This may cause fever, fatigue, easy bleeding, anemia, infection, a swollen spleen, bone pain, or other signs and symptoms. Chronic myelogenous leukemia is usually marked by a chromosome change called the Philadelphia chromosome, in which a piece of chromosome 9 and a piece of chromosome 22 break off and trade places with each other. It usually occurs in older adults and rarely occurs in children. Also called chronic granulocytic leukemia, chronic myeloid leukemia, and CML.
chronic myeloid leukemia listen (KRAH-nik MY-eh-loyd loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many myeloblasts are found in the blood and bone marrow. Myeloblasts are a type of immature blood cell that makes white blood cells called myeloid cells. Chronic myeloid leukemia may get worse over time as the number of myeloblasts increases in the blood and bone marrow. This may cause fever, fatigue, easy bleeding, anemia, infection, a swollen spleen, bone pain, or other signs and symptoms. Chronic myeloid leukemia is usually marked by a chromosome change called the Philadelphia chromosome, in which a piece of chromosome 9 and a piece of chromosome 22 break off and trade places with each other. It usually occurs in older adults and rarely occurs in children. Also called chronic granulocytic leukemia, chronic myelogenous leukemia, and CML.
chronic myelomonocytic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik MY-eh-loh-MAH-noh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A slowly progressing type of myelodysplastic/myeloproliferative disease in which too many myelomonocytes (a type of white blood cell) are in the bone marrow, crowding out other normal blood cells, such as other white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets. Also called CMML.
chronic myeloproliferative neoplasm listen (KRAH-nik MY-eh-loh-proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
A type of disease in which the bone marrow makes too many red blood cells, platelets, or certain white blood cells. Chronic myeloproliferative neoplasms usually get worse over time as the number of extra cells build up in the blood and/or bone marrow. This may cause bleeding problems, anemia, infection, fatigue, or other signs and symptoms. Certain chronic myeloproliferative neoplasms may become acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Chronic myeloproliferative neoplasms include chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), polycythemia vera, primary myelofibrosis, essential thrombocythemia, chronic neutrophilic leukemia, and chronic eosinophilic leukemia. Also called myeloproliferative neoplasm.
chronic neutrophilic leukemia listen (KRAH-nik NOO-troh-FIH-lik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A disease in which too many neutrophils (a type of white blood cell) are found in the blood. The extra neutrophils may cause the spleen and liver to become enlarged. Chronic neutrophilic leukemia may stay the same for many years or it may progress quickly to acute leukemia.
chronic obstructive pulmonary disease listen (KRAH-nik ub-STRUK-tiv PUL-muh-NAYR-ee dih-ZEEZ)
A type of lung disease marked by permanent damage to tissues in the lungs, making it hard to breathe. Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease includes chronic bronchitis, in which the bronchi (large air passages) are inflamed and scarred, and emphysema, in which the alveoli (tiny air sacs) are damaged. It develops over many years and is usually caused by cigarette smoking. Also called COPD.
chronic pain listen (KRAH-nik payn)
Pain that can range from mild to severe, and persists or progresses over a long period of time.
chronic phase listen (KRAH-nik fayz)
Refers to the early stages of chronic myelogenous leukemia or chronic lymphocytic leukemia. The number of mature and immature abnormal white blood cells in the bone marrow and blood is higher than normal, but lower than in the accelerated or blast phase.
chronic phase chronic myelogenous leukemia listen (KRAH-nik fayz KRAH-nik MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A phase of chronic myelogenous leukemia in which fewer than 10% of the cells in the blood and bone marrow are blast cells (immature blood cells). This phase may last from several months to several years, and there may be no symptoms of leukemia.
chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome listen (KRAH-nik PROS-tuh-TY-tis/KRAH-nik PEL-vik payn SIN-drome)
A condition of the prostate gland that continues or gets worse over a long period of time. Symptoms include body aches, pain in the lower back and genital area, a burning feeling during urination, and problems with emptying the bladder all the way. Also called CP/CPPS.
chrysotherapy listen (KRIH-soh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses gold salts (a salt form of the metal element gold) to treat diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis. The gold salts stop cells from releasing chemicals that can harm tissues. Also called aurotherapy and gold therapy.
CHS 828
A drug that is being studied in the treatment of solid tumors.
chyle listen (kile)
A milky-white fluid that forms in the small intestine during digestion. It is made of lymph fluid and fats. Special lymph vessels carry chyle from the intestines to the blood.
CI-1033
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. CI-1033 blocks the action of proteins called epidermal growth factor receptors, and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called canertinib dihydrochloride.
CI-958
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. CI-958 binds to DNA and stops cells, including cancer cells, from repairing damage to DNA and from making more DNA, RNA, and protein. It is a type of DNA intercalator. Also called sedoxantrone trihydrochloride.
CI-980
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called mivobulin isethionate.
CI-994
A substance being studied in the treatment of non-small cell lung cancer. Also called N-acetyldinaline.
Cialis listen (see-A-lis)
A drug used to treat erectile dysfunction. It is also being studied in the treatment of sexual problems in patients treated with radiation or surgery for prostate cancer. Cialis blocks the action of a certain enzyme, which can result in increased blood flow to the penis, causing an erection. It is a type of cGMP phosphodiesterase type 5 (PDE5) inhibitor. Also called tadalafil.
cidofovir listen (sy-DOH-foh-veer)
A drug used in the treatment of infections caused by viruses.
cigar listen (sih-GAR)
A tube-shaped tobacco product that is made of tightly rolled, cured tobacco leaves in a tobacco leaf wrapper or a wrapper that contains tobacco. It may also have other ingredients, including substances to add different flavors. A cigar is lit on one end and smoked, but the smoke is usually not inhaled into the lungs. Cigars contain nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Smoking cigars can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, larynx (voice box), esophagus, lung, and pancreas. Heavy cigar smoking can also increase the risk of heart disease and lung diseases, such as emphysema and chronic bronchitis.
cigarette listen (SIH-guh-ret)
A tube-shaped tobacco product that is made of finely cut, cured tobacco leaves wrapped in thin paper. It may also have other ingredients, including substances to add different flavors. A cigarette is lit on one end and smoked, and the smoke is usually inhaled into the lungs. Cigarettes contain nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Smoking cigarettes can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause many types of cancer, including cancers of the lung, larynx, mouth, esophagus, throat, kidney, bladder, pancreas, stomach, and cervix, and acute myeloid leukemia. Smoking cigarettes also causes other health problems, including heart disease, stroke, and lung diseases, such as emphysema and chronic bronchitis.
cilengitide listen (sy-LEN-gih-tide)
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer and antiangiogenesis drug. Also called EMD 121974.
ciliary body listen (SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee)
A part of the middle layer of the wall of the eye. The ciliary body includes the ring-shaped muscle that changes the size of the pupil and the shape of the lens when the eye focuses. It also makes the fluid that fills the eye.
cimetidine listen (sy-MEH-tih-deen)
A drug usually used to treat stomach ulcers and heartburn. It is also commonly used in a regimen to prevent allergic reactions.
CIN listen
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. CIN is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. CIN is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. It is graded on a scale of 1 to 3, based on how abnormal the cells look under a microscope and how much of the cervical tissue is affected. For example, CIN 1 has slightly abnormal cells and is less likely to become cancer than CIN 2 or CIN 3. Also called cervical intraepithelial neoplasia.
CIN 1 listen
Slightly abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. CIN 1 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. CIN 1 is not cancer and usually goes away on its own without treatment. Sometimes it becomes cancer and spreads to nearby normal tissue. CIN 1 is sometimes called low-grade or mild dysplasia. Also called cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 1.
CIN 2 listen
Moderately abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. CIN 2 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. CIN 2 is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue if not treated. Treatment for CIN 2 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. CIN 2 is sometimes called high-grade or moderate dysplasia. Also called cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 2.
CIN 2/3 listen
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. CIN 2/3 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. CIN 2/3 has features of CIN 2 and CIN 3. It is not cancer, but may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue if not treated. Treatment for CIN 2/3 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. Also called cervical intraepithelial neoplasia grade 2/3.
CIN 3 listen
Severely abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. CIN 3 is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. If not treated, these abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Treatment for CIN 3 may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. CIN 3 is sometimes called high-grade or severe dysplasia. Also called cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 and stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ.
Cipro listen (SIP-roh)
A drug that is used to treat infections caused by bacteria and is being studied in the treatment of bladder cancer. Cipro is a type of fluoroquinolone. Also called ciprofloxacin.
ciprofloxacin listen (SIH-proh-FLOK-suh-sin)
A drug that is used to treat infections caused by bacteria and is being studied in the treatment of bladder cancer. Ciprofloxacin is a type of fluoroquinolone. Also called Cipro.
circadian rhythm listen (sir-KAY-dee-un RIH-thum)
The natural cycle of physical, mental, and behavior changes that the body goes through in a 24-hour cycle. Circadian rhythms are mostly affected by light and darkness and are controlled by a small area in the middle of the brain. They can affect sleep, body temperature, hormones, appetite, and other body functions. Abnormal circadian rhythms may be linked to obesity, diabetes, depression, bipolar disorder, seasonal affective disorder, and sleep disorders such as insomnia. Circadian rhythm is sometimes called the “body’s clock.”
circulation listen (ser-kyoo-LAY-shun)
In the body, the flow of blood through the heart and blood vessels, and the flow of lymph through the lymph vessels.
circulatory system listen (SER-kyoo-lah-tor-ee SIS-tem)
The system that contains the heart and the blood vessels and moves blood throughout the body. This system helps tissues get enough oxygen and nutrients, and it helps them get rid of waste products. The lymph system, which connects with the blood system, is often considered part of the circulatory system.
circumcision listen (SIR-kum-SIH-zhun)
Surgery to remove part or all of the foreskin (loose skin that covers the head of the penis).
cirrhosis listen (seh-ROH-sis)
A type of chronic, progressive liver disease in which liver cells are replaced by scar tissue.
CIS
The CIS is the National Cancer Institute's link to the public, interpreting and explaining research findings in a clear and understandable manner, and providing personalized responses to specific questions about cancer. Access the CIS by calling 1-800-4-CANCER (1-800-422-6237), or by using the LiveHelp instant-messaging service at https://livehelp.cancer.gov. Also called Cancer Information Service.
CISNET
A group of researchers supported by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) who use statistical models to help understand how cancer prevention, screening, and treatment programs can affect the number of new cases of cancer diagnosed each year and the number of deaths from cancer each year. The CISNET is now studying breast, colorectal, esophageal, lung, and prostate cancers. The models they create help guide future cancer control strategies, research priorities, policies, and decision making. Also called Cancer Intervention and Surveillance Modeling Network.
cisplatin listen (sis-PLA-tin)
A drug used to treat certain types of bladder, ovarian, and testicular cancer. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be treated with or has not gotten better with other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cisplatin contains the metal platinum. It kills cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. Cisplatin is a type of DNA crosslinking agent. The brand name Platinol has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
citalopram listen (sy-TA-loh-pram)
A drug used to treat depression. It belongs to the families of drugs called antidepressant agents and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs). Also called Celexa.
citric acid/potassium-sodium citrate listen (SIH-trik A-sid/puh-TA-see-um-SOH-dee-um SIH-trayt)
A drug used in the treatment of metabolic acidosis (a disorder in which the blood is too acidic).
citrovorum factor listen (sih-troh-VOR-um FAK-ter)
A drug used to lessen the toxic effects of the anticancer drug methotrexate or other substances that block the action of folic acid. It is also used to treat some types of anemia and is used with fluorouracil to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Citrovorum factor is a form of folic acid. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called calcium levoleucovorin, folinic acid, Fusilev, and leucovorin calcium.
cixutumumab listen (SIK-syoo-TOO-myoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a monoclonal antibody that is made in the laboratory and can bind to substances in the body. Cixutumumab blocks the action of a protein needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of insulin-like growth factor-1 receptor (IGF-1R) inhibitor. Also called IMC-A12.
c-kit
A protein found on the surface of many different types of cells. It binds to a substance called stem cell factor (SCF), which causes certain types of blood cells to grow. C-kit may also be found in higher than normal amounts, or in a changed form, on some types of cancer cells, including gastrointestinal stromal tumors and melanoma. Measuring the amount of c-kit in tumor tissue may help diagnose cancer and plan treatment. C-kit is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase and a type of tumor marker. Also called CD117 and stem cell factor receptor.
cladribine listen (KLAD-rih-been)
A drug used to treat hairy cell leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cladribine damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite.
clarithromycin listen (kluh-RITH-roh-MY-sin)
An antibiotic drug used in the treatment of infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called macrolides.
Clark level I skin cancer listen (klark LEH-vul ... skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that is found only in the epidermis (outer layer of skin).
Clark level II skin cancer listen (klark LEH-vul … skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that has spread from the epidermis (outer layer of skin) down into the papillary dermis (the thin top layer of the dermis).
Clark level III skin cancer listen (klark LEH-vul … skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that has spread down through the papillary dermis (the thin top layer of the dermis) but not into the reticular dermis (the thick bottom layer of the dermis).
Clark level IV skin cancer listen (klark LEH-vul … skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that has spread down into the reticular dermis (the thick bottom layer of the dermis).
Clark level V skin cancer listen (klark LEH-vul … skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that has spread down into the subcutaneous tissue (tissue beneath the skin).
Clark levels listen (klark LEH-vulz)
A system for describing how deep skin cancer has spread into the skin. Levels I-V describe the layers of skin involved.
classic Hodgkin lymphoma listen (KLA-sik HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
The most common type of Hodgkin lymphoma (a cancer of the immune system). Classic Hodgkin lymphoma is marked by the presence of a type of cell called the Reed-Sternberg cell.
Claus model listen (… MAH-dul)
A computer program that uses statistics to predict a person’s risk for developing breast cancer based on family history.
clavicle listen (KLA-vih-kul)
One of a pair of bones at the base of the front of the neck. The clavicles connect the breastbone to the shoulder blades. Also called collarbone.
CLD
A type of disorder that affects the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. It usually develops slowly, and may get worse over time. CLD may be caused by smoking tobacco or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, chemical fumes, dust, or other forms of air pollution. Types of CLD include asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, asbestosis, pneumonitis, and other lung conditions. Also called chronic lung disease.
clear cell listen (kleer sel)
A type of cell that looks clear inside when viewed under a microscope.
clear cell adenocarcinoma listen (kleer sel A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of tumor, usually of the female genital tract, in which the insides of the cells look clear when viewed under a microscope. Also called clear cell carcinoma and mesonephroma.
clear cell carcinoma listen (kleer sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of tumor, usually of the female genital tract, in which the insides of the cells look clear when viewed under a microscope. Also called clear cell adenocarcinoma and mesonephroma.
clear cell sarcoma of soft tissue listen (kleer sel sar-KOH-muh ... TIH-shoo)
A soft tissue tumor that begins in a tendon (tough, cord-like tissue that connects muscle to bone or to another part of the body). Under the microscope, clear cell sarcoma of soft tissue may look a lot like melanoma (a type of skin cancer). Clear cell sarcoma of soft tissue usually occurs in the leg or arm and it often spreads to nearby lymph nodes. It is most common in young adults.
clear cell sarcoma of the kidney listen (kleer sel sar-KOH-muh ...KID-nee)
A rare type of kidney cancer, in which the inside of the cells look clear when viewed under a microscope. Clear cell sarcoma can spread from the kidney to other organs, most commonly the bone, but also including the lungs, brain, and soft tissues of the body.
clear liquid diet listen (kleer LIH-kwid DY-et)
A diet that is made up of only liquids and foods that are clear liquids at room temperature. Clear liquids are easy to digest and include water, broth, gelatin, plain tea and coffee, popsicles and juices without pulp, sodas, and sports drinks. Clear liquid diets may be used before certain tests or procedures, such as a colonoscopy, or before or after certain types of surgery. They may also be used to help treat gastrointestinal problems, such as nausea, vomiting, or diarrhea. Clear liquid diets are normally used for only a few days because they do not have enough of the calories and nutrients the body needs.
cleaved listen (kleevd)
Having to do with the appearance of cells when viewed under a microscope. The nucleus of cleaved cells appears divided or segmented.
clergy listen (KLER-jee)
Ordained individuals who perform spiritual and/or religious functions.
clinical listen (KLIH-nih-kul)
Having to do with the examination and treatment of patients.
clinical breast exam listen (KLIH-nih-kul brest eg-ZAM)
A physical exam of the breast performed by a health care provider to check for lumps or other changes. Also called CBE.
clinical practice guidelines listen (KLIH-nih-kul PRAK-tis GIDE-linez)
Guidelines developed to help health care professionals and patients make decisions about screening, prevention, or treatment of a specific health condition.
clinical research listen (KLIH-nih-kul REE-serch)
Research in which people, or data or samples of tissue from people, are studied to understand health and disease. Clinical research helps find new and better ways to detect, diagnose, treat, and prevent disease. Types of clinical research include clinical trials, which test new treatments for a disease, and natural history studies, which collect health information to understand how a disease develops and progresses over time.
clinical researcher listen (KLIH-nih-kul REE-ser-cher)
A health professional who works directly with patients, or uses data from patients, to do research on health and disease and to develop new treatments. Clinical researchers may also do research on how health care practices affect health and disease.
clinical resistance listen (KLIH-nih-kul reh-ZIH-stunts)
The failure of a cancer to shrink after treatment.
clinical series listen (KLIH-nih-kul SEER-eez)
A case series in which the patients receive treatment in a clinic or other medical facility.
clinical stage listen (KLIH-nih-kul stayj)
The stage of cancer (amount or spread of cancer in the body) that is based on tests that are done before surgery. These include physical exams, imaging tests, laboratory tests (such as blood tests), and biopsies.
clinical staging listen (KLIH-nih-kul STAY-jing)
A method used to find out the stage of cancer (amount or spread of cancer in the body) using tests that are done before surgery. These include physical exams, imaging tests, laboratory tests (such as blood tests), and biopsies.
clinical study listen (KLIH-nih-kul STUH-dee)
A type of research study that tests how well new medical approaches work in people. These studies test new methods of screening, prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of a disease. Also called clinical trial.
clinical trial listen (KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A type of research study that tests how well new medical approaches work in people. These studies test new methods of screening, prevention, diagnosis, or treatment of a disease. Also called clinical study.
clinical trial phase listen (KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul fayz)
A part of the clinical research process that answers specific questions about whether treatments or other interventions that are being studied work and are safe. Phase I trials test the best way to give a new treatment and the best dose. Phase II trials test whether a new treatment has an effect on the disease. Phase III trials compare the results of people taking a new treatment with the results of people taking the standard treatment. Phase IV trials are done using thousands of people after a treatment has been approved and marketed, to check for side effects that were not seen in the phase III trial.
clinical trial sponsor listen (KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul SPON-ser)
A person, company, institution, group, or organization that oversees or pays for a clinical trial and collects and analyzes the data. Also called trial sponsor.
clinician listen (klih-NIH-shun)
A health professional who takes care of patients.
CLL
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found mostly in the blood and bone marrow. Sometimes, in later stages of the disease, cancer cells are found in the lymph nodes and the disease is called small lymphocytic lymphoma. Also called chronic lymphocytic leukemia.
CLL/SLL
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found in the blood and bone marrow and/or in the lymph nodes. CLL (chronic lymphocytic leukemia) and SLL (small lymphocytic lymphoma) are the same disease, but in CLL cancer cells are found mostly in the blood and bone marrow. In SLL cancer cells are found mostly in the lymph nodes. CLL/SLL is a type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma.
clodronate listen (kloh-DROH-nayt)
A drug used in the treatment of hypercalcemia (abnormally high levels of calcium in the blood) and cancer that has spread to the bone (bone metastases). It may decrease pain, the risk of fractures, and the development of new bone metastases.
clofarabine listen (kloh-FAYR-uh-been)
A drug used to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children. It is used in patients whose cancer came back or did not get better after at least two other types of anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Clofarabine blocks cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of purine nucleoside analog. Also called Clolar.
Clolar listen (KLOH-lar)
A drug used to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia in children. It is used in patients whose cancer came back or did not get better after at least two other types of anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Clolar blocks cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of purine nucleoside analog. Also called clofarabine.
clonidine hydrochloride listen (KLOH-nih-deen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure. It is also being studied in the treatment of certain types of cancer pain and as an aid to stop smoking. It blocks the release of chemicals from nerve endings that make blood vessels constrict (get narrower). Clonidine hydrochloride is a type of antihypertensive agent and a type of alpha-adrenergic agonist. Also called Catapres.
Cloretazine listen (klor-EH-tuh-zeen)
A drug used to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of several other types of cancer. It blocks cell growth by damaging the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called laromustine and Onrigin.
Clostridium difficile listen (klah-STRIH-dee-um dih-FIH-sih-lee)
A type of bacterium found in human and animal waste. Clostridium difficile is a common cause of diarrhea that occurs in hospitals. It can also cause diarrhea or other intestinal disorders in patients treated with antibiotics.
clove cigarette listen (klove SIH-guh-ret)
A type of cigarette that is made in Indonesia. It is made using a mixture of tobacco, cloves, and other ingredients. Clove cigarettes contain nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Smoking clove cigarettes can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause lung cancer and other lung conditions. Also called kretek.
CMF
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or with other therapies to treat breast cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, methotrexate, and fluorouracil. Also called CMF regimen.
CMF regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or with other therapies to treat breast cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, methotrexate, and fluorouracil. Also called CMF.
CML
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer in which too many myeloblasts are found in the blood and bone marrow. Myeloblasts are a type of immature blood cell that makes white blood cells called myeloid cells. CML may get worse over time as the number of myeloblasts increases in the blood and bone marrow. This may cause fever, fatigue, easy bleeding, anemia, infection, a swollen spleen, bone pain, or other signs and symptoms. CML is usually marked by a chromosome change called the Philadelphia chromosome, in which a piece of chromosome 9 and a piece of chromosome 22 break off and trade places with each other. It usually occurs in older adults and rarely occurs in children. Also called chronic granulocytic leukemia, chronic myelogenous leukemia, and chronic myeloid leukemia.
CMML
A slowly progressing type of myelodysplastic/myeloproliferative disease in which too many myelomonocytes (a type of white blood cell) are in the bone marrow, crowding out other normal blood cells, such as other white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets. Also called chronic myelomonocytic leukemia.
CMS
A condition that may occur in patients who have had surgery to remove a tumor in certain parts of the brain, including the cerebellum. CMS usually appears 1 or 2 days after surgery. Symptoms include loss of speech, trouble swallowing and eating, loss of balance, trouble walking, loss of muscle tone, mood swings, and changes in personality. Many of these symptoms go away over time. Also called cerebellar mutism syndrome.
CMV
A virus that may be carried in an inactive state for life by healthy individuals. It is a cause of severe pneumonia in people with a suppressed immune system, such as those undergoing bone marrow transplantation or those with leukemia or lymphoma. Also called cytomegalovirus.
cnicin listen (NIH-sin)
A substance found in certain plants, including blessed thistle. It has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. Cnicin is a type of sesquiterpene lactone.
CNS
The brain and spinal cord. Also called central nervous system.
CNS depressant listen (… dee-PREH-sunt)
A type of drug that slows down brain activity, which causes the muscles to relax and calms and soothes a person. CNS depressants are used to treat insomnia (trouble sleeping), anxiety, panic attacks, and seizures. They may also be used to relieve anxiety and tension before surgery. Examples of CNS depressants are benzodiazepines, barbiturates, and certain sleep medicines. CNS depressants are sometimes called sedatives or tranquilizers. Also called central nervous system depressant.
CNS metastasis listen (...meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the central nervous system (CNS). Also called central nervous system metastasis.
CNS PNET listen
A type of cancer that arises from a particular type of cell within the brain or spinal cord. Also called central nervous system primitive neuroectodermal tumor.
CNS prophylaxis listen (... PROH-fih-LAK-sis)
A type of treatment that uses intrathecal chemotherapy (chemotherapy injected directly into the fluid-filled space between the thin layers of tissue that cover the brain and spinal cord) or high-dose chemotherapy injected into a vein to kill cancer cells in the central nervous system (CNS). Radiation therapy is also sometimes used. CNS prophylaxis is given when the cancer is diagnosed because standard chemotherapy cannot get into the CNS and kill cancer cells that may be hiding in there. It is used to lessen the chance cancer will come back in the CNS after the first treatment. CNS prophylaxis is used with other therapy to treat certain types of leukemia and lymphoma that may spread to the CNS. Also called central nervous system prophylaxis.
CNS stimulant listen (... STIM-yoo-lunt)
A type of drug that increases the levels of certain chemicals in the brain and increases alertness, attention, energy, and physical activity. CNS stimulants also raise blood pressure and increase heart rate and breathing rate. They are used to treat depression, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (a disorder in which a person has problems paying attention, controlling actions, and remaining still or quiet), and narcolepsy (a sleep disorder). Also called central nervous system stimulant.
CNS tumor listen (… TOO-mer)
A tumor of the central nervous system (CNS), including brain stem glioma, craniopharyngioma, medulloblastoma, and meningioma. Also called central nervous system tumor.
CNTO 328
A drug used to treat a rare condition called Castleman disease in patients who do not have HIV or human herpesvirus 8. It is also being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. CNTO 328 binds to a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by some white blood cells and other cells in the body. CNTO 328 may help reduce inflammation and stop the growth of cancer cells or abnormal blood cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody, cCLB8, siltuximab, and Sylvant.
coactivated T cell listen (koh-AK-tih-vay-ted … sel)
A T cell that has been coated with monoclonal antibodies to enhance its ability to kill tumor cells.
cobalamin listen (koh-BA-luh-min)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Cobalamin helps make red blood cells, DNA, RNA, energy, and tissues, and keeps nerve cells healthy. It is found in liver, meat, eggs, poultry, shellfish, milk, and milk products. Cobalamin is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough cobalamin can cause certain types of anemia (a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal) and neurologic disorders. It is being studied with folate in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called cyanocobalamin and vitamin B12.
cobalt 60 listen (KOH-bawlt …)
A radioactive form of the metal cobalt, which is used as a source of radiation to treat cancer.
cobimetinib fumarate listen (KOH-bih-MEH-tih-nib FYOO-muh-rayt)
A drug used with vemurafenib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cobimetinib fumarate blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Cotellic.
coccyx listen (KOK-six)
The small bone at the bottom of the spine. It is made up of 3-5 fused bones. Also called tailbone.
Cockayne syndrome listen (KAH-kayn SIN-drome)
A genetic condition characterized by short stature, premature aging, sensitivity to light, and possibly deafness and mental retardation.
co-culture listen (koh-KUL-cher)
A mixture of two or more different kinds of cells that are grown together.
codeine phosphate listen (KOH-deen FOS-fayt)
A drug used to treat pain, cough, and diarrhea. It is made from opium or morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Codeine phosphate is a type of opiate, a type of analgesic agent, a type of antitussive agent, and a type of antidiarrheal agent.
coenzyme Q10 listen (koh-EN-zime ...)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Coenzyme Q10 helps mitochondria (small structures in the cell) make energy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Coenzyme Q10 is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, beef, soybeans, peanuts, and spinach. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and heart disease and in the relief of side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Also called CoQ10, Q10, ubiquinone, and vitamin Q10.
coffee enema listen (KAW-fee EH-neh-muh)
The injection of coffee through the anus into the colon (large intestine). Coffee enemas are being tested in the treatment of pancreatic cancer.
COG listen
A large group of researchers, hospitals, and cancer centers that get support from the National Cancer Institute (NCI) to study childhood cancers. The main goal of the COG is to conduct clinical trials that test new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer in children and adolescents. These clinical trials also include supportive care and childhood cancer survivorship studies. The COG has hospitals and cancer centers in the United States, Canada, Europe, Australia, and New Zealand. It is part of the National Clinical Trials Network (NCTN). Also called Children's Oncology Group.
cognition listen (kog-NIH-shun)
The mental process of thinking, learning, remembering, being aware of surroundings, and using judgment.
cognitive behavior therapy listen (KOG-nih-tiv beh-HAY-vyer THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of psychotherapy that helps patients change their behavior by changing the way they think and feel about certain things. It is used to treat mental, emotional, personality, and behavioral disorders. Also called CBT and cognitive therapy.
cognitive therapy listen (KOG-nih-tiv THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of psychotherapy that helps patients change their behavior by changing the way they think and feel about certain things. It is used to treat mental, emotional, personality, and behavioral disorders. Also called CBT and cognitive behavior therapy.
cohort listen (KOH-hort)
A group of individuals who share a common trait, such as birth year. In medicine, a cohort is a group that is part of a clinical trial or study and is observed over a period of time.
cohort study listen (KOH-hort STUH-dee)
A research study that compares a particular outcome (such as lung cancer) in groups of individuals who are alike in many ways but differ by a certain characteristic (for example, female nurses who smoke compared with those who do not smoke).
coinsurance listen (KOH-in-SHOOR-ents)
The amount of money not covered by a patient’s health insurance that the patient pays for each healthcare service. For example, if a plan covers 80% of the cost of a service, then the coinsurance that the patient pays will be the remaining 20% of the cost.
COL18A1
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. COL18A1 is made from a type of collagen (a protein found in cartilage and other connective tissue). It may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. COL18A1 is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called endostatin.
COL-3
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. COL-3 may block the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
colchicine listen (KOL-chih-seen)
A drug used to treat gout (inflamed joints caused by a buildup of uric acid). It comes from the crocus plant Colchicum autumnale. Colchicine blocks cell division and the movement of certain immune cells to areas that are inflamed. It is a type of alkaloid and a type of mitotic inhibitor.
cold ischemia listen (kold is-KEE-mee-uh)
In surgery, the cooling of a tissue, organ, or body part after its blood supply has been reduced or cut off. This can occur while the organ is still in the body or after it is removed from the body if the organ is to be used for transplantation.
cold ischemia time listen (kold is-KEE-mee-uh …)
In surgery, the time between the chilling of a tissue, organ, or body part after its blood supply has been reduced or cut off and the time it is warmed by having its blood supply restored. This can occur while the organ is still in the body or after it is removed from the body if the organ is to be used for transplantation.
cold knife cone biopsy listen (kold nife kone BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a cone-shaped piece of abnormal tissue is removed from the cervix using a scalpel or laser knife. Some of the tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease, such as cervical cancer. Cold knife cone biopsy may also be used to treat certain cervical conditions. Also called cold knife conization.
cold knife conization listen (kold nife koh-nih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which a cone-shaped piece of abnormal tissue is removed from the cervix using a scalpel or laser knife. Some of the tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease, such as cervical cancer. Cold knife conization may also be used to treat certain cervical conditions. Also called cold knife cone biopsy.
cold nodule listen (kold NAH-jool)
When radioactive material is used to examine the thyroid with a scanner, nodules that collect less radioactive material than the surrounding thyroid tissue are considered "cold." A nodule that is cold does not make thyroid hormone. Cold nodules may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Cold nodules are sometimes called hypofunctioning nodules.
colectomy listen (koh-LEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove all or part of the colon. When only part of the colon is removed, it is called a partial colectomy. In an open colectomy, one long incision is made in the wall of the abdomen and doctors can see the colon directly. In a laparoscopic-assisted colectomy, several small incisions are made and a thin, lighted tube attached to a video camera is inserted through one opening to guide the surgery. Surgical instruments are inserted through the other openings to perform the surgery.
colitis listen (koh-LY-tis)
Inflammation of the colon.
collagen listen (KAH-luh-jen)
A fibrous protein found in cartilage and other connective tissue.
collagen disease listen (KAH-luh-jen dih-ZEEZ)
A term previously used to describe chronic diseases of the connective tissue (e.g., rheumatoid arthritis, systemic lupus erythematosus, and systemic sclerosis), but now is thought to be more appropriate for diseases associated with defects in collagen, which is a component of the connective tissue.
collagenase listen (KAH-luh-jeh-nays)
A type of enzyme that breaks down the protein collagen.
collarbone listen (KAH-ler-bone)
One of a pair of bones at the base of the front of the neck. The collarbones connect the breastbone to the shoulder blades. Also called clavicle.
collecting duct listen (kuh-LEK-ting dukt)
The last part of a long, twisting tube that collects urine from the nephrons (cellular structures in the kidney that filter blood and form urine) and moves it into the renal pelvis and ureters. Also called renal collecting tubule.
collective patient perspective listen (kuh-LEK-tiv PAY-shunt per-SPEK-tiv)
An understanding of the disease experiences of many patients and the ability to describe this collective experience separately from a person’s own disease experience. In cancer research, a collective patient perspective may help scientific researchers develop clinical trials that help meet the needs of more patients.
colloidal gold-bound tumor necrosis factor listen (kuh-LOY-dul ... TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Colloidal gold-bound tumor necrosis factor is made in the laboratory by binding a cancer-killing protein called tumor necrosis factor (TNF) to the surface of very tiny particles of gold. These TNF-gold particles may kill cancer cells without harming healthy tissue. Also called Aurimmune and TNF-bound colloidal gold.
coloanal anastomosis listen (KOH-loh-AY-nul uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A surgical procedure in which the colon is attached to the anus after the rectum has been removed. Also called coloanal pull-through.
coloanal pull-through listen (KOH-loh-AY-nul PUL-throo)
A surgical procedure in which the colon is attached to the anus after the rectum has been removed. Also called coloanal anastomosis.
colon listen (KOH-lun)
The longest part of the large intestine, which is a tube-like organ connected to the small intestine at one end and the anus at the other. The colon removes water and some nutrients and electrolytes from partially digested food. The remaining material, solid waste called stool, moves through the colon to the rectum and leaves the body through the anus.
colon cancer listen (KOH-lun KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the colon (the longest part of the large intestine). Most colon cancers are adenocarcinomas (cancers that begin in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids).
colon crypt listen (KOH-lun kript)
Tube-like gland found in the lining of the colon and rectum. Colon crypt cells renew the lining of the intestine and make mucus. Also called gland of Lieberkuhn.
colon polyp listen (KOH-lun PAH-lip)
An abnormal growth of tissue in the lining of the bowel. Polyps are a risk factor for colon cancer.
colonoscope listen (koh-LAH-noh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the colon. A colonoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
colonoscopy listen (KOH-luh-NOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the colon using a colonoscope, inserted into the rectum. A colonoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
colony-stimulating factor listen (KAH-luh-nee-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting FAK-ter)
A substance that stimulates the production of blood cells. Colony-stimulating factors include granulocyte colony-stimulating factor (G-CSF), granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), and promegapoietin.
colorectal listen (KOH-loh-REK-tul)
Having to do with the colon or the rectum.
colorectal cancer listen (KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer that develops in the colon (the longest part of the large intestine) and/or the rectum (the last several inches of the large intestine before the anus).
colostomy listen (koh-LOS-toh-mee)
An opening into the colon from the outside of the body. A colostomy provides a new path for waste material to leave the body after part of the colon has been removed.
colostomy irrigation listen (koh-LOS-toh-mee EER-ih-GAY-shun)
A procedure in which a patient with a colostomy flushes the colon with water, using a tube that is inserted into the stoma (a surgically created opening in the body that connects an organ or area inside the body with the outside). This causes the colon to empty and pass stool through the stoma into a bag. The procedure should be done at the same time every day. It may allow colostomy patients to have better control over their bodies.
colposcope listen (KOL-poh-SKOPE)
A lighted magnifying instrument used to check the cervix, vagina, and vulva for signs of disease.
colposcopy listen (kol-POS-koh-pee)
A procedure in which a lighted, magnifying instrument called a colposcope is used to examine the cervix, vagina, and vulva. During colposcopy, an instrument called a speculum is inserted into the vagina to widen it so that the cervix can be seen more easily. A vinegar solution may be used to make abnormal tissue easier to see with the colposcope. Tissue samples may be taken using a spoon-shaped instrument called a curette and checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Colposcopy may be used to check for cancers of the cervix, vagina, and vulva, and changes that may lead to cancer.
coma listen (KOH-muh)
A condition in which a patient is in a state of deep sleep and cannot be awakened. A coma may be caused by many things, including trauma, drugs, toxins, or certain diseases.
combination antiretroviral therapy listen (KOM-bih-NAY-shun AN-tee-REH-troh-VY-rul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses a combination of three or more drugs to treat HIV infection. Combination antiretroviral therapy stops the virus from making copies of itself in the body. This may lessen the damage to the immune system caused by HIV and may slow down the development of AIDS. It may also help prevent transmission of HIV to others, including from mother to child during birth. Also called cART, HAART, and highly active antiretroviral therapy.
combination chemotherapy listen (KOM-bih-NAY-shun KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using more than one anticancer drug.
combination therapy listen (KOM-bih-NAY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Therapy that combines more than one method of treatment. Also called multimodality therapy and multimodality treatment.
combined androgen blockade listen (kum-BINDE AN-droh-jen blah-KAYD)
Treatment used to block androgen (male hormone) activity in the body. This may be done by giving an antiandrogen drug and removing the testicles (orchiectomy) or by giving an antiandrogen drug with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Combined androgen blockade may stop the growth of cancer cells that need androgens to grow, and is used in the treatment of prostate cancer. Also called complete androgen blockade and total androgen blockade.
combretastatin A4 phosphate listen (kum-BREE-tuh-STA-tin … FOS-fayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It decreases the flow of blood to tumors and may kill cancer cells. Combretastatin A4 phosphate comes from the African bush willow. It is a type of tubulin-binding agent and a type of vascular targeting agent.
comedo carcinoma listen (KAH-meh-doh KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of ductal carcinoma in situ (very early-stage breast cancer).
Cometriq listen (koh-MEH-trik)
A drug used to treat progressive medullary thyroid cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cometriq blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Cometriq contains the active ingredient cabozantinib-s-malate. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
comfort care listen (KUM-furt kayr)
Care given to improve the quality of life of patients who have a serious or life-threatening disease. The goal of comfort care is to prevent or treat as early as possible the symptoms of a disease, side effects caused by treatment of a disease, and psychological, social, and spiritual problems related to a disease or its treatment. Also called palliative care, supportive care, and symptom management.
common bile duct listen (KAH-mun bile dukt)
A tube that carries bile from the liver and the gallbladder through the pancreas and into the duodenum (the upper part of the small intestine). It is formed where the ducts from the liver and gallbladder are joined. It is part of the biliary duct system.
common hepatic duct listen (KAH-mun heh-PA-tik dukt)
A tube that carries bile from the liver. It starts where the right and left hepatic (liver) ducts join outside the liver. It ends where the cystic duct from the gall bladder joins it to form the common bile duct. It is part of the biliary duct system.
Community Advisory Board listen (kuh-MYOO-nih-tee ad-VIZE-ree bord)
In medicine, a group of non-scientist volunteers that serves as a link between a community and clinical trial researchers. A Community Advisory Board may review and monitor clinical trials and help teach the community about the trials. Also called CAB.
comorbidity listen (koh-mor-BIH-dih-tee)
The condition of having two or more diseases at the same time.
companion diagnostic test (kum-PAN-yun DY-ug-NAH-stik …)
A test used to help match a patient to a specific drug or therapy. For example, a companion diagnostic test may identify whether a patient’s tumor has a specific gene change or biomarker that is targeted by the drug. This helps determine if the patient should receive the drug or not. Companion diagnostic tests can also be used to find out whether serious side effects may occur from treatment or how well treatment is working. Most drugs with a companion diagnostic test are cancer drugs that target specific tumor mutations.
comparative anatomy listen (kum-PAYR-uh-tiv uh-NA-toh-mee)
The comparison of the structure (anatomy) of one animal or plant with the structure of a different animal or plant.
compassionate use trial listen (kum-PA-shuh-nut yoos TRY-ul)
A way to provide an investigational therapy to a patient who is not eligible to receive that therapy in a clinical trial, but who has a serious or life-threatening illness for which other treatments are not available. Compassionate use trials allow patients to receive promising but not yet fully studied or approved cancer therapies when no other treatment option exists. Also called expanded access trial.
complement protein listen (KOM-pleh-ment PROH-teen)
One of a group of about 20 proteins that is found in the blood and is important in fighting infections and other diseases.
complementary and alternative medicine listen (KOM-pleh-MEN-tuh-ree... all-TER-nuh-tiv MEH-dih-sin)
Forms of treatment that are used in addition to (complementary) or instead of (alternative) standard treatments. These practices generally are not considered standard medical approaches. Standard treatments go through a long and careful research process to prove they are safe and effective, but less is known about most types of complementary and alternative medicine. Complementary and alternative medicine may include dietary supplements, megadose vitamins, herbal preparations, special teas, acupuncture, massage therapy, magnet therapy, spiritual healing, and meditation. Also called CAM.
complementary medicine listen (KOM-pleh-MEN-tuh-ree MEH-dih-sin)
Treatments that are used along with standard treatments, but are not considered standard. Standard treatments are based on the results of scientific research and are currently accepted and widely used. Less research has been done for most types of complementary medicine. Complementary medicine includes acupuncture, dietary supplements, massage therapy, hypnosis, and meditation. For example, acupuncture may be used with certain drugs to help lessen cancer pain or nausea and vomiting.
complete androgen blockade listen (kum-PLEET AN-droh-jen blah-KAYD)
Treatment used to block androgen (male hormone) activity in the body. This may be done by giving an antiandrogen drug and removing the testicles (orchiectomy) or by giving an antiandrogen drug with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Complete androgen blockade may stop the growth of cancer cells that need androgens to grow, and is used in the treatment of prostate cancer. Also called combined androgen blockade and total androgen blockade.
complete blood count listen (kum-PLEET blud kownt)
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood. The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A complete blood count is used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions. Also called blood cell count, CBC, and full blood count.
complete hysterectomy listen (kum-PLEET HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire uterus, including the cervix. Also called total hysterectomy.
complete metastasectomy listen (kum-PLEET meh-TAS-tuh-SEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all metastases (tumors formed from cells that have spread from the primary tumor).
complete remission listen (kum-PLEET reh-MIH-shun)
The disappearance of all signs of cancer in response to treatment. This does not always mean the cancer has been cured. Also called complete response.
complete response listen (kum-PLEET reh-SPONTS)
The disappearance of all signs of cancer in response to treatment. This does not always mean the cancer has been cured. Also called complete remission.
complex decongestive therapy listen (KOM-plex DEE-kun-JEH-stiv THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment to reduce lymphedema (swelling caused by a buildup of lymph fluid in tissue). This therapy uses massage to move the fluid away from areas where lymph vessels are blocked, damaged, or removed by surgery. This helps remove extra fluid. The affected area is then wrapped in a special bandage. Later, a compression garment (tight-fitting, elastic piece of clothing) is worn to keep fluid from building up again.
compliance listen (kum-PLY-unts)
The act of following a medical regimen or schedule correctly and consistently, including taking medicines or following a diet.
complication listen (kom-plih-KAY-shun)
In medicine, a medical problem that occurs during a disease, or after a procedure or treatment. The complication may be caused by the disease, procedure, or treatment or may be unrelated to them.
composite hemangioendothelioma listen (kum-PAH-zit hee-MAN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A blood vessel tumor that is made up of different types of cells and has features that are both benign (not cancer) and malignant (cancer). Composite hemangioendotheliomas usually form on or under the skin on the arms or legs. They may also form on the head, neck, or chest. Composite hemangioendotheliomas may spread to nearby lymph nodes, but usually do not spread to other parts of the body. They may come back in the same place after treatment. They are most common in adults. Composite hemangioendotheliomas are a type of vascular tumor.
composite lymphoma listen (kum-PAH-zit lim-FOH-muh)
A rare form of lymphoma (cancer that begins in cells of the immune system) in which different types of lymphoma cells occur at the same time. The different lymphoma cells may form in the same tissue or organ or in many different tissues or organs. The composite lymphoma may contain different types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma cells or both Hodgkin and non-Hodgkin lymphoma cells.
compound listen (KOM-pownd)
In science, a substance made from two or more different elements that have been chemically joined. Examples of compounds include water (H2O), which is made from the elements hydrogen and oxygen, and table salt (NaCl), which is made from the elements sodium and chloride.
compound nevus listen (KOM-pownd NEE-vus)
A type of mole formed by groups of nevus cells found in the epidermis and dermis (the two main layers of tissue that make up the skin).
comprehensive cancer center listen (KOM-pree-HEN-siv KAN-ser ...)
A cancer research center that gets support from the National Cancer Institute (NCI) to do cancer research and provide services directly to cancer patients. Scientists and doctors at these centers do basic laboratory research and clinical trials, and they study the patterns, causes, and control of cancer in groups of people. Also, they take part in multicenter clinical trials, which enroll patients from many parts of the country. Comprehensive Cancer Centers also give cancer information to health care professionals and the public. More information about the NCI Cancer Centers Program can be found on the NCI's Web site at http://cancercenters.cancer.gov/.
comprehensive pediatric cancer center listen (KOM-pree-HEN-siv pee-dee-A-trik ...)
A cancer research center that gets support from the National Cancer Institute (NCI). Scientists and doctors at these centers do basic laboratory research and clinical trials on childhood cancers, and they study the patterns, causes, and control of cancer in groups of children. Also, they treat patients from many parts of the country and give cancer information to health care professionals and the public. More information about the NCI Cancer Centers Program can be found on the NCI's Web site at https://cancercenters.cancer.gov/.
compression listen (kum-PREH-shun)
A pressing or squeezing together. In medicine, it can describe a structure, such as a tumor, that presses on another part of the body, such as a nerve. It can also describe the flattening of soft tissue, such as the breast, that occurs during a mammogram (x-ray of the breast).
compression bandage listen (kum-PREH-shun BAN-dij)
A bandage designed to provide pressure to a particular area.
compression fracture listen (kum-PREH-shun FRAK-sher)
A type of break in a bone caused by pressure and in which the bone collapses. Compression fractures usually occur in the spine (backbone) and in bones made weak by cancer or by osteoporosis (a decrease in bone mass and density).
compression garment listen (kum-PREH-shun GAR-ment)
A tight-fitting, elastic garment, such as a sleeve or stocking. Compression garments are used in the treatment of lymphedema (swelling caused by a buildup of lymph fluid in tissue). They are also used to improve blood flow.
compression pump listen (kum-PREH-shun …)
A machine used to keep blood and lymph flowing by pushing air through bands or sleeves that are placed on the arms or legs.
compulsion listen (kum-PUL-zhun)
An uncontrollable urge to say or do something without an obvious reason. A person may repeat a behavior, such as hand-washing, over and over.
computational biology (kom-pyoo-TAY-shuh-nul by-AH-loh-jee)
A field of science that uses computers, databases, math, and statistics to collect, store, organize, and analyze large amounts of biological, medical, and health information. Information may come from many sources, including genetic and molecular research studies, patient statistics, tissue specimens, clinical trials, and scientific journals. Also called bioinformatics.
computed tomographic colonography listen (kum-PYOO-ted toh-muh-GRA-fik KOH-lun-AH-gruh-fee)
A method to examine the inside of the colon by taking a series of x-rays. A computer is used to make 2-dimensional (2-D) and 3-D pictures of the colon from these x-rays. The pictures can be saved, changed to give better viewing angles, and reviewed after the procedure, even years later. Also called computed tomography colonography, CT colonography, CTC, and virtual colonoscopy.
computed tomography angiography listen (kum-PYOO-ted toh-MAH-gruh-fee an-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to create a series of detailed pictures of the blood vessels and blood flow inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are created by a computer linked to an x-ray machine. A dye is injected into a vein to make the blood vessels and blood flow easier to see on the x-ray. Computed tomography angiography may be used to check for aneurysms (a bulge in the blood vessel wall), blockages in the arteries, blood clots, and other blood vessel problems. Also called CT angiography and CTA.
computed tomography colonography listen (kum-PYOO-ted toh-MAH-gruh-fee KOH-luh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A method to examine the inside of the colon by taking a series of x-rays. A computer is used to make 2-dimensional (2-D) and 3-D pictures of the colon from these x-rays. The pictures can be saved, changed to give better viewing angles, and reviewed after the procedure, even years later. Also called computed tomographic colonography, CT colonography, CTC, and virtual colonoscopy.
computed tomography scan listen (kum-PYOO-ted toh-MAH-gruh-fee skan)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are used to create 3-dimensional (3-D) views of tissues and organs. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the tissues and organs show up more clearly. A computed tomography scan may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called CAT scan, computerized axial tomography scan, computerized tomography, and CT scan.
computerized axial tomography scan listen (kum-PYOO-teh-RIZED AK-see-ul toh-MAH-gruh-fee skan)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are used to create 3-dimensional (3-D) views of tissues and organs. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the tissues and organs show up more clearly. A computerized axial tomography scan may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called CAT scan, computed tomography scan, computerized tomography, and CT scan.
computerized tomography listen (kum-PYOO-teh-RIZED toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are used to create 3-dimensional (3-D) views of tissues and organs. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the tissues and organs show up more clearly. A computerized tomography may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called CAT scan, computed tomography scan, computerized axial tomography scan, and CT scan.
concentration listen (KON-sen-TRAY-shun)
In science, the amount of a substance, such as a salt, that is in a certain amount of tissue or liquid, such as blood. A substance becomes more concentrated when less water is present. For example, the salt in urine may become more concentrated when a person doesn’t drink enough water.
conception listen (kun-SEP-shun)
In biology, the beginning of pregnancy, marked by fertilization of an egg by a sperm.
Concerta listen (kon-SER-tuh)
A drug used to treat certain behavior disorders, such as attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). It is also being studied as a way to improve brain function in patients treated with anticancer drugs. Concerta acts on certain parts of the brain. It is a type of central nervous system stimulant. Also called methylphenidate hydrochloride and Ritalin.
concomitant listen (kon-KAH-mih-tunt)
Occurring or existing at the same time as something else. In medicine, it may refer to a condition a person has or a medication a person is taking that is not being studied in the clinical trial he or she is taking part in.
concurrent therapy listen (kun-KER-ent THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment that is given at the same time as another.
condition listen (kun-DIH-shun)
In medicine, a health problem with certain characteristics or symptoms.
conditioned response listen (kun-DIH-shund reh-SPONTS)
A type of learning in which repeated exposure to something may affect a person’s behavior when they encounter an unrelated object, sound, or smell that occurred at the same time as the initial exposure. For example, a patient who always feels sick after receiving chemotherapy in a clinic that smells a certain way may be conditioned to feel sick when smelling the same odor in a different place.
conditioned stimulus listen (kun-DIH-shund STIM-yoo-lus)
A situation in which one signal, or stimulus, is given just before another signal. After this happens several times, the first signal alone can cause the response that would usually need the second signal.
conditioning regimen listen (kun-DIH-shuh-ning REH-jih-men)
The treatments used to prepare a patient for stem cell transplantation (a procedure in which a person receives blood stem cells, which make any type of blood cell). A conditioning regimen may include chemotherapy, monoclonal antibody therapy, and radiation to the entire body. It helps make room in the patient’s bone marrow for new blood stem cells to grow, helps prevent the patient's body from rejecting the transplanted cells, and helps kill any cancer cells that are in the body.
condyloma listen (KON-dih-LOH-muh)
A raised growth on the surface of the genitals caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection. The HPV in condyloma is very contagious and can be spread by skin-to-skin contact, usually during oral, anal, or genital sex with an infected partner. Also called genital wart.
cone biopsy listen (kone BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a cone-shaped piece of abnormal tissue is removed from the cervix. A scalpel, a laser knife, or a thin wire loop heated by an electric current may be used to remove the tissue. The tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Cone biopsy may be used to check for cervical cancer or to treat certain cervical conditions. Types of cone biopsy are LEEP (loop electrosurgical excision procedure) and cold knife conization (cold knife cone biopsy). Also called conization.
confusion listen (kun-FYOO-zhun)
A mental state in which one is not thinking clearly.
congenital listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul)
A condition or trait present at birth. It may be the result of genetic or non-genetic factors.
congenital fibrosarcoma listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue. Congenital fibrosarcoma usually occurs in infants and young children but it may also be found before birth by ultrasound. It can occur anywhere in the body. The tumor is often large and fast-growing, but it rarely spreads to other parts of the body. The cancer cells usually have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Congenital fibrosarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called infantile fibrosarcoma.
congenital hemangioma listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that is fully formed at birth. Congenital hemangiomas usually form on the skin of the head and neck or arms and legs. They may also form in organs, such as the liver. Congenital hemangiomas may be raised or flat and usually appear as purple-red lesions on the skin. Some congenital hemangiomas go away on their own; others only partly go away or do not go away at all. Congenital hemangiomas are a type of vascular tumor.
congenital hypoplastic anemia listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul HY-poh-PLAS-tik uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with congenital hypoplastic anemia may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, DBA, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, erythrogenesis imperfecta, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
congenital mesoblastic nephroma listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul MEH-zoh-BLAS-tik neh-FROH-muh)
A type of kidney tumor that is usually found before birth by ultrasound or within the first 3 months of life. It contains fibroblastic cells (connective tissue cells), and may spread to the other kidney or to nearby tissue. Congenital mesoblastic nephroma is more common in males.
congenital neutropenia listen (kon-JEH-nih-tul noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called genetic infantile agranulocytosis, infantile genetic agranulocytosis, Kostmann disease, Kostmann neutropenia, and Kostmann syndrome.
congenital pure red cell aplasia listen (kun-JEH-nih-tul … sel uh-PLAY-zhuh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with congenital pure red cell aplasia may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital hypoplastic anemia, DBA, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, erythrogenesis imperfecta, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
congestive heart failure listen (kun-JES-tiv hart FAYL-yer)
Weakness of the heart muscle that leads to a buildup of fluid in body tissues.
conization listen (koh-nih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which a cone-shaped piece of abnormal tissue is removed from the cervix. A scalpel, a laser knife, or a thin wire loop heated by an electric current may be used to remove the tissue. The tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Conization may be used to check for cervical cancer or to treat certain cervical conditions. Types of conization are LEEP (loop electrosurgical excision procedure) and cold knife conization (cold knife cone biopsy). Also called cone biopsy.
conjugate listen (KON-jih-gut)
A compound formed by chemically joining two or more different substances. For example, an antibody-drug conjugate is made up of a monoclonal antibody that is chemically linked to a drug. Some conjugates are used to treat cancer.
conjunctiva listen (KON-junk-TY-vuh)
A membrane that lines the inner surface of the eyelid and also covers the front part of the eye. Conjunctivitis is inflammation of the conjunctiva.
conjunctivitis listen (kun-JUNK-tih-VY-tis)
A condition in which the conjunctiva (membranes lining the eyelids and covering the white part of the eye) become inflamed or infected. Also called pinkeye.
connecting peptide listen (kuh-NEK-ting PEP-tide)
A substance made by the pancreas. Connecting peptide and insulin are both part of a larger molecule that gets split apart before being released into the blood. Abnormal blood levels of connecting peptide may occur in certain diseases, such as diabetes or cancer. Also called C-peptide.
connective tissue listen (kuh-NEK-tiv TIH-shoo)
Tissue that supports, protects, and gives structure to other tissues and organs in the body. Connective tissue also stores fat, helps move nutrients and other substances between tissues and organs, and helps repair damaged tissue. Connective tissue is made up of cells, fibers, and a gel-like substance. Types of connective tissue include bone, cartilage, fat, blood, and lymphatic tissue.
conscious sedation listen (KON-shus seh-DAY-shun)
A level of sedation in which a person is asleep but wakes when spoken to or touched. Conscious sedation is caused by special drugs and is used to help relieve anxiety during certain medical or surgical procedures. Drugs that relieve pain may be given at the same time. Also called moderate sedation.
consecutive case series listen (kun-SEH-kyoo-tiv kays SEER-eez)
A clinical study that includes all eligible patients identified by the researchers during the study registration period. The patients are treated in the order in which they are identified. This type of study usually does not have a control group.
Consensus Development Program listen (kun-SEN-sus dee-VEH-lup-ment PROH-gram)
A program of the National Institutes of Health to bring together an independent group of experts to review scientific evidence related to an important public health issue. For a specific issue, a panel of experts (such as doctors and scientists) reviews reports and papers on the subject, listens to information presented by other experts in the field, and hears comments from the general public. Based on the evidence presented, the panel writes a report summarizing the findings, which is made available to the public. The report is not intended to be a practice guideline.
consent form listen (kun-SENT ...)
A document with important information about a medical procedure or treatment, a clinical trial, or genetic testing. It also includes information on possible risks and benefits. If a person chooses to take part in the treatment, procedure, trial, or testing, he or she signs the form to give official consent.
consent process listen (kun-SENT PRAH-ses)
A process in which patients are given important information, including possible risks and benefits, about a medical procedure or treatment, genetic testing, or a clinical trial. This is to help them decide if they want to be treated, tested, or take part in the trial. Patients are also given any new information that might affect their decision to continue. Also called informed consent.
consolidation therapy listen (kun-SAH-lih-DAY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given after cancer has disappeared following the initial therapy. Consolidation therapy is used to kill any cancer cells that may be left in the body. It may include radiation therapy, a stem cell transplant, or treatment with drugs that kill cancer cells. Also called intensification therapy and postremission therapy.
constipation listen (KON-stih-PAY-shun)
A condition in which stool becomes hard, dry, and difficult to pass, and bowel movements don’t happen very often. Other symptoms may include painful bowel movements, and feeling bloated, uncomfortable, and sluggish.
constitutional acupuncture listen (KON-stih-TOO-shuh-nul AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A type of acupuncture based on a form of Oriental medicine in which treatment is based on a person’s constitution. According to this type of medicine, the constitution is the specific way a person’s organs affect health and how he or she looks, thinks, behaves, and responds to treatment. Also called Korean acupuncture.
constitutional DNA listen (KAWNT-stuh-TOO-shuh-nul...)
The DNA in germ cells (egg and sperm cells that join to form an embryo). Constitutional DNA is the source of DNA for all other cells in the body. Also called germline DNA.
contiguous listen (kun-TIG-yoo-us)
Touching or very close together.
contiguous lymphoma listen (kun-TIG-yoo-us lim-FOH-muh)
Lymphoma in which the lymph nodes containing cancer are next to each other.
continent reservoir listen (KON-tih-nent REH-ser-vwar)
A pouch formed from a piece of small intestine to hold urine after the bladder has been removed.
contingency management listen (kun-TIN-jen-see MA-nij-ment)
In medicine, a treatment plan that gives immediate rewards for desired changes in behavior. It is based on the principle that if a good behavior is rewarded, it is more likely to be repeated. This is often used in the treatment of drug and alcohol abuse, and is being studied as a smoking cessation method.
continuous hyperthermic peritoneal perfusion listen (kon-TIN-yoo-us HY-per-THER-mik PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul per-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure that bathes the abdominal cavity in fluid that contains anticancer drugs. This fluid is warmer than body temperature. This procedure appears to kill cancer cells without harming normal cells. Also called CHPP.
continuous infusion listen (kon-TIN-yoo-us in-FYOO-zhun)
The administration of a fluid into a blood vessel, usually over a prolonged period of time.
continuum of care listen (kon-TIN-yoo-um … kayr)
In medicine, describes the delivery of health care over a period of time. In patients with a disease, this covers all phases of illness from diagnosis to the end of life.
contraception listen (KON-truh-SEP-shun)
The use of drugs, devices, or surgery to prevent pregnancy. There are many different types of contraception. These include barrier methods to keep sperm from fertilizing the egg, hormone methods, intrauterine devices (IUDs), and surgery to close the fallopian tubes in women or close off the two tubes that carry sperm out of the testicles in men. Also called birth control.
Contract Research Organization listen (KON-trakt REE-serch OR-guh-nih-ZAY-shun)
A company hired by another company or research center to take over certain parts of running a clinical trial. The company may design, manage, and monitor the trial, and analyze the results. Also called CRO.
contracture listen (kun-TRAK-cher)
A permanent tightening of the muscles, tendons, skin, and nearby tissues that causes the joints to shorten and become very stiff. This prevents normal movement of a joint or other body part. Contractures may be caused by injury, scarring, and nerve damage, or by not using the muscles. It may also occur at some point in time after a stem cell transplant that caused chronic graft-versus-host disease.
contraindication listen (KON-truh-IN-dih-KAY-shun)
Anything (including a symptom or medical condition) that is a reason for a person to not receive a particular treatment or procedure because it may be harmful. For example, having a bleeding disorder is a contraindication for taking aspirin because treatment with aspirin may cause excess bleeding.
contralateral listen (KON-truh-LA-teh-rul)
Having to do with the opposite side of the body.
contrast esophagram listen (KON-trast ee-SAH-fuh-gram)
A series of x-ray pictures of the esophagus taken after a patient drinks a liquid containing barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). The barium sulfate coats and outlines the inner wall of the esophagus so that it can be seen on the x-ray pictures. Also called esophagram.
contrast material listen (KON-trast muh-TEER-ee-ul)
A dye or other substance that helps show abnormal areas inside the body. It is given by injection into a vein, by enema, or by mouth. Contrast material may be used with x-rays, CT scans, MRI, or other imaging tests.
control animal listen (kun-TROLE A-nih-mul)
An animal in a study that does not receive the treatment being tested. Comparing the health of control animals with the health of treated animals allows researchers to evaluate the effects of a treatment more accurately.
control group listen (kun-TROLE groop)
In a clinical trial, the group that does not receive the new treatment being studied. This group is compared to the group that receives the new treatment, to see if the new treatment works.
controlled clinical trial listen (kun-TROLD KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A clinical study that includes a comparison (control) group. The comparison group receives a placebo, another treatment, or no treatment at all.
controlled study listen (kun-TROLD STUH-dee)
An experiment or clinical trial that includes a comparison (control) group.
controlled substance listen (kun-TROLD SUB-stunts)
A drug or other substance that is tightly controlled by the government because it may be abused or cause addiction. The control applies to the way the substance is made, used, handled, stored, and distributed. Controlled substances include opioids, stimulants, depressants, hallucinogens, and anabolic steroids. Controlled substances with known medical use, such as morphine, Valium, and Ritalin, are available only by prescription from a licensed medical professional. Other controlled substances, such as heroin and LSD, have no known medical use and are illegal in the United States.
conventional medicine listen (kun-VEN-shuh-nul MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called allopathic medicine, biomedicine, mainstream medicine, orthodox medicine, and Western medicine.
conventional therapy listen (kun-VEN-shuh-nul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is widely accepted and used by most healthcare professionals. It is different from alternative or complementary therapies, which are not as widely used. Examples of conventional therapy for cancer include chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and surgery. Also called conventional treatment.
conventional treatment listen (kun-VEN-shuh-nul TREET-ment)
Treatment that is widely accepted and used by most healthcare professionals. It is different from alternative or complementary therapies, which are not as widely used. Examples of conventional treatment for cancer include chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and surgery. Also called conventional therapy.
convulsion listen (kun-VUL-zhun)
A condition in which muscles contract and relax quickly and cause uncontrolled shaking of the body. Head injuries, high fevers, some medical disorders, and certain drugs can cause convulsions. They may also occur during seizures caused by epilepsy.
Coombs test listen (koomz test)
A laboratory test to identify antibodies that can bind to the surface of red blood cells or platelets and destroy them. This test is used to diagnose certain blood disorders in which patients make antibodies to their own red blood cells or platelets. It is also used to determine blood type. Also called antiglobulin test.
copanlisib hydrochloride listen (koh-PAN-lih-sib HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat follicular lymphoma that has relapsed (come back) after treatment with at least two other anticancer therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Copanlisib hydrochloride blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called Aliqopa.
copay listen (KOH-pay)
The amount of money that a patient with health insurance pays for each healthcare service, such as a visit to the doctor, laboratory tests, prescription medicines, and hospital stays. The amount of the copay usually depends on the type of healthcare service. Also called copayment.
copayment listen (KOH-pay-ment)
The amount of money that a patient with health insurance pays for each healthcare service, such as a visit to the doctor, laboratory tests, prescription medicines, and hospital stays. The amount of the copayment usually depends on the type of healthcare service. Also called copay.
COPD
A type of lung disease marked by permanent damage to tissues in the lungs, making it hard to breathe. COPD includes chronic bronchitis, in which the bronchi (large air passages) are inflamed and scarred, and emphysema, in which the alveoli (tiny air sacs) are damaged. It develops over many years and is usually caused by cigarette smoking. Also called chronic obstructive pulmonary disease.
COPDAC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat certain types of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in males. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, and dacarbazine. Also called COPDAC regimen.
COPDAC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat certain types of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in males. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, and dacarbazine. Also called COPDAC.
cope listen (kope)
To adjust to new situations and overcome problems.
Copiktra listen (koh-PIK-truh)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, small lymphocytic lymphoma, and follicular lymphoma that have relapsed (come back) or have not gotten better after treatment with at least two other therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Copiktra blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called duvelisib.
coping skills listen (KOH-ping skilz)
The methods a person uses to deal with stressful situations. These may help a person face a situation, take action, and be flexible and persistent in solving problems.
copolymer listen (KOH-pah-lih-mer)
A molecule made up of two or more different kinds of small molecules called monomers. The monomers are joined together in a repeating pattern.
COPP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin and non-Hodgkin lymphomas. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called COPP regimen.
COPP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin and non-Hodgkin lymphomas. It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called COPP.
COPP-ABV
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma in children. It may be used with radiation therapy. COPP-ABV includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, prednisone, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, and vinblastine sulfate. Also called COPP-ABV regimen.
COPP-ABV regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma in children. It may be used with radiation therapy. COPP-ABV regimen includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, prednisone, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, and vinblastine sulfate. Also called COPP-ABV.
copper Cu 64-ATSM listen (KAH-per …)
A substance being studied in PET imaging to detect certain types of tumors. Copper Cu 64 is a radioactive substance. It is linked to ATSM, which is taken up by tissues that have low levels of oxygen, such as some tumor tissues. A PET scanner is used to detect which cells in the body have taken up copper Cu 64-ATSM. It is a type of radioimaging agent.
CoQ10
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. CoQ10 helps mitochondria (small structures in the cell) make energy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). CoQ10 is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, beef, soybeans, peanuts, and spinach. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and heart disease and in the relief of side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Also called coenzyme Q10, Q10, ubiquinone, and vitamin Q10.
cordectomy listen (kor-DEK-toh-mee)
An operation on the vocal cords or on the spinal cord.
Corderone listen (KOR-deh-rone)
A drug used to treat certain types of abnormal heart rhythms that have not gotten better with other drugs. Corderone affects the electrical activity of the heart. It is a type of antiarrhythmic agent. Also called amiodarone hydrochloride.
cordycepin listen (KOR-duh-see-pin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to a family of drugs called antitumor antibiotics.
core biopsy listen (... BY-op-see)
The removal of a tissue sample with a wide needle for examination under a microscope. Also called core needle biopsy.
core needle biopsy listen (... NEE-dul BY-op-see)
The removal of a tissue sample with a wide needle for examination under a microscope. Also called core biopsy.
Coreg listen (KOR-eg)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and certain heart problems. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of side effects caused by some anticancer drugs. Coreg blocks certain receptors on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to dilate (widen). It is a type of antihypertensive agent and a type of antianginal agent. Also called carvedilol phosphate.
Coriolus versicolor extract listen (KOR-ee-OH-lus VER-sih-KUH-ler EK-strakt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancer and other types of cancer. Coriolus versicolor is a type of mushroom. Its extract is used with other treatments in some cultures to treat cancer and other conditions. The extract may boost the immune system, slow the growth of some tumor cells, and lessen the side effects of chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is a type of biological response modifier (BRM) and a type of dietary supplement.
cornea listen (KOR-nee-uh)
The transparent part of the eye that covers the iris and the pupil and allows light to enter the inside.
coronary artery bypass listen (KOR-uh-NAYR-ee AR-tuh-ree BY-pas)
Surgery in which a healthy blood vessel taken from another part of the body is used to make a new path for blood around a blocked artery leading to the heart. This restores the flow of oxygen and nutrients to the heart. Also called aortocoronary bypass and CAB.
coronary artery disease listen (KOR-uh-NAYR-ee AR-tuh-ree dih-ZEEZ)
A disease in which there is a narrowing or blockage of the coronary arteries (blood vessels that carry blood and oxygen to the heart). Coronary artery disease is usually caused by atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries). The disease may cause chest pain, shortness of breath during exercise, and heart attacks. The risk of coronary artery disease is increased by having a family history of coronary artery disease before age 50, older age, smoking tobacco, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, diabetes, lack of exercise, and obesity. Also called CAD and coronary heart disease.
coronary heart disease listen (KOR-uh-NAYR-ee hart dih-ZEEZ)
A disease in which there is a narrowing or blockage of the coronary arteries (blood vessels that carry blood and oxygen to the heart). Coronary heart disease is usually caused by atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries). The disease may cause chest pain, shortness of breath during exercise, and heart attacks. The risk of coronary heart disease is increased by having a family history of coronary heart disease before age 50, older age, smoking tobacco, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, diabetes, lack of exercise, and obesity. Also called CAD and coronary artery disease.
corpus cavernosum listen (KOR-pus KA-ver-NOH-sum)
One of two columns of spongy tissue that runs through the shaft (body) of the penis. The corpus cavernosum forms most of the penis and contains blood vessels that fill with blood to help make an erection.
corpus spongiosum listen (KOR-pus SPUN-jee-OH-sum)
A column of spongy tissue that runs through the shaft (body) and glans (head) of the penis. The corpus spongiosum surrounds the urethra (the tube through which urine and sperm pass from the body). It contains blood vessels that fill with blood to help make an erection and keep the urethra open during the erection.
corpus uteri listen (KOR-pus YOO-TEH-ry)
The body of the uterus.
corticosteroid listen (KOR-tih-koh-STAYR-oyd)
Any steroid hormone made in the adrenal cortex (the outer part of the adrenal gland). They are also made in the laboratory. Corticosteroids have many different effects in the body, and are used to treat many different conditions. They may be used as hormone replacement, to suppress the immune system, and to treat some side effects of cancer and its treatment. Corticosteroids are also used to treat certain lymphomas and lymphoid leukemias.
corticotropin listen (KOR-tih-koh-TROH-pin)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. Corticotropin acts on the outer part of the adrenal gland to control its release of corticosteroid hormones. More corticotropin is made during times of stress. Also called ACTH and adrenocorticotropic hormone.
cortisol listen (KOR-tih-sol)
A hormone made by the adrenal cortex (the outer layer of the adrenal gland). It helps the body use glucose (a sugar), protein, and fats. Cortisol made in the laboratory is called hydrocortisone. It is used to treat many conditions, including inflammation, allergies, and some cancers. Cortisol is a type of glucocorticoid hormone.
cortisone listen (KOR-tih-sone)
A natural steroid hormone produced in the adrenal gland. It can also be made in the laboratory. Cortisone reduces swelling and can suppress immune responses.
Corynebacterium granulosum (kah-RY-nee-bak-TEER-ee-um GRAN-yoo-LOH-sum)
A bacterium that can cause skin disorders. Substances taken from this bacterium can stimulate the immune system and may help kill cancer cells.
Cosmegen listen (KOS-muh-jin)
A drug used to treat Ewing sarcoma, gestational trophoblastic tumor, Wilms tumor, and certain types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat rhabdomyosarcoma in children. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cosmegen comes from the bacterium Streptomyces parvulus. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anticancer antibiotic. Also called actinomycin D and dactinomycin.
cost sharing listen (… SHAYR-ing)
A term used to describe the practice of dividing the cost of healthcare services between the patient and the insurance plan. For example, if a plan pays 80% of the cost of a service, then the patient pays the remaining 20% of the cost. The most common form of cost sharing is for deductibles, coinsurance, and copayments. Cost sharing usually does not include the payment of monthly health insurance premiums or the cost of non-covered healthcare services.
Costello syndrome listen (KOS-teh-loh SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder marked by developmental problems, being shorter than normal, mental retardation, heart problems, unusual facial features, and extra folds of skin around the neck, hands, and feet. People with Costello syndrome have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, such as rhabdomyosarcoma (a soft tissue tumor) and neuroblastoma (cancer of immature nerve cells).
Cotellic listen (coh-TEL-lik)
A drug used with vemurafenib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cotellic blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called cobimetinib fumarate.
co-trimoxazole listen (KOH-try-MOK-suh-zole)
A drug used in the treatment of infections caused by bacteria and protozoa. It is a combination of two anti-infection drugs, sulfamethoxazole and trimethoprim.
cottonseed meal toxin listen (KAH-tun-SEED meel TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It comes from the seed of the cotton plant (Gossypium). It blocks the growth of cells and may kill cancer cells. Cottonseed meal toxin may also act as a male contraceptive (a type of birth control).
coumarin listen (KOO-muh-rin)
A substance used to make drugs that prevent and treat blood clots in blood vessels and treat certain heart conditions. Coumarin is taken from certain plants and can also be made in the laboratory. It is a type of anticoagulant.
coumestan listen (KOO-meh-stan)
An estrogen-like substance (phytoestrogen) made by some plants. Coumestans may have anticancer effects.
coumestrol listen (KOO-meh-strol)
A type of coumestan. Coumestans are estrogen-like substances (phytoestrogens) made by some plants. Coumestans may have anticancer effects.
counseling listen (KOWN-suh-ling)
The process by which a professional counselor helps a person cope with mental or emotional distress, and understand and solve personal problems.
counselor listen (KOWN-seh-ler)
A specialist who talks to patients and their families about emotional and personal matters, and can help them make decisions. Also called mental health counselor.
course of treatment listen (kors ... TREET-ment)
A treatment plan made up of several cycles of treatment. For example, treatment given for one week followed by three weeks of rest (no treatment) is one treatment cycle. When a treatment cycle is repeated multiple times on a regular schedule, it makes up a course of treatment. A course of treatment can last for several months. Also called treatment course.
Cowden disease listen (KOW-den dih-ZEEZ)
An inherited disorder marked by the formation of many noncancerous growths called hamartomas. These growths occur in the skin, breast, thyroid, colon, intestines, and mouth. Patients with Cowden disease are at increased risk of certain types of cancer, including cancers of the breast and thyroid. Also called Cowden syndrome and multiple hamartoma syndrome.
Cowden syndrome listen (KOW-den SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder marked by the formation of many noncancerous growths called hamartomas. These growths occur in the skin, breast, thyroid, colon, intestines, and mouth. Patients with Cowden syndrome are at increased risk of certain types of cancer, including cancers of the breast and thyroid. Also called Cowden disease and multiple hamartoma syndrome.
COX inhibitor listen (kox in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug that is used to treat inflammation and pain, and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer. COX inhibitors belong to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs). Also called cyclooxygenase inhibitor.
COX-2 listen
An enzyme that speeds up the formation of substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also cause tumor cells to grow. Some tumors have high levels of COX-2 and blocking its activity may reduce tumor growth. Also called cyclooxygenase-2 and prostaglandin-endoperoxide synthase 2.
COX-2 inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug used to relieve pain and inflammation. COX-2 inhibitors are being studied in the prevention of colon polyps, and as anticancer drugs. Also called cyclooxygenase-2 inhibitor.
Cozaar listen (KOH-zar)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure. Cozaar blocks the action of chemicals that make blood vessels constrict (get narrower). It is a type of angiotensin II receptor antagonist. Also called losartan potassium.
CP
A chemotherapy combination used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs chlorambucil hydrochloride and prednisone. Also called chlorambucil-prednisone, chlorambucil-prednisone regimen, and CP regimen.
CP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs chlorambucil hydrochloride and prednisone. Also called chlorambucil-prednisone, chlorambucil-prednisone regimen, and CP.
CP/CPPS
A condition of the prostate gland that continues or gets worse over a long period of time. Symptoms include body aches, pain in the lower back and genital area, a burning feeling during urination, and problems with emptying the bladder all the way. Also called chronic prostatitis/chronic pelvic pain syndrome.
CP-358,774
A drug used to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. CP-358,774 blocks a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called erlotinib hydrochloride, OSI-774, and Tarceva.
CP-4055
A drug used to treat advanced acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is a form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that may work in patients with leukemia that is resistant to cytarabine. CP-4055 blocks cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Elacyt and elacytarabine.
CP4071
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
CP-547,632
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) receptor inhibitors and angiogenesis inhibitors.
CP-609,754
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
CP-724,714
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called ErbB receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitors.
C-peptide listen (… PEP-tide)
A substance made by the pancreas. C-peptide and insulin are both part of a larger molecule that gets split apart before being released into the blood. Abnormal blood levels of C-peptide may occur in certain diseases, such as diabetes or cancer. Also called connecting peptide.
C-peptide suppression test listen (… PEP-tide suh-PREH-shun …)
A test used to help diagnose a type of pancreatic tumor called an insulinoma. After fasting, the patient receives an injection of insulin and the level of C-peptide (a substance released with insulin by the pancreas) in the blood is measured. In patients who have an insulinoma, the level of C-peptide is higher than normal.
CpG 7909
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called biological response modifiers. Also called PF-3512676 and ProMune.
CPR
An emergency procedure used to restart a person’s heartbeat and breathing after one or both have stopped. It involves giving strong, rapid pushes to the chest to keep blood moving through the body. Usually, it also involves blowing air into the person’s mouth to help with breathing and send oxygen to the lungs. Also called cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
CPT 11
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat colon cancer or rectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after treatment with fluorouracil. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. CPT 11 blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called Camptosar and irinotecan hydrochloride.
CQS
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called chloroquinoxaline sulfonamide.
CRA-024781
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor.
cramp listen (kramp)
A sharp pain that occurs when a muscle suddenly contracts (tightens up). Cramps commonly occur in the abdomen and legs.
craniopharyngioma listen (KRAY-nee-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-OH-muh)
A rare, benign (not cancer) brain tumor that usually forms near the pituitary gland and the hypothalamus. Craniopharyngiomas are slow-growing and do not spread to other parts of the brain or to other parts of the body. However, they may grow and press on nearby parts of the brain, including the pituitary gland, hypothalamus, optic chiasm, optic nerves, and fluid-filled spaces in the brain. This may cause problems with growth, vision, and making certain hormones. Craniopharyngiomas usually occur in children and young adults.
craniotomy listen (KRAY-nee-AH-toh-mee)
An operation in which a piece of the skull is removed. A craniotomy may be done so doctors can remove a brain tumor or abnormal brain tissue. It may also be done to remove blood or blood clots from the brain, relieve pressure in the brain after an injury or stroke, repair a brain aneurysm (a bulge in a blood vessel wall) or skull fractures, or treat other brain conditions. The piece of skull that is removed is usually put back in place after the brain problem has been treated.
cranium listen (KRAY-nee-um)
The bones that form the head. The cranium is made up of cranial bones (bones that surround and protect the brain) and facial bones (bones that form the eye sockets, nose, cheeks, jaw, and other parts of the face). An opening at the base of the cranium is where the spinal cord connects to the brain. Also called skull.
craving listen (KRAY-ving)
A strong, urgent, or abnormal desire for a certain substance or activity. There are different types of cravings, such as food cravings or cravings for addictive substances, including alcohol, drugs, or nicotine. Nicotine cravings are common after a person quits smoking and may come and go over time.
creatine listen (KREE-uh-teen)
A substance that is made by the body and used to store energy. It is being studied in the treatment of weight loss related to cancer. It is derived from the amino acid arginine.
creatinine listen (kree-A-tih-neen)
A compound that is excreted from the body in urine. Creatinine levels are measured to monitor kidney function.
Crestor listen (KREH-stor)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol and other harmful substances, such as triglycerides, in the blood. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Crestor blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body and it helps break down cholesterol. It also may cause cancer cells to die and may inhibit the growth of blood vessels that cancer cells need to grow. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called rosuvastatin calcium.
crib death listen (krib deth)
A disorder marked by the sudden and unexpected death of a healthy child who is younger than one year old, usually during sleep. The cause of crib death is not known. Also called SIDS and sudden infant death syndrome.
cribriform listen (KRIH-brih-form)
Pierced with small holes as in a sieve. Refers to the appearance of a tumor when viewed under a microscope. The tumor appears to have open spaces or small holes inside.
crisis intervention listen (KRY-sis IN-ter-VEN-shun)
Immediate, short-term counseling (talking with a professional counselor) to stop a critical emotional incident (e.g., attempted suicide or drug overdose) from getting worse. Crisis intervention is not meant to solve the problem that led up to the crisis.
crisnatol mesylate listen (KRIS-nuh-tol MEH-zih-layt)
An anticancer drug that interferes with the DNA in cancer cells.
CRISPR-Cas9
A laboratory tool used to change or “edit” pieces of a cell’s DNA. CRISPR-Cas9 uses a specially designed RNA molecule to guide an enzyme called Cas9 to a specific sequence of DNA. Cas9 then cuts the strands of DNA at that point and removes a small piece, causing a gap in the DNA where a new piece of DNA can be added. CRISPR-Cas9 is a breakthrough in science that will have important uses in many kinds of research. In cancer research, it may help to understand how cancer forms and responds to treatment as well as new ways to diagnose, treat, and prevent it.
crizotinib listen (krih-ZOH-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive or ROS1 positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Crizotinib blocks the proteins made by the ALK and ROS1 genes. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Crizotinib may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Xalkori.
CRO
A company hired by another company or research center to take over certain parts of running a clinical trial. The company may design, manage, and monitor the trial, and analyze the results. Also called Contract Research Organization.
Crohn disease listen (krone dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which the gastrointestinal tract is inflamed over a long period of time. Crohn disease usually affects the small intestine and colon. Symptoms include fever, diarrhea, stomach cramps, vomiting, and weight loss. Crohn disease increases the risk of colorectal cancer and small intestine cancer. It is a type of inflammatory bowel disease (IBD). Also called regional enteritis.
cross-talk listen (KROS-tawk)
Describes the process inside a cell that occurs when the same signal is shared by two or more signaling pathways. Usually, a signal caused by the binding of a substance to a molecule on or inside a cell is passed from one molecule to another in the same pathway.
CRPC
Prostate cancer that keeps growing even when the amount of testosterone in the body is reduced to very low levels. Many early-stage prostate cancers need normal levels of testosterone to grow, but CRPCs do not. Also called castrate-resistant prostate cancer.
cruciferous vegetable listen (kroo-SIH-feh-rus VEJ-tuh-bul)
A member of the family of vegetables that includes broccoli, Brussels sprouts, cabbage, cauliflower, collard greens, kale, and turnips. These vegetables contain substances that may protect against cancer. Also called Brassica vegetable.
cryoablation listen (KRY-oh-a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure in which an extremely cold liquid or an instrument called a cryoprobe is used to freeze and destroy abnormal tissue. A cryoprobe is cooled with substances such as liquid nitrogen, liquid nitrous oxide, or compressed argon gas. Cryoablation may be used to treat certain types of cancer and some conditions that may become cancer. Also called cryosurgery and cryotherapy.
cryobanking listen (KRY-oh-bank-ing)
The process of cooling and storing cells, tissues, or organs at very low or freezing temperatures to save them for future use. Also called cryopreservation.
cryopreservation listen (KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of cooling and storing cells, tissues, or organs at very low or freezing temperatures to save them for future use. Also called cryobanking.
cryosurgery listen (KRY-oh-SER-juh-ree)
A procedure in which an extremely cold liquid or an instrument called a cryoprobe is used to freeze and destroy abnormal tissue. A cryoprobe is cooled with substances such as liquid nitrogen, liquid nitrous oxide, or compressed argon gas. Cryosurgery may be used to treat certain types of cancer and some conditions that may become cancer. Also called cryoablation and cryotherapy.
cryotherapy listen (KRY-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure in which an extremely cold liquid or an instrument called a cryoprobe is used to freeze and destroy abnormal tissue. A cryoprobe is cooled with substances such as liquid nitrogen, liquid nitrous oxide, or compressed argon gas. Cryotherapy may be used to treat certain types of cancer and some conditions that may become cancer. Also called cryoablation and cryosurgery.
cryptorchidism listen (krip-TOR-kih-dih-zum)
A condition in which one or both testicles fail to move from the abdomen, where they develop before birth, into the scrotum. Cryptorchidism may increase the risk for development of testicular cancer. Also called undescended testicles.
CSF
The fluid that flows in and around the hollow spaces of the brain and spinal cord, and between two of the meninges (the thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). CSF is made by tissue called the choroid plexus in the ventricles (hollow spaces) in the brain. Also called cerebrospinal fluid.
CSP
A type of tumor found in breast or prostate tissue. It is often large and bulky and grows quickly. It may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) and may spread to other parts of the body. Also called cystosarcoma phyllodes and phyllodes tumor.
CSS
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, to the date of death from the disease. Patients who die from causes unrelated to the disease are not counted in this measurement. In a clinical trial, measuring the CSS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called cause-specific survival.
CT angiography listen (... an-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to create a series of detailed pictures of the blood vessels and blood flow inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are created by a computer linked to an x-ray machine. A dye is injected into a vein to make the blood vessels and blood flow easier to see on the x-ray. CT angiography may be used to check for aneurysms (a bulge in the blood vessel wall), blockages in the arteries, blood clots, and other blood vessel problems. Also called computed tomography angiography and CTA.
CT colonography listen (... KOH-luh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A method to examine the inside of the colon by taking a series of x-rays. A computer is used to make 2-dimensional (2-D) and 3-D pictures of the colon from these x-rays. The pictures can be saved, changed to give better viewing angles, and reviewed after the procedure, even years later. Also called computed tomographic colonography, computed tomography colonography, CTC, and virtual colonoscopy.
CT scan listen (… skan)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are used to create 3-dimensional (3-D) views of tissues and organs. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the tissues and organs show up more clearly. A CT scan may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called CAT scan, computed tomography scan, computerized axial tomography scan, and computerized tomography.
CT-2103
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel combined with a protein called poliglumex that may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer, ovarian cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called paclitaxel poliglumex, paclitaxel polyglutamate, and Xyotax.
CT-2106
A form of the anticancer drug camptothecin that may have fewer side effects and work better than camptothecin. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of DNA topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called polyglutamate camptothecin.
CT-2584
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may prevent the growth of blood vessels from surrounding tissue into a solid tumor.
CT-322
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. CT-322 may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 (VEGFR-2) inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Angiocept and VEGFR-2 inhibitor CT-322.
CT53518
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may stop cancer cell growth by blocking certain enzymes. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called MLN518 and tandutinib.
CTA
A procedure that uses x-rays to create a series of detailed pictures of the blood vessels and blood flow inside the body. The pictures are taken from different angles and are created by a computer linked to an x-ray machine. A dye is injected into a vein to make the blood vessels and blood flow easier to see on the x-ray. CTA may be used to check for aneurysms (a bulge in the blood vessel wall), blockages in the arteries, blood clots, and other blood vessel problems. Also called computed tomography angiography and CT angiography.
CTC
A method to examine the inside of the colon by taking a series of x-rays. A computer is used to make 2-dimensional (2-D) and 3-D pictures of the colon from these x-rays. The pictures can be saved, changed to give better viewing angles, and reviewed after the procedure, even years later. Also called computed tomographic colonography, computed tomography colonography, CT colonography, and virtual colonoscopy.
CT-guided biopsy listen (… GY-ded BY-op-see)
A biopsy procedure that uses a CT scan (a special type of x-ray linked to a computer) to find an abnormal area in the body and help guide the removal of a sample of tissue from that area. A needle is usually used to remove the sample, which is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease. A CT-guided biopsy may be done when the abnormal area is deep inside the body or when the doctor cannot feel a lump or mass.
CTLA-4
A protein found on T cells (a type of immune cell) that helps keep the body’s immune responses in check. When CTLA-4 is bound to another protein called B7, it helps keep T cells from killing other cells, including cancer cells. Some anticancer drugs, called immune checkpoint inhibitors, are used to block CTLA-4. When this protein is blocked, the “brakes” on the immune system are released and the ability of T cells to kill cancer cells is increased.
CTX
A substance being studied in the diagnosis and treatment of glioma (a type of brain cancer) and other types of cancer. It binds to cancer cells in the brain and peripheral nervous system and may keep them from spreading. CTX comes from the venom of a type of scorpion. A form of CTX made in the laboratory is called TM-601. CTX is a type of neurotoxin. Also called chlorotoxin.
CTX
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat a certain type of kidney disease in children. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. CTX damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. CTX is a type of alkylating agent. Also called cyclophosphamide.
cubic centimeter listen (KYOO-bik SEN-tih-MEE-ter)
A measure of volume in the metric system. One thousand cubic centimeters equal one liter. Also called cc, milliliter, and mL.
Cubicin listen (KYOO-bih-sin)
A drug used to treat certain bacterial skin and bloodstream infections in adults. Cubicin is also being studied in the treatment of fever and neutropenia (an abnormal decrease in the number of neutrophils, a type of white blood cell) in patients with cancer. It is a type of antibiotic. Also called daptomycin.
cultural competency listen (KUL-cher-ul KOM-peh-ten-see)
The ability to understand, interact, and work well with people of different cultures. In medicine, one goal of cultural competency is to help make sure that the quality of the healthcare is equal among different cultural groups.
culture listen (KUL-cher)
The beliefs, values, and behaviors that are shared within a group, such as a religious group or a nation. Culture includes language, customs, and beliefs about roles and relationships. In medicine, culture also refers to the growth of microorganisms, such as bacteria and yeast, or human, plant, or animal cells or tissue in the laboratory.
cultured cell listen (KUL-cherd sel)
A human, plant, or animal cell that has been adapted to grow in the laboratory. Cultured cells may be used to diagnose infections, to test new drugs, and in research.
cultured cell line listen (KUL-cherd sel line)
Cells of a single type (human, animal, or plant) that have been adapted to grow continuously in the laboratory and are used in research.
Culturelle listen (KUL-cher-EL)
A live form of a bacterium that makes lactic acid (a substance that is made from sugars found in milk and is also made in the body). Culturelle is given to help with digestion and normal bowel function. It may also help keep the gastrointestinal (GI) tract healthy. It is being studied in the prevention of infections in patients having donor stem cell transplants and in other conditions. Also called Lactobacillus rhamnosus GG.
cumulative dose listen (KYOO-myuh-luh-tiv dose)
In medicine, the total amount of a drug or radiation given to a patient over time; for example, the total dose of radiation given in a series of radiation treatments.
cumulative exposure listen (KYOO-myuh-luh-tiv ek-SPOH-zher)
The total amount of a substance or radiation that a person is exposed to over time. Cumulative exposure to a harmful substance or radiation may increase the risk of certain diseases or conditions.
cumulative risk listen (KYOO-myuh-luh-tiv risk)
A measure of the total risk that a certain event will happen during a given period of time. In cancer research, it is the likelihood that a person who is free of a certain type of cancer will develop that cancer by a specific age. For example, a woman with no known risk factors for breast cancer has a cumulative risk of getting breast cancer over a lifetime of 90 years of about 12-13%. This means one out of every eight women will get breast cancer by age 90 years.
CUP
A case in which cancer cells are found in the body, but the place where the cells first started growing (the origin or primary site) cannot be determined. Also called cancer of unknown primary origin and carcinoma of unknown primary.
cupping listen (KUP-ping)
A procedure in which a rounded glass cup is warmed and placed upside down over an area of the body, creating suction that holds the cup to the skin. Cupping increases the flow of blood. In traditional Chinese medicine, it is also thought to increase the flow of qi (vital energy).
curative surgery listen (KYOOR-uh-tiv SER-juh-ree)
Surgery to remove all malignant (cancerous) tissue, which is meant to cure the disease. This includes removing part or all of the cancerous organ or tissue and a small amount of healthy tissue around it. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed. Curative surgery works best for localized cancer. Chemotherapy or radiation therapy may be given before surgery to shrink the tumor or after surgery to kill any cancer cells that remain.
curcumin listen (ker-KYOO-min)
A yellow pigment of the spice turmeric that is being studied in cancer prevention.
cure listen (kyoor)
To heal or restore health; a treatment to restore health.
curettage listen (kyoo-reh-TAZH)
Removal of tissue with a curette (a spoon-shaped instrument with a sharp edge).
curette listen (kyoo-RET)
A spoon-shaped instrument with a sharp edge.
Cushing disease listen (KUSH-ing dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which there is too much cortisol (a hormone made by the outer layer of the adrenal gland) in the body. In Cushing disease, this happens when an adenoma (benign tumor) in the pituitary gland makes too much adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH). This causes the adrenal gland to make too much cortisol. Symptoms include a round face, thin arms and legs, severe fatigue and muscle weakness, high blood pressure and high blood sugar, purple or pink stretch marks on the skin, and weight gain, especially in the abdomen.
Cushing syndrome listen (KUSH-ing SIN-drome)
A condition in which there is too much cortisol (a hormone made by the outer layer of the adrenal gland) in the body. Cushing syndrome may be caused by taking too many steroid drugs or by certain types of tumors. Tumors that make adrenocorticotropic hormone (ACTH) cause the adrenal gland to make too much cortisol. Symptoms of Cushing syndrome include a round face, thin arms and legs, severe fatigue and muscle weakness, high blood pressure, high blood sugar, purple or pink stretch marks on the skin, and weight gain, especially in the abdomen.
custirsen sodium listen (KUS-tir-sen SOH-dee-um)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks the production of a protein called clusterin, which helps cells live longer. This may kill cancer cells that need clusterin to grow. It may also make cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide, and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called OGX-011.
cutaneous listen (kyoo-TAY-nee-us)
Having to do with the skin.
cutaneous breast cancer listen (kyoo-TAY-nee-us brest KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread from the breast to the skin.
cutaneous leiomyoma listen (kyoo-TAY-nee-us LY-oh-my-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor that forms in the muscle tissue around a hair follicle (the opening on the skin through which hair grows). Cutaneous leiomyomas appear as small bumps that may be the same color as, or darker than, the nearby skin. They usually occur on the arms, legs, chest, and abdomen. Cutaneous leiomyomas tend to increase in size and number over time and can be painful to the touch or in cold temperatures. They often occur in patients with an inherited condition called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer.
cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma listen (kyoo-TAY-nee-us SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in cells that form the epidermis (outer layer of the skin). It usually occurs on areas of the skin that have been exposed to natural sunlight or artificial sunlight (such as from tanning beds) over long periods of time. These areas include the face, ears, lower lip, neck, arms, or back of the hands. It may also occur on areas of the skin that have been burned or exposed to chemicals or radiation. Cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma may appear as a firm red bump, a scaly red patch, an open sore, or a wart that may crust or bleed easily. Cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma that has not spread can usually be cured. Also called squamous cell carcinoma of the skin and squamous cell skin cancer.
cutaneous T-cell lymphoma listen (kyoo-TAY-nee-us … lim-FOH-muh)
Any of a group of T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas that begins in the skin as an itchy, red rash that can thicken or form a tumor. The most common types are mycosis fungoides and Sézary syndrome.
CVA
In medicine, a loss of blood flow to part of the brain, which damages brain tissue. CVAs are caused by blood clots and broken blood vessels in the brain. Symptoms include dizziness, numbness, weakness on one side of the body, and problems with talking, writing, or understanding language. The risk of CVA is increased by high blood pressure, older age, smoking, diabetes, high cholesterol, heart disease, atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries), and a family history of CVA. Also called cerebrovascular accident and stroke.
CVP
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat slow-growing forms of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) and chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, and prednisone. Also called CVP regimen.
CVP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat slow-growing forms of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) and chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, and prednisone. Also called CVP.
cyanocobalamin listen (SY-uh-NOH-koh-BA-luh-min)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Cyanocobalamin helps make red blood cells, DNA, RNA, energy, and tissues, and keeps nerve cells healthy. It is found in liver, meat, eggs, poultry, shellfish, milk, and milk products. Cyanocobalamin is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough cyanocobalamin can cause certain types of anemia (a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal) and neurologic disorders. It is being studied with folate in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called cobalamin and vitamin B12.
cyanogenic glucoside listen (SY-uh-noh-JEH-nik GLOO-koh-side)
A plant compound that contains sugar and produces cyanide.
cyanosis listen (SY-uh-NOH-sis)
Blue-colored skin caused by too little oxygen in the blood.
CYC116
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes involved in cell division and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
cycle of treatment listen (SY-kul … TREET-ment)
A period of treatment followed by a period of rest (no treatment) that is repeated on a regular schedule. For example, treatment given for one week followed by three weeks of rest is one cycle of treatment. When this cycle is repeated multiple times on a regular schedule, it makes up a course of treatment. Also called treatment cycle.
cyclic neutropenia listen (SY-klik noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
A chronic condition that affects neutrophils (a type of white blood cell). In cyclic neutropenia, the number of neutrophils in the blood goes in cycles from normal to low and back to normal again. Symptoms include fever, inflamed mucous membranes in the mouth, and infections. Also called periodic neutropenia.
cyclin-D1 listen (SY-klin …)
A protein that helps control cell division. It is found in higher than normal amounts in several types of cancer cells. Measuring the amount of cyclin-D1 in blood cells may help to diagnose cancer or plan cancer treatment. Cyclin-D1 is a cell cycle protein and a type of tumor marker.
cyclooxygenase inhibitor listen (SY-kloh-OK-sih-jeh-NAYS in-HIH-bih-ter)
COX inhibitor. A type of drug that is used to treat inflammation and pain, and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer. Cyclo-oxygenase inhibitors belong to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs). Also called COX inhibitor.
cyclooxygenase-2 listen (SY-kloh-OK-sih-jeh-NAYS-2)
An enzyme that speeds up the formation of substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also cause tumor cells to grow. Some tumors have high levels of cyclooxygenase-2 and blocking its activity may reduce tumor growth. Also called COX-2 and prostaglandin-endoperoxide synthase 2.
cyclooxygenase-2 inhibitor listen (SY-kloh-OK-sih-jeh-NAYS-2 in-HIH-bih-ter)
A nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug used to relieve pain and inflammation. Cyclooxygenase-2 inhibitors are being studied in the prevention of colon polyps, and as anticancer drugs. Also called COX-2 inhibitor.
cyclophosphamide listen (SY-kloh-FOS-fuh-mide)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat a certain type of kidney disease in children. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. Cyclophosphamide damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. Cyclophosphamide is a type of alkylating agent. Also called CTX.
cyclosporine listen (SY-kloh-SPOR-een)
A drug used to help reduce the risk of rejection of organ and bone marrow transplants by the body. It is also used in clinical trials to make cancer cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs.
Cymbalta listen (sim-BAL-tuh)
A drug used to treat depression and peripheral neuropathy (pain, numbness, tingling, burning, or weakness in the hands or feet) that can occur with diabetes. It is also being studied in the treatment of peripheral neuropathy caused by certain anticancer drugs. Cymbalta increases the amount of certain chemicals in the brain that help relieve depression and pain. It is a type of serotonin and norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor. Also called duloxetine hydrochloride.
cyproheptadine listen (SY-proh-HEP-tuh-deen)
A drug that is used to treat asthma, allergies, and colds, and to relieve itching caused by certain skin disorders. It has also been used to stimulate appetite and weight gain, and is being studied in the treatment of weight loss caused by cancer and its treatment. Cyproheptadine belongs to the family of drugs called antihistamines.
cyproterone acetate listen (sy-PROH-teh-rone A-seh-tayt)
A synthetic hormone being studied for treatment of hot flashes in men with prostate cancer who have had both testicles removed by surgery.
Cyramza listen (sy-RAM-zuh)
A drug used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) in certain patients who have already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used alone or with another drug to treat cancer of the stomach or gastroesophageal junction (the area where the esophagus connects to the stomach) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cyramza binds to receptors for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor, which may be found on some types of cancer cells. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Cyramza is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B, IMC-1121B, and ramucirumab.
cyst listen (sist)
A closed, sac-like pocket of tissue that can form anywhere in the body. It may be filled with fluid, air, pus, or other material. Most cysts are benign (not cancer).
cystectomy listen (sis-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all or part of the bladder (the organ that holds urine) or to remove a cyst (a sac or capsule in the body).
cystic duct listen (SIS-tik dukt)
A tube that carries bile from the gall bladder. It joins the common hepatic duct to form the common bile duct. It is part of the biliary duct system.
cystic fibrosis listen (SIS-tik fy-BROH-sis)
A common hereditary disease in which exocrine (secretory) glands produce abnormally thick mucus. This mucus can cause problems in digestion, breathing, and body cooling.
cystic nephroma listen (SIS-tik neh-FROH-muh)
A rare, benign (not cancer) kidney tumor made up of fluid-filled cysts. Cystic nephroma can occur in one or both kidneys. Signs and symptoms may include pain in the abdomen or back, a lump in the abdomen, blood in the urine, urinary tract infection, anemia, and fever. Cystic nephroma usually occurs in young children or middle-aged adults. Cystic nephroma may also be found in patients who have pleuropulmonary blastoma (a rare, fast-growing cancer that forms in the tissues of the lung and chest cavity). Some patients with cystic nephroma have a mutation (change) in a gene called DICER1.
cystitis listen (sis-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the lining of the bladder. Symptoms include pain and a burning feeling while urinating, blood in the urine, dark or cloudy urine, feeling a need to urinate often or right away, being unable to control the flow of urine, and pain in the pelvis or lower back. Cystitis is most often caused by an infection, but it may also be caused by taking certain medicines (such as anticancer drugs), radiation therapy to the pelvis, being exposed to chemicals (such as perfumes or dyes), or having a catheter in the bladder for a long time. It may also be caused by other conditions, such as diabetes, kidney stones, an enlarged prostate, or a spinal cord injury.
cystoprostatectomy listen (SIS-toh-pros-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the bladder (the organ that holds urine) and the prostate. In a radical cystoprostatectomy, the seminal vesicles are also removed. The prostate and seminal vesicles are glands in the male reproductive system that help make semen. Also called prostatocystectomy.
cystosarcoma phyllodes listen (SIS-toh-sar-KOH-muh fih-LOH-deez)
A type of tumor found in breast or prostate tissue. It is often large and bulky and grows quickly. It may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) and may spread to other parts of the body. Also called CSP and phyllodes tumor.
cystoscope listen (SIS-toh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to look inside the bladder and urethra. A cystoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
cystoscopy listen (sis-TOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the bladder and urethra using a cystoscope, inserted into the urethra. A cystoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
cystourethrectomy listen (SIS-toh-yoo-ree-THREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the bladder (the organ that holds urine) and urethra (the tube through which urine leaves the body).
cytarabine listen (sy-TAYR-uh-been)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL), acute myeloid leukemia (AML), and chronic myeloid leukemia (CML). It is also used to prevent and treat a type of leukemia that has spread to the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cytarabine blocks cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called ARA-C.
cytarabine liposome listen (sy-TAYR-uh-been LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than cytarabine. It is used to treat lymphoma that has spread to the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Depo-Cyt and liposomal cytarabine.
cytochlor listen (SY-toh-klor)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer that has spread to the brain. It has also been studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Cytochlor damages the DNA in cancer cells, which may make them easier to kill with radiation therapy. It is a type of radiosensitizing agent.
cytochrome P450 enzyme system listen (SY-tuh-krome ... EN-zime SIS-tem)
A group of enzymes involved in drug metabolism and found in high levels in the liver. These enzymes change many drugs, including anticancer drugs, into less toxic forms that are easier for the body to excrete.
cytogenetics listen (SY-toh-jeh-NEH-tix)
The study of chromosomes, which are long strands of DNA and protein that contain most of the genetic information in a cell. Cytogenetics involves testing samples of tissue, blood, or bone marrow in a laboratory to look for changes in chromosomes, including broken, missing, or extra chromosomes. Changes in certain chromosomes may be a sign of a genetic disease or condition or some types of cancer. Cytogenetics may be used to help diagnose a disease or condition, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working.
cytokeratin listen (SY-toh-KAYR-uh-tin)
A type of protein found on epithelial cells, which line the inside and outside surfaces of the body. Cytokeratins help form the tissues of the hair, nails, and the outer layer of the skin. They are also found on cells in the lining of organs, glands, and other parts of the body. Certain cytokeratins may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with different types of epithelial cell cancers, including lung, breast, colorectal, bladder, and head and neck cancers. Measuring the amount of specific cytokeratins in the blood may help to plan cancer treatment or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. A cytokeratin is a type of tumor marker. Also called keratin.
cytokine listen (SY-toh-kine)
A type of protein that is made by certain immune and non-immune cells and has an effect on the immune system. Some cytokines stimulate the immune system and others slow it down. They can also be made in the laboratory and used to help the body fight cancer, infections, and other diseases. Examples of cytokines are interleukins, interferons, and colony-stimulating factors (filgrastim, sargramostim).
cytokine release syndrome listen (SY-toh-kine reh-LEES SIN-drome)
A condition that may occur after treatment with some types of immunotherapy, such as monoclonal antibodies and CAR-T cells. Cytokine release syndrome is caused by a large, rapid release of cytokines into the blood from immune cells affected by the immunotherapy. Cytokines are immune substances that have many different actions in the body. Signs and symptoms of cytokine release syndrome include fever, nausea, headache, rash, rapid heartbeat, low blood pressure, and trouble breathing. Most patients have a mild reaction, but sometimes, the reaction may be severe or life threatening.
cytology listen (sy-TAH-loh-jee)
The study of cells using a microscope.
cytomegalovirus listen (SY-toh-MEH-guh-loh-VY-rus)
A virus that may be carried in an inactive state for life by healthy individuals. It is a cause of severe pneumonia in people with a suppressed immune system, such as those undergoing bone marrow transplantation or those with leukemia or lymphoma. Also called CMV.
Cytomel listen (SY-toh-mel)
A drug that is used to treat certain thyroid (a gland located near the voice box) conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of thyroid cancer. Cytomel is made in the laboratory and is a form of the thyroid hormone triiodthyronine (T3). Also called liothyronine sodium and Triostat.
cytopenia listen (SY-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of blood cells.
cytoplasm listen (SY-toh-PLA-zum)
The fluid inside a cell but outside the cell's nucleus. Most chemical reactions in a cell take place in the cytoplasm.
cytosine listen (SY-toh-seen)
A chemical compound that is used to make one of the building blocks of DNA and RNA. It is a type of pyrimidine.
cytostatic agent listen (SY-toh-STA-tik AY-jent)
A substance that slows or stops the growth of cells, including cancer cells, without killing them. These agents may cause tumors to stop growing and spreading without causing them to shrink in size.
cytotoxic agent listen (SY-toh-TOK-sik AY-jent)
A substance that kills cells, including cancer cells. These agents may stop cancer cells from dividing and growing and may cause tumors to shrink in size.
cytotoxic chemotherapy listen (SY-toh-TOK-sik KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Anticancer drugs that kill cells, especially cancer cells.
cytotoxic T cell listen (SY-toh-TOK-sik ... sel)
A type of immune cell that can kill certain cells, including foreign cells, cancer cells, and cells infected with a virus. Cytotoxic T cells can be separated from other blood cells, grown in the laboratory, and then given to a patient to kill cancer cells. A cytotoxic T cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called cytotoxic T lymphocyte and killer T cell.
cytotoxic T lymphocyte listen (SY-toh-TOK-sik ... LIM-foh-site)
A type of immune cell that can kill certain cells, including foreign cells, cancer cells, and cells infected with a virus. Cytotoxic T lymphocytes can be separated from other blood cells, grown in the laboratory, and then given to a patient to kill cancer cells. A cytotoxic T lymphocyte is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called cytotoxic T cell and killer T cell.
cytotoxin listen (SY-toh-TOK-sin)
A substance that can kill cells.
D&C
A procedure to scrape and remove tissue from the inner lining of the uterus. The cervix is dilated (made larger) and a curette (spoon-shaped instrument) is inserted into the uterus to remove tissue. A tissue sample may then be checked under a microscope for signs of disease, such as infection or cancer. A D&C may also be done after a miscarriage or to treat certain conditions, such as abnormal bleeding. Also called dilatation and curettage and dilation and curettage.
D-1MT
A substance being studied in the treatment of melanoma and many other types of cancer. D-1MT blocks the breakdown of the amino acid tryptophan, which is needed for T cells (a type of immune system cell) to kill tumor cells. Giving D-1MT to patients who have received chemotherapy for cancer may help kill more tumor cells. It is a type of enzyme inhibitor and immunosuppressant. Also called 1-methyl-d-tryptophan.
D-20761
A synthetic luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone (LH-RH) antagonist that suppresses LH and sex steroid levels.
dabrafenib mesylate listen (duh-BRA-feh-nib MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used with trametinib to treat anaplastic thyroid cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also used alone or with trametinib to treat certain types of melanoma. Dabrafenib mesylate is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dabrafenib mesylate blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Tafinlar.
Dabska tumor listen (DAB-skuh TOO-mer)
A rare, slow-growing tumor of blood vessels that forms in or under the skin anywhere on the body. Dabska tumors may appear as firm, raised, purplish bumps, which may be small or large. They usually do not spread to other parts of the body. Dabska tumors can occur in children and adults. They are a type of vascular tumor. Also called papillary intralymphatic angioendothelioma.
DACA
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called acridine carboxamide.
dacarbazine listen (duh-KAR-buh-zeen)
A drug used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma that did not get better with other anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat melanoma that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dacarbazine damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent.
dacliximab listen (duh-KLIK-sih-mab)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting kidney transplants. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Dacliximab binds to receptors for a protein called interleukin-2 (IL-2), which are found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. Dacliximab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called daclizumab and Zenapax.
daclizumab listen (duh-KLIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting kidney transplants. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Daclizumab binds to receptors for a protein called interleukin-2 (IL-2), which are found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. Daclizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called dacliximab and Zenapax.
Dacogen listen (DA-koh-jen)
A drug used to treat myelodysplastic syndromes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dacogen stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called decitabine.
dacomitinib listen (DA-koh-MIH-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dacomitinib blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called PF-00299804 and Vizimpro.
dactinomycin listen (DAK-tih-noh-MY-sin)
A drug used to treat Ewing sarcoma, gestational trophoblastic tumor, Wilms tumor, and certain types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat rhabdomyosarcoma in children. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dactinomycin comes from the bacterium Streptomyces parvulus. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anticancer antibiotic. Also called actinomycin D and Cosmegen.
da-huang listen (dah-hwong)
The root of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rheum palmatum or Rheum officinale. Also called Chinese rhubarb, Indian rhubarb, rhubarb, and Turkish rhubarb.
daidzein listen (DAYD-zine)
An isoflavone found in soy products. Soy isoflavones are being studied in the prevention of cancer.
dalteparin sodium listen (dul-TEH-puh-rin SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to prevent blood clots from forming or to treat blood clots that have formed in patients with cancer or other conditions. Dalteparin sodium is a type of anticoagulant. Also called Fragmin.
danazol listen (DA-nuh-zole)
A synthetic hormone that is a type of androgen and is used to treat endometriosis. It is being evaluated in the treatment of endometrial cancer.
dapsone listen (DAP-sone)
A drug used to treat acne. It is also used to treat other types of skin diseases and certain bacterial infections, such as leprosy. It blocks bacteria from making a substance that they need to grow. Dapsone is a type of antibacterial agent and a type of anti-inflammatory agent.
daptomycin listen (dap-toh-MY-sin)
A drug used to treat certain bacterial skin and bloodstream infections in adults. Daptomycin is also being studied in the treatment of fever and neutropenia (an abnormal decrease in the number of neutrophils, a type of white blood cell) in patients with cancer. It is a type of antibiotic. Also called Cubicin.
DAR
A log of study drugs kept by an investigator running a clinical trial. It lists many things about each drug, including the drug name, lot number, expiration date, the amount of drug received, used, returned, or thrown away, and the amount left. DARs help make sure that a clinical trial is done safely and correctly. DARs are required by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Also called Drug Accountability Record.
daratumumab listen (DAYR-uh-TOOM-yoo-mab)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is used with dexamethasone and lenalidomide or bortezomib in patients whose cancer was treated with at least one anticancer therapy. It is used alone in patients whose cancer was treated with at least three anticancer therapies, including a proteasome inhibitor and an immunomodulating agent. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Daratumumab binds to a protein called CD38, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells, including myeloma cells. Daratumumab may block CD38 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Darzalex.
darbepoetin alfa listen (dar-bee-POH-ee-tin AL-fuh)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease and some types of chemotherapy. Darbepoetin alfa is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Darbepoetin alfa is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called Aranesp.
dark-field microscope listen (... MY-kroh-SKOPE)
A microscope (device used to magnify small objects) in which objects are lit at a very low angle from the side so that the background appears dark and the objects show up against this dark background.
Darzalex listen (DAR-zah-lex)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is used with dexamethasone and lenalidomide or bortezomib in patients whose cancer was treated with at least one anticancer therapy. It is used alone in patients whose cancer was treated with at least three anticancer therapies, including a proteasome inhibitor and an immunomodulating agent. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Darzalex binds to a protein called CD38, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells, including myeloma cells. Darzalex may block CD38 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called daratumumab.
dasatinib listen (da-SA-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat children with chronic phase chronic myeloid leukemia (CML) that is Philadelphia chromosome positive (Ph+). It is also used to treat adults with certain types of CML and acute lymphoblastic leukemia that are Ph+. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Dasatinib blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called BMS-354825 and Sprycel.
Data and Safety Monitoring Board listen (DAY-tuh ... SAYF-tee MAH-nih-ter-ing bord)
An impartial group that oversees a clinical trial and reviews the results to see if they are acceptable. This group determines if the trial should be changed or closed. Also called DSMB.
daunomycin hydrochloride listen (DAW-noh-MY-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia and acute myeloid leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Daunomycin hydrochloride blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Cerubidine and daunorubicin hydrochloride.
daunorubicin hydrochloride listen (DAW-noh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia and acute myeloid leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Daunorubicin hydrochloride blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Cerubidine and daunomycin hydrochloride.
daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine liposome listen (DAW-noh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide … sy-TAYR-uh-been LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drugs daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine. Daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine liposome is used to treat certain types of newly diagnosed acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine liposome is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of antimetabolite. Also called Vyxeos.
Daurismo listen (DOOR-is-moh)
A drug used with low-dose cytarabine to treat acute myeloid leukemia that is newly diagnosed. It is used in patients who are 75 years and older or in patients who cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Daurismo blocks a type of protein involved in cell growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called glasdegib maleate.
DBA
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with DBA may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital hypoplastic anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, erythrogenesis imperfecta, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
DBE
A procedure used to look at the inside of the small intestine. A special instrument made up of two tubes (one inside the other) is inserted through the mouth or rectum and into the small intestine. The inside tube, which is an endoscope with a light and lens for viewing, is moved through part of the small intestine, and a balloon at the end of it is inflated to keep the endoscope in place. Next, the outer tube is moved through the small intestine to reach the end of the endoscope, and a balloon at the end of the outer tube is inflated to keep it in place. Then, the balloon at the end of the endoscope is deflated, and the endoscope is moved through the next part of the small intestine. These steps are repeated many times as the tubes move through the whole small intestine. This allows the doctor to see all of the small intestine. Tissue samples may be removed so they can be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called double balloon endoscopy and double balloon enteroscopy.
DBVE
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, and etoposide. Also called ABVE, ABVE regimen, and DBVE regimen.
DBVE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, and etoposide. Also called ABVE, ABVE regimen, and DBVE.
DBVE-PC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, etoposide, prednisone, and cyclophosphamide. Also called ABVE-PC, ABVE-PC regimen, and DBVE-PC regimen.
DBVE-PC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), bleomycin sulfate, vincristine sulfate, etoposide, prednisone, and cyclophosphamide. Also called ABVE-PC, ABVE-PC regimen, and DBVE-PC.
DCF
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), cisplatin (Platinol), and fluorouracil. Also called docetaxel-cisplatin-fluorouracil, Taxotere-Platinol-fluorouracil, TPF, and TPF regimen.
DCIS
A noninvasive condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct. The abnormal cells have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. In some cases, DCIS may become invasive cancer and spread to other tissues. At this time, there is no way to know which lesions could become invasive. Also called ductal carcinoma in situ and intraductal carcinoma.
D-cycloserine listen (...SY-kloh-SAYR-een)
A drug used to treat tuberculosis. It is also being studied in the treatment of pain and nerve problems (numbness, tingling) caused by chemotherapy and in the treatment of low back pain, autism, certain anxiety disorders, and schizophrenia. D-cycloserine is a type of antibiotic. Also called Seromycin.
DDS
A rare disorder that causes kidney failure before age 3, abnormal development of the sexual organs, and, in most cases, Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer). Children with Denys-Drash syndrome are also at high risk of some other types of cancer. Also called Denys-Drash syndrome.
de Gramont regimen listen (dey gruh-MON REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer. It is also used with radiation therapy to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs fluorouracil and leucovorin calcium.
de novo listen (deh NOH-voh)
In cancer, the first occurrence of cancer in the body.
de qi sensation listen (duh chee sen-SAY-shun)
Tingling, numbness, heaviness, and other feelings that occur after an acupuncture needle has been properly placed in the body. The needle may be twirled, moved up and down at different speeds and depths, heated, or charged with a small electric current until the de qi sensation occurs.
death cap listen (deth kap)
A type of poisonous mushroom that has harmful effects on the kidneys and liver. It is responsible for most fatal cases of mushroom poisoning. Also called Amanita phalloides.
death rattle listen (... RA-tul)
A gurgling sound that comes from the back of the throat of a dying person. It is caused by the build-up of saliva and mucus in the throat and upper airways when the person is too weak to cough.
death receptor 4 listen (… reh-SEP-ter 4)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of death receptor 4 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called DR4, TRAIL receptor 1, TRAIL-R1, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A.
death receptor 5 listen (… reh-SEP-ter 5)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of death receptor 5 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called DR5, TRAIL receptor 2, TRAIL-R2, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B.
debulking listen (dee-BUL-king)
Surgical removal of as much of a tumor as possible. Debulking may increase the chance that chemotherapy or radiation therapy will kill all the tumor cells. It may also be done to relieve symptoms or help the patient live longer. Also called tumor debulking.
deceased listen (dih-SEEST)
Dead.
decitabine listen (deh-SIH-tuh-been)
A drug used to treat myelodysplastic syndromes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Decitabine stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Dacogen.
Declomycin listen (DEH-kloh-MY-sin)
A substance being studied as a way to detect bone growth in patients receiving bisphosphonates (a type of drug used to treat bone pain caused by some types of cancer) for breast cancer. It binds to newly formed bone. A biopsy is done and bone growth is measured using a special microscope. Declomycin is a type of tetracycline antibiotic and a type of bone-labeling agent. Also called demeclocycline hydrochloride.
decortication listen (deh-KOR-tih-KAY-shun)
Removal of part or all of the external surface of an organ.
deductible listen (dee-DUK-tih-bul)
The amount of money that a patient with health insurance pays for healthcare services before the health insurance plan begins to pay. Healthcare services may include visits to the doctor, laboratory tests, prescription medicines, and hospital stays. Not all healthcare plans require a deductible. Usually, plans with higher deductibles have lower monthly premiums (payments).
deep sedation listen (… seh-DAY-shun)
A level of sedation in which a person is in a deep sleep, loses feeling, and is hard to wake up. Deep sedation is caused by special drugs and is used to help relieve anxiety during certain medical or surgical procedures. Oxygen may also be given to help the patient breathe and drugs that relieve pain may be given at the same time. The patient usually does not remember the procedure.
deep vein thrombosis listen (… vayn throm-BOH-sis)
The formation of a blood clot in a deep vein of the leg or lower pelvis. Symptoms may include pain, swelling, warmth, and redness in the affected area. Also called DVT.
defecation listen (DEH-feh-kay-shun)
Movement of feces (undigested food, bacteria, mucus, and cells from the lining of the intestines) through the bowel and out the anus. Also called bowel movement.
deferasirox listen (deh-FER-a-ser-ox)
A drug used to treat too much iron in the blood caused by blood transfusions. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplastic syndromes (a group of diseases in which the bone marrow does not make enough healthy blood cells) and other conditions. Deferasirox binds to extra iron in the blood. The drug and the iron are passed from the body in urine. It is a type of chelating agent. Also called Exjade.
deferoxamine listen (DEH-feh-ROK-suh-meen)
An iron-chelating agent that removes iron from tumors by inhibiting DNA synthesis and causing cancer cell death. It is used in conjunction with other anticancer agents in pediatric neuroblastoma therapy.
deferred therapy listen (deh-FURD THAYR-uh-pee)
Closely watching a patient’s condition but not giving treatment unless symptoms appear or change, or there are changes in test results. Deferred therapy avoids problems that may be caused by treatments such as radiation or surgery. It is used to find early signs that the condition is getting worse. During deferred therapy, patients may be given certain exams and tests. It is sometimes used in prostate cancer. Also called expectant management.
defibrotide sodium listen (dee-FY-broh-tide SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat hepatic veno-occlusive disease (a condition in which small veins in the liver are blocked) in patients who have kidney or lung problems after a stem cell transplant. Defibrotide sodium may affect the cells that line the inside of blood vessels and may help improve blood flow inside the liver. Also called Defitelio.
deficiency listen (deh-FIH-shun-see)
In medicine, a shortage of a substance (such as a vitamin or mineral) needed by the body.
definitive diagnosis listen (deh-FIH-nih-tiv DY-ug-NOH-sis)
A final diagnosis that is made after getting the results of tests, such as blood tests and biopsies, that are done to find out if a certain disease or condition is present.
definitive treatment listen (deh-FIH-nih-tiv TREET-ment)
The treatment plan for a disease or disorder that has been chosen as the best one for a patient after all other choices have been considered.
Defitelio listen (DEH-fih-TEH-lee-oh)
A drug used to treat hepatic veno-occlusive disease (a condition in which small veins in the liver are blocked) in patients who have kidney or lung problems after a stem cell transplant. Defitelio may affect the cells that line the inside of blood vessels and may help improve blood flow inside the liver. Also called defibrotide sodium.
degarelix acetate listen (DEH-guh-REH-lix A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. Degarelix acetate binds to gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) receptors in the pituitary gland. This causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. Degarelix acetate may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. It is a type of GnRH antagonist. Also called Firmagon.
degenerative disease listen (deh-JEH-neh-ruh-tiv dih-ZEEZ)
A disease in which the function or structure of the affected tissues or organs changes for the worse over time. Osteoarthritis, osteoporosis, and Alzheimer disease are examples.
dehydration listen (dee-hy-DRAY-shun)
A condition caused by the loss of too much water from the body. Severe diarrhea or vomiting can cause dehydration.
dehydroepiandrosterone listen (dee-HY-droh-EH-pee-an-DROS-teh-rone)
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. It is a type of steroid. Also called DHEA.
delayed-type hypersensitivity response listen (...HY-per-SEN-sih-TIH-vih-tee reh-SPONTS)
An inflammatory response that develops 24 to 72 hours after exposure to an antigen that the immune system recognizes as foreign. This type of immune response involves mainly T cells rather than antibodies (which are made by B cells). Also called DTH.
delirium listen (deh-LEER-ee-um)
A mental state in which a person is confused, disoriented, and not able to think or remember clearly. The person may also be agitated and have hallucinations, and extreme excitement.
demeclocycline hydrochloride listen (DEH-meh-kloh-SY-kleen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied as a way to detect bone growth in patients receiving bisphosphonates (a type of drug used to treat bone pain caused by some types of cancer) for breast cancer. It binds to newly formed bone. A biopsy is done and bone growth is measured using a special microscope. Demeclocycline hydrochloride is a type of tetracycline antibiotic and a type of bone-labeling agent. Also called Declomycin.
dementia listen (deh-MEN-shuh)
A condition in which a person loses the ability to think, remember, learn, make decisions, and solve problems. Symptoms may also include personality changes and emotional problems. There are many causes of dementia, including Alzheimer disease, brain cancer, and brain injury. Dementia usually gets worse over time.
Demerol listen (DEH-meh-ROL)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Demerol is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid. Also called meperidine hydrochloride.
dendritic cell listen (den-DRIH-tik sel)
A special type of immune cell that is found in tissues, such as the skin, and boosts immune responses by showing antigens on its surface to other cells of the immune system. A dendritic cell is a type of phagocyte and a type of antigen-presenting cell (APC).
dendritic cell vaccine listen (den-DRIH-tik sel vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made of antigens and dendritic antigen-presenting cells (APCs).
denial listen (deh-NY-ul)
In psychiatry, a state in which a person is unable or unwilling to see the truth or reality about an issue or situation.
denileukin diftitox listen (DEH-nih-LOO-kin DIF-tih-tox)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that has recurred (come back) or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is used in patients whose cancer has a receptor for the protein interleukin-2 (IL-2). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Denileukin diftitox is made by combining IL-2 with a bacterial toxin. The IL-2 part of the drug attaches to the cancer cells and the toxin kills them. Denileukin diftitox is a type of immunotoxin and a type of fusion protein. Also called Ontak.
denomination listen (deh-NAH-mih-NAY-shun)
In religion, describes a group whose members are organized under a common name and set of rules and have common beliefs and practices.
denosumab listen (deh-noh-SOO-mab)
A drug used to prevent or treat certain bone problems. It is used under the brand name Xgeva to prevent bone problems caused by multiple myeloma or by solid tumors that have spread to the bone. It is also used in certain patients to treat giant cell tumor of the bone that cannot be removed by surgery, and to treat hypercalcemia that is caused by cancer and did not get better after treatment with bisphosphonates. Denosumab is also used under the brand name Prolia to increase bone mass in certain patients with breast cancer or prostate cancer who have a high risk of breaking bones. It is also used to treat osteoporosis in men and postmenopausal women who have a high risk of breaking bones. Denosumab is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It binds to a protein called RANKL, which keeps RANKL from binding to another protein called RANK on the surface of certain bone cells, including bone cancer cells. This may help keep bone from breaking down and cancer cells from growing. Denosumab may also prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called AMG 162.
dental implant listen (DEN-tul IM-plant)
A metal device that is surgically placed in the jawbone. It acts as an anchor for an artificial tooth or teeth.
dentist listen (DEN-tist)
A health professional who has special training in caring for the teeth, gums, and other tissues in the mouth.
Denys-Drash syndrome listen (deh-NEES-drash SIN-drome)
A rare disorder that causes kidney failure before age 3, abnormal development of the sexual organs, and, in most cases, Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer). Children with Denys-Drash syndrome are also at high risk of some other types of cancer. Also called DDS.
deoxycytidine listen (dee-OK-see-SY-tih-deen)
A drug that protects healthy tissues from the toxic effects of anticancer drugs.
deoxyribonucleic acid listen (dee-OK-see-RY-boh-noo-KLAY-ik A-sid)
The molecules inside cells that carry genetic information and pass it from one generation to the next. Also called DNA.
Depakene listen (DEH-puh-KEEN)
A drug used to treat epileptic seizures and bipolar disorder and to prevent migraine headaches. It is also being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme that cells need to grow and may cause cancer cells to die. It also blocks the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of anticonvulsant, histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, antimaniacal, migraine headache prophylactic, and antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Stavzor and valproic acid.
Department of Health and Human Services listen (deh-PART-ment … helth … HYOO-mun SER-vih-ses)
The U.S. federal government agency responsible for protecting the public’s health and providing important services, especially for people in need. The Department of Health and Human Services works with state and local governments throughout the country to do research and provide public health services, food and drug safety programs, health insurance programs, and many other services. There are several federal agencies that are a part of the Department of Health and Human Services. They include the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), the National Institutes of Health (NIH), and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMMS). Also called DHHS.
Depo-Cyt listen (DEE-poh-SITE)
A form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than cytarabine. It is used to treat lymphoma that has spread to the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called cytarabine liposome and liposomal cytarabine.
depression listen (dee-PREH-shun)
A mental condition marked by ongoing feelings of sadness, despair, loss of energy, and difficulty dealing with normal daily life. Other symptoms of depression include feelings of worthlessness and hopelessness, loss of pleasure in activities, changes in eating or sleeping habits, and thoughts of death or suicide. Depression can affect anyone, and can be successfully treated. Depression affects 15-25% of cancer patients.
depsipeptide listen (DEP-see-PEP-tide)
A substance that is made naturally by some bacteria, fungi, and other organisms, and can also be made in the laboratory. Depsipeptides are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
derivative listen (deh-RIH-vuh-tiv)
In chemistry, a compound produced from or related to another.
dermabrasion listen (DER-muh-BRAY-zhun)
A type of surgery used to make the skin smooth and to improve the way deep scars, pits, and wrinkles look. After numbing the skin, a doctor removes the top layer of skin using sandpaper or a brush or burr (small file) that spins at a high speed.
dermatitis listen (DER-muh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the skin.
dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans listen (DER-muh-toh-FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh proh-TOO-beh-ranz)
A type of tumor that begins as a hard nodule and grows slowly. These tumors are usually found in the dermis (the inner layer of the two main layers of tissue that make up the skin) of the limbs or trunk of the body. They can grow into surrounding tissue but do not spread to other parts of the body. These tumors are related to giant cell fibroblastomas.
dermatologist listen (der-muh-TAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training to diagnose and treat skin problems.
dermis listen (DER-mis)
The inner layer of the two main layers of the skin. The dermis has connective tissue, blood vessels, oil and sweat glands, nerves, hair follicles, and other structures. It is made up of a thin upper layer called the papillary dermis, and a thick lower layer called the reticular dermis.
dermoid cyst listen (DER-moyd sist)
A type of tumor that contains a cyst filled with tissues that are normally found in the outer layers of the skin, including sweat and oil glands. These may also contain elements of hair and teeth. Dermoid cysts can form anywhere in the body, but they usually form in the ovary, testes, the skin of the head, neck, face, or lower back, or in the central nervous system. Dermoid cysts are benign (not cancer) and tend to grow slowly. They are present at birth but may not be found until later in life. Dermoid cysts are a type of germ cell tumor called a mature teratoma.
DES
A synthetic form of the hormone estrogen that was prescribed to pregnant women between about 1940 and 1971 because it was thought to prevent miscarriages. DES may increase the risk of uterine, ovarian, or breast cancer in women who took it. It also has been linked to an increased risk of clear cell carcinoma of the vagina or cervix in daughters exposed to DES before birth. Also called diethylstilbestrol.
deslorelin listen (DES-loh-REH-lin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer as a way to block sex hormones made by the ovaries or testicles. It is a type of gonadotropin-releasing hormone analog.
desmoid tumor listen (DEZ-moyd TOO-mer)
A type of soft tissue tumor that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue, usually in the arms, legs, or abdomen. It may also occur in the head and neck. Desmoid tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They often recur (come back) after treatment and spread to nearby tissue, but they rarely spread to other parts of the body. They may occur in adults or children. Also called aggressive fibromatosis and desmoid-type fibromatosis.
desmoid-type fibromatosis listen (DEZ-moyd … FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis)
A type of soft tissue tumor that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue, usually in the arms, legs, or abdomen. It may also occur in the head and neck. Desmoid-type fibromatoses are usually benign (not cancer). They often recur (come back) after treatment and spread to nearby tissue, but they rarely spread to other parts of the body. They may occur in adults or children. Also called aggressive fibromatosis and desmoid tumor.
desmoplastic listen (DES-moh-PLAS-tik)
Causing or forming adhesions or fibrous connective tissue within a tumor.
desmoplastic melanoma listen (DES-moh-PLAS-tik MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
A rare form of malignant melanoma marked by nonpigmented lesions on sun-exposed areas of the body, most commonly on the head and neck.
desmoplastic small round cell tumor listen (DES-moh-PLAS-tik ... TOO-mer)
A rare, aggressive cancer that usually affects young males and usually is located in the abdomen.
detoxify listen (dee-TOK-sih-fy)
To make something less poisonous or harmful. It may refer to the process of removing toxins, poisons, or other harmful substances from the body.
developmental stage listen (dee-VEH-lup-MEN-tul stayj)
The physical, mental, and emotional stages a child goes through as he or she grows and matures.
deviant listen (DEE-vee-unt)
Different from what is normal or standard, especially in terms of behavior.
device listen (dee-VISE)
An object that has a specific use. In medicine, wheelchairs, pumps, and artificial limbs are examples of devices.
DEXA listen
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, bone mineral density scan, DEXA scan, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, dual x-ray absorptiometry, and DXA.
DEXA scan listen (… skan)
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, bone mineral density scan, DEXA, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, dual x-ray absorptiometry, and DXA.
dexamethasone listen (DEK-suh-MEH-thuh-sone)
A drug used to reduce inflammation and lower the body’s immune response. It is used with other drugs to treat leukemia, lymphoma, mycosis fungoides, and other types of cancer. Dexamethasone is also used to prevent or treat many other diseases and conditions. These include conditions related to cancer and its treatment, such as anemia, allergic reactions, swelling in the brain, and high levels of calcium in the blood. Dexamethasone is a type of corticosteroid.
dexmethylphenidate listen (dex-MEH-thul-FEH-nih-dayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of fatigue and nervous system side effects caused by chemotherapy. It is a type of central nervous system stimulant.
dexrazoxane hydrochloride listen (DEX-ruh-ZOK-sane HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat severe side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is used under the brand name Totect to treat the toxic effects of an anticancer drug that leaks from a vein into surrounding tissue and causes tissue damage. It is also used under the brand name Zinecard to reduce heart damage in women given doxorubicin for breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. Dexrazoxane hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of cardioprotective agent, a type of chemoprotective agent, and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
dextroamphetamine-amphetamine listen (DEK-stroh-am-FEH-tuh-meen-am-FEH-tuh-meen)
A combination of drugs used as a treatment for attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) and narcolepsy (a sleep disorder). It is a type of stimulant. Also called Adderall.
dextromethorphan acetic acid listen (DEK-stroh-meh-THOR-fan uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
An anticancer drug that is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
DFMO
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called difluoromethylornithine.
DFS
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient survives without any signs or symptoms of that cancer. In a clinical trial, measuring the DFS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called disease-free survival, relapse-free survival, and RFS.
DHA-paclitaxel listen (...PA-klih-TAK-sil)
A combination of DHA (a natural fatty acid) and paclitaxel (an anticancer drug) being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor.
DHEA
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. It is a type of steroid. Also called dehydroepiandrosterone.
DHFR inhibitor listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that can build up in cancer cells and block them from using folate. Folate is a nutrient that rapidly dividing cells need to make DNA. Blocking folate use helps keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Some DHFR inhibitors are used to treat cancer. A DHFR inhibitor is a type of antifolate. Also called dihydrofolate reductase inhibitor.
DHHS
The U.S. federal government agency responsible for protecting the public’s health and providing important services, especially for people in need. The DHHS works with state and local governments throughout the country to do research and provide public health services, food and drug safety programs, health insurance programs, and many other services. There are several federal agencies that are a part of the DHHS. They include the Food and Drug Administration (FDA), the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), the National Institutes of Health (NIH), and the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMMS). Also called Department of Health and Human Services.
DHL
A rare, aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma caused by changes in the DNA that affect a gene called the MYC gene and either the BCL2 gene or the BCL6 gene. DHL may be hard to treat and has a poor prognosis. It is a type of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called double-hit lymphoma.
DHPLN
A childhood condition in which abnormal tissue grows on the outer part of one or both kidneys. DHPLN usually develops into Wilms tumor (a type of childhood kidney cancer) if not treated. Also called diffuse hyperplastic perilobar nephroblastomatosis.
DHT
A hormone made from testosterone in the prostate, testes, and certain other tissues. It is needed to develop and maintain male sex characteristics, such as facial hair, deep voice, and muscle growth. High amounts of DHT may increase the growth of prostate cancer and make it harder to treat. Also called androstanolone and dihydrotestosterone.
diabetes listen (dy-uh-BEE-teez)
Any of several diseases in which the kidneys make a large amount of urine. Diabetes usually refers to diabetes mellitus in which there is also a high level of glucose (a type of sugar) in the blood because the body does not make enough insulin or use it the way it should.
diabetes insipidus listen (dy-uh-BEE-teez in-SIH-pih-dus)
A condition in which a person is very thirsty and makes large amounts of urine. The most common types of diabetes insipidus are central diabetes insipidus (a pituitary disorder) and nephrogenic diabetes insipidus (kidney failure). Diabetes insipidus is not related to diabetes mellitus, which is more common.
diabetes mellitus listen (dy-uh-BEE-teez MEH-lih-tus)
A disease in which the body does not control the amount of glucose (a type of sugar) in the blood and the kidneys make a large amount of urine. This disease occurs when the body does not make enough insulin or does not use it the way it should.
diacetylmorphine hydrochloride listen (dy-A-seh-til-MOR-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance made from morphine. Diacetylmorphine hydrochloride is very addictive, and it is illegal to use or sell it in the United States. It may be used outside the United States to treat severe pain. Diacetylmorphine hydrochloride binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opiate. Also called diamorphine hydrochloride and heroin.
diagnosis listen (DY-ug-NOH-sis)
The process of identifying a disease, condition, or injury from its signs and symptoms. A health history, physical exam, and tests, such as blood tests, imaging tests, and biopsies, may be used to help make a diagnosis.
diagnostic mammogram listen (DY-ug-NAH-stik MA-muh-gram)
X-ray of the breasts used to check for breast cancer after a lump or other sign or symptom of breast cancer has been found.
diagnostic procedure listen (DY-ug-NAH-stik proh-SEE-jer)
A type of test used to help diagnose a disease or condition. Mammograms and colonoscopies are examples of diagnostic procedures. Also called diagnostic test.
diagnostic technique listen (DY-ug-NAH-stik tek-NEEK)
A type of method or test used to help diagnose a disease or condition. Imaging tests and tests to measure blood pressure, pulse, and temperature are examples of diagnostic techniques.
diagnostic test listen (DY-ug-NAH-stik …)
A type of test used to help diagnose a disease or condition. Mammograms and colonoscopies are examples of diagnostic tests. Also called diagnostic procedure.
diagnostic trial listen (DY-ug-NAH-stik TRY-ul)
A research study that evaluates methods of detecting disease.
dialysis listen (dy-A-luh-sis)
The process of filtering the blood when the kidneys are not able to cleanse it.
diameter listen (dy-A-meh-ter)
The length of a straight line that extends from one edge of a tumor or other object, through its center and to the opposite edge. It is usually used to measure the size of round or spherical shapes.
Diamond-Blackfan anemia listen (DY-uh-mund-BLAK-fan uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with Diamond-Blackfan anemia may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital hypoplastic anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, DBA, erythrogenesis imperfecta, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
diamorphine hydrochloride listen (dy-uh-MOR-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance made from morphine. Diamorphine hydrochloride is very addictive, and it is illegal to use or sell it in the United States. It may be used outside the United States to treat severe pain. Diamorphine hydrochloride binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opiate. Also called diacetylmorphine hydrochloride and heroin.
diaphragm listen (DY-uh-fram)
The thin muscle below the lungs and heart that separates the chest from the abdomen.
diarrhea listen (dy-uh-REE-uh)
Frequent and watery bowel movements.
diathermy listen (DY-uh-THER-mee)
A procedure in which tissue is heated to destroy abnormal cells. The heat may come from electric currents, microwaves, radio waves, or ultrasound. Diathermy is a type of hyperthermia therapy. Also called electrodiathermy.
diazepam listen (dy-A-zeh-pam)
A drug used to treat mild to moderate anxiety and tension and to relax muscles. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called Valium.
diaziquone listen (dy-A-zih-kwone)
An anticancer drug that is able to cross the blood-brain barrier and kill cancer cells in the central nervous system. Also called AZQ.
DICER1 syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called DICER1. Having this mutation increases the risk of certain types of tumors, including tumors of the kidney, thyroid, ovary, cervix, testicle, brain, eye, and lining of the lung. The tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). A goiter (an enlarged thyroid) and polyps in the colon may also occur. Not all people who have a mutation in the DICER1 gene will develop tumors.
diclofenac listen (dy-KLOH-feh-nak)
The active ingredient in a drug that is used to treat the symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of skin cancer. It blocks substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor, a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
diclofenac sodium listen (dy-KLOH-feh-nak SOH-dee-um)
A drug that is used to treat the symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of skin cancer. It blocks substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor, a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Voltaren.
diclofenac sodium gel listen (dy-KLOH-feh-nak SOH-dee-um jel)
The gel form of a drug that is used to treat the symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of skin cancer. It blocks substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor, a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Voltaren gel.
didanosine listen (dy-DA-noh-seen)
A drug used in the treatment of infections caused by viruses.
di-dgA-RFB4
An anticancer drug that is a combination of a monoclonal antibody (RFB4) and an immunotoxin (dgA).
DIEP flap listen (… flap)
A type of breast reconstruction in which blood vessels called deep inferior epigastric perforators (DIEP), and the skin and fat connected to them are removed from the lower abdomen and used for reconstruction. Muscle is left in place.
diet listen (DY-et)
The things a person eats and drinks.
dietary counseling listen (DY-uh-TAYR-ee KOWN-suh-ling)
A process by which a health professional with special training in nutrition helps people make healthy food choices and form healthy eating habits. In cancer treatment, the goal of dietary counseling is to help patients stay healthy during and after treatment and to stay strong enough to fight infections and the recurrence of disease. Also called nutritional counseling.
dietary protocol listen (DY-uh-TAYR-ee PROH-tuh-KOL)
A detailed diet plan that states what, how, and when a person will eat and drink. It may be used to test how a specific diet affects a health outcome, such as lower cholesterol.
Dietary Reference Intakes listen (DY-uh-TAYR-ee REH-frents IN-tayks)
A set of guidelines developed by U.S. and Canadian scientists to give information about the role of nutrients in human health. These guidelines include the Reference Daily Intakes (RDI), which are the recommended amounts of nutrients to be eaten each day to meet the needs of most healthy people. This system replaced the Recommended Dietary Allowances (RDA). Also called DRI.
dietary supplement listen (DY-uh-TAYR-ee SUH-pleh-ment)
A product that is added to the diet. A dietary supplement is taken by mouth, and usually contains one or more dietary ingredient (such as vitamin, mineral, herb, amino acid, and enzyme). Also called nutritional supplement.
diethylstilbestrol listen (dy-EH-thul-stil-BES-trol)
A synthetic form of the hormone estrogen that was prescribed to pregnant women between about 1940 and 1971 because it was thought to prevent miscarriages. Diethylstilbestrol may increase the risk of uterine, ovarian, or breast cancer in women who took it. It also has been linked to an increased risk of clear cell carcinoma of the vagina or cervix in daughters exposed to diethylstilbestrol before birth. Also called DES.
dietitian listen (dy-eh-TIH-shun)
A health professional who has special training in diet and nutrition. Dietitians advise on nutrition and healthy eating to help prevent and treat conditions, such as food allergies and conditions caused by diabetes, heart disease, and cancer. Dietitians may provide nutritional counseling, meal planning, medical nutrition therapy (such as a special diet, dietary supplements, or intravenous or tube feedings), and nutrition education programs.
differentiating agent listen (DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ting AY-jent)
A substance that causes a cell to change from an immature form to a mature form. In cancer, a differentiating agent may help cancer cells to become more like normal cells and to grow and spread more slowly. Some differentiating agents are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer.
differentiation listen (DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-shun)
In biology, describes the processes by which immature cells become mature cells with specific functions. In cancer, this describes how much or how little tumor tissue looks like the normal tissue it came from. Well-differentiated cancer cells look more like normal cells and tend to grow and spread more slowly than poorly differentiated or undifferentiated cancer cells. Differentiation is used in tumor grading systems, which are different for each type of cancer.
diffuse listen (dih-FYOOS)
Widely spread; not localized or confined.
diffuse hyperplastic perilobar nephroblastomatosis listen (dih-FYOOS HY-per-PLAS-tik payr-ee-LOH-bar NEH-froh-blas-TOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A childhood condition in which abnormal tissue grows on the outer part of one or both kidneys. Diffuse hyperplastic perilobar nephroblastomatosis usually develops into Wilms tumor (a type of childhood kidney cancer) if not treated. Also called DHPLN.
diffuse intrinsic pontine glioma listen (dih-FYOOS in-TRIN-sik PON-teen glee-OH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing tumor that forms in cells called glial cells in a part of the brain stem called the pons. Diffuse intrinsic pontine gliomas tend to spread to nearby tissue and other parts of the brain stem, are hard to treat, and have a poor prognosis (outcome). They usually occur in children. Also called DIPG.
diffuse large B-cell lymphoma listen (dih-FYOOS larj ... sel lim-FOH-muh)
A type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer of the immune system) that is usually aggressive (fast-growing). It is the most common type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma, and is marked by rapidly growing tumors in the lymph nodes, spleen, liver, bone marrow, or other organs. Other symptoms include fever, night sweats, and weight loss. There are several subtypes of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma.
diffuse optical imaging listen (dih-FYOOS OP-tih-kul IH-muh-jing)
A procedure that uses light waves to create 2-dimensional (2-D) or 3-dimensional (3-D) pictures of tissues inside the body. Diffuse optical imaging may be used to look at blood flow to the tissues and to measure changes in the amount of oxygen in them. This may help show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. Diffuse optical imaging may be especially useful for looking at soft tissue, such as breast and brain tissue. It is being studied as an imaging test to help diagnose early-stage breast cancer and other conditions. Also called DOI.
diffuse optical tomography listen (dih-FYOOS OP-tih-kul toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses light waves to create 3-dimensional (3-D) pictures of tissues inside the body. The pictures are created by a computer linked to the light source. Diffuse optical tomography may be used to look at blood flow to the tissues and to measure changes in the amount of oxygen in them. This may help show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. Diffuse optical tomography may be especially useful for looking at soft tissue, such as breast and brain tissue. It is being studied as an imaging test to help diagnose early-stage breast cancer and other conditions. Also called DOT.
difluoromethylornithine listen (dy-FLOOR-oh-MEH-thul-OR-nih-theen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called DFMO.
digestion listen (dy-JES-chun)
The process of breaking down food into substances the body can use for energy, tissue growth, and repair.
digestive system listen (dy-JES-tiv SIS-tem)
The organs that take in food and liquids and break them down into substances that the body can use for energy, growth, and tissue repair. Waste products the body cannot use leave the body through bowel movements. The digestive system includes the mouth, pharynx (throat), esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large intestine, rectum, and anus. It also includes the salivary glands, liver, gallbladder, and pancreas, which make digestive juices and enzymes that help the body digest food and liquids. Also called gastrointestinal system.
digestive tract listen (dy-JES-tiv trakt)
The organs that food and liquids travel through when they are swallowed, digested, absorbed, and leave the body as feces. These organs include the mouth, pharynx (throat), esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large intestine, rectum, and anus. The digestive tract is part of the digestive system. Also called alimentary tract and gastrointestinal tract.
digital image analysis listen (DIH-jih-tul IH-mij uh-NA-lih-sis)
A method in which an image or other type of data is changed into a series of dots or numbers so that it can be viewed and studied on a computer. In medicine, this type of image analysis is being used to study organs or tissues, and in the diagnosis and treatment of disease.
digital mammography listen (DIH-jih-tul ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
The use of a computer, rather than x-ray film, to create a picture of the breast.
digital photography listen (DIH-jih-tul fuh-TAH-gruh-fee)
A type of photography in which images can be viewed on a computer screen.
digital rectal examination listen (DIH-jih-tul REK-tul eg-ZA-mih-NAY-shun)
An examination in which a doctor inserts a lubricated, gloved finger into the rectum to feel for abnormalities. Also called DRE.
digitalis listen (DIH-jih-TA-lis)
A substance used to make drugs that are used to treat several heart conditions, including congestive heart failure. Digitalis is made from the dried leaves of Digitalis purpurea (common foxglove) plants. It is a type of cardiac glycoside.
digoxin listen (dih-JOK-sin)
A drug used to treat irregular heartbeat and some types of heart failure. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Digoxin helps the heart work normally by controlling the amount of calcium that goes into the heart muscle. It also may kill cancer cells and make them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of cardiac glycoside. Also called Lanoxin.
dihematoporphyrin ether listen (dy-HEE-muh-toh-POR-fih-rin EE-ther)
Used in photodynamic therapy, a drug that is absorbed by tumor cells; when exposed to light, it becomes active and kills the cancer cells.
dihydrofolate reductase inhibitor listen (dy-HY-droh-FOH-layt ree-DUK-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that can build up in cancer cells and block them from using folate. Folate is a nutrient that rapidly dividing cells need to make DNA. Blocking folate use helps keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Some dihydrofolate reductase inhibitors are used to treat cancer. A dihydrofolate reductase inhibitor is a type of antifolate. Also called DHFR inhibitor.
dihydrotestosterone listen (dy-HY-droh-tes-TOS-teh-rone)
A hormone made from testosterone in the prostate, testes, and certain other tissues. It is needed to develop and maintain male sex characteristics, such as facial hair, deep voice, and muscle growth. High amounts of dihydrotestosterone may increase the growth of prostate cancer and make it harder to treat. Also called androstanolone and DHT.
diindolylmethane listen (dy-IN-doh-lil-MEH-thayn)
A substance being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer and in the prevention of cervical cancer. Diindolylmethane is found in cruciferous vegetables like broccoli, brussels sprouts, cauliflower, cabbage, and kale. It is a type of plant indole. Also called DIM.
Dilantin listen (dy-LAN-tin)
A drug used to treat or prevent seizures or convulsions that may be caused by epilepsy, brain surgery, or treatment for brain cancer. It is a type of anticonvulsant agent. Also called phenytoin sodium.
dilatation and curettage listen (DIH-luh-TAY-shun … kyoo-reh-TAZH)
A procedure to scrape and remove tissue from the inner lining of the uterus. The cervix is dilated (made larger) and a curette (spoon-shaped instrument) is inserted into the uterus to remove tissue. A tissue sample may then be checked under a microscope for signs of disease, such as infection or cancer. A dilatation and curettage may also be done after a miscarriage or to treat certain conditions, such as abnormal bleeding. Also called D&C and dilation and curettage.
dilate listen (DY-layt)
To widen or enlarge an opening or hollow structure beyond its usual size, such as the pupil of the eye or a blood vessel.
dilation and curettage listen (dy-LAY-shun … kyoo-reh-TAZH)
A procedure to scrape and remove tissue from the inner lining of the uterus. The cervix is dilated (made larger) and a curette (spoon-shaped instrument) is inserted into the uterus to remove tissue. A tissue sample may then be checked under a microscope for signs of disease, such as infection or cancer. A dilation and curettage may also be done after a miscarriage or to treat certain conditions, such as abnormal bleeding. Also called D&C and dilatation and curettage.
dilator listen (DY-lay-ter)
A device used to stretch or enlarge an opening.
Dilaudid listen (dy-LAW-did)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It may also be used to treat certain types of cough. Dilaudid is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Exalgo, hydromorphone hydrochloride, and Hydrostat IR.
dilute listen (dy-LOOT)
To make something thinner, weaker, less concentrated, or less pure by adding something to it.
DIM
A substance being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer and in the prevention of cervical cancer. DIM is found in cruciferous vegetables like broccoli, brussels sprouts, cauliflower, cabbage, and kale. It is a type of plant indole. Also called diindolylmethane.
Dimericine listen (dy-MAYR-ih-seen)
A lotion being studied in the treatment of skin cancer and a skin condition called xeroderma pigmentosum. It has an enzyme contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. The enzyme repairs damage caused by ultraviolet radiation. Dimericine is a type of DNA repair enzyme topical agent. Also called T4N5 liposomal lotion.
dimesna listen (dy-MEZ-nuh)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called chemoprotective agents.
dimethyl sulfoxide listen (dy-MEH-thul sul-FOK-side)
A colorless liquid that readily dissolves many chemicals and penetrates animal and plant tissues. It is used in human medicine, veterinary medicine, and pharmaceuticals.
dimethylxanthenone acetic acid listen (dy-MEH-thul-ZAN-theh-none uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
An anticancer drug that is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor.
DIN
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct (milk duct). Having DIN may increase the risk of breast cancer in which these abnormal cells become cancer and spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. Types of DIN include atypical ductal hyperplasia and ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS). Also called ductal intraepithelial neoplasia.
dinaciclib listen (dih-nuh-SY-klib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced melanoma (a type of skin cancer) and other types of cancer. It blocks cell division and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called CDK inhibitor SCH 727965.
dinutuximab listen (din-yoo-TUK-sih-mab)
A drug used with granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), aldesleukin (IL-2), and 13-cis-retinoic acid to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It is used in children whose disease has improved with other anticancer treatment. Dinutuximab binds to a substance called GD2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Dinutuximab may block GD2 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Ch14.18, MOAB Ch14.18, monoclonal antibody Ch14.18, and Unituxin.
DIPG
A rare, fast-growing tumor that forms in cells called glial cells in a part of the brain stem called the pons. DIPGs tend to spread to nearby tissue and other parts of the brain stem, are hard to treat, and have a poor prognosis (outcome). They usually occur in children. Also called diffuse intrinsic pontine glioma.
diphenhydramine listen (dy-fen-HY-druh-meen)
A drug used to treat allergies and relieve cough and itching caused by insect bites, sunburn, and poison oak or ivy. It is also used to treat mild Parkinson disease, to prevent and treat motion sickness, to relieve cough and cold symptoms, and as a sleep aid. It is a type of antihistamine.
diphosphonate listen (dy-FOS-foh-nayt)
A drug or substance used to treat hypercalcemia (abnormally high blood calcium) and bone pain caused by some types of cancer. Forms of diphosphonates are also used to treat osteoporosis and for bone imaging. Diphosphonates inhibit a type of bone cell that breaks down bone. Also called bisphosphonate.
dipyridamole listen (DY-pih-RIH-duh-mole)
A drug that prevents blood cell clumping and enhances the effectiveness of fluorouracil and other chemotherapeutic agents.
direct ophthalmoscopy listen (duh-REKT OF-thul-MOS-koh-pee)
An exam of the inside of the back of the eye using an ophthalmoscope (a flashlight-sized instrument with a light source and a set of rotating lenses).
disability insurance listen (dih-suh-BIH-lih-tee in-SHOOR-ents)
An insurance plan that pays some of a person’s income when he or she is disabled from an illness or injury and cannot work. The two main types of disability insurance are short-term disability (STD) and long-term disability (LTD). STD may last for up to 2 years. LTD usually begins after STD ends and may last for a person’s lifetime.
discharge listen (DIS-charj)
In medicine, a fluid that comes out of the body. Discharge can be normal or a sign of disease. Discharge also means release of a patient from care.
disease progression listen (dih-ZEEZ pruh-GREH-shun)
Cancer that continues to grow or spread.
disease-free survival listen (dih-ZEEZ ... ser-VY-vul)
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient survives without any signs or symptoms of that cancer. In a clinical trial, measuring the disease-free survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called DFS, relapse-free survival, and RFS.
disease-specific survival rate listen (dih-ZEEZ-speh-SIH-fik ser-VY-vul rayt)
The percentage of people in a study or treatment group who have not died from a specific disease in a defined period of time. The time period usually begins at the time of diagnosis or at the start of treatment and ends at the time of death. Patients who died from causes other than the disease being studied are not counted in this measurement.
disinfectant listen (DIS-in-fek-tunt)
Any substance or process that is used primarily on non-living objects to kill germs, such as viruses, bacteria, and other microorganisms that can cause infection and disease. Most disinfectants are harsh chemicals but sometimes heat or radiation may be used.
disorder listen (dis-OR-der)
In medicine, a disturbance of normal functioning of the mind or body. Disorders may be caused by genetic factors, disease, or trauma.
disorientation listen (dis-OR-ee-en-TAY-shun)
A mental state marked by confusion about time, place, or who one is.
disseminate listen (dih-SEH-mih-NAYT)
Scatter or distribute over a large area or range.
distal listen (DIS-tul)
In medicine, refers to a part of the body that is farther away from the center of the body than another part. For example, the fingers are distal to the shoulder. The opposite is proximal.
distal colon listen (DIS-tul KOH-lun)
The last part of the colon. The distal colon includes the descending colon (the left side of the colon) and the sigmoid colon (the S-shaped section of the colon that connects to the rectum).
distal extrahepatic bile duct listen (DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt)
The last part of a duct (tube) called the extrahepatic bile duct. It is outside the liver and carries bile from the liver and gallbladder to the small intestine. The distal extrahepatic bile duct starts where the ducts from the liver and gallbladder join to form the common bile duct. It passes through the pancreas into the small intestine. The distal extrahepatic bile duct is part of the biliary system.
distal pancreatectomy listen (DIS-tul PAN-kree-uh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the body and the tail of the pancreas. The spleen may also be removed. A distal pancreatectomy is usually done to remove benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) pancreatic tumors found in the body or tail of the pancreas, but it may also be done to treat chronic pancreatitis and injuries to the pancreas.
distal urethra listen (DIS-tul yoo-REE-thruh)
The part of the urethra closest to the outside of the body. The urethra is the tube through which urine leaves the body. In women, the distal urethra is approximately the last ½ inch, and in men it is the part of the urethra in the penis.
distal urethral cancer listen (DIS-tul yoo-REE-thrul KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the part of the urethra that is closest to the outside of the body. The cancer often has not spread deeply into the tissue.
distant cancer listen (DIS-tunt KAN-ser)
Refers to cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to distant organs or distant lymph nodes. Also known as distant metastasis.
distant metastasis listen (DIS-tunt meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Refers to cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to distant organs or distant lymph nodes. Also known as distant cancer.
distraction listen (dis-TRAK-shun)
In medicine, a pain relief method that takes the patient's attention away from the pain.
distress listen (dih-STRES)
Emotional, social, spiritual, or physical pain or suffering that may cause a person to feel sad, afraid, depressed, anxious, or lonely. People in distress may also feel that they are not able to manage or cope with changes caused by normal life activities or by having a disease, such as cancer. Cancer patients may have trouble coping with their diagnosis, physical symptoms, or treatment.
disulfiram listen (dy-SUL-fih-ram)
A drug that slows the metabolism of retinoids, allowing them to act over a longer period of time.
diuresis listen (DY-yoo-REE-sis)
An increase in the amount of urine made by the kidney and passed from the body.
diuretic listen (DY-yoo-REH-tik)
A type of drug that causes the kidneys to make more urine. Diuretics help the body get rid of extra fluid and salt. They are used to treat high blood pressure, edema (extra fluid in the tissues), and other conditions. There are many different types of diuretics. They are sometimes called water pills.
diverticulitis listen (DY-ver-TIH-kyoo-LY-tis)
Inflammation of one or more pouches or sacs that bulge out from the wall of a hollow organ, such as the colon. Symptoms include muscle spasms and cramps in the abdomen.
diverticulosis listen (DY-ver-TIH-kyoo-LOH-sis)
A condition marked by small sacs or pouches in the walls of a hollow organ, such as the colon. These sacs can become inflamed and cause a condition called diverticulitis.
diverticulum listen (DY-ver-TIH-kyoo-lum)
A small pouch or sac that bulges out from the wall of a hollow organ, such as the colon.
DJ-927
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of taxane derivative.
DNA
The molecules inside cells that carry genetic information and pass it from one generation to the next. Also called deoxyribonucleic acid.
DNA cross-linking agent listen (… KROS-lin-king AY-jent)
A substance that binds DNA nucleotides together and blocks DNA synthesis. In cancer treatment, DNA cross-linking agents may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing.
DNA gene-expression microarray listen (… jeen-ek-SPREH-shun MY-kroh-uh-RAY)
A process that allows thousands of pieces of DNA that are fixed to a glass slide to be analyzed at one time. It is used to identify the genes (pieces of DNA) in specific cells or tissue that are actively used to make RNA, which then may be used to make proteins.
DNA intercalating agent listen (…in-TER-kuh-LAY-ting AY-jent)
A substance that inserts itself into the DNA structure of a cell and binds to the DNA. This causes DNA damage. In cancer treatment, DNA intercalating agents may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing.
DNA methylase listen (… MEH-thih-LAYS)
An enzyme (a protein that speeds up chemical reactions in the body) that attaches methyl groups to DNA. A methyl group is a chemical group containing one carbon and three hydrogen atoms. Also called DNA methyltransferase.
DNA methyltransferase listen (... MEH-thul-TRANZ-feh-rays)
An enzyme (a protein that speeds up chemical reactions in the body) that attaches methyl groups to DNA. A methyl group is a chemical group containing one carbon and three hydrogen atoms. Also called DNA methylase.
DNA repair deficiency syndrome listen (… reh-PAYR deh-FIH-shun-see SIN-drome)
A type of inherited disorder caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes involved in DNA repair. Changes in these genes can cause breaks, rearrangements, and other problems in the DNA. There are many different types of DNA repair deficiency syndromes. Most of these syndromes are marked by growth and developmental problems, premature aging, and disorders of the skin and nervous system. Having a DNA repair deficiency syndrome may increase a person’s risk of certain types of cancer. Also called DNA repair disorder.
DNA repair disorder listen (… reh-PAYR dis-OR-der)
A type of inherited disorder caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes involved in DNA repair. Changes in these genes can cause breaks, rearrangements, and other problems in the DNA. There are many different types of DNA repair disorders. Most of these disorders are marked by growth and developmental problems, premature aging, and disorders of the skin and nervous system. Having a DNA repair disorder may increase a person’s risk of certain types of cancer. Also called DNA repair deficiency syndrome.
DNA replication listen (… reh-plih-KAY-shun)
The process by which a copy of the DNA in a cell is made before the cell divides.
DNA sequencing listen (… SEE-kwen-sing)
A laboratory process used to learn the exact sequence (order) of the four building blocks, or bases, that make up DNA. Information is stored in DNA in a code made by arranging the four bases (identified by the letters A, C, G, and T) in different orders. DNA sequencing can be used to find DNA mutations (changes) that may cause diseases, such as cancer.
DNR order listen (… OR-der)
A type of advance directive in which a person states that healthcare providers should not perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation (restarting the heart) if his or her heart or breathing stops. Also called do not resuscitate order.
do not resuscitate order listen (… ree-SUH-sih-TAYT …)
A type of advance directive in which a person states that healthcare providers should not perform cardiopulmonary resuscitation (restarting the heart) if his or her heart or breathing stops. Also called DNR order.
docetaxel listen (DOH-seh-TAK-sil)
A drug used to treat certain types of cancers of the breast, stomach, lung, prostate, and head and neck. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Docetaxel kills cancer cells by stopping them from dividing. It is a type of taxane. Also called Taxotere.
docetaxel-cisplatin-fluorouracil listen (DOH-seh-TAK-sil-sis-PLA-tin-floor-oh-YOOR-uh-sil)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), cisplatin (Platinol), and fluorouracil. Also called DCF, Taxotere-Platinol-fluorouracil, TPF, and TPF regimen.
dock listen (dok)
A plant that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rumex acetosella. Also called sheep sorrel and sorrel.
DOI
A procedure that uses light waves to create 2-dimensional (2-D) or 3-dimensional (3-D) pictures of tissues inside the body. DOI may be used to look at blood flow to the tissues and to measure changes in the amount of oxygen in them. This may help show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. DOI may be especially useful for looking at soft tissue, such as breast and brain tissue. It is being studied as an imaging test to help diagnose early-stage breast cancer and other conditions. Also called diffuse optical imaging.
dolasetron mesylate listen (doh-LAH-seh-tron MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Dolasetron mesylate blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Dolasetron mesylate is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic.
dolastatin 10 listen (DOH-luh-STA-tin …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to a protein that cells need to divide and it may kill cancer cells. Dolastatin 10 comes from a marine organism. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor.
donepezil listen (doh-NEH-peh-zil)
A drug that is used to treat Alzheimer disease and is being studied in the treatment of side effects caused by radiation therapy to the brain. It is a type of cholinesterase inhibitor.
dong quai listen (dong kwye)
An herb native to China. A substance taken from the roots has been used in traditional Chinese medicine to treat menstrual and menopausal problems. Dong quai may increase the effect of the drug warfarin (a blood-thinner). The scientific name is Angelica sinensis.
donor listen (DOH-ner)
In medicine, a person who gives blood, cells, tissue, or an organ for use in another person, such as in a blood transfusion or an organ transplant.
donor lymphocyte infusion listen (DOH-ner LIM-foh-site in-FYOO-zhun)
A type of therapy in which lymphocytes from the blood of a donor are given to a patient who has already received a stem cell transplant from the same donor. The donor lymphocytes may kill remaining cancer cells. Donor lymphocyte infusion is used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that has come back and myeloma. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer.
dornase alfa inhalation solution listen (DOR-nays AL-fuh in-huh-LAY-shun suh-LOO-shun)
A drug given in an aerosol mist to decrease the thickness of mucus in the lungs of patients with cystic fibrosis. It is also being studied as a treatment to reduce the thickness of saliva in patients being treated for head and neck cancer. Dornase alfa inhalation solution contains an enzyme that breaks the DNA in mucus into small pieces and makes the mucus thinner. Also called Pulmozyme.
dose listen (dose)
The amount of medicine taken, or radiation given, at one time.
dose-dense chemotherapy listen (dose-dents KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A chemotherapy treatment plan in which drugs are given with less time between treatments than in a standard chemotherapy treatment plan.
dose-dependent listen (dose-deh-PEN-dent)
Refers to the effects of treatment with a drug. If the effects change when the dose of the drug is changed, the effects are said to be dose-dependent.
dose-limiting listen (dose-LIH-mih-ting)
Describes side effects of a drug or other treatment that are serious enough to prevent an increase in dose or level of that treatment.
dose-rate listen (dose-rayt)
The strength of a treatment given over a period of time.
dosimetrist listen (doh-SIH-meh-trist)
A person who determines the proper radiation dose for treatment.
dosimetry listen (doh-SIH-meh-tree)
Measurement of radiation exposure from x-rays, gamma rays, or other types of radiation used in the treatment or detection of diseases, including cancer.
DOT
A procedure that uses light waves to create 3-dimensional (3-D) pictures of tissues inside the body. The pictures are created by a computer linked to the light source. DOT may be used to look at blood flow to the tissues and to measure changes in the amount of oxygen in them. This may help show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. DOT may be especially useful for looking at soft tissue, such as breast and brain tissue. It is being studied as an imaging test to help diagnose early-stage breast cancer and other conditions. Also called diffuse optical tomography.
double balloon endoscopy listen (DUH-bul buh-LOON en-DOS-koh-pee)
A procedure used to look at the inside of the small intestine. A special instrument made up of two tubes (one inside the other) is inserted through the mouth or rectum and into the small intestine. The inside tube, which is an endoscope with a light and lens for viewing, is moved through part of the small intestine, and a balloon at the end of it is inflated to keep the endoscope in place. Next, the outer tube is moved through the small intestine to reach the end of the endoscope, and a balloon at the end of the outer tube is inflated to keep it in place. Then, the balloon at the end of the endoscope is deflated, and the endoscope is moved through the next part of the small intestine. These steps are repeated many times as the tubes move through the whole small intestine. This allows the doctor to see all of the small intestine. Tissue samples may be removed so they can be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called DBE and double balloon enteroscopy.
double balloon enteroscopy listen (DUH-bul buh-LOON en-teh-ROS-koh-pee)
A procedure used to look at the inside of the small intestine. A special instrument made up of two tubes (one inside the other) is inserted through the mouth or rectum and into the small intestine. The inside tube, which is an endoscope with a light and lens for viewing, is moved through part of the small intestine, and a balloon at the end of it is inflated to keep the endoscope in place. Next, the outer tube is moved through the small intestine to reach the end of the endoscope, and a balloon at the end of the outer tube is inflated to keep it in place. Then, the balloon at the end of the endoscope is deflated, and the endoscope is moved through the next part of the small intestine. These steps are repeated many times as the tubes move through the whole small intestine. This allows the doctor to see all of the small intestine. Tissue samples may be removed so they can be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called DBE and double balloon endoscopy.
double-blind study listen (DUH-bul-blind STUH-dee)
A type of clinical trial in which neither the participants nor the researcher knows which treatment or intervention participants are receiving until the clinical trial is over. This makes results of the study less likely to be biased. This means that the results are less likely to be affected by factors that are not related to the treatment or intervention being tested.
double-contrast barium enema listen (DUH-bul-KON-trast BAYR-ee-um EH-neh-muh)
A procedure in which x-rays of the colon and rectum are taken after a liquid containing barium is put into the rectum. Barium is a silver-white metallic compound that outlines the colon and rectum on an x-ray and helps show abnormalities. Air is put into the rectum and colon to further enhance the x-ray.
double-hit lymphoma listen (DUH-bul-hit lim-FOH-muh)
A rare, aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma caused by changes in the DNA that affect a gene called the MYC gene and either the BCL2 gene or the BCL6 gene. Double-hit lymphoma may be hard to treat and has a poor prognosis. It is a type of diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called DHL.
doubling time listen (DUH-bling...)
In biology, the amount of time it takes for one cell to divide or for a group of cells (such as a tumor) to double in size. The doubling time is different for different kinds of cancer cells or tumors.
douche listen (doosh)
A procedure in which the vagina is washed with water or a cleansing solution. Most cleansing solutions contain water mixed with vinegar, baking soda, or iodine. Regular douching can wash away some of the bacteria that normally live in the vagina. This may allow yeast or harmful types of bacteria to grow and cause infection. Douching may also cause other health problems, such as pelvic inflammatory disease (PID) and problems during pregnancy. Most doctors do not recommend douching.
Down syndrome listen (...SIN-drome)
A disorder caused by the presence of an extra chromosome 21 and characterized by mental retardation and distinguishing physical features.
doxazosin mesylate listen (dok-SAY-zoh-sin MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. It relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate. Doxazosin mesylate is a type of alpha blocker. Also called Cardura.
doxercalciferol listen (DOK-ser-kal-SIH-feh-rol)
A substance being studied in the prevention of recurrent prostate cancer. It is a type of vitamin D analog.
Doxil listen (DOK-sil)
A form of the anticancer drug doxorubicin that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than doxorubicin hydrochloride. Doxil is used to treat ovarian cancer that got worse or recurred (came back) after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in patients who are not able to take other anticancer drugs or did not get better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used with bortezomib to treat multiple myeloma that was already treated with at least one other anticancer therapy. Doxil is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. Also called doxorubicin hydrochloride liposome and liposomal doxorubicin hydrochloride.
doxorubicin listen (DOK-soh-ROO-bih-sin)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer, including leukemia, lymphoma, neuroblastoma, sarcoma, Wilms tumor, and cancers of the lung, breast, stomach, ovary, thyroid, and bladder. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Doxorubicin comes from the bacterium Streptomyces peucetius. It damages DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. The brand names Adriamycin PFS, Adriamycin RDF, and Rubex have been taken off the market and are no longer available. Also called doxorubicin hydrochloride and hydroxydaunorubicin.
doxorubicin hydrochloride listen (DOK-soh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer, including leukemia, lymphoma, neuroblastoma, sarcoma, Wilms tumor, and cancers of the lung, breast, stomach, ovary, thyroid, and bladder. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Doxorubicin hydrochloride comes from the bacterium Streptomyces peucetius. It damages DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. The brand names Adriamycin PFS, Adriamycin RDF, and Rubex have been taken off the market and are no longer available. Also called doxorubicin and hydroxydaunorubicin.
doxorubicin hydrochloride liposome listen (DOK-soh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug doxorubicin that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than doxorubicin hydrochloride. Doxorubicin hydrochloride liposome is used to treat ovarian cancer that got worse or recurred (came back) after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in patients who are not able to take other anticancer drugs or did not get better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used with bortezomib to treat multiple myeloma that was already treated with at least one other anticancer therapy. Doxorubicin hydrochloride liposome is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. Also called Doxil and liposomal doxorubicin hydrochloride.
doxycycline hyclate listen (DOK-suh-SY-kleen HY-klayt)
A drug used to treat many types of bacterial infections. It stops the growth of bacteria by keeping them from making proteins. It is a type of antibiotic.
DPA
A type of power of attorney. A power of attorney is a legal document that gives one person (such as a relative, lawyer, or friend) the authority to make legal, medical, or financial decisions for another person. It may go into effect right away, or when that person is no longer able to make decisions for himself or herself. A DPA remains in effect until the person who grants it dies or cancels it. It does not need to be renewed over time. Also called durable power of attorney.
DPPE
Belongs to a group of antihormone drugs.
DR4
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of DR4 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 4, TRAIL receptor 1, TRAIL-R1, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A.
DR5
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of DR5 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 5, TRAIL receptor 2, TRAIL-R2, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B.
drain listen (drayn)
In medicine, to remove fluid as it collects; or, a tube or wick-like device used to remove fluid from a body cavity, wound, or infected area.
DRE
An examination in which a doctor inserts a lubricated, gloved finger into the rectum to feel for abnormalities. Also called digital rectal examination.
DRI
A set of guidelines developed by U.S. and Canadian scientists to give information about the role of nutrients in human health. These guidelines include the Reference Daily Intakes (RDI), which are the recommended amounts of nutrients to be eaten each day to meet the needs of most healthy people. This system replaced the Recommended Dietary Allowances (RDA). Also called Dietary Reference Intakes.
dronabinol listen (droh-NA-bih-nol)
A synthetic pill form of delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC), an active ingredient in marijuana that is used to treat nausea and vomiting associated with cancer chemotherapy.
droperidol listen (droh-PAYR-ih-dol)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting in patients who receive anesthesia before surgery. It is also used to treat anxiety. Droperidol is a type of antiemetic, adjunct anesthesia, and antipsychotic.
Droxia listen (DROK-see-uh)
A drug used to treat certain patients with sickle cell anemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and some types of cancer. Droxia may help keep abnormal red blood cells from forming. Droxia contains the active ingredient hydroxyurea. It is a type of antimetabolite.
drug listen (drug)
Any substance, other than food, that is used to prevent, diagnose, treat or relieve symptoms of a disease or abnormal condition. Also refers to a substance that alters mood or body function, or that can be habit-forming or addictive, especially a narcotic.
drug abuse listen (...uh-BYOOS)
The use of illegal drugs or the use of prescription or over-the-counter drugs for purposes other than those for which they are meant to be used, or in large amounts. Drug abuse may lead to social, physical, emotional, and job-related problems.
Drug Accountability Record listen (… uh-KOWN-tuh-BIH-lih-tee REH-kurd)
A log of study drugs kept by an investigator running a clinical trial. It lists many things about each drug, including the drug name, lot number, expiration date, the amount of drug received, used, returned, or thrown away, and the amount left. Drug Accountability Records help make sure that a clinical trial is done safely and correctly. Drug Accountability Records are required by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA). Also called DAR.
drug interaction listen (… IN-teh-RAK-shun)
A change in the way a drug acts in the body when taken with certain other drugs, herbals, or foods, or when taken with certain medical conditions. Drug interactions may cause the drug to be more or less effective, or cause effects on the body that are not expected.
drug resistance listen (... reh-ZIH-stunts)
The failure of cancer cells, viruses, or bacteria to respond to a drug used to kill or weaken them. The cells, viruses, or bacteria may be resistant to the drug at the beginning of treatment, or may become resistant after being exposed to the drug.
drug therapy listen (… THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with any substance, other than food, that is used to prevent, diagnose, treat, or relieve symptoms of a disease or abnormal condition.
drug tolerance listen (... TAH-leh-runts)
A condition that occurs when the body gets used to a medicine so that either more medicine is needed or different medicine is needed.
dry orgasm listen (dry OR-ga-zum)
Sexual climax without the release of semen from the penis.
DSMB
Data and Safety Monitoring Board. An impartial group that oversees a clinical trial and reviews the results to see if they are acceptable. This group determines if the trial should be changed or closed. Also called Data and Safety Monitoring Board.
DT2219ARL immunotoxin listen (… IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of B-cell cancer. It contains an antibody linked to a toxic substance. The antibody binds to proteins called CD19 and CD22 on the surface of B cells, and the toxic substance kills the cells. It is a type of bispecific ligand-directed toxin.
DT388IL3 fusion protein listen (...FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of myeloid leukemia (a disease in which too many immature non-lymphocyte white blood cells are found in the blood and bone marrow). DT388IL3 fusion protein is made by combining IL-3 with a toxic substance. The IL-3 attaches to the cancer cells and the toxic substance kills them.
DTGM fusion protein listen (... FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
An anticancer drug formed by the combination of diphtheria toxin and a colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF). The colony-stimulating factor is attracted to cancer cells, and the diphtheria toxin kills the cells.
DTH
An inflammatory response that develops 24 to 72 hours after exposure to an antigen that the immune system recognizes as foreign. This type of immune response involves mainly T cells rather than antibodies (which are made by B cells). Also called delayed-type hypersensitivity response.
DU 145
A cell line made from human prostate cancer cells that is used in the laboratory to study the way prostate cancer cells grow.
dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan listen (... ub-SORP-shee-uh-MEH-trik skan)
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, bone mineral density scan, DEXA, DEXA scan, dual x-ray absorptiometry, and DXA.
dual x-ray absorptiometry listen (... ub-SORP-shee-AH-meh-tree)
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, bone mineral density scan, DEXA, DEXA scan, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, and DXA.
duct listen (dukt)
In medicine, a tube or vessel of the body through which fluids pass.
ductal carcinoma listen (DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The most common type of breast cancer. It begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple). Ductal carcinoma may be either ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS) or invasive ductal carcinoma. DCIS is a noninvasive condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct and have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. In some cases, DCIS may become invasive cancer. In invasive ductal carcinoma, cancer has spread outside the breast duct to surrounding normal tissue. It can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body.
ductal carcinoma in situ listen (DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A noninvasive condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct. The abnormal cells have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. In some cases, ductal carcinoma in situ may become invasive cancer and spread to other tissues. At this time, there is no way to know which lesions could become invasive. Also called DCIS and intraductal carcinoma.
ductal intraepithelial neoplasia listen (DUK-tul IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct (milk duct). Having ductal intraepithelial neoplasia may increase the risk of breast cancer in which these abnormal cells become cancer and spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. Types of ductal intraepithelial neoplasia include atypical ductal hyperplasia and ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS). Also called DIN.
ductal lavage listen (DUK-tul luh-VAZH)
A method used to collect cells from milk ducts in the breast. A hair-size catheter (tube) is inserted into the nipple, and a small amount of salt water is released into the duct. The water picks up breast cells, and is removed. The cells are checked under a microscope. Ductal lavage may be used in addition to clinical breast examination and mammography to detect breast cancer.
ductography listen (duk-TAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to create pictures of milk ducts in the breast. A very thin catheter (tube) is inserted into the nipple, and a small amount of dye is injected into the duct. This makes the duct easier to see on the x-ray. Ductography is used in patients who have a bloody or clear discharge from one nipple. A small amount of the fluid may be collected to check for infection or cancer cells. Ductography may be used to help diagnose certain breast conditions, such as papillomas (wart-like growths) in a milk duct, fibrocystic breast changes, and breast cancer. Also called galactography.
Dukes A colorectal cancer listen (dooks ... KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall and has spread to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) or to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall. Also called stage I colorectal cancer.
Dukes B colorectal cancer listen (dooks ... KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread (1) through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall to the serosa (outermost layer) of the colon and/or rectal wall; or (2) through the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall but has not spread to nearby organs; or (3) through the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall to nearby organs. Also called stage II colorectal cancer.
Dukes C colorectal cancer listen (dooks ... KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer (1) has spread through the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectal wall to the submucosa (layer of tissue under the mucosa) and may have spread to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall. Cancer has spread to at least one but not more than 3 nearby lymph nodes, or cancer cells have formed in tissues near the lymph nodes; or cancer has spread through the mucosa of the colon and/or rectal wall to the submucosa. Cancer has spread to at least 4 but not more than 6 nearby lymph nodes. OR, (2) cancer has spread through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall to the serosa (outermost layer) of the colon and/or rectal wall or has spread through the serosa but not to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to at least one but not more than 3 nearby lymph nodes, or cancer cells have formed in tissues near the lymph nodes; or cancer has spread to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall or to the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall. Cancer has spread to at least 4 but not more than 6 nearby lymph nodes; or cancer has spread through the mucosa of the colon and/or rectal wall to the submucosa and may have spread to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall. Cancer has spread to 7 or more nearby lymph nodes. OR, (3) cancer has spread through the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall but has not spread to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to at least 4 but not more than 6 nearby lymph nodes; or cancer has spread through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectal wall to the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall or has spread through the serosa but has not spread to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to 7 or more nearby lymph nodes; or cancer has spread through the serosa of the colon and/or rectal wall and has spread to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to one or more nearby lymph nodes, or cancer cells have formed in tissues near the lymph nodes. Also called stage III colorectal cancer.
Dukes classification listen (dooks KLA-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
A staging system used to describe the extent of colorectal cancer. Stages range from A (early stage) to D (advanced stage).
duloxetine hydrochloride listen (duh-LOK-suh-teen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat depression and peripheral neuropathy (pain, numbness, tingling, burning, or weakness in the hands or feet) that can occur with diabetes. It is also being studied in the treatment of peripheral neuropathy caused by certain anticancer drugs. Duloxetine hydrochloride increases the amount of certain chemicals in the brain that help relieve depression and pain. It is a type of serotonin and norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor. Also called Cymbalta.
dumping syndrome listen (DUM-ping SIN-drome)
A condition that occurs when food or liquid moves too fast into the small intestine. Symptoms include cramps, nausea, diarrhea, sweating, weakness, and dizziness. Dumping syndrome sometimes occurs in people who have had part or all of their stomach removed.
duodenitis listen (DOO-ah-deh-NY-tis)
Inflammation of the duodenum (the first part of the small intestine that connects to the stomach).
duodenum listen (DOO-ah-DEE-num)
The first part of the small intestine. It connects to the stomach. The duodenum helps to further digest food coming from the stomach. It absorbs nutrients (vitamins, minerals, carbohydrates, fats, proteins) and water from food so they can be used by the body.
dura mater listen (DER-uh MAY-ter)
The tough outer layer of tissue that covers and protects the brain and spinal cord and is closest to the skull. The dura mater is one of the three layers that form the meninges.
durable power of attorney listen (DER-uh-bul...uh-TER-nee)
A type of power of attorney. A power of attorney is a legal document that gives one person (such as a relative, lawyer, or friend) the authority to make legal, medical, or financial decisions for another person. It may go into effect right away, or when that person is no longer able to make decisions for himself or herself. A durable power of attorney remains in effect until the person who grants it dies or cancels it. It does not need to be renewed over time. Also called DPA.
durvalumab listen (dur-VAL-yoo-mab)
A drug used to treat stage III non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that cannot be removed by surgery. It is used in patients whose disease did not get worse after treatment with radiation therapy and anticancer drugs that included platinum. Durvalumab is also used to treat urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose disease got worse during or after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Durvalumab binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Durvalumab may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Imfinzi.
dutasteride listen (doo-TAS-teh-ride)
A drug used to treat symptoms of an enlarged prostate gland. It is being studied in the treatment of male hair loss and prostate cancer. Dutasteride blocks enzymes the body needs to make male sex hormones. It is a type of 5-alpha reductase inhibitor. Also called Avodart and GG745.
duvelisib listen (DOO-veh-LIH-sib)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, small lymphocytic lymphoma, and follicular lymphoma that have relapsed (come back) or have not gotten better after treatment with at least two other therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Duvelisib blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called Copiktra.
DVT
The formation of a blood clot in a deep vein of the leg or lower pelvis. Symptoms may include pain, swelling, warmth, and redness in the affected area. Also called deep vein thrombosis.
DX-52-1
An anticancer drug that is a type of antitumor antibiotic. It is an anthracycline.
DX-8951f
An anticancer drug that is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called exatecan mesylate.
DXA
An imaging test that measures bone density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain volume of bone) by passing x-rays with two different energy levels through the bone. It is used to diagnose osteoporosis (decrease in bone mass and density). Also called BMD scan, bone mineral density scan, DEXA, DEXA scan, dual energy x-ray absorptiometric scan, and dual x-ray absorptiometry.
dyscrasia listen (dis-KRAY-zhuh)
Disease. Usually refers to diseases of the blood.
dysesthesia listen (DIH-ses-THEE-zhuh)
A condition in which a sense, especially touch, is distorted. Dysesthesia can cause an ordinary stimulus to be unpleasant or painful. It can also cause insensitivity to a stimulus.
dysfunction listen (dis-FUNK-shun)
A state of not functioning normally.
dysgerminoma listen (DIS-jer-mih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in germ cells in females. Germ cells are cells that form sperm in males or eggs in females. Dysgerminomas occur most often in the ovaries, but they may also occur in other areas of the body, including the central nervous system. Some dysgerminomas make a hormone called beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) that may cause signs and symptoms of disease. Dysgerminomas tend to grow and spread slowly. They are the most common type of ovarian germ cell tumor. They usually occur in teenage girls or young women.
dysgeusia listen (dis-GOO-zee-uh)
A bad taste in the mouth. Also called parageusia.
dyspepsia listen (dis-PEP-see-uh)
Upset stomach.
dysphagia listen (dis-FAY-jee-uh)
Difficulty swallowing.
dysphonia listen (dis-FOH-nee-uh)
Trouble with the voice when trying to talk, including hoarseness and change in pitch or quality or voice.
dysplasia listen (dis-PLAY-zhuh)
Cells that look abnormal under a microscope but are not cancer.
dysplastic nevus listen (dis-PLAS-tik NEE-vus)
A specific type of nevus (mole) that looks different from a common mole. Dysplastic nevi are mostly flat and often larger than common moles and have borders that are irregular. A dysplastic nevus can contain different colors, which can range from pink to dark brown. Parts of the mole may be raised above the skin surface. A dysplastic nevus may develop into melanoma (a type of skin cancer), and the more dysplastic nevi a person has, the higher the risk of melanoma. A dysplastic nevus is sometimes called an atypical mole.
dyspnea listen (DISP-nee-uh)
Difficult, painful breathing or shortness of breath.
E7070
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called sulfonamides.
E7389
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has already been treated with an anthracycline and a taxane (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used to treat liposarcoma (a type of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has already been treated with an anthracycline. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. E7389 blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antitubulin agent. Also called eribulin mesylate and Halaven.
ear acupuncture listen (… AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A type of acupuncture in which thin needles are inserted at specific points on the outer ear to control pain and other symptoms. It is thought that the outer ear contains a “map” of the whole body and that specific points on this map match up with certain parts of the body. Also called auricular acupuncture.
early menopause listen (ER-lee MEH-nuh-pawz)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. There are two types of early menopause, primary and secondary. Primary early menopause means that the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. In secondary early menopause, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Some women with early menopause sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called ovarian failure, ovarian insufficiency, and premature menopause.
early-stage breast cancer listen (ER-lee-stayj brest KAN-ser)
Breast cancer that has not spread beyond the breast or the axillary lymph nodes. This includes ductal carcinoma in situ and stage I, stage IIA, stage IIB, and stage IIIA breast cancers.
early-stage cancer listen (ER-lee-stayj KAN-ser)
A term used to describe cancer that is early in its growth, and may not have spread to other parts of the body. What is called early stage may differ between cancer types.
Eastern red cedar listen (EE-stern red SEE-der)
A type of evergreen tree with hard fragrant wood that is a member of the cypress family. The oil from the wood is used in soaps, shampoos, bath salts, perfumes, aromatherapy, and to keep insects away. The scientific name is Juniperus virginiana. Also called cedarwood and red cedar.
EBV
A common virus that remains dormant in most people. It causes infectious mononucleosis and has been associated with certain cancers, including Burkitt lymphoma, immunoblastic lymphoma, and nasopharyngeal carcinoma. Also called Epstein-Barr virus.
ecchymosis listen (EH-kih-MOH-sis)
A small bruise caused by blood leaking from broken blood vessels into the tissues of the skin or mucous membranes.
eccrine gland listen (EK-rin ...)
A type of simple sweat gland that is found in almost all regions of the skin. These glands produce sweat that reaches the surface of the skin by way of coiled ducts (tubes). The body is cooled as sweat evaporates from the skin.
ECD
A very rare disorder in which too many histiocytes (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs and damage them. ECD most often affects the long bones of the arms and legs, but it can also affect the skin, lungs, heart, kidneys, brain, tissue behind the eyes, and the retroperitoneum (the back wall of the abdomen). The symptoms can range from mild to severe and life-threatening. ECD is most common in adults. It is a type of histiocytosis. Also called Erdheim-Chester disease.
ECG
A line graph that shows changes in the electrical activity of the heart over time. It is made by an instrument called an electrocardiograph. The graph can show that there are abnormal conditions, such as blocked arteries, changes in electrolytes (particles with electrical charges), and changes in the way electrical currents pass through the heart tissue. Also called EKG and electrocardiogram.
echinacea listen (EH-kih-NAY-shuh)
An herb native to North America that has been used to prevent and treat the common cold and other respiratory infections. Echinacea may interfere with treatment that uses the immune system to fight cancer. The scientific names are Echinacea purpurea and Echinacea angustifolia. Also called purple coneflower.
echocardiogram listen (EH-koh-KAR-dee-oh-gram)
A computer picture of the heart created by bouncing high-energy sound waves (ultrasound) off internal tissues or organs of the chest. Echocardiograms show the size, shape, and position of the heart. They also show the parts inside the heart, such as the valves, and the motion of the heart while it is beating. An echocardiogram may be used to help diagnose heart problems, such as abnormal heart valves and heart rhythms, damage to the heart muscle from a heart attack, and heart murmurs. Echocardiograms can also show an infection on or around the heart valves, blood clots or tumors inside the heart, and fluid buildup in the sac around the heart.
echocardiography listen (EH-koh-KAR-dee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses high-energy sound waves (ultrasound) to look at tissues and organs inside the chest. Echoes from the sound waves form a picture of the size, shape, and position of the heart on a computer screen (echocardiogram). The pictures can also show the parts of the inside of the heart, such as the valves, and the motion of the heart while it is beating. Echocardiography may be used to help diagnose heart problems, such as abnormal heart valves and heart rhythms, heart murmurs, and damage to the heart muscle from a heart attack. It may also be used to check for an infection on or around the heart valves, blood clots or tumors inside the heart, and fluid buildup in the sac around the heart.
e-cigarette listen (… SIH-guh-ret)
A device that has the shape of a cigarette, cigar, or pen and does not contain tobacco. It uses a battery and contains a solution of nicotine, flavorings, and other chemicals, some of which may be harmful. When e-cigarettes are used, the nicotine solution turns into a mist that can be inhaled into the lungs. The amount of nicotine in individual e-cigarettes can vary. It is not yet known whether e-cigarettes are safe or if they can be used to help smokers quit smoking. Also called electronic cigarette.
ecologic study listen (EE-kuh-LAH-jik STUH-dee)
A study that compares large groups of people instead of individuals for differences in things such as cancer rates. The groups can differ by location (for example, city, county, or country). They can also differ by time (a few days, years, or decades). Groups can be immigrants (compared with people who are native to the country) or people with different types of jobs. The Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) Program conducts ecologic studies to collect information on cancer rates over time in certain parts of the United States. Also called ecological study.
ecological study listen (EE-kuh-LAH-jih-kul STUH-dee)
A study that compares large groups of people instead of individuals for differences in things such as cancer rates. The groups can differ by location (for example, city, county, or country). They can also differ by time (a few days, years, or decades). Groups can be immigrants (compared with people who are native to the country) or people with different types of jobs. The Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results (SEER) Program conducts ecological studies to collect information on cancer rates over time in certain parts of the United States. Also called ecologic study.
economic burden listen (eh-kuh-NAH-mik BUR-den)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Economic burden can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have economic burden than people without cancer. Also called economic hardship, financial burden, financial distress, financial hardship, financial stress, and financial toxicity.
economic hardship listen (eh-kuh-NAH-mik HARD-ship)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Economic hardship can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have economic hardship than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, financial burden, financial distress, financial hardship, financial stress, and financial toxicity.
ECT
A treatment for severe depression and certain mental disorders. A brief seizure is induced by giving electrical stimulation to the brain through electrodes placed on the scalp. Also called electroconvulsive therapy and electroshock therapy.
ecteinascidin 743 listen (ek-TIH-nuh-SY-din …)
A drug used to treat liposarcoma and leiomyosarcoma (types of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who were treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ecteinascidin 743 may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called ET-743, trabectedin, and Yondelis.
ectocervical listen (EK-toh-SER-vih-kul)
Having to do with the part of the cervix that protrudes into the vagina and is lined with epithelial cells.
ectomesenchymoma listen (EK-toh-MEH-zen-ky-MOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing tumor of the nervous system or soft tissue that occurs in children and young adults. Ectomesenchymomas may form in the head and neck, abdomen, perineum, scrotum, or limbs. Also called malignant ectomesenchymoma.
ectopic pregnancy listen (ek-TAH-pik PREG-nun-see)
A condition in which a fertilized egg grows outside of the uterus, usually in one of the fallopian tubes. Symptoms include sharp pain on one side of the abdomen and bleeding from the vagina. Also called extrauterine pregnancy.
eculizumab listen (ek-yoo-LIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used to prevent red blood cells from being destroyed in patients with a rare red blood cell disorder called paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH). It is also used to treat another rare disorder called atypical hemolytic urea syndrome (aHUS), in which blood clots form in small blood vessels. Eculizumab binds to an immune system protein called C5. This helps keep red blood cells from breaking down and helps keep blood clots from forming. Eculizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Soliris.
eczema listen (EK-zeh-muh)
A group of conditions in which the skin becomes inflamed, forms blisters, and becomes crusty, thick, and scaly. Eczema causes burning and itching, and may occur over a long period of time. Atopic dermatitis is the most common type of eczema.
edatrexate listen (EH-duh-TREK-sayt)
An anticancer drug that belongs to a family of drugs called antimetabolites.
edema listen (eh-DEE-muh)
Swelling caused by excess fluid in body tissues.
edetic acid listen (eh-DEH-tik A-sid)
A chemical that binds certain metal ions, such as calcium, magnesium, lead, and iron. It is used in medicine to prevent blood samples from clotting and to remove calcium and lead from the body. It is also used to keep bacteria from forming a biofilm (thin layer stuck to a surface). It is a type of chelating agent. Also called EDTA and etheylenediaminetetraacetic acid.
edotecarin listen (eh-doh-TEH-kar-in)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase I inhibitor. Also called J-107088.
edrecolomab listen (EH-dreh-KOH-loh-mab)
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
EDTA
A chemical that binds certain metal ions, such as calcium, magnesium, lead, and iron. It is used in medicine to prevent blood samples from clotting and to remove calcium and lead from the body. It is also used to keep bacteria from forming a biofilm (thin layer stuck to a surface). It is a type of chelating agent. Also called edetic acid and etheylenediaminetetraacetic acid.
Edwards syndrome listen (ED-wurdz SIN-drome)
A genetic disorder caused by having an extra chromosome 18 in some or all of the body’s cells. Edwards syndrome is marked by a low birth weight and certain abnormal features. These include a small, abnormally shaped head; a small jaw and mouth; clenched fists with overlapping fingers; and heart, lung, kidney, intestine, and stomach defects. Many babies with Edwards syndrome die before birth or within the first month of life, but some children live for several years. Having Edwards syndrome increases the risk of certain types of cancer, such as hepatoblastoma (a type of liver cancer) and Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer). Also called trisomy 18.
EEG
A recording of electrical activity in the brain. It is made by placing electrodes on the scalp (the skin covering the top of the head), and impulses are sent to a special machine. An EEG may be used to diagnose brain and sleep disorders. Also called electroencephalogram.
EEG biofeedback listen (… BY-oh-FEED-bak)
A treatment being studied to improve brain function in certain brain disorders and in patients treated with chemotherapy for breast cancer. Sensors are placed on a person’s head, which allows brain activity to be shown as patterns on a computer screen. A beep or a tone may be used as a reward to a person for changing certain brain activities. EEG biofeedback may help cancer patients deal with the stress and mental side effects of chemotherapy. Also called neurofeedback.
EF5
A drug that is used to plan cancer treatment by measuring oxygen levels in tumor cells.
efaproxiral listen (eh-fuh-PROK-sih-rul)
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain tumors and some other types of cancer. It increases the amount of oxygen in tumor tissues, which may make the tumor cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Efaproxiral is a type of radiosensitizing agent. Also called RSR13.
efavirenz listen (ee-FAH-vih-renz)
A drug used with other drugs to treat infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). It blocks HIV from making copies of itself. It is a type of non-nucleoside reverse transcriptase inhibitor and a type of antiviral agent. Also called Sustiva.
effector cell listen (eh-FEK-ter sel)
A cell that performs a specific function in response to a stimulus; usually used to describe cells in the immune system.
Effexor listen (eh-FEK-sor)
A drug used to treat depression and certain anxiety disorders. It may also be used to treat hot flashes in women who are in menopause or are being treated for breast cancer. Effexor increases the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant and a type of serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor. Also called venlafaxine.
efficacy listen (EH-fih-kuh-see)
Effectiveness. In medicine, the ability of an intervention (for example, a drug or surgery) to produce the desired beneficial effect.
effusion listen (eh-FYOO-zhun)
An abnormal collection of fluid in hollow spaces or between tissues of the body. For example, a pleural effusion is a collection of fluid between the two layers of membrane covering the lungs.
eflornithine listen (eh-FLOR-nih-theen)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antiprotozoals.
EFS
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient remains free of certain complications or events that the treatment was intended to prevent or delay. These events may include the return of the cancer or the onset of certain symptoms, such as bone pain from cancer that has spread to the bone. In a clinical trial, measuring the EFS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called event-free survival.
EFTs
A group of cancers that includes Ewing tumor of bone (ETB or Ewing sarcoma of bone), extraosseous Ewing (EOE) tumors, primitive neuroectodermal tumors (PNET or peripheral neuroepithelioma), and Askin tumors (PNET of the chest wall). These tumors all come from the same type of stem cell. Also called Ewing sarcoma family of tumors.
Efudex listen (EH-fyoo-dex)
A drug used as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). It is also used as a cream to treat basal cell skin cancer that is superficial (not invasive) and cannot be treated with other therapy. Efudex stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It contains the active ingredient fluorouracil. Efudex is a type of antimetabolite.
EGb761
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of cognitive dysfunction (slowed ability to think, reason, concentrate, or remember) in patients receiving chemotherapy. It comes from ginkgo biloba leaves.
EGCG
A substance found in green tea. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer and some other diseases. It is a type of antioxidant. Also called epigallocatechin-3-gallate.
EGF
A protein made by many cells in the body and by some types of tumors. It causes cells to grow and differentiate (become more specialized). It is a type of growth factor and a type of cytokine. Also called epidermal growth factor.
EGFR
The protein found on the surface of some cells and to which epidermal growth factor binds, causing the cells to divide. It is found at abnormally high levels on the surface of many types of cancer cells, so these cells may divide excessively in the presence of epidermal growth factor. Also called epidermal growth factor receptor, ErbB1, and HER1.
EGFR gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is involved in cell growth and cell survival. Mutated (changed) forms of the EGFR gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Checking for changes in the EGFR gene in tumor tissue may help plan cancer treatment. Also called epidermal growth factor receptor gene, ERBB1 gene, and HER1 gene.
EGFR inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). EGFR is found on the surface of some normal cells and is involved in cell growth. It may also be found at high levels on some types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow and divide. Blocking EGFR may keep cancer cells from growing. Some EGFR inhibitors are used to treat cancer. Also called EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor, epidermal growth factor receptor inhibitor, and epidermal growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor listen (... TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). EGFR is found on the surface of some normal cells and is involved in cell growth. It may also be found at high levels on some types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow and divide. Blocking EGFR may keep cancer cells from growing. Some EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer. Also called EGFR inhibitor, epidermal growth factor receptor inhibitor, and epidermal growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
egg banking listen (... BANK-ing)
The process of freezing one or more unfertilized eggs (eggs that have not been combined with sperm) to save them for future use. The eggs are thawed and fertilized in the laboratory to make embryos that can be placed in a woman’s uterus. Egg banking is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called egg cryopreservation, egg freezing, and oocyte cryopreservation.
egg cryopreservation listen (… KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of freezing one or more unfertilized eggs (eggs that have not been combined with sperm) to save them for future use. The eggs are thawed and fertilized in the laboratory to make embryos that can be placed in a woman’s uterus. Egg cryopreservation is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called egg banking, egg freezing, and oocyte cryopreservation.
egg freezing listen (… FREE-zing)
The process of freezing one or more unfertilized eggs (eggs that have not been combined with sperm) to save them for future use. The eggs are thawed and fertilized in the laboratory to make embryos that can be placed in a woman’s uterus. Egg freezing is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called egg banking, egg cryopreservation, and oocyte cryopreservation.
EHR
An electronic (digital) collection of medical information about a person that is stored on a computer. An EHR includes information about a patient’s health history, such as diagnoses, medicines, tests, allergies, immunizations, and treatment plans. EHRs can be seen by all healthcare providers who are taking care of a patient and can be used by them to help make recommendations about the patient’s care. Also called electronic health record and electronic medical record.
ejaculation listen (eh-JAK-yoo-LAY-shun)
The release of semen through the penis during orgasm.
EKB-569
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks the action of certain proteins that are part of the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) family of proteins. These proteins may be found in increased amounts on the surface of some types of cancer cells. Blocking the action of these proteins may stop cancer cells from growing and may kill cancer cells. EKB-569 is a type of EGFR inhibitor. Also called pelitinib.
EKG
A line graph that shows changes in the electrical activity of the heart over time. It is made by an instrument called an electrocardiograph. The graph can show that there are abnormal conditions, such as blocked arteries, changes in electrolytes (particles with electrical charges), and changes in the way electrical currents pass through the heart tissue. Also called ECG and electrocardiogram.
Eklund displacement views listen (EH-klund dis-PLAYS-ment vyooz)
A procedure used to do a mammogram (x-ray of the breasts) in women with breast implants. The implant is pushed back against the chest wall and the breast tissue is pulled forward and around it so the tissue can be seen in the mammogram. Also called Eklund views and implant displacement views.
Eklund views listen (EH-klund vyooz)
A procedure used to do a mammogram (x-ray of the breasts) in women with breast implants. The implant is pushed back against the chest wall and the breast tissue is pulled forward and around it so the tissue can be seen in the mammogram. Also called Eklund displacement views and implant displacement views.
Elacyt listen (EH-luh-SITE)
A drug used to treat advanced acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is a form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that may work in patients with leukemia that is resistant to cytarabine. Elacyt blocks cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called CP-4055 and elacytarabine.
elacytarabine listen (EH-luh-sy-TAYR-uh-been)
A drug used to treat advanced acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is a form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that may work in patients with leukemia that is resistant to cytarabine. Elacytarabine blocks cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called CP-4055 and Elacyt.
electroacupuncture listen (ee-LEK-troh-AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A procedure in which pulses of weak electrical current are sent through acupuncture needles into acupuncture points in the skin. This procedure is being studied in the prevention of nausea and vomiting in patients undergoing chemotherapy.
electrocardiogram listen (ee-LEK-troh-KAR-dee-oh-gram)
A line graph that shows changes in the electrical activity of the heart over time. It is made by an instrument called an electrocardiograph. The graph can show that there are abnormal conditions, such as blocked arteries, changes in electrolytes (particles with electrical charges), and changes in the way electrical currents pass through the heart tissue. Also called ECG and EKG.
electrocautery listen (ee-LEK-troh-KAW-teh-ree)
A procedure that uses heat from an electric current to destroy abnormal tissue, such as a tumor or other lesion. It may also be used to control bleeding during surgery or after an injury. The electric current passes through an electrode that is placed on or near the tissue. The tip of the electrode is heated by the electric current to burn or destroy the tissue. Electrocautery is a type of electrosurgery. Also called electrocoagulation, electrofulguration, and fulguration.
electrocoagulation listen (ee-LEK-troh-koh-A-gyuh-LAY-shun)
A procedure that uses heat from an electric current to destroy abnormal tissue, such as a tumor or other lesion. It may also be used to control bleeding during surgery or after an injury. The electric current passes through an electrode that is placed on or near the tissue. The tip of the electrode is heated by the electric current to burn or destroy the tissue. Electrocoagulation is a type of electrosurgery. Also called electrocautery, electrofulguration, and fulguration.
electroconvulsive therapy listen (ee-LEK-troh-kun-VUL-siv THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment for severe depression and certain mental disorders. A brief seizure is induced by giving electrical stimulation to the brain through electrodes placed on the scalp. Also called ECT and electroshock therapy.
electrode listen (ee-LEK-trode)
In medicine, a device such as a small metal plate or needle that carries electricity from an instrument to a patient for treatment or surgery. Electrodes can also carry electrical signals from muscles, brain, heart, skin, or other body parts to recording devices to help diagnose certain conditions.
electrodermal response listen (ee-LEK-troh-DER-mul reh-SPONTS)
A change in the heat and electricity passed through the skin by nerves and sweat. Electrodermal response increases in certain emotional states and during hot flashes that happen with menopause. Also called galvanic skin response and skin conduction.
electrodesiccation listen (ee-LEK-troh-deh-sih-KAY-shun)
The drying of tissue by a high-frequency electric current applied with a needle-shaped electrode.
electrodiathermy listen (ee-LEK-troh-DY-uh-THER-mee)
A procedure in which tissue is heated to destroy abnormal cells. The heat may come from electric currents, microwaves, radio waves, or ultrasound. Electrodiathermy is a type of hyperthermia therapy. Also called diathermy.
electroencephalogram listen (ee-LEK-troh-en-SEH-fuh-loh-gram)
A recording of electrical activity in the brain. It is made by placing electrodes on the scalp (the skin covering the top of the head), and impulses are sent to a special machine. An EEG may be used to diagnose brain and sleep disorders. Also called EEG.
electrofulguration listen (ee-LEK-troh-ful-guh-RAY-shun)
A procedure that uses heat from an electric current to destroy abnormal tissue, such as a tumor or other lesion. It may also be used to control bleeding during surgery or after an injury. The electric current passes through an electrode that is placed on or near the tissue. The tip of the electrode is heated by the electric current to burn or destroy the tissue. Electrofulguration is a type of electrosurgery. Also called electrocautery, electrocoagulation, and fulguration.
electrolarynx listen (ee-LEK-troh-LAYR-inx)
A battery-operated device that makes a humming sound. It is used to help a person talk after removal of the larynx (voice box).
electrolyte listen (ee-LEK-troh-lite)
A substance that breaks up into ions (particles with electrical charges) when it is dissolved in water or body fluids. Some examples of ions are sodium, potassium, calcium, chloride, and phosphate. These ions help move nutrients into cells, help move waste out of cells, and help nerves, muscles, the heart, and the brain work the way they should.
electromagnetic field listen (ee-LEK-troh-mag-NEH-tik feeld)
An area of electric and magnetic forces caused by electromagnetic radiation. Researchers are studying whether the electromagnetic fields from power lines, electrical appliances, and wireless and cellular telephones can cause cancer or other harmful health effects. Also called EMF.
electromagnetic radiation listen (ee-LEK-troh-mag-NEH-tik ray-dee-AY-shun)
Radiation that has both electric and magnetic fields and travels in waves. It comes from natural and man-made sources. Electromagnetic radiation can vary in strength from low energy to high energy. It includes radio waves, microwaves, infrared light, visible light, ultraviolet light, x-rays, and gamma rays. Also called EMR.
electromagnetic spectrum listen (ee-LEK-troh-mag-NEH-tik SPEK-trum)
The complete range of all types of radiation that has both electric and magnetic fields and travels in waves. The electromagnetic spectrum ranges from low-energy, low-frequency radiation that travels in long waves (such as radio waves and microwaves) to high-energy, high-frequency radiation that travels in short waves (such as x-rays and gamma rays).
electron listen (ee-LEK-tron)
A small particle with a negative charge that is found in all atoms. Streams of electrons made by special equipment can be used for radiation treatment.
electron beam listen (ee-LEK-tron beem)
A stream of electrons (small negatively charged particles found in atoms) that can be used for radiation therapy.
electron microscope listen (ee-LEK-tron MY-kroh-SKOPE)
A microscope (device used to magnify small objects) that uses electrons (instead of light) to produce an enlarged image. An electron microscope shows tiny details better than any other type of microscope.
electronic cigarette listen (eh-lek-TRAH-nik SIH-guh-ret)
A device that has the shape of a cigarette, cigar, or pen and does not contain tobacco. It uses a battery and contains a solution of nicotine, flavorings, and other chemicals, some of which may be harmful. When electronic cigarettes are used, the nicotine solution turns into a mist that can be inhaled into the lungs. The amount of nicotine in individual e-cigarettes can vary. It is not yet known whether electronic cigarettes are safe or if they can be used to help smokers quit smoking. Also called e-cigarette.
electronic health record listen (eh-lek-TRAH-nik helth REH-kurd)
An electronic (digital) collection of medical information about a person that is stored on a computer. An electronic health record includes information about a patient’s health history, such as diagnoses, medicines, tests, allergies, immunizations, and treatment plans. Electronic health records can be seen by all healthcare providers who are taking care of a patient and can be used by them to help make recommendations about the patient’s care. Also called EHR and electronic medical record.
electronic medical record listen (eh-lek-TRAH-nik MEH-dih-kul REH-kurd)
An electronic (digital) collection of medical information about a person that is stored on a computer. An electronic medical record includes information about a patient’s health history, such as diagnoses, medicines, tests, allergies, immunizations, and treatment plans. Electronic medical records can be seen by all healthcare providers who are taking care of a patient and can be used by them to help make recommendations about the patient’s care. Also called EHR and electronic health record.
electrophoresis listen (ee-LEK-troh-for-EE-sis)
A laboratory technique that uses an electric current to separate substances, such as proteins or nucleic acids. The size and electrical charge (either positive or negative) of a substance determines how far it moves with the current. Electrophoresis may be used to help diagnosis certain diseases. There are many different types of electrophoresis.
electroporation therapy listen (ee-LEK-troh-por-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that generates electrical pulses through an electrode placed in a tumor to enhance the ability of anticancer drugs to enter tumor cells. Also called EPT.
electroshock therapy listen (ee-LEK-troh-shok THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment for severe depression and certain mental disorders. A brief seizure is induced by giving electrical stimulation to the brain through electrodes placed on the scalp. Also called ECT and electroconvulsive therapy.
electrosurgery listen (ee-LEK-troh-SER-juh-ree)
A procedure that uses an electric current to cut, remove, or destroy tissue and control bleeding. The current is carried through an electrode that is placed on or near the tissue. Electrosurgery may be used to treat basal cell skin cancer or other types of skin problems, such as actinic keratoses, warts, and moles. It may also be used to remove abnormal cells from the cervix and to treat abnormal tissue of the vagina, vulva, penis, and anus that might become cancer. Examples of electrosurgery are electrodesiccation and fulguration.
element listen (EH-leh-ment)
A basic part of a whole. In chemistry, refers to a simple substance that cannot be broken down into smaller parts or changed into another substance. The basic part of an element is an atom, which contains protons, neutrons, and electrons. All atoms of an element have the same number of protons. Examples of elements are hydrogen, carbon, oxygen, nitrogen, and calcium.
elesclomol sodium listen (eh-les-KLOH-mol SOH-dee-um)
A drug used in the treatment of skin cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It increases the amount of harmful oxygen molecules in cells and may kill cancer cells. It may also help other drugs kill cancer cells. It is a type of oxidative stress inducer.
ELF-EMF
A type of very low-energy radiation that travels in long waves. Although there have been health concerns, it is not known to cause harmful health effects, including cancer. The most common sources of ELF-EMFs are power lines, electrical wiring, and electrical appliances, such as shavers, hair dryers, and electric blankets. Also called extremely low frequency electromagnetic field.
Eligard listen (EH-lih-gard)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Eligard keeps the testicles from making testosterone by blocking other hormones that are needed to make it. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. Eligard is a type of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Also called leuprolide acetate, Lupron, and Lupron Depot.
eligibility criteria listen (EH-lih-jih-BIH-lih-tee kry-TEER-ee-uh)
In clinical trials, requirements that must be met for a person to be included in a trial. These requirements help make sure that participants in a trial are like each other in terms of specific factors such as age, type and stage of cancer, general health, and previous treatment. When all participants meet the same eligibility criteria, it is more likely that results of the study are caused by the intervention being tested and not by other factors or by chance.
ELISA listen (ee-LY-suh)
A laboratory technique that uses antibodies linked to enzymes to detect and measure the amount of a substance in a solution, such as serum. The test is done using a solid surface to which the antibodies and other molecules stick. In the final step, an enzyme reaction takes place that causes a color change that can be read using a special machine. There are many different ways that an ELISA can be done. ELISAs may be used to help diagnose certain diseases. Also called enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.
Elitek listen (EH-lih-tek)
A drug used to treat high blood levels of uric acid in patients with leukemia, lymphoma, and other types of cancer who are receiving certain types of cancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other medical conditions. Elitek is a type of recombinant enzyme and a type of urate-lowering drug. Also called rasburicase and recombinant urate oxidase.
Ellence listen (eh-LENTS)
A drug used with other drugs to treat breast cancer that was removed by surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has spread to the lymph nodes under the arm. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ellence blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called epirubicin and epirubicin hydrochloride.
Elocon listen (EH-loh-kon)
A drug that is used in a cream to treat certain skin conditions and in a nasal spray to treat sinus problems caused by allergies. It is being studied as a way to treat inflammation of the skin caused by radiation therapy. Elocon is a type of corticosteroid. Also called mometasone furoate and Nasonex.
elotuzumab listen (EH-loh-TOO-zoo-mab)
A drug used with lenalidomide and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients whose cancer was treated with one to three anticancer therapies. Elotuzumab binds to a protein called CS1, which is found on myeloma cells and some types of immune cells. Elotuzumab may block CS1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Empliciti and HuLuc63.
Eloxatin listen (eh-LOK-sah-tin)
A drug used with other drugs to treat stage III colon cancer that was removed by surgery and colorectal cancer that is advanced. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Eloxatin damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of platinum compound. Also called oxaliplatin.
Elspar listen (EL-spar)
A drug that is used to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) and is being studied in the treatment of some other types of cancer. It is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of tumor cells that need asparagine to grow. Also called asparaginase and L-asparaginase.
eltrombopag olamine listen (el-TROM-boh-pag OH-luh-meen)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (a lower-than-normal number of platelets in the blood) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system). It is used in patients who did not get better with corticosteroids, immunoglobulins, or surgery to remove the spleen. Eltrombopag olamine is also used to treat severe aplastic anemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Eltrombopag olamine causes more platelets to be made in the bone marrow. It is a type of thrombopoietin receptor agonist. Also called Promacta.
Elzonris listen (el-ZON-ris)
A drug used to treat a rare blood cancer called blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Elzonris is made up of interleukin-3 (IL-3), which binds to an IL-3 receptor protein called CD123. CD123 may be found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells. Elzonris is also made up of a diphtheria toxin, which may help kill cancer cells. Elzonris is a type of cytotoxin. Also called tagraxofusp.
EM-1421
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks proteins needed for cancer growth. It is a type of transcriptional inhibitor. Also called tetra-O-methyl NDGA and tetra-O-methyl nordihydroguaiaretic acid.
emapalumab listen (EH-muh-PAL-yoo-mab)
A drug used to treat a rare immune system disorder called primary hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis (HLH) that came back, got worse, or did not get better with other therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with other therapy. Emapalumab binds to an immune system protein called interferon gamma, which is found at higher than normal levels in patients with HLH. This may help lower the body’s immune response and reduce inflammation. Emapalumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Gamifant.
embalmer listen (em-BAL-mer)
A person who treats dead bodies with embalming fluid (a chemical like formaldehyde) to keep them from decaying.
embolism listen (EM-boh-lih-zum)
A block in an artery caused by blood clots or other substances, such as fat globules, infected tissue, or cancer cells.
embolization listen (EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure that uses particles, such as tiny gelatin sponges or beads, to block a blood vessel. Embolization may be used to stop bleeding or to block the flow of blood to a tumor or abnormal area of tissue. It may be used to treat some types of liver cancer, kidney cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors. It may also be used to treat uterine fibroids, aneurysms, and other conditions. Types of embolization are arterial embolization, chemoembolization, and radioembolization.
embryo listen (EM-bree-oh)
Early stage in the development of humans and other animals or plants. In animals that have a backbone or spinal column, this stage lasts from shortly after fertilization until all major body parts appear. In particular, in humans, this stage lasts from about 2 weeks after fertilization until the end of the seventh or eighth week of pregnancy.
embryo banking listen (EM-bree-oh BANK-ing)
The process of freezing one or more embryos to save them for future use. Embryo banking involves in vitro fertilization, a procedure in which eggs are removed from a woman’s ovary and combined with sperm in the laboratory to form embryos. The embryos are frozen and can later be thawed and placed in a woman’s uterus. Embryo banking is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called embryo cryopreservation and embryo freezing.
embryo cryopreservation listen (EM-bree-oh KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of freezing one or more embryos to save them for future use. Embryo cryopreservation involves in vitro fertilization, a procedure in which eggs are removed from a woman’s ovary and combined with sperm in the laboratory to form embryos. The embryos are frozen and can later be thawed and placed in a woman’s uterus. Embryo cryopreservation is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called embryo banking and embryo freezing.
embryo freezing listen (EM-bree-oh FREE-zing)
The process of freezing one or more embryos to save them for future use. Embryo freezing involves in vitro fertilization, a procedure in which eggs are removed from a woman’s ovary and combined with sperm in the laboratory to form embryos. The embryos are frozen and can later be thawed and placed in a woman’s uterus. Embryo freezing is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called embryo banking and embryo cryopreservation.
embryoma listen (EM-bree-OH-muh)
A mass of rapidly growing cells that begins in embryonic (fetal) tissue. Embryomas may be benign or malignant, and include neuroblastomas and Wilms tumors. Also called embryonal tumor.
embryonal rhabdomyosarcoma listen (em-BRY-uh-nul RAB-doh-MY-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in infants and young children. It begins in muscles, usually in the head, neck, or genitourinary tract. Also called ERMS.
embryonal tumor listen (em-BRY-uh-nul TOO-mer)
A mass of rapidly growing cells that begins in embryonic (fetal) tissue. Embryonal tumors may be benign or malignant, and include neuroblastomas and Wilms tumors. Also called embryoma.
embryonic listen (EM-bree-AH-nik)
Having to do with an embryo, which is an early stage in the development of a plant or animal.
EMD 121974
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer and antiangiogenesis drug. Also called cilengitide.
Emend listen (ee-MEND)
A drug used with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Emend blocks the action of a certain chemical in the brain that may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking this chemical may lessen nausea and vomiting. Emend is a type of antiemetic and a type of substance P/neurokinin 1 receptor antagonist. Also called aprepitant.
Emend for Injection listen (ee-MEND ... in-JEK-shun)
A drug used together with other drugs to prevent and control nausea and vomiting caused by cancer treatment. It is given in a vein. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of substance P/neurokinin 1 receptor antagonist. Also called fosaprepitant dimeglumine.
emesis listen (EH-meh-sis)
Vomiting.
emetic listen (eh-MEH-tik)
Describes a substance that causes vomiting. Also called emetogenic.
emetogenic listen (eh-MEH-toh-JEH-nik)
Describes a substance that causes vomiting. Also called emetic.
EMF
An area of electric and magnetic forces caused by electromagnetic radiation. Researchers are studying whether the EMFs from power lines, electrical appliances, and wireless and cellular telephones can cause cancer or other harmful health effects. Also called electromagnetic field.
emitefur listen (eh-MIH-teh-fur)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites.
emodin listen (EH-moh-din)
A substance found in certain plants, including rhubarb. It belongs to a family of compounds called anthraquinones, which have shown anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects.
emollient listen (eh-MOL-ee-unt)
A substance that helps soothe, soften, and increase moisture levels, especially in the skin. Emollients may be used in a lotion, cream, ointment, or gel to prevent or treat dry, rough, scaly, itchy skin and other skin problems, such as rashes or burns. They may also be used to help protect the skin against irritation. Emollients may also be given by mouth to prevent or treat constipation by moistening and softening the stool.
emphysema listen (EMP-fuh-ZEE-muh)
A disorder affecting the alveoli (tiny air sacs) of the lungs. The transfer of oxygen and carbon dioxide in the lungs takes place in the walls of the alveoli. In emphysema, the alveoli become abnormally inflated, damaging their walls and making it harder to breathe. People who smoke or have chronic bronchitis have an increased risk of emphysema. Emphysema is a type of chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD).
Empliciti listen (em-PLIH-sih-tee)
A drug used with lenalidomide and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients whose cancer was treated with one to three anticancer therapies. Empliciti binds to a protein called CS1, which is found on myeloma cells and some types of immune cells. Empliciti may block CS1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called elotuzumab and HuLuc63.
EMR
Radiation that has both electric and magnetic fields and travels in waves. It comes from natural and man-made sources. EMR can vary in strength from low energy to high energy. It includes radio waves, microwaves, infrared light, visible light, ultraviolet light, x-rays, and gamma rays. Also called electromagnetic radiation.
enalapril listen (eh-NA-luh-pril)
An antihypertensive agent that can also be used to slow or prevent the progression of heart disease in people with childhood cancer treated with drugs that may be harmful to the heart.
enasidenib mesylate listen (EH-nuh-SIH-deh-nib MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has recurred (come back) or has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called isocitrate dehydrogenase-2 (IDH2). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Enasidenib mesylate blocks the protein made by the mutated IDH2 gene. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Enasidenib mesylate is a type of enzyme inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Idhifa.
encapsulated listen (en-KAP-soo-lay-ted)
Confined to a specific, localized area and surrounded by a thin layer of tissue.
encephalopathy listen (en-SEH-fuh-LAH-puh-thee)
A disorder of the brain that can be caused by disease, injury, drugs, or chemicals.
enchondroma listen (en-kon-DROH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) growth of cartilage in bones or in other areas where cartilage is not normally found.
encorafenib listen (EN-kor-A-feh-nib)
A drug used with binimetinib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Encorafenib blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Braftovi.
endemic listen (en-DEH-mik)
In medicine, describes a disease that is constantly present in a certain geographic area or in a certain group of people. For example, endemic Burkitt lymphoma (a type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma) is seen at constant levels in certain parts of Africa.
endocarditis listen (EN-doh-kar-DY-tis)
A condition in which the tissues lining the inside of the heart and the heart valves become inflamed (red and swollen). Endocarditis may be caused by infection with microorganisms, such as bacteria or fungi.
endocervical curettage listen (en-doh-SER-vih-kul kyoo-reh-TAZH)
A procedure in which a sample of abnormal tissue is removed from the cervix using a small, spoon-shaped instrument called a curette. The tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of cervical cancer. This procedure may be done if abnormal cells are found during a Pap test.
endocervix listen (EN-doh-SER-vix)
The inner part of the cervix that forms a canal that connects the vagina to the uterus. The endocervix is lined with cells that make mucus. During a pelvic exam, cells may be scraped from the endocervix. The cells are checked under a microscope for infection, inflammation, and cancer or changes that may become cancer.
endocrine listen (EN-doh-krin)
Refers to tissue that makes and releases hormones that travel in the bloodstream and control the actions of other cells or organs. Some examples of endocrine tissues are the pituitary, thyroid, and adrenal glands.
endocrine cancer listen (EN-doh-krin KAN-ser)
Cancer that occurs in endocrine tissue, the tissue in the body that secretes hormones.
endocrine gland listen (EN-doh-krin …)
An organ that makes hormones that are released directly into the blood and travel to tissues and organs all over the body. Endocrine glands help control many body functions, including growth and development, metabolism, and fertility. Some examples of endocrine glands are the pituitary, thyroid, and adrenal glands.
endocrine pancreas cell listen (EN-doh-krin PAN-kree-us sel)
A pancreatic cell that produces hormones (e.g., insulin and glucagon) that are secreted into the bloodstream. These hormones help control the level of glucose (sugar) in the blood. Also called islet cell and islet of Langerhans cell.
endocrine system listen (EN-doh-krin SIS-tem)
A system of glands and cells that make hormones that are released directly into the blood and travel to tissues and organs all over the body. The endocrine system controls growth, sexual development, sleep, hunger, and the way the body uses food.
endocrine therapy listen (EN-doh-krin THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that adds, blocks, or removes hormones. For certain conditions (such as diabetes or menopause), hormones are given to adjust low hormone levels. Hormones can cause certain cancers (such as prostate and breast cancer) to grow. To slow or stop the growth of cancer, synthetic hormones or other drugs may be given to block the body’s natural hormones. Sometimes surgery is needed to remove the gland that makes a certain hormone. Also called hormonal therapy, hormone therapy, and hormone treatment.
endocrine-inactive tumor listen (EN-doh-krin-in-AK-tiv TOO-mer)
A tumor that is found in endocrine tissue but does not make extra hormones. Endocrine-inactive tumors usually do not cause symptoms until they grow large or spread to other parts of the body. Also called nonfunctioning tumor.
endocrinologist listen (EN-doh-krih-NAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating disorders of the endocrine system (the glands and organs that make hormones). These disorders include diabetes, infertility, and thyroid, adrenal, and pituitary gland problems.
endocrinology listen (EN-doh-krih-NAH-loh-jee)
A branch of medicine that specializes in diagnosing and treating disorders of the endocrine system, which includes the glands and organs that make hormones. These disorders include diabetes, infertility, and thyroid, adrenal, and pituitary gland problems.
endodermal sinus tumor listen (EN-doh-DER-mul SY-nus TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that begins in germ cells (cells that form sperm or eggs). Endodermal sinus tumors occur most often in the ovary or testicle, but they may also occur in other areas of the body, such as the chest, abdomen, or brain. They tend to grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body if not treated. Endodermal sinus tumors are the most common malignant germ cell tumor in children. Also called yolk sac tumor.
end-of-life care listen (… kayr)
Care given to people who are near the end of life and have stopped treatment to cure or control their disease. End-of-life care includes physical, emotional, social, and spiritual support for patients and their families. The goal of end-of-life care is to control pain and other symptoms so the patient can be as comfortable as possible. End-of-life care may include palliative care, supportive care, and hospice care.
endogenous listen (en-DAH-jeh-nus)
Produced inside an organism or cell. The opposite is external (exogenous) production.
endolymphatic sac listen (EN-doh-lim-FA-tik sak)
A balloon-shaped structure filled with fluid in the inner ear. The fluid in the endolymphatic sac surrounds and protects the structures in the inner ear that affect hearing and balance. When pressure in the inner ear builds, the endolymphatic sac releases fluid to relieve the pressure. The endolymphatic sac also removes extra fluid and waste products from the inner ear and is involved in the inner ear’s immune response to foreign substances.
endometrial listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul)
Having to do with the endometrium (the layer of tissue that lines the uterus).
endometrial biopsy listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a sample of tissue is taken from the endometrium (inner lining of the uterus) for examination under a microscope. A thin tube is inserted through the cervix into the uterus, and gentle scraping and suction are used to remove the sample.
endometrial cancer listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissue lining the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman's pelvis in which a fetus develops). Most endometrial cancers are adenocarcinomas (cancers that begin in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids).
endometrial disorder listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul dis-OR-der)
Abnormal cell growth in the endometrium (the lining of the uterus).
endometrial hyperplasia listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
An abnormal overgrowth of the endometrium (the layer of cells that lines the uterus). There are four types of endometrial hyperplasia: simple endometrial hyperplasia, complex endometrial hyperplasia, simple endometrial hyperplasia with atypia, and complex endometrial hyperplasia with atypia. These differ in terms of how abnormal the cells are and how likely it is that the condition will become cancer.
endometriosis listen (EN-doh-MEE-tree-OH-sis)
A benign condition in which tissue that looks like endometrial tissue grows in abnormal places in the abdomen.
endometrium listen (en-doh-MEE-tree-um)
The layer of tissue that lines the uterus.
EndoPat listen (EN-doh-pat)
A medical device that tests to see if endothelial cells are damaged. Endothelial cells line the inner walls of blood vessels, lymph vessels, and the heart, and damage to them may be an early sign of heart disease. EndoPat looks for heart disease by using sensors that measure blood flow through a patient’s fingers. It is also being used to check blood vessels in patients treated for breast cancer. Also called Endo-Pat 2000.
Endo-Pat 2000 listen (EN-doh-pat...)
A medical device that tests to see if endothelial cells are damaged. Endothelial cells line the inner walls of blood vessels, lymph vessels, and the heart, and damage to them may be an early sign of heart disease. Endo-Pat 2000 looks for heart disease by using sensors that measure blood flow through a patient’s fingers. It is also being used to check blood vessels in patients treated for breast cancer. Also called EndoPat.
endoplasmic reticulum listen (EN-doh-PLAZ-mik reh-TIH-kyoo-lum)
A network of sac-like structures and tubes in the cytoplasm (gel-like fluid) of a cell. Proteins and other molecules move through the endoplasmic reticulum. The outer surface of the endoplasmic reticulum can be smooth or rough. The rough endoplasmic reticulum has many ribosomes on its outer surface and makes proteins the cell needs. The smooth endoplasmic reticulum makes other substances that the cell needs, such as lipids (fats) and carbohydrates (sugars). The endoplasmic reticulum is a cell organelle.
endorectal ultrasound listen (en-doh-REK-tul UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure in which a probe that sends out high-energy sound waves is inserted into the rectum. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of body tissue called a sonogram. Endorectal ultrasound is used to look for abnormalities in the rectum and nearby structures, including the prostate. Also called ERUS, transrectal ultrasound, and TRUS.
endorphin listen (en-DOR-fin)
One of several substances made in the body that can relieve pain and give a feeling of well-being. Endorphins are peptides (small proteins) that bind to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. An endorphin is a type of neurotransmitter.
endoscope listen (EN-doh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to look at tissues inside the body. An endoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography listen (en-doh-SKAH-pik REH-troh-grayd koh-LAN-jee-oh-PAN-kree-uh-TAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses an endoscope to examine and x-ray the pancreatic duct, hepatic duct, common bile duct, duodenal papilla, and gallbladder. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. The endoscope is passed through the mouth and down into the first part of the small intestine (duodenum). A smaller tube (catheter) is then inserted through the endoscope into the bile and pancreatic ducts. A dye is injected through the catheter into the ducts, and an x-ray is taken. Also called ERCP.
endoscopic ultrasound listen (en-doh-SKAH-pik UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure in which an endoscope is inserted into the body. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument that has a light and a lens for viewing. A probe at the end of the endoscope is used to bounce high-energy sound waves (ultrasound) off internal organs to make a picture (sonogram). Also called endosonography and EUS.
endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration listen (en-doh-SKAH-pik UL-truh-sownd-GY-ded … NEE-dul AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A procedure to take a sample of tissue for examination under a microscope. An endoscope with an ultrasound probe and a biopsy needle at the end is inserted through the mouth into the esophagus. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument that has a light and a lens for viewing. The ultrasound probe is used to bounce high-energy sound waves off internal organs and tissues to make a picture on a monitor. This picture helps the doctor see where to place the biopsy needle. Also called EUS-FNA.
endoscopy listen (en-DOS-koh-pee)
A procedure that uses an endoscope to examine the inside of the body. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
endosonography listen (EN-doh-soh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure in which an endoscope is inserted into the body. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument that has a light and a lens for viewing. A probe at the end of the endoscope is used to bounce high-energy sound waves (ultrasound) off internal organs to make a picture (sonogram). Also called endoscopic ultrasound and EUS.
endostatin listen (EN-doh-STA-tin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Endostatin is made from a type of collagen (a protein found in cartilage and other connective tissue). It may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Endostatin is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called COL18A1.
endothelial cell listen (EN-doh-THEE-lee-ul sel)
The main type of cell found in the inside lining of blood vessels, lymph vessels, and the heart.
endothelin receptor antagonist listen (EN-doh-THEE-lin reh-SEP-ter an-TA-guh-nist)
A drug that blocks the hormone endothelin and may prevent prostate cancer from spreading to the bones. It may also prevent the growth and spread of other types of cancer, including colorectal cancer.
endothelin-1 protein receptor antagonist listen (EN-doh-THEE-lin-1 PROH-teen reh-SEP-ter an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that blocks the binding of the endothelin-1 protein to its receptor. Endothelin-1 is a small molecule that causes changes in blood vessels and helps regulate blood pressure. It can also stimulate the growth of some types of cells.
endpoint listen (END-poynt)
In clinical trials, an event or outcome that can be measured objectively to determine whether the intervention being studied is beneficial. The endpoints of a clinical trial are usually included in the study objectives. Some examples of endpoints are survival, improvements in quality of life, relief of symptoms, and disappearance of the tumor.
end-stage cancer listen (… stayj KAN-ser)
Cancer that cannot be cured and leads to death. Also called terminal cancer.
enema listen (EH-neh-muh)
The injection of a liquid through the anus into the large bowel.
energy balance listen (EH-ner-jee BA-lunts)
In biology, the state at which the number of calories eaten equals the number of calories used. Energy balance is affected by physical activity, body size, amount of body fat and muscle, and genetics.
energy healing listen (EH-ner-jee HEEL-ing)
A form of complementary and alternative medicine based on the belief that a vital energy flows through the human body. The goal of energy healing is to balance the energy flow in the patient. It is used to reduce stress and anxiety and promote well-being. Energy healing is being studied in patients receiving cancer therapy, to find out if it can improve quality of life, boost the immune system, or reduce side effects. Also called energy therapy.
energy therapy listen (EH-ner-jee THAYR-uh-pee)
A form of complementary and alternative medicine based on the belief that a vital energy flows through the human body. The goal of energy therapy is to balance the energy flow in the patient. It is used to reduce stress and anxiety and promote well-being. Energy therapy is being studied in patients receiving cancer therapy, to find out if it can improve quality of life, boost the immune system, or reduce side effects. Also called energy healing.
English chamomile listen (... KA-muh-mile)
A type of chamomile plant with daisy-like white flowers that is found in Europe, North America, and Argentina. The dried flowers are used in teas to calm and relax, to improve sleep, and to help with stomach problems. Its essential oil (scented liquid taken from plants) is used in perfumes, shampoos, face creams, lotions, and aromatherapy. The scientific names are Chamaemelum nobile and Anthemis nobilis. Also called Roman chamomile.
English lavender listen (ING-lish LA-ven-der)
A plant with aromatic leaves and flowers that is a member of the mint family. Oil from the flowers has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, to keep insects away, and to wash in. It is also used in aromatherapy. Perillyl alcohol, a substance found in English lavender, is being studied in cancer prevention and treatment. The scientific name is Lavandula angustifolia. Also called lavender and true lavender.
eniluracil listen (EH-nil-YOOR-uh-sil)
An anticancer drug that increases the effectiveness of fluorouracil. Also called ethynyluracil.
enoxaparin listen (ee-NOK-suh-PAYR-in)
A drug used to prevent blood clots. It belongs to the family of drugs called anticoagulants.
enriched food listen (in-RICHT…)
A food that has nutrients added back that were lost during processing. Examples are bread, pasta, and other products made from white flour that have B vitamins added back.
Ensure listen (en-SHER)
A type of nutrition drink that may help people who cannot get all the nutrients they need from foods and other drinks. Ensure has vitamins, minerals, protein, and fats. It may be added to a person’s diet to help build strong bones, rebuild muscle and strength, and help the body heal after injury or surgery. Ensure may be taken by mouth or given through tube feeding. Ensure is a type of polymeric enteral nutrition formula and a type of dietary supplement.
ENT doctor listen (… DOK-ter)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the ear, nose, and throat. Also called otolaryngologist.
enteral nutrition listen (EN-teh-rul noo-TRIH-shun)
A form of nutrition that is delivered into the digestive system as a liquid. Drinking nutrition beverages or formulas and tubefeeding are forms of enteral nutrition. People who are unable to meet their needs with food and beverages alone, and who do not have vomiting or uncontrollable diarrhea may be given tubefeedings. Tubefeeding can be used to add to what a person is able to eat or can be the only source of nutrition. A small feeding tube may be placed through the nose into the stomach or the small intestine, or it may be surgically placed into the stomach or the intestinal tract through an opening made on the outside of the abdomen, depending on how long it will be used.
enterostomal therapist listen (EN-teh-roh-STOH-mul THAYR-uh-pist)
A health professional trained in the care of persons with stomas, such as colostomies or urostomies.
entinostat listen (en-tih-NOH-stat)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor. Also called HDAC inhibitor SNDX-275 and SNDX-275.
entrectinib listen (en-TREK-tih-nib)
A substance that blocks certain proteins involved in cell signaling and growth. These proteins may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking these proteins may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Entrectinib is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy.
enucleation listen (ee-NOO-klee-AY-shun)
In medicine, the removal of an organ or tumor in such a way that it comes out clean and whole, like a nut from its shell.
enveloped virus listen (EN-veh-lupt VY-rus)
A virus that has an outer wrapping or envelope. This envelope comes from the infected cell, or host, in a process called "budding off." During the budding process, newly formed virus particles become "enveloped" or wrapped in an outer coat that is made from a small piece of the cell's plasma membrane. The envelope may play a role in helping a virus survive and infect other cells.
environmental tobacco smoke listen (en-VY-run-MEN-tul tuh-BA-koh ...)
Smoke that comes from the burning of a tobacco product and smoke that is exhaled by smokers. Inhaling environmental tobacco smoke is called involuntary or passive smoking. Also called ETS and secondhand smoke.
enzalutamide listen (EN-zuh-LOO-tuh-mide)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Enzalutamide binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Enzalutamide blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called Xtandi.
enzastaurin hydrochloride listen (en-zuh-STAW-rin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of cancer, including non-Hodgkin lymphoma, breast, colon, lung, ovarian, and prostate. Enzastaurin hydrochloride blocks certain cell signaling pathways, and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of serine threonine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called LY317615.
enzyme listen (EN-zime)
A protein that speeds up chemical reactions in the body.
enzyme inhibitor listen (EN-zime in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the action of an enzyme. Enzymes help speed up chemical reactions in the body and take part in many cell functions, including cell signaling, growth, and division. In cancer treatment, enzyme inhibitors may be used to block certain enzymes that cancer cells need to grow.
enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay listen (EN-zime-linkt IH-myoo-noh-SOR-bent A-say)
A laboratory technique that uses antibodies linked to enzymes to detect and measure the amount of a substance in a solution, such as serum. The test is done using a solid surface to which the antibodies and other molecules stick. In the final step, an enzyme reaction takes place that causes a color change that can be read using a special machine. There are many different ways that an enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay can be done. Enzyme-linked immunosorbent assays may be used to help diagnose certain diseases. Also called ELISA.
EOB
A summary of the costs of a medical treatment or other healthcare service that an insurance company may send to a patient after the patient has received the service. An EOB usually includes the date the patient received the service, how much the service cost, how much the health insurance plan paid, and how much the patient may need to pay the healthcare provider. Also called explanation of benefits.
eosinophil listen (EE-oh-SIH-noh-FIL)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during infections, allergic reactions, and asthma. An eosinophil is a type of white blood cell and a type of granulocyte.
eosinophilia listen (EE-oh-SIH-noh-FIH-lee-uh)
A condition in which the number of eosinophils (a type of white blood cell) in the blood is greatly increased. Eosinophilia is often a response to infection or allergens (substances that cause an allergic response).
EP-2101
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called cancer vaccines.
ependyma listen (eh-PEN-dih-muh)
A thin membrane that lines the fluid-filled spaces in the brain and spinal cord. It is made up of a type of glial cell called an ependymal cell.
ependymal cell listen (eh-PEN-dih-mul sel)
A cell that forms the lining of the fluid-filled spaces in the brain and spinal cord. It is a type of glial cell.
ependymal tumor listen (eh-PEN-dih-mul TOO-mer)
A type of brain tumor that begins in cells lining the spinal cord central canal (fluid-filled space down the center) or the ventricles (fluid-filled spaces of the brain). Ependymal tumors may also form in the choroid plexus (tissue in the ventricles that makes cerebrospinal fluid). Also called ependymoma.
ependymoma listen (eh-PEN-dih-MOH-muh)
A type of brain tumor that begins in cells lining the spinal cord central canal (fluid-filled space down the center) or the ventricles (fluid-filled spaces of the brain). Ependymomas may also form in the choroid plexus (tissue in the ventricles that makes cerebrospinal fluid). Also called ependymal tumor.
ephedra listen (eh-FEH-druh)
A shrub native to China and India. The stems and roots are used in traditional medicine as a diuretic and for asthma, bronchitis, and cough. It has also been promoted as a decongestant, a weight loss aid, and as a supplement to increase energy. Ephedra may cause high blood pressure, increased heart rate, or death if used with certain drugs, and may reduce the effects of certain drugs used to treat cancer and other diseases. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration has banned the sale of dietary supplements that contain ephedra. The scientific name is Ephedra sinica. Also called ma huang.
epidemiologist listen (EH-pih-DEE-mee-AH-loh-jist)
A scientist who studies the patterns, causes, and control of disease in groups of people.
epidemiology listen (EH-pih-dee-mee-AH-loh-jee)
The study of the patterns, causes, and control of disease in groups of people.
epidermal growth factor listen (eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter)
A protein made by many cells in the body and by some types of tumors. It causes cells to grow and differentiate (become more specialized). It is a type of growth factor and a type of cytokine. Also called EGF.
epidermal growth factor receptor listen (eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter)
The protein found on the surface of some cells and to which epidermal growth factor binds, causing the cells to divide. It is found at abnormally high levels on the surface of many types of cancer cells, so these cells may divide excessively in the presence of epidermal growth factor. Also called EGFR, ErbB1, and HER1.
epidermal growth factor receptor gene listen (eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is involved in cell growth and cell survival. Mutated (changed) forms of the epidermal growth factor receptor gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Checking for changes in the epidermal growth factor receptor gene in tumor tissue may help plan cancer treatment. Also called EGFR gene, ERBB1 gene, and HER1 gene.
epidermal growth factor receptor inhibitor listen (eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). EGFR is found on the surface of some normal cells and is involved in cell growth. It may also be found at high levels on some types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow and divide. Blocking EGFR may keep cancer cells from growing. Some epidermal growth factor receptor inhibitors are used to treat cancer. Also called EGFR inhibitor, EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor, and epidermal growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
epidermal growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor listen (eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). EGFR is found on the surface of some normal cells and is involved in cell growth. It may also be found at high levels on some types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow and divide. Blocking EGFR may keep cancer cells from growing. Some epidermal growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer. Also called EGFR inhibitor, EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor, and epidermal growth factor receptor inhibitor.
epidermis listen (EH-pih-DER-mis)
The outer layer of the two main layers of the skin.
epidermoid carcinoma listen (EH-pih-DER-moyd KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in squamous cells. Squamous cells are thin, flat cells that look like fish scales, and are found in the tissue that forms the surface of the skin, the lining of the hollow organs of the body, and the lining of the respiratory and digestive tracts. Most cancers of the anus, cervix, head and neck, and vagina are epidermoid carcinomas. Also called squamous cell carcinoma.
epidermolysis bullosa listen (EH-pih-der-MAH-lih-sis buh-LOH-suh)
A group of chronic skin disorders in which fluid-filled blisters form on the skin and mucosa (the moist, inner lining of some organs and body cavities). Epidermolysis bullosa is inherited and usually starts at birth. Patients with epidermolysis bullosa may be at increased risk of squamous cell cancer of the skin.
epididymis listen (eh-pih-DIH-dih-mis)
A narrow, tightly-coiled tube that is attached to each of the testicles (the male sex glands that produce sperm). Sperm cells (male reproductive cells) move from the testicles into the epididymis, where they finish maturing and are stored.
epidural listen (EH-pih-DER-ul)
Having to do with the space between the wall of the spinal canal and the covering of the spinal cord. An epidural injection is given into this space.
epidural block listen (EH-pih-DER-ul blok)
An injection of an anesthetic drug into the space between the wall of the spinal canal and the covering of the spinal cord.
epigallocatechin-3-gallate listen (EH-pih-ga-loh-KA-teh-kin-3-GA-layt)
A substance found in green tea. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer and some other diseases. It is a type of antioxidant. Also called EGCG.
epigastric listen (EH-pih-GAS-trik)
Having to do with the upper middle area of the abdomen.
epigenetic alteration listen (EH-pih-jeh-NEH-tik ALL-teh-RAY-shun)
A change in the chemical structure of DNA that does not change the DNA coding sequence. Epigenetic alterations occur in the body when chemical groups called methyl groups are added to or removed from DNA or when changes are made to proteins called histones that bind to the DNA in chromosomes. These changes may occur with age and exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals. They can affect a person’s risk of disease and may be passed from parent to child. Also called epigenetic variant and epimutation.
epigenetic variant listen (EH-pih-jeh-NEH-tik VAYR-ee-unt)
A change in the chemical structure of DNA that does not change the DNA coding sequence. Epigenetic variants occur in the body when chemical groups called methyl groups are added to or removed from DNA or when changes are made to proteins called histones that bind to the DNA in chromosomes. These changes may occur with age and exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals. They can affect a person’s risk of disease and may be passed from parent to child. Also called epigenetic alteration and epimutation.
epigenetics listen (EH-pih-jeh-NEH-tix)
The study of how age and exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals, may cause changes in the way genes are switched on and off without changing the actual DNA sequence. These changes can affect a person’s risk of disease and may be passed from parents to their children.
epigenomics listen (EH-pih-jeh-NOH-mix)
The study of all of the epigenetic changes in a cell. Epigenetic changes are changes in the way genes are switched on and off without changing the actual DNA sequence. They may be caused by age and exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals. Epigenetic changes can affect a person’s risk of disease and may be passed from parents to their children.
epiglottis listen (eh-pih-GLAH-tis)
The flap that covers the trachea during swallowing so that food does not enter the lungs.
epilepsy listen (EH-pih-LEP-see)
A group of disorders marked by problems in the normal functioning of the brain. These problems can produce seizures, unusual body movements, a loss of consciousness or changes in consciousness, as well as mental problems or problems with the senses.
epimutation listen (EH-pih-myoo-TAY-shun)
A change in the chemical structure of DNA that does not change the DNA coding sequence. Epimutations occur in the body when chemical groups called methyl groups are added to or removed from DNA or when changes are made to proteins called histones that bind to the DNA in chromosomes. These changes may occur with age and exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals. They can affect a person’s risk of disease and may be passed from parent to child. Also called epigenetic alteration and epigenetic variant.
epinephrine listen (eh-pih-NEH-frin)
A hormone and neurotransmitter. Also called adrenaline.
epipodophyllotoxin listen (EH-pih-POH-doh-FIH-loh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Epipodophyllotoxin is extracted from the mandrake root Podophyllum peltatum. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
epirubicin listen (EH-pih-ROO-bih-sin)
A drug used with other drugs to treat breast cancer that was removed by surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has spread to the lymph nodes under the arm. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Epirubicin blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Ellence and epirubicin hydrochloride.
epirubicin hydrochloride listen (EH-pih-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat breast cancer that was removed by surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has spread to the lymph nodes under the arm. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Epirubicin hydrochloride blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Ellence and epirubicin.
episodic breathlessness listen (EH-pih-SAH-dik BRETH-les-nes)
A medical condition in which patients have periods of trouble breathing that are followed by periods with no trouble breathing. Episodic breathlessness is seen in patients with lung cancer or other lung diseases, and in some heart conditions.
epithelial listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul)
Refers to the cells that line the internal and external surfaces of the body.
epithelial carcinoma listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in the cells that line an organ.
epithelial ovarian cancer listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul oh-VAYR-ee-un KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissue covering the ovary (one of a pair of female reproductive glands in which eggs are made). Most ovarian cancers are epithelial ovarian cancers. Fallopian tube cancer and primary peritoneal cancer are similar to epithelial ovarian cancer and are staged and treated the same way. Also called ovarian epithelial cancer.
epithelioid hemangioendothelioma listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-oyd hee-MAN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A rare blood vessel tumor that usually forms in the liver, lung, or bone, but it can also form on or in the skin. Epithelioid hemangioendotheliomas may be slow growing or fast growing and, in some people, may spread to other parts of the body very quickly. Signs and symptoms depend on where the tumor is in the body. On the skin, the tumor may be raised with round or flat, red-brown patches that feel warm. In the lung, the tumor can cause chest pain, trouble breathing, spitting up blood, and anemia. In the bone, the tumor can cause breaks. Epithelioid hemangioendotheliomas usually occur in adults, but can sometimes occur in children. They are a type of vascular tumor and a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
epithelioid hemangioma listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-oyd hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A rare benign (not cancer) tumor of small blood vessels surrounded by lymphocytes and eosinophils (types of white blood cells). Epithelioid hemangioma usually forms on or in the skin, especially the skin of the head, but can occur in other areas of the body, such as in bone. On the skin, it may appear as firm pink to red bumps that may be itchy or painful. If the tumor is in bone, it may cause swelling and pain. Epithelioid hemangioma is sometimes caused by injury and often comes back after treatment. Epithelioid hemangioma is most common in young and middle-aged adults. It is a type of vascular tumor. Also called angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia and histiocytoid hemangioma.
epithelioid sarcoma listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-oyd sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that usually begins as a slow-growing, firm lump in the deep soft tissue or skin of the arms, hands, or fingers. It may also occur in the legs, trunk (chest and abdomen), or head and neck. The lump is usually painless and there may be an ulcer in the skin covering the lump. Epithelioid sarcoma may spread to nearby tissue, lymph nodes, or other parts of the body. It often recurs (comes back) after treatment. Epithelioid sarcoma usually occurs in young adults. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
epithelium listen (eh-pih-THEE-lee-um)
A thin layer of tissue that covers organs, glands, and other structures within the body.
epitope listen (EH-pih-tope)
A part of a molecule that an antibody will recognize and bind to.
EPO906
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called epothilones. Also called epothilone B.
EPOCH listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat aggressive forms of non-Hodgkin lymphoma, including mantle cell lymphoma. It includes the drugs etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH regimen.
EPOCH regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat aggressive forms of non-Hodgkin lymphoma, including mantle cell lymphoma. It includes the drugs etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH.
EPOCH-R listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH-R regimen, R-EPOCH, and R-EPOCH regimen.
EPOCH-R regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH-R, R-EPOCH, and R-EPOCH regimen.
epoetin alfa listen (ee-POH-ee-tin AL-fuh)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease, some types of chemotherapy, and an antiviral drug for HIV infection called zidovudine. It is also used to lower the number of donor blood transfusions needed during and after certain types of surgery. Epoetin alfa is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Epoetin alfa is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called Epogen, Procrit, and Retacrit.
epoetin beta listen (ee-POH-eh-tin BAY-tuh)
A substance that is made in the laboratory and stimulates the bone marrow to make red blood cells. It is a type of antianemic and a type of recombinant human erythropoietin.
Epogen listen (EE-poh-jen)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease, some types of chemotherapy, and an antiviral drug for HIV infection called zidovudine. It is also used to lower the number of donor blood transfusions needed during and after certain types of surgery. Epogen is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Epogen is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called epoetin alfa, Procrit, and Retacrit.
epothilone listen (eh-POTH-ih-lone)
A substance obtained from bacteria that interferes with cell division. Some epothilones are being studied as treatments for cancer.
epothilone B listen (eh-POTH-ih-lone ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of epothilone. Also called EPO906.
epothilone D listen (eh-POTH-ih-lone ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and epothilone. Also called KOS-862.
epothilone ZK219477 listen (eh-POTH-ih-lone ...)
A form of the substance epothilone that is made in the laboratory. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Epothilone ZK2219477 stops the growth of tumor cells by blocking cell division. It is a type of antimitotic agent.
epratuzumab listen (EH-pruh-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) and acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is also being studied in the treatment of an autoimmune disease called systemic lupus erythematosus (SLE). Epratuzumab binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. Epratuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody.
Epstein-Barr virus listen (ep-stine-BAR VY-rus)
A common virus that remains dormant in most people. It causes infectious mononucleosis and has been associated with certain cancers, including Burkitt lymphoma, immunoblastic lymphoma, and nasopharyngeal carcinoma. Also called EBV.
EPT
Treatment that generates electrical pulses through an electrode placed in a tumor to enhance the ability of anticancer drugs to enter tumor cells. Also called electroporation therapy.
ER
A protein found inside the cells of the female reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. The hormone estrogen will bind to the receptors inside the cells and may cause the cells to grow. Also called estrogen receptor.
ER- listen
Describes cells that do not have a protein to which the hormone estrogen will bind. Cancer cells that are ER- do not need estrogen to grow, and usually do not stop growing when treated with hormones that block estrogen from binding. Also called estrogen receptor negative.
ER+ listen
Describes cells that have a receptor protein that binds the hormone estrogen. Cancer cells that are ER+ may need estrogen to grow, and may stop growing or die when treated with substances that block the binding and actions of estrogen. Also called estrogen receptor positive.
ERA-923
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to a family of drugs called antiestrogens.
erb-38 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
ErbB1
The protein found on the surface of some cells and to which epidermal growth factor binds, causing the cells to divide. It is found at abnormally high levels on the surface of many types of cancer cells, so these cells may divide excessively in the presence of epidermal growth factor. Also called EGFR, epidermal growth factor receptor, and HER1.
ERBB1 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is involved in cell growth and cell survival. Mutated (changed) forms of the ERBB1 gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Checking for changes in the ERBB1 gene in tumor tissue may help plan cancer treatment. Also called EGFR gene, epidermal growth factor receptor gene, and HER1 gene.
Erbitux listen (ER-bih-tux)
A drug used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer, and a certain type of colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Erbitux binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is on the surface of some types of cancer cells. This may stop cancer cells from growing. Erbitux is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called cetuximab.
ERCP
A procedure that uses an endoscope to examine and x-ray the pancreatic duct, hepatic duct, common bile duct, duodenal papilla, and gallbladder. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. The endoscope is passed through the mouth and down into the first part of the small intestine (duodenum). A smaller tube (catheter) is then inserted through the endoscope into the bile and pancreatic ducts. A dye is injected through the catheter into the ducts, and an x-ray is taken. Also called endoscopic retrograde cholangiopancreatography.
erdafitinib (ER-duh-FIH-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat urothelial cancer (a type of bladder cancer) that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in adults whose cancer has certain mutations in the FGFR3 gene or a fusion gene involving the FGFR3 or FGFR2 gene and has gotten worse during or after treatment with at least one type of platinum chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Erdafitinib blocks a protein called FGFR, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Balversa.
Erdheim-Chester disease listen (ERD-hime-CHEH-ster dih-ZEEZ)
A very rare disorder in which too many histiocytes (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs and damage them. Erdheim-Chester disease most often affects the long bones of the arms and legs, but it can also affect the skin, lungs, heart, kidneys, brain, tissue behind the eyes, and the retroperitoneum (the back wall of the abdomen). The symptoms can range from mild to severe and life-threatening. Erdheim-Chester disease is most common in adults. It is a type of histiocytosis. Also called ECD.
erectile dysfunction listen (eh-REK-tile dis-FUNK-shun)
An inability to have an erection of the penis adequate for sexual intercourse. Also called impotence.
erection listen (eh-REK-shun)
In medicine, the swelling of the penis with blood, causing it to become firm.
ergocalciferol listen (ER-goh-kal-SIH-feh-rol)
A form of vitamin D that helps the body use calcium and phosphorus to make strong bones and teeth. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in plants and yeast. It can be made in the body from another form of vitamin D when the body is exposed to the sun. Ergocalciferol is also made in the laboratory. It is used to prevent and to treat vitamin D deficiency. It is a type of dietary supplement. Also called vitamin D2.
eribulin mesylate listen (er-eh-BYOO-lin MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has already been treated with an anthracycline and a taxane (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used to treat liposarcoma (a type of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has already been treated with an anthracycline. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Eribulin mesylate blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antitubulin agent. Also called E7389 and Halaven.
erismodegib listen (AYR-is-MOH-deh-gib)
A drug used to treat locally advanced basal cell carcinoma (BCC) that has come back after surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. Erismodegib is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Erismodegib blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called LDE225, Odomzo, and sonidegib phosphate.
Erivedge listen (AYR-ih-vej)
A drug used to treat advanced basal cell carcinoma that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after surgery. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Erivedge blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of Hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called GDC-0449 and vismodegib.
Erleada listen (er-LEE-duh)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has not spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Erleada binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Erleada blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called apalutamide.
erlotinib hydrochloride listen (er-LOH-tih-nib HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Erlotinib hydrochloride blocks a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called CP-358,774, OSI-774, and Tarceva.
ERMS
A soft tissue tumor that is most common in infants and young children. It begins in muscles, usually in the head, neck, or genitourinary tract. Also called embryonal rhabdomyosarcoma.
ER-negative PR-negative HER2/neu-negative breast cancer listen (... NEH-guh-tiv ... NEH-guh-tiv ... NEH-guh-tiv brest KAN-ser)
Describes breast cancer cells that do not have estrogen receptors, progesterone receptors, or large amounts of HER2/neu protein. Also called triple-negative breast cancer.
ERT
Treatment with the hormone estrogen to increase the amount of estrogen in the body. It is given to women who have gone through menopause or to women who have early menopause caused by cancer treatment or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. ERT may help relieve symptoms of menopause, such as hot flashes, night sweats, vaginal dryness, and sleep problems. It may also help protect against osteoporosis (thinning of the bones) and lower the risk of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. Also called estrogen replacement therapy.
ERUS
A procedure in which a probe that sends out high-energy sound waves is inserted into the rectum. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of body tissue called a sonogram. ERUS is used to look for abnormalities in the rectum and nearby structures, including the prostate. Also called endorectal ultrasound, transrectal ultrasound, and TRUS.
Erwinaze listen (ER-wih-nayz)
A drug used with other anticancer drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is an enzyme that comes from the Erwinia chrysanthemi bacterium. It is used in patients who cannot take a similar drug that comes from the E. coli bacterium. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. It may also kill cancer cells. Also called asparaginase Erwinia chrysanthemi.
erythema listen (AYR-ih-THEE-muh)
Redness of the skin.
erythrocyte listen (eh-RITH-roh-site)
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood. Erythrocytes contain a protein called hemoglobin, which carries oxygen from the lungs to all parts of the body. Checking the number of erythrocytes in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as anemia, dehydration, malnutrition, and leukemia. Also called RBC and red blood cell.
erythrocyte sedimentation rate listen (eh-RITH-roh-site SEH-dih-men-TAY-shun ...)
The distance red blood cells travel in one hour in a sample of blood as they settle to the bottom of a test tube. The sedimentation rate is increased in inflammation, infection, cancer, rheumatic diseases, and diseases of the blood and bone marrow. Also called ESR and sedimentation rate.
erythrodysplasia listen (eh-RITH-roh-dis-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which immature red blood cells (erythroid cells) in the bone marrow are abnormal in size, shape, organization, and/or number. Erythrodysplasia may be caused by vitamin deficiency or chemotherapy, or it may be a sign of refractory anemia, which is a myelodysplastic syndrome. Also called erythroid dysplasia.
erythrogenesis imperfecta listen (eh-RITH-roh-JEH-neh-sis IM-per-FEK-tuh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with erythrogenesis imperfecta may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital hypoplastic anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, DBA, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, and inherited erythroblastopenia.
erythroid dysplasia listen (eh-RITH-royd dis-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which immature red blood cells (erythroid cells) in the bone marrow are abnormal in size, shape, organization, and/or number. Erythroid dysplasia may be caused by vitamin deficiency or chemotherapy, or it may be a sign of refractory anemia, which is a myelodysplastic syndrome. Also called erythrodysplasia.
erythroleukemia listen (eh-RITH-roh-loo-KEE-mee-uh)
Cancer of the blood-forming tissues in which large numbers of immature, abnormal red blood cells are found in the blood and bone marrow.
erythroleukoplakia listen (eh-RITH-roh-LOO-koh-PLAY-kee-uh)
An abnormal patch of red and white tissue that forms on mucous membranes in the mouth and may become cancer. Tobacco (smoking and chewing) and alcohol may increase the risk of erythroleukoplakia.
erythroplakia listen (eh-RITH-roh-PLAY-kee-uh)
An abnormal patch of red tissue that forms on mucous membranes in the mouth and may become cancer. Tobacco (smoking and chewing) and alcohol may increase the risk of erythroplakia.
erythropoiesis listen (eh-RITH-roh-poy-EE-sis)
The formation of red blood cells in blood-forming tissue. In the early development of a fetus, erythropoiesis takes place in the yolk sac, spleen, and liver. After birth, all erythropoiesis occurs in the bone marrow.
erythropoiesis-stimulating agent listen (eh-RITH-roh-poy-EE-sis-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting AY-jent)
A substance that stimulates the bone marrow to make more red blood cells. Erythropoiesis-stimulating agents are used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney failure, some anticancer drugs, and certain treatments for HIV. They may also be used to lower the number of blood transfusions needed during and after certain major surgeries. Examples of erythropoiesis-stimulating agents are epoetin alfa (Epogen, Procrit) and darbepoetin alfa (Aranesp). Also called ESA.
erythropoietin listen (eh-RITH-roh-POY-eh-tin)
A substance that is naturally produced by the kidneys, and that stimulates the bone marrow to make red blood cells. When erythropoietin is made in the laboratory, it is called epoetin alfa or epoetin beta.
ESA
A substance that stimulates the bone marrow to make more red blood cells. ESAs are used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney failure, some anticancer drugs, and certain treatments for HIV. They may also be used to lower the number of blood transfusions needed during and after certain major surgeries. Examples of ESAs are epoetin alfa (Epogen, Procrit) and darbepoetin alfa (Aranesp). Also called erythropoiesis-stimulating agent.
escitalopram listen (es-sy-TA-loh-pram)
A drug used to treat depression and certain anxiety disorders. It belongs to the family of drugs called selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs). Also called Lexapro.
esomeprazole magnesium listen (EH-soh-MEH-pruh-zole mag-NEE-zee-um)
A drug that blocks acid from being made in the stomach. It is used to treat acid reflux disease and to prevent certain types of gastrointestinal ulcers. Esomeprazole magnesium is being studied in the prevention of esophageal cancer and in the treatment of other conditions, including side effects of chemotherapy. It is a type of anti-ulcer agent. Also called Nexium.
esophageal listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul)
Having to do with the esophagus, the muscular tube through which food passes from the throat to the stomach.
esophageal cancer listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues lining the esophagus (the muscular tube through which food passes from the throat to the stomach). Two types of esophageal cancer are squamous cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the esophagus) and adenocarcinoma (cancer that begins in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids).
esophageal reflux listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul REE-flux)
The backward flow of stomach acid contents into the esophagus (the tube that connects the mouth to the stomach). Also called gastric reflux and gastroesophageal reflux.
esophageal speech listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul...)
Speech produced by trapping air in the esophagus and forcing it out again. It is used after removal of a person's larynx (voice box).
esophageal stent listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul stent)
A tube placed in the esophagus to keep a blocked area open so the patient can swallow soft food and liquids. Esophageal stents are made of metal mesh, plastic, or silicone, and may be used in the treatment of esophageal cancer.
esophagectomy listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove a portion of the esophagus.
esophagitis listen (ee-SAH-fuh-JY-tis)
Inflammation of the esophagus (the tube that carries food from the mouth to the stomach).
esophagoscopy listen (ee-SAH-fuh-GOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the esophagus using an esophagoscope. An esophagoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
esophagram listen (ee-SAH-fuh-gram)
A series of x-ray pictures of the esophagus taken after a patient drinks a liquid containing barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). The barium sulfate coats and outlines the inner wall of the esophagus so that it can be seen on the x-ray pictures. Also called contrast esophagram.
esophagus listen (ee-SAH-fuh-gus)
The muscular tube through which food passes from the throat to the stomach.
ESR
The distance red blood cells travel in one hour in a sample of blood as they settle to the bottom of a test tube. The sedimentation rate is increased in inflammation, infection, cancer, rheumatic diseases, and diseases of the blood and bone marrow. Also called erythrocyte sedimentation rate and sedimentation rate.
essential oil listen (eh-SENT-shul oyl)
The scented liquid taken from certain plants using steam or pressure. Essential oils contain the natural chemicals that give the plant its “essence” (specific odor and flavor). Essential oils are used in perfumes, food flavorings, medicine, and aromatherapy.
essential thrombocythemia listen (eh-SENT-shul THROM-boh-sy-THEE-mee-uh)
An increased number of thrombocytes (platelets) in the blood, without a known cause. Also called essential thrombocytosis.
essential thrombocytosis listen (eh-SENT-shul THROM-boh-sy-TOH-sis)
An increased number of thrombocytes (platelets) in the blood, without a known cause. Also called essential thrombocythemia.
Essiac listen (EH-see-ak)
An herbal tea mixture that contains burdock root, Indian rhubarb root, sheep sorrel, and slippery elm bark. It has been claimed to remove toxins from the body, make the immune system stronger, relieve pain, control diabetes, treat AIDS, reduce tumor size, increase cancer survival, and improve quality of life. No clinical trial using Essiac in humans has been reported in a peer-reviewed, scientific journal, and the FDA has not approved the use of Essiac for the treatment of any medical conditions.
ester listen (EH-ster)
A chemical substance made when an acid and an alcohol combine and water is removed. Esters are found in essential oils (scented oils that come from plants).
esterified estrogen listen (eh-STAYR-ih-fide ES-truh-jin)
A form of estrogen that may have fewer side effects than other forms. Esterified estrogens are used to treat some types of cancer, including prostate cancer. They are also used to treat the symptoms of menopause, (such as hot flashes, vaginal dryness, or heavy and painful bleeding) and osteoporosis (loss of bone mass). It is a type of drug called hormone therapy.
esthesioneuroblastoma listen (es-THEE-zee-oh-NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the tissues of the upper part of the nasal cavity (space inside the nose). This area is near the bone that separates the nasal cavity from the brain. These tissues are involved in the sense of smell. Esthesioneuroblastoma may spread from the nasal cavity to the bone around the eyes, the sinuses, the front part of the brain, or the lymph nodes in the neck. It is the most common type of nasal cavity tumor in children, especially in teens. Also called olfactory neuroblastoma.
estradiol listen (es-truh-DY-ol)
A form of the hormone estrogen.
estramustine listen (ES-truh-MUS-teen)
A combination of the hormone estradiol (an estrogen) and nitrogen mustard (an anticancer drug). Used in the palliative therapy of prostate cancer.
estrogen listen (ES-truh-jin)
A type of hormone made by the body that helps develop and maintain female sex characteristics and the growth of long bones. Estrogens can also be made in the laboratory. They may be used as a type of birth control and to treat symptoms of menopause, menstrual disorders, osteoporosis, and other conditions.
estrogen blocker listen (ES-truh-jin BLAH-ker)
A substance that keeps cells from making or using estrogen (a hormone that plays a role in female sex characteristics, the menstrual cycle, and pregnancy). Estrogen blockers may stop some cancer cells from growing and are used to prevent and treat breast cancer. They are also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. An estrogen blocker is a type of hormone antagonist. Also called antiestrogen.
estrogen cream listen (ES-truh-jin creem)
A cream that contains the hormone estrogen. It is used to treat some symptoms of menopause, such as vaginal dryness and painful intercourse. It may also be used to treat certain types of urinary incontinence (inability to control the flow of urine from the bladder). Estrogen cream is usually applied to the vagina, vulva, or opening of the urethra. It may also be applied to the cervix in some women who have certain abnormal cell changes caused by low hormone levels. Treatment with estrogen cream usually helps make these abnormal cells go away.
estrogen receptor listen (ES-truh-jin reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found inside the cells of the female reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. The hormone estrogen will bind to the receptors inside the cells and may cause the cells to grow. Also called ER.
estrogen receptor negative listen (ES-truh-jin reh-SEP-ter NEH-guh-tiv)
Describes cells that do not have a protein to which the hormone estrogen will bind. Cancer cells that are estrogen receptor negative do not need estrogen to grow, and usually do not stop growing when treated with hormones that block estrogen from binding. Also called ER-.
estrogen receptor positive listen (ES-truh-jin reh-SEP-ter PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cells that have a receptor protein that binds the hormone estrogen. Cancer cells that are estrogen receptor positive may need estrogen to grow, and may stop growing or die when treated with substances that block the binding and actions of estrogen. Also called ER+.
estrogen receptor test listen (ES-truh-jin reh-SEP-ter test)
A lab test to find out if cancer cells have estrogen receptors (proteins to which estrogen will bind). If the cells have estrogen receptors, they may need estrogen to grow, and this may affect how the cancer is treated.
estrogen replacement therapy listen (ES-truh-jin reh-PLAYS-ment THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with the hormone estrogen to increase the amount of estrogen in the body. It is given to women who have gone through menopause or to women who have early menopause caused by cancer treatment or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. Estrogen replacement therapy may help relieve symptoms of menopause, such as hot flashes, night sweats, vaginal dryness, and sleep problems. It may also help protect against osteoporosis (thinning of the bones) and lower the risk of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. Also called ERT.
ET-743
A drug used to treat liposarcoma and leiomyosarcoma (types of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who were treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ET-743 may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called ecteinascidin 743, trabectedin, and Yondelis.
etanercept listen (ee-TA-ner-cept)
A drug that is commonly used to treat arthritis. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer, and as a treatment for loss of appetite and weight loss in cancer patients. It belongs to the family of drugs called tumor necrosis factor (TNF) antagonists.
etaracizumab listen (eh-TAR-uh-SIH-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Etaracizumab binds to a protein on the surface of blood vessels and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It may also prevent the spread of cancer. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent, a type of metastasis inhibitor, and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Abegrin, humanized monoclonal antibody MEDI-522, and MEDI-522.
ethanol ablation listen (EH-thuh-nol a-BLAY-shun)
An injection of ethanol (alcohol) through the skin directly into a tumor to kill cancer cells. Ultrasound or a CT scan is used to guide the needle into the tumor. Also called alcohol ablation, PEI, and percutaneous ethanol injection.
etheylenediaminetetraacetic acid listen (EH-thih-leen-DY-uh-meen-TEH-truh-uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
A chemical that binds certain metal ions, such as calcium, magnesium, lead, and iron. It is used in medicine to prevent blood samples from clotting and to remove calcium and lead from the body. It is also used to keep bacteria from forming a biofilm (thin layer stuck to a surface). It is a type of chelating agent. Also called edetic acid and EDTA.
ethical listen (EH-thih-kul)
Having to do with beliefs about what is right and wrong in terms of how people behave. Also called moral.
ethical will listen (EH-thih-kul …)
A final personal message or document in which a person shares his or her thoughts, values, memories, life lessons, advice, and hopes for the future. The person may also ask for forgiveness and forgive others. An ethical will is not a legal document.
ethiodized oil listen (eh-THY-oh-dized oyl)
A form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine. Ethiodized oil is given by injection and builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in tumors. It is used for imaging (taking pictures) of the salivary glands and the lymph system. It is also being studied in the imaging of other organs such as the liver, lung, stomach, and thyroid. It is a type of diagnostic imaging agent. Also called Ethiodol, iodized oil, and Lipiodol.
Ethiodol listen (eh-THY-oh-dol)
A form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine. Ethiodol is given by injection and builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in tumors. It is used for imaging (taking pictures) of the salivary glands and the lymph system. It is also being studied in the imaging of other organs such as the liver, lung, stomach, and thyroid. It is a type of diagnostic imaging agent. Also called ethiodized oil, iodized oil, and Lipiodol.
ethmoid sinus listen (ETH-moyd SY-nus)
A type of paranasal sinus (a hollow space in the bones around the nose). Ethmoid sinuses are found in the spongy ethmoid bone in the upper part of the nose between the eyes. They are lined with cells that make mucus to keep the nose from drying out.
ethnic group listen (ETH-nik groop)
A group of people who share a similar culture (beliefs, values, and behaviors), language, religion, ancestry, or other characteristic that is often handed down from one generation to the next. They may come from the same country or live together in the same area. Examples of ethnic groups include Hispanics and Han Chinese. Some diseases or genetic conditions may be more common in certain ethnic groups than in others.
ethylene oxide listen (EH-thuh-leen OK-side)
A chemical used to make antifreeze, to clean medical equipment, and as a pesticide. It is also found in tobacco smoke. Being exposed to ethylene oxide can cause lung damage, headache, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, and shortness of breath. Being exposed over a long time may increase the risk of certain types of cancer.
ethynyluracil listen (eh-THY-nil-YOOR-uh-sil)
An anticancer drug that increases the effectiveness of fluorouracil. Also called eniluracil.
Ethyol listen (eh-THY-ol)
A drug used to help protect the kidneys in patients receiving cisplatin (a type of anticancer drug) for advanced ovarian cancer. It is also used to help reduce dry mouth in patients receiving radiation therapy after surgery for head and neck cancer. Ethyol helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by certain types of cancer treatment. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of radioprotective agent. Also called amifostine.
etidronate listen (ee-tih-DROH-nayt)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called bisphosphonates. Bisphosphonates are used as treatment for hypercalcemia (abnormally high levels of calcium in the blood) and for cancer that has spread to the bone (bone metastases).
etiology listen (EE-tee-AH-loh-jee)
The cause or origin of disease.
Etopophos listen (ee-toh-POH-fos)
A drug used with other drugs to treat small cell lung cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat testicular cancer that has not gotten better after other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Etopophos blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of podophyllotoxin derivative and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called etoposide phosphate.
etoposide listen (ee-toh-POH-side)
The active ingredient in a drug used with other drugs to treat small cell lung cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat testicular cancer that has not gotten better after other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Etoposide blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of podophyllotoxin derivative and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called VP-16.
etoposide phosphate listen (ee-toh-POH-side FOS-fayt)
A drug used with other drugs to treat small cell lung cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat testicular cancer that has not gotten better after other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Etoposide phosphate blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of podophyllotoxin derivative and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Etopophos.
ETS
Smoke that comes from the burning of a tobacco product and smoke that is exhaled by smokers. Inhaling ETS is called involuntary or passive smoking. Also called environmental tobacco smoke and secondhand smoke.
eucalyptus listen (YOO-kuh-LIP-tus)
A type of evergreen tree that is a member of the myrtle family. Oil from the leaves is used in very small amounts in mouthwash and in medicines and candy used to treat and soothe sore throats and coughs. It has also been used in some cultures to treat many other medical problems. The scientific name is Eucalyptus globulus.
euphoria listen (yoo-FOR-ee-uh)
A feeling of great happiness or well-being. Euphoria may be a side effect of certain drugs.
EUS
A procedure in which an endoscope is inserted into the body. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument that has a light and a lens for viewing. A probe at the end of the endoscope is used to bounce high-energy sound waves (ultrasound) off internal organs to make a picture (sonogram). Also called endoscopic ultrasound and endosonography.
EUS-FNA
A procedure to take a sample of tissue for examination under a microscope. An endoscope with an ultrasound probe and a biopsy needle at the end is inserted through the mouth into the esophagus. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument that has a light and a lens for viewing. The ultrasound probe is used to bounce high-energy sound waves off internal organs and tissues to make a picture on a monitor. This picture helps the doctor see where to place the biopsy needle. Also called endoscopic ultrasound-guided fine needle aspiration.
euthanasia listen (YOO-thuh-NAY-zhuh)
An easy or painless death, or the intentional ending of the life of a person suffering from an incurable or painful disease at his or her request. Also called mercy killing.
evaluable disease listen (ee-VAL-yoo-uh-bul dih-ZEEZ)
Disease that cannot be measured directly by the size of the tumor but can be evaluated by other methods specific to a particular clinical trial.
evaluable patients listen (ee-VAL-yoo-uh-bul PAY-shunts)
Patients whose response to a treatment can be measured because enough information has been collected.
event-free survival listen (eh-VENT … ser-VY-vul)
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient remains free of certain complications or events that the treatment was intended to prevent or delay. These events may include the return of the cancer or the onset of certain symptoms, such as bone pain from cancer that has spread to the bone. In a clinical trial, measuring the event-free survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called EFS.
everolimus listen (eh-veh-ROH-lih-mus)
A drug used with exemestane to treat some postmenopausal women with advanced breast cancer that is hormone receptor positive and HER2 negative. It is also used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) and certain types of pancreatic, lung, and gastrointestinal neuroendocrine tumors. It is used under the brand name Afinitor to treat these cancers and to treat renal angiomyolipoma (a type of benign kidney tumor) and subependymal giant cell astrocytoma (SEGA, a type of benign brain tumor) in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. Everolimus is also used under the brand name Afinitor Disperz to treat SEGA and certain types of seizures in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. It is also used under the brand name Zortress to keep the body from rejecting a kidney or liver transplant. Everolimus is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks a protein involved in cell division, which may help keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Everolimus also lowers the body’s immune response. It is a type of kinase inhibitor, a type of angiogenesis inhibitor, and a type of immunosuppressant. Also called RAD001.
Evista listen (ee-VIS-tuh)
A drug used to reduce the risk of invasive breast cancer in postmenopausal women who are at high risk of the disease or who have osteoporosis. It is also used to prevent and treat osteoporosis in postmenopausal women. Evista is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. It may also help keep bone from breaking down. Evista is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called raloxifene hydrochloride.
Evomela listen (eh-voh-MEH-lah)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma in patients who cannot take melphalan by mouth. It is also used to help prepare patients for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Evomela may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called melphalan hydrochloride.
Evoxac listen (EE-voh-ZAK)
A drug used to treat certain disorders of the salivary gland. It is also being studied as a treatment for dry mouth caused by radiation therapy to the head and neck. It increases the amount of saliva and sweat made by saliva and sweat glands. Evoxac is a type of cholinergic agonist. Also called cevimeline hydrochloride.
Ewing sarcoma listen (YOO-ing sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in bone or soft tissue. Also called peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumor and pPNET.
Ewing sarcoma family of tumors listen (YOO-ing sar-KOH-muh FA-mih-lee ... TOO-mers)
A group of cancers that includes Ewing tumor of bone (ETB or Ewing sarcoma of bone), extraosseous Ewing (EOE) tumors, primitive neuroectodermal tumors (PNET or peripheral neuroepithelioma), and Askin tumors (PNET of the chest wall). These tumors all come from the same type of stem cell. Also called EFTs.
ex vivo listen (ex VEE-voh)
Outside of the living body. Refers to a medical procedure in which an organ, cells, or tissue are taken from a living body for a treatment or procedure, and then returned to the living body.
Exalgo listen (eg-ZAL-goh)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It may also be used to treat certain types of cough. Exalgo is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Dilaudid, hydromorphone hydrochloride, and Hydrostat IR.
exatecan mesylate listen (EK-suh-TEE-kan MEH-zih-layt)
An anticancer drug that is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called DX-8951f.
excision listen (ek-SIH-zhun)
Removal by surgery.
excisional biopsy listen (ek-SIH-zhuh-nul BY-op-see)
A surgical procedure in which an entire lump or suspicious area is removed for diagnosis. The tissue is then examined under a microscope.
excisional skin surgery listen (ek-SIH-zhuh-nul … SER-juh-ree)
A surgical procedure used to remove moles, cysts, skin cancer, and other skin growths using local anesthesia. To treat skin cancer, the doctor uses a scalpel to remove the entire tumor and some of the healthy tissue around it.
excrete listen (ek-SKREET)
To get rid of waste material from the blood, tissues, or organs by a normal discharge (such as sweat, urine, or stool).
exemestane listen (EK-seh-MEH-stayn)
A drug used to treat advanced breast cancer or early-stage breast cancer that is estrogen receptor positive (ER+). It is used in postmenopausal women whose cancer has already been treated with tamoxifen. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Exemestane lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Exemestane is a type of aromatase inhibitor. Also called Aromasin.
exenteration listen (eg-ZEN-teh-RAY-shun)
Surgery to remove organs within a body cavity.
existential therapy (EK-sih-STEN-shul THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of psychotherapy that helps people think about the problems in their lives in the context of larger issues related to being human. Existential therapy focuses on helping people make healthy choices by taking responsibility for their own decisions, recognizing both their potential and their limitations, developing better ways of communicating, and searching for meaning and purpose in their lives. It may be used to help treat certain conditions, such as anxiety, depression, substance use disorders, and post-traumatic stress disorder.
exisulind listen (ek-sih-SOO-lind)
A drug being studied in the treatment and prevention of cancer. It has been shown to cause apoptosis (cell death) in cells that are malignant (cancer) and in cells that may become cancer. It acts through a group of cellular enzymes called cGMP phosphodiesterases.
Exjade listen (EX-jayd)
A drug used to treat too much iron in the blood caused by blood transfusions. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplastic syndromes (a group of diseases in which the bone marrow does not make enough healthy blood cells) and other conditions. Exjade binds to extra iron in the blood. The drug and the iron are passed from the body in urine. It is a type of chelating agent. Also called deferasirox.
exocrine cancer listen (EK-soh-krin KAN-ser)
A disease in which malignant (cancer) cells are found in the tissues of the pancreas. Also called pancreatic cancer.
exocrine pancreas cell listen (EK-soh-krin PAN-kree-us sel)
A pancreatic cell that produces enzymes that are secreted into the small intestine. These enzymes help digest food as it passes through the gastrointestinal tract.
expanded access trial listen (ek-SPAN-ded AK-ses TRY-ul)
A way to provide an investigational therapy to a patient who is not eligible to receive that therapy in a clinical trial, but who has a serious or life-threatening illness for which other treatments are not available. Expanded access allows a patient to receive promising but not yet fully studied or approved cancer therapies when no other treatment option exists. Also called compassionate use trial.
expectant management listen (ek-SPEK-tunt MA-nij-ment)
Closely watching a patient’s condition but not giving treatment unless symptoms appear or change, or there are changes in test results. Expectant management avoids problems that may be caused by treatments such as radiation or surgery. It is used to find early signs that the condition is getting worse. During expectant management, patients may be given certain exams and tests. It is sometimes used in prostate cancer. Also called deferred therapy.
experimental listen (ek-SPAYR-ih-men-tul)
In clinical trials, refers to a drug (including a new drug, dose, combination, or route of administration) or procedure that has undergone basic laboratory testing and received approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to be tested in human subjects. A drug or procedure may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition, but be considered experimental in other diseases or conditions. Also called investigational.
experimental drug listen (ek-SPAYR-ih-men-tul ...)
A substance that has been tested in the laboratory and has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for testing in people. Clinical trials test how well experimental drugs work and whether they are safe to use. An experimental drug may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition but still be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called IND, investigational agent, investigational drug, and investigational new drug.
experimental group listen (ek-SPAYR-ih-MEN-tul groop)
The group in a clinical research study that receives the drug, vaccine, or other intervention being tested. Interventions may also include medical procedures (such as radiation therapy and surgery), medical devices, behavior changes (such as diet and exercise), education programs, and counseling. Also called intervention group and investigational group.
explanation of benefits listen (EK-spluh-NAY-shun … BEH-neh-fits)
A summary of the costs of a medical treatment or other healthcare service that an insurance company may send to a patient after the patient has received the service. An explanation of benefits usually includes the date the patient received the service, how much the service cost, how much the health insurance plan paid, and how much the patient may need to pay the healthcare provider. Also called EOB.
exploratory surgery listen (ek-SPLOR-uh-TOR-ee SER-juh-ree)
Surgery to look inside the body to help make a diagnosis.
extensive-stage small cell lung cancer listen (ek-STEN-siv-stayj ... sel lung KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread outside of the lung in which it began or to other parts of the body.
external radiation therapy listen (...RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses a machine to aim high-energy rays at the cancer from outside of the body. Also called external-beam radiation therapy.
external right atrial catheter listen (ek-STER-nul rite AY-tree-ul KA-theh-ter)
A thin, flexible tube that is inserted into a vein in the neck or below the collar bone and guided (threaded) into the right atrium of the heart. It is used to give intravenous fluids, blood transfusions, and chemotherapy and other drugs, and for taking blood samples. It avoids the need for repeated needle sticks. An external right atrial catheter is a type of central venous access device.
external-beam radiation therapy listen (...RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses a machine to aim high-energy rays at the cancer from outside of the body. Also called external radiation therapy.
extracorporeal photopheresis listen (EK-struh-kor-POR-ee-ul FOH-toh-feh-REE-sis)
A procedure in which blood is removed from the body and treated with ultraviolet light and drugs that become active when exposed to light. The blood is then returned to the body. It is being studied in the treatment of some blood and bone marrow diseases and graft-vs-host disease (GVHD). Also called photopheresis.
extracranial listen (EK-struh-KRAY-nee-ul)
Outside of the cranium (bones that surround the brain).
extracranial germ cell tumor listen (EK-struh-KRAY-nee-ul jerm sel TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that begins in germ cells (cells that form sperm or eggs) that are found in areas of the body other than the brain. These areas include the ovary, testicle, chest, abdomen, and tailbone. Extracranial germ cell tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Extracranial germ cell tumors are most common in children and teenagers and can usually be cured.
extract listen (EK-strakt)
In medicine, a preparation of a substance obtained from plants, animals, or bacteria and used as a drug or in drugs.
extragonadal listen (EK-struh-goh-NA-dul)
An area of the body other than the ovaries or testes.
extragonadal extracranial germ cell tumor listen (EK-struh-goh-NA-dul EK-struh-KRAY-nee-ul jerm sel TOO-mer)
A rare type of tumor that begins in germ cells (cells that form sperm or eggs) found in areas of the body other than the testicle, ovary, or brain. Most extragonadal extracranial germ cell tumors form either in the sacrum (the large, triangle-shaped bone in the lower spine that forms part of the pelvis) and tailbone, or in the chest area and back of the abdomen. They may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) and occur most often in children and young adults.
extragonadal germ cell tumor listen (EK-struh-goh-NA-dul jerm sel TOO-mer)
A rare cancer that develops in germ cells that are found in areas of the body other than the ovary or testicle (such as the brain, chest, abdomen, or tailbone). Germ cells are reproductive cells that develop into sperm in males and eggs in females.
extrahepatic listen (EK-struh-heh-PA-tik)
Located or occurring outside the liver.
extrahepatic bile duct listen (EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt)
A duct (tube) that is outside the liver and carries bile from the liver and gallbladder to the small intestine. The extrahepatic bile duct includes the perihilar bile duct and the distal extrahepatic bile duct. The extrahepatic bile duct is part of the biliary system.
extrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the bile ducts outside the liver. A bile duct is a tube that carries bile (fluid made by the liver) between the liver and gallbladder and the small intestine. Cancer that forms in the area where the right and left bile ducts meet outside the liver is called Klatskin tumor. It is the most common type of bile duct cancer.
extranodal listen (EK-struh-NOH-dul)
Refers to an area or organ outside of the lymph nodes.
extraocular listen (EK-struh-AH-kyoo-ler)
Located outside the eye.
extraosseous listen (EK-struh-AH-see-us)
Located or occurring outside of the bone. Also called extraskeletal.
extraosseous Ewing tumor listen (EK-struh-OS-see-us YOO-ing TOO-mer)
A rare type of Ewing sarcoma that forms in soft tissue instead of bone. It usually occurs in the chest, pelvis, thigh, foot, or spine. Extraosseous Ewing tumors usually occur in children and young adults. They belong to a group of cancers called Ewing sarcoma family of tumors. Also called extraskeletal Ewing sarcoma and extraskeletal Ewing tumor.
extraosseous osteosarcoma listen (EK-struh-OS-see-us OS-tee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing type of cancer that is made up of bone and cartilage cells, and forms in soft tissue near bones. It usually occurs in the thigh, buttock, shoulder, or trunk (chest and abdomen). It often recurs (comes back) after treatment and spreads to other parts of the body, including the lungs. Extraosseous osteosarcoma usually occurs in middle-aged or older adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called extraskeletal osteosarcoma.
extrapleural pneumonectomy listen (EK-struh-PLOOR-ul NOO-moh-NEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a diseased lung, part of the pericardium (membrane covering the heart), part of the diaphragm (muscle between the lungs and the abdomen), and part of the parietal pleura (membrane lining the chest). This type of surgery is used most often to treat malignant mesothelioma.
extrarenal (extracranial) rhabdoid tumor listen (EK-struh-REE-nul (EK-struh-KRAY-nee-ul) RAB-doyd TOO-mer)
A rare, fast-growing cancer that forms in the soft tissues of the liver, heart, peritoneum, or other areas of the body outside the kidney and brain. These tumors often have an abnormality of chromosome 22. They usually occur in infants and young children, but they can also occur in older children and adults.
extraskeletal listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul)
Located or occurring outside of the bone. Also called extraosseous.
extraskeletal Ewing sarcoma listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul YOO-ing sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of Ewing sarcoma that forms in soft tissue instead of bone. It usually occurs in the chest, pelvis, thigh, foot, or spine. Extraskeletal Ewing sarcomas usually occur in children and young adults. They belong to a group of cancers called Ewing sarcoma family of tumors. Also called extraosseous Ewing tumor and extraskeletal Ewing tumor.
extraskeletal Ewing tumor listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul YOO-ing TOO-mer)
A rare type of Ewing sarcoma that forms in soft tissue instead of bone. It usually occurs in the chest, pelvis, thigh, foot, or spine. Extraskeletal Ewing tumors usually occur in children and young adults. They belong to a group of cancers called Ewing sarcoma family of tumors. Also called extraosseous Ewing tumor and extraskeletal Ewing sarcoma.
extraskeletal mesenchymal chondrosarcoma listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul meh-ZEN-kih-mul KON-droh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in cartilage or other soft tissue but not in bone. It usually occurs in the head and neck. Most extraskeletal mesenchymal chondrosarcomas are fast-growing and may spread to other parts of the body. They may also recur (come back) many years after treatment. Extraskeletal mesenchymal chondrosarcoma usually occurs in young adults. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
extraskeletal myxoid chondrosarcoma listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul MIK-soyd KON-droh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in cartilage near bones. It usually occurs in the thigh, knee, buttock, or trunk (chest and abdomen). The tumor may grow large and spread to nearby tissue or to other parts of the body, including the lymph nodes and lungs. It may also recur (come back) many years after treatment. The cancer cells usually have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Extraskeletal myxoid chondrosarcoma usually occurs in middle-aged or older adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
extraskeletal osteosarcoma listen (EK-struh-SKEH-leh-tul OS-tee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing type of cancer that is made up of bone and cartilage cells, and forms in soft tissue near bones. It usually occurs in the thigh, buttock, shoulder, or trunk (chest and abdomen). It often recurs (comes back) after treatment and spreads to other parts of the body, including the lungs. Extraskeletal osteosarcoma usually occurs in middle-aged or older adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called extraosseous osteosarcoma.
extrauterine pregnancy listen (EK-struh-YOO-teh-rin PREG-nun-see)
A condition in which a fertilized egg grows outside of the uterus, usually in one of the fallopian tubes. Symptoms include sharp pain on one side of the abdomen and bleeding from the vagina. Also called ectopic pregnancy.
extravasation listen (ek-STRA-vuh-SAY-shun)
The leakage of blood, lymph, or other fluid, such as an anticancer drug, from a blood vessel or tube into the tissue around it. It is also used to describe the movement of cells out of a blood vessel into tissue during inflammation or metastasis (the spread of cancer).
extravasation injury listen (ek-STRA-vuh-SAY-shun IN-jer-ee)
Blistering and tissue damage caused by certain drugs when they leak out of a vein into the tissue around it. The damage is sometimes severe and can lead to tissue necrosis (tissue death).
extremely dense breast tissue listen (ek-STREEM-lee dents brest TIH-shoo)
A term used to describe breast tissue that is made up of almost all dense fibrous tissue and glandular tissue. On a mammogram, the dense areas of the breast make it harder to find tumors or other changes. Women who have extremely dense breast tissue have a higher risk of breast cancer than those who have little or no dense breast tissue. Extremely dense breast tissue is one of four categories used to describe a level of breast density seen on a mammogram. About 10% of women have this type of breast tissue.
extremely low frequency electromagnetic field listen (ek-STREEM-lee … FREE-kwen-see ee-LEK-troh-mag-NEH-tik feeld)
A type of very low-energy radiation that travels in long waves. Although there have been health concerns, it is not known to cause harmful health effects, including cancer. The most common sources of extremely low frequency electromagnetic fields are power lines, electrical wiring, and electrical appliances, such as shavers, hair dryers, and electric blankets. Also called ELF-EMF.
extremity listen (ek-STREH-mih-tee)
A limb of the body, such as the arm or leg.
eye cancer listen (i KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of and around the eye. Some of the cancers that may affect the eye include melanoma (a rare cancer that begins in cells that make the pigment melanin in the eye), carcinoma (cancer that begins in tissues that cover structures in the eye), lymphoma (cancer that begins in immune system cells), and retinoblastoma (cancer that begins in the retina and usually occurs in children younger than 5 years).
EZN-2285
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic lymphoma in children and young adults aged 1 month to 21 years. EZN-2285 is a form of the drug L-asparaginase that is linked to a substance called SC-PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. L-asparaginase is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may stop the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. EZN-2285 is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called Asparlas, calaspargase pegol, and SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase.
F511 cream listen (… creem)
A substance being studied in the prevention of palmar-plantar erythrodysesthesia (pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the palms of the hands or soles of the feet) in breast cancer patients treated with anticancer drugs. F511 cream contains a substance that is used in products to control excess sweating under the arms and on the palms of the hands and soles of the feet. It is a type of antiperspirant.
falimarev listen (fuh-LIM-uh-rev)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a chicken virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called recombinant fowlpox-CEA-MUC-1-TRICOM vaccine.
fallopian tube listen (fuh-LOH-pee-in...)
A slender tube through which eggs pass from an ovary to the uterus. In the female reproductive tract, there is one ovary and one fallopian tube on each side of the uterus.
fallopian tube cancer listen (fuh-LOH-pee-in … KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissue lining the fallopian tube (one of two long, slender tubes that connect the ovaries to the uterus). The cancer sometimes begins at the end of the fallopian tube near the ovary and spreads to the ovary. Fallopian tube cancer is similar to ovarian epithelial cancer and is staged and treated the same way.
false-negative test result listen (... NEH-guh-tiv ... reh-ZULT)
A test result that indicates that a person does not have a specific disease or condition when the person actually does have the disease or condition.
false-positive test result listen (... PAH-zih-tiv ... reh-ZULT)
A test result that indicates that a person has a specific disease or condition when the person actually does not have the disease or condition.
familial adenomatous polyposis listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul A-deh-NOH-muh-tus PAH-lee-POH-sis)
An inherited condition in which numerous polyps (growths that protrude from mucous membranes) form on the inside walls of the colon and rectum. It increases the risk of colorectal cancer. Also called familial polyposis and FAP.
familial atypical multiple mole melanoma syndrome listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul AY-TIH-pih-kul MUL-tih-pul ... MEH-luh-NOH-muh SIN-drome)
An inherited condition marked by the following: (1) one or more first- or second-degree relatives (parent, sibling, child, grandparent, grandchild, aunt, or uncle) with malignant melanoma; (2) many moles, some of which are atypical (asymmetrical, raised, and/or different shades of tan, brown, black, or red) and often of different sizes; and (3) moles that have specific features when examined under a microscope. Familial atypical multiple mole melanoma syndrome increases the risk of melanoma and may increase the risk of pancreatic cancer. Also called FAMMM syndrome.
familial cancer listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that occurs in families more often than would be expected by chance. These cancers often occur at an early age, and may indicate the presence of a gene mutation that increases the risk of cancer. They may also be a sign of shared environmental or lifestyle factors.
familial dysplastic nevi listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul dis-PLAS-tik NEE-vye)
A condition that runs in certain families in which at least two members have dysplastic nevi (atypical moles) and have a tendency to develop melanoma.
familial isolated hyperparathyroidism listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul I-soh-LAY-ted HY-per-PAYR-uh-THY-roy-dih-zum)
A rare inherited condition in which one or more tumors form in the parathyroid glands (four pea-sized organs found on the thyroid) and cause them to make too much parathyroid hormone. The increased parathyroid hormone causes a loss of calcium from the bones and too much calcium in the blood. Also called FIHP.
familial medullary thyroid cancer listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
An inherited form of medullary thyroid cancer (cancer that forms in the cells of the thyroid that make the hormone calcitonin).
familial polyposis listen (fuh-MIH-lee-ul PAH-lee-POH-sis)
An inherited condition in which numerous polyps (growths that protrude from mucous membranes) form on the inside walls of the colon and rectum. It increases the risk of colorectal cancer. Also called familial adenomatous polyposis and FAP.
family cancer syndrome listen (FA-mih-lee KAN-ser SIN-drome)
A type of inherited disorder in which there is a higher-than-normal risk of certain types of cancer. Family cancer syndromes are caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes passed from parents to children. In a family cancer syndrome, certain patterns of cancer may be seen within families. These patterns include having several close family members (such as a mother, daughter, and sister) with the same type of cancer, developing cancer at an early age, or having two or more types of cancer develop in the same person. Examples of family cancer syndromes are hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome, Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome, and Lynch syndrome. Also called hereditary cancer syndrome and inherited cancer syndrome.
family history listen (FA-mih-lee HIH-stuh-ree)
A record of the relationships among family members along with their medical histories. This includes current and past illnesses. A family history may show a pattern of certain diseases in a family. Also called family medical history.
family medical history listen (FA-mih-lee MEH-dih-kul HIH-stuh-ree)
A record of the relationships among family members along with their medical histories. This includes current and past illnesses. A family medical history may show a pattern of certain diseases in a family. Also called family history.
family therapy listen (FA-mih-lee THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy in which the whole family talks with a professional counselor to solve family problems.
FAMMM syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
An inherited condition marked by the following: (1) one or more first- or second-degree relatives (parent, sibling, child, grandparent, grandchild, aunt, or uncle) with malignant melanoma; (2) many moles, some of which are atypical (asymmetrical, raised, and/or different shades of tan, brown, black, or red) and often of different sizes; and (3) moles that have specific features when examined under a microscope. FAMMM syndrome increases the risk of melanoma and may increase the risk of pancreatic cancer. Also called familial atypical multiple mole melanoma syndrome.
Fanconi anemia listen (fan-KOH-nee uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A rare inherited disorder in which the bone marrow does not make blood cells. It is usually diagnosed in children between 2 and 15 years old. Symptoms include frequent infections, easy bleeding, and extreme tiredness. People with Fanconi anemia may have a small skeleton and brown spots on the skin. They also have an increased risk of developing certain types of cancer.
Fanconi syndrome listen (fan-KOH-nee SIN-drome)
A group of kidney disorders that cause protein, sugar, minerals, and other nutrients to be lost in the urine. Symptoms include weakness, bone pain, and passing a greater than normal amount of urine. One form of Fanconi syndrome is inherited and is usually found in infants. Fanconi syndrome may also be caused by other diseases, a lack of vitamin D, or exposure to heavy metals or chemicals, including certain anticancer drugs.
FAP
An inherited condition in which numerous polyps (growths that protrude from mucous membranes) form on the inside walls of the colon and rectum. It increases the risk of colorectal cancer. Also called familial adenomatous polyposis and familial polyposis.
Fareston listen (FAYR-es-ton)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in postmenopausal women whose cancer is estrogen receptor positive (ER+) or when it is not known if the cancer is ER+ or estrogen receptor negative (ER-). Fareston blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. It is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called toremifene citrate.
Farydak listen (FAYR-ah-dak)
A drug used with bortezomib and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients who have already been treated with bortezomib and an immunomodulating agent. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Farydak blocks certain enzymes needed for cells to grow and divide and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called LBH589 and panobinostat.
Faslodex listen (FAZ-loh-dex)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer. It is used alone in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy or whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used with palbociclib or abemaciclib in women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Faslodex binds to proteins called estrogen receptors, which are found in some breast cancer cells. These proteins may cause cancer cells to grow. Faslodex blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiestrogen. Also called fulvestrant and ICI 182780.
fast-neutron beam radiation listen (fast-NOO-tron beem RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy that uses tiny particles called neutrons made by a machine called a cyclotron.
fat necrosis listen (… neh-KROH-sis)
A benign condition in which fat tissue in the breast or other organs is damaged by injury, surgery, or radiation therapy. The fat tissue in the breast may be replaced by a cyst or by scar tissue, which may feel like a round, firm lump. The skin around the lump may look red, bruised or dimpled.
fatigue listen (fuh-TEEG)
A condition marked by extreme tiredness and inability to function due to lack of energy. Fatigue may be acute or chronic.
fat-soluble vitamin listen (… SOL-yoo-bul VY-tuh-min)
A vitamin that can dissolve in fats and oils. Fat-soluble vitamins are absorbed along with fats in the diet and can be stored in the body’s fatty tissue. They come from plant and animal foods or dietary supplements. Vitamins A, D, E, and K are fat-soluble.
fatty acid listen (FA-tee A-sid)
A major component of fats that is used by the body for energy and tissue development.
fatty breast tissue listen (FA-tee brest TIH-shoo)
A term used to describe breast tissue that is made up of almost all fatty tissue. Fatty breast tissue does not look dense on a mammogram, which may make it easier to find tumors or other changes in the breast. Fatty breast tissue is more common in older women than in younger women. Fatty breast tissue is one of four categories used to describe a level of breast density seen on a mammogram.
FAU
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced solid tumors and lymphomas. It blocks the growth of cells and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of uracil analog. Also called 1-(2’-deoxy-2’-fluoro-ß-D-arabinofuranosyl) uracil.
fazarabine listen (fuh-ZAR-uh-been)
An anticancer drug that is a type of antimetabolite.
FDA
An agency in the U.S. federal government whose mission is to protect public health by making sure that food, cosmetics, and nutritional supplements are safe to use and truthfully labeled. The FDA also makes sure that drugs, medical devices, and equipment are safe and effective, and that blood for transfusions and transplant tissue are safe. Also called Food and Drug Administration.
FdCyd
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may prevent the growth of tumors by stopping cancer cells from dividing and by killing them. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 5-fluoro-2-deoxycytidine.
FDR
A parent, brother, sister, or child. Also called first-degree relative.
febrile neutropenia listen (FEH-brile noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition marked by fever and a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils in the blood. A neutrophil is a type of white blood cell that helps fight infection. Having too few neutrophils increases the risk of infection.
FEC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer, including breast cancer that has spread or come back. It includes the drugs fluorouracil, epirubicin hydrochloride, and cyclophosphamide. Also called FEC regimen.
FEC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer, including breast cancer that has spread or come back. It includes the drugs fluorouracil, epirubicin hydrochloride, and cyclophosphamide. Also called FEC.
fecal immunochemical test listen (FEE-kul IH-myoo-noh-KEH-mih-kul …)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called FIT, iFOBT, immunoassay fecal occult blood test, immunochemical fecal occult blood test, and immunologic fecal occult blood test.
fecal impaction listen (FEE-kul im-PAK-shun)
A mass of dry, hard stool that cannot pass out of the colon or rectum. Fecal impaction may be caused by using laxatives too often, using certain types of pain medicines, little or no physical activity over a long period, diet changes, or constipation that is not treated. Signs and symptoms may include being unable to have a bowel movement, pain in the abdomen or back, problems urinating, and nausea and vomiting. Fecal impaction may also cause problems with circulation, the heart, or breathing.
fecal incontinence listen (FEE-kul in-KON-tih-nents)
Inability to hold stool in the rectum.
fecal occult blood test listen (FEE-kul uh-KULT...)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Guaiac fecal occult blood test and immunochemical fecal occult blood test are two types of fecal occult blood tests. Guaiac fecal occult blood test uses a chemical substance called guaiac to check for blood in the stool. Immunochemical fecal occult blood test uses an antibody to check for blood in the stool. Also called FOBT.
feces listen (FEE-seez)
The material in a bowel movement. Feces is made up of undigested food, bacteria, mucus, and cells from the lining of the intestines. Also called stool.
Femara listen (FEH-muh-ruh)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Femara lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Femara is a type of aromatase inhibitor. Also called letrozole.
fenofibrate listen (FEH-noh-FY-brayt)
A drug used to treat high levels of cholesterol and triglycerides in the blood. Fenofibrate is being studied in the treatment of advanced cancers in young patients and in the treatment of other conditions. It is a type of antilipidemic agent. Also called Lofibra and TriCor.
fenretinide listen (fen-REH-tih-nide)
A substance being studied in the treatment and prevention of some types of cancer. Fenretinide may cause ceramide (a wax-like substance) to build up in tumor cells and kill them. It is a type of retinoid, which are substances related to vitamin A.
fenretinide LXS listen (fen-REH-tih-nide…)
A powdered form of fenretinide that is being studied in the treatment of neuroblastoma. It may be used by the body more easily than the pill form. Fenretinide may cause ceramide (a wax-like substance) to build up in tumor cells and kill them. It is a type of retinoid, which are substances related to vitamin A. Also called fenretinide Lym-X-Sorb.
fenretinide Lym-X-Sorb listen (fen-REH-tih-nide…)
A powdered form of fenretinide that is being studied in the treatment of neuroblastoma. It may be used by the body more easily than the pill form. Fenretinide may cause ceramide (a wax-like substance) to build up in tumor cells and kill them. It is a type of retinoid, which are substances related to vitamin A. Also called fenretinide LXS.
fentanyl citrate listen (FEN-tuh-nil SIH-trayt)
A drug used to treat severe cancer pain that occurs even though the patient is already taking opioids. It is also used during anesthesia for surgery. Fentanyl citrate binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid.
fentanyl sublingual spray listen (FEN-tuh-nil sub-LING-wul …)
A form of the drug fentanyl that is sprayed under the tongue and then absorbed into the blood. It is being studied in the treatment of breakthrough pain (pain that occurs even when pain-control medication is already being used) in cancer patients. Fentanyl is a type of opioid analgesic.
ferritin listen (FAYR-ih-tin)
A protein that binds to iron and stores it for use by the body. Ferritin is found in cells in the liver, spleen, bone marrow, and other tissues.
Ferrlecit listen (FAYR-leh-sit)
A form of the mineral iron that is used to treat anemia caused by low amounts of iron in the blood. Anemia is a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal. Ferrlecit is a type of hematinic and a dietary supplement. Also called sodium ferric gluconate.
ferrous sulfate listen (FAYR-us SUL-fayt)
A form of the mineral iron that is used to treat anemia caused by low amounts of iron in the blood. Anemia is a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal. Ferrous sulfate is a type of hematinic and a type of dietary supplement.
fertile listen (FER-til)
Able to produce children.
fertility listen (fer-TIH-lih-tee)
The ability to produce children.
fertility preservation listen (fer-TIH-lih-tee PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
A type of procedure used to help keep a person’s ability to have children. A fertility preservation procedure is done before a medical treatment that may cause infertility, such as radiation therapy or chemotherapy. Examples of fertility preservation procedures include sperm banking, egg freezing, in vitro fertilization with embryo freezing, and certain types of surgery for cervical and ovarian cancer.
ferumoxtran-10 listen (fayr-yoo-MOX-tran…)
A substance being studied as a way of improving magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) in diagnosing cancer and finding lymph nodes to which cancer has spread. Ferumoxtran-10 is made of nanoparticles (ultrasmall pieces) of iron oxide coated with dextran (a type of sugar). It is injected into the blood of the patient and the particles collect in lymph nodes, liver, spleen, or brain tissue where they can be seen using MRI. Ferumoxtran-10 later breaks down and passes from the body in urine.
ferumoxytol listen (fayr-yoo-MOK-sih-tol)
A nanoparticle form of iron made in the laboratory that is being studied for use in iron replacement therapy, and as a contrast agent for magnetic resonance imaging. Contrast agents are substances that are injected into the body and taken up by certain tissues, making the tissues easier to see in imaging scans.
fetal listen (FEE-tul)
Having to do with a fetus. A fetus is an unborn baby that develops and grows inside the uterus. In humans, the fetal period begins 8 weeks after fertilization of an egg by a sperm and ends at birth.
fetus listen (FEE-tus)
In humans, an unborn baby that develops and grows inside the uterus (womb). The fetal period begins 8 weeks after fertilization of an egg by a sperm and ends at the time of birth.
fever listen (FEE-ver)
An increase in body temperature above normal (98.6 degrees F), usually caused by disease.
fexofenadine listen (FEK-soh-FEH-nuh-deen)
A drug used to treat certain allergy symptoms. It blocks a chemical released during an allergic response that causes itching, sneezing, runny nose, wheezing, and watery eyes. It is a type of antihistamine. Also called Allegra.
FH gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes an enzyme called fumarase, which helps cells in the body use oxygen and make energy. Mutated (changed) forms of the FH gene may cause cells to lose the ability to use oxygen. This may increase the growth of some cells, including abnormal cells and cancer cells. The mutated FH gene has been found in patients with an inherited condition called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer (HLRCC). Patients with HLRCC have an increased risk of kidney cancer and tumors in the skin and uterus. Also called fumarate hydratase gene.
fiber listen (FY-ber)
In food, fiber is the part of fruits, vegetables, legumes, and whole grains that cannot be digested. The fiber in food may help prevent cancer. In the body, fiber refers to tissue made of long threadlike cells, such as muscle fiber or nerve fiber.
fiberoptic listen (FY-ber-OP-tik)
Describes the use of a coated, thin, clear, glass or plastic fiber that can carry light and send information, including images. In medicine, flexible fiberoptic instruments are used to look inside the body. Fiberoptics are also used to deliver laser light to tumors injected with a type of drug that kills cancer cells when it is exposed to laser light.
fibrin listen (FY-brin)
A protein involved in forming blood clots in the body. It is made from the protein fibrinogen and helps stop bleeding and heal wounds. Sometimes fibrin-like substances may be found in higher than normal amounts in the blood and urine of patients with some types of cancer or other conditions. Measuring the amount of these substances may help to check how well cancer treatment is working or if the cancer has gotten worse. Fibrin is a type of tumor marker.
fibrin sealant listen (FY-brin SEE-lent)
A substance used during surgery to help heal wounds. It contains proteins found in human blood that cause blood to clot. When fibrin sealant is placed on a wound, a clot forms. Fibrin sealant is being studied as a way to improve healing after lymph node removal in patients with cancer. It is a type of surgical glue.
fibrinogen listen (fy-BRIH-noh-jen)
A protein involved in forming blood clots in the body. It is made in the liver and forms fibrin. Fibrin is the main protein in a blood clot that helps stop bleeding and heal wounds. Sometimes fibrin-like substances may be found in higher than normal amounts in the blood and urine of patients with some types of cancer or other conditions. Measuring the amount of these substances may help to check how well cancer treatment is working or if the cancer has gotten worse. Fibrinogen is a type of tumor marker.
fibroadenoma listen (FY-broh-a-deh-NOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor that usually forms in the breast from both fibrous and glandular tissue. Fibroadenomas are the most common benign breast tumors.
fibroblast listen (FY-broh-blast)
A connective tissue cell that makes and secretes collagen proteins.
fibrocystic breast changes listen (FY-broh-SIS-tik brest CHAYN-jiz)
A common condition marked by benign (not cancer) changes in breast tissue. These changes may include irregular lumps or cysts, breast swelling or discomfort, sensitive nipples, and itching. These symptoms may change throughout the menstrual cycle and usually stop after menopause. Fibrocystic breast changes can occur at any age, but are most common in younger women. This condition does not increase the risk of breast cancer.
fibrofolliculoma listen (FY-broh-fuh-LIH-kyoo-LOH-muh)
A rare, benign (not cancer) tumor that forms in a hair follicle (the opening on the skin through which hair grows). Fibrofolliculomas appear as small, raised, whitish bumps that usually occur on the face, ears, neck, and chest. They tend to grow slowly but can increase in size and number over time. Fibrofolliculomas often occur in patients with an inherited condition called Birt-Hogg-Dubé syndrome.
fibroid listen (FY-broyd)
A benign smooth-muscle tumor, usually in the uterus or gastrointestinal tract. Also called leiomyoma.
fibromatosis listen (FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis)
A condition in which multiple fibromas develop. Fibromas are tumors (usually benign) that affect connective tissue.
fibrosarcoma listen (FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of soft tissue sarcoma that begins in fibrous tissue, which holds bones, muscles, and other organs in place.
fibrosis listen (fy-BROH-sis)
The growth of fibrous tissue.
fibrous listen (FY-brus)
Containing or resembling fibers.
fiducial marker listen (fih-DOO-shul MAR-ker)
A medical device or small object placed in or on the body to mark an area for radiation treatment or surgery. For example, tiny gold seeds may be put into the prostate to mark a tumor before radiation therapy. This allows the doctor to give higher doses of radiation to the tumor with less harm to nearby healthy tissue.
fifth cranial nerve listen (fith KRAY-nee-ul nerv)
The main sensory nerve of the head and face, and the motor nerve of the muscles used in chewing. Also called trigeminal nerve.
fight-or-flight syndrome listen (fite … flite SIN-drome)
A group of changes that occur in the body to help a person fight or take flight in stressful or dangerous situations. This is the body’s way of helping to protect itself from possible harm. During fight or flight, certain hormones, such as adrenaline and cortisol, are released into the blood. This causes an increase in blood pressure, heart rate, and breathing. Other changes include an increase in blood sugar, alertness, muscle tension, and sweating.
FIHP
A rare inherited condition in which one or more tumors form in the parathyroid glands (four pea-sized organs found on the thyroid) and cause them to make too much parathyroid hormone. The increased parathyroid hormone causes a loss of calcium from the bones and too much calcium in the blood. Also called familial isolated hyperparathyroidism.
filgrastim listen (fil-GRAS-tim)
A drug used under the brand names Neupogen, Zarxio, and Granix to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is also used under the brand names Neupogen and Zarxio to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer, to treat severe chronic neutropenia, and to prepare the blood for the collection of certain types of blood cells. Filgrastim helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called G-CSF and granulocyte colony-stimulating factor.
filgrastim-SD/01 listen (fil-GRAS-tim ...)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Filgrastim-SD/01 helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a form of filgrastim and is able to stay in the body longer. Filgrastim-SD/01 is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called Fulphila, Neulasta, and pegfilgrastim.
filler listen (FIH-ler)
An inactive substance used to make a product bigger or easier to handle. For example, fillers are often used to make pills or capsules because the amount of active drug is too small to be handled conveniently.
film mammography listen (... ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
The use of x-rays to create a picture of the breast on a film.
filter listen (FIL-ter)
A material or device that allows certain substances to pass through it, while keeping other substances out. Filters may be used in cigarettes to help trap tar and other harmful substances found in tobacco smoke. In medicine, filter also means to remove toxins, poisons, or other harmful substances from the blood. For example, the kidneys remove waste and extra water from the blood (as urine). The liver also removes harmful substances from the blood.
financial burden listen (fy-NAN-shul BUR-den)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Financial burden can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have financial burden than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, economic hardship, financial distress, financial hardship, financial stress, and financial toxicity.
financial distress listen (fy-NAN-shul dih-STRES)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Financial distress can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have financial distress than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, economic hardship, financial burden, financial hardship, financial stress, and financial toxicity.
financial hardship listen (fy-NAN-shul HARD-ship)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Financial hardship can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have financial hardship than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, economic hardship, financial burden, financial distress, financial stress, and financial toxicity.
financial navigator listen (fy-NAN-shul NA-vih-GAY-ter)
A person who works with patients and their families to help them reduce stress or hardship related to the cost of treatment for a medical condition, such as cancer. Financial navigators help patients understand their out-of-pocket expenses and what their health insurance plans may cover. Financial navigators may also help patients set up payment plans, find cost-saving methods for treatments, and improve access to healthcare services that the patient needs.
financial stress listen (fy-NAN-shul stres)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Financial stress can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have financial stress than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, economic hardship, financial burden, financial distress, financial hardship, and financial toxicity.
financial toxicity listen (fy-NAN-shul tok-SIH-sih-tee)
In medicine, a term used to describe problems a patient has related to the cost of medical care. Not having health insurance or having a lot of costs for medical care not covered by health insurance can cause financial problems and may lead to debt and bankruptcy. Financial toxicity can also affect a patient’s quality of life and access to medical care. For example, a patient may not take a prescription medicine or may avoid going to the doctor to save money. Cancer patients are more likely to have financial toxicity than people without cancer. Also called economic burden, economic hardship, financial burden, financial distress, financial hardship, and financial stress.
finasteride listen (fih-NAS-teh-ride)
A drug used to reduce the amount of male hormone (testosterone) produced by the body.
fine-needle aspiration biopsy listen (... NEE-dul AS-pih-RAY-shun BY-op-see)
The removal of tissue or fluid with a thin needle for examination under a microscope. Also called FNA biopsy.
Firmagon listen (FER-muh-gon)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. Firmagon binds to gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) receptors in the pituitary gland. This causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. Firmagon may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. It is a type of GnRH antagonist. Also called degarelix acetate.
first-degree relative listen (first-deh-GREE REH-luh-tiv)
A parent, brother, sister, or child. Also called FDR.
first-line therapy listen (... THAYR-uh-pee)
The first treatment given for a disease. It is often part of a standard set of treatments, such as surgery followed by chemotherapy and radiation. When used by itself, first-line therapy is the one accepted as the best treatment. If it doesn’t cure the disease or it causes severe side effects, other treatment may be added or used instead. Also called induction therapy, primary therapy, and primary treatment.
FISH listen
A laboratory technique used to look at genes or chromosomes in cells and tissues. Pieces of DNA that contain a fluorescent dye are made in the laboratory and added to cells or tissues on a glass slide. When these pieces of DNA bind to specific genes or areas of chromosomes on the slide, they light up when viewed under a microscope with a special light. Also called fluorescence in situ hybridization.
fistula listen (FIS-chuh-luh)
An abnormal opening or passage between two organs or between an organ and the surface of the body. Fistulas may be caused by injury, infection, or inflammation, or may be created during surgery.
FIT
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called fecal immunochemical test, iFOBT, immunoassay fecal occult blood test, immunochemical fecal occult blood test, and immunologic fecal occult blood test.
five element acupuncture listen (… EH-leh-ment AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
An ancient form of acupuncture based on the principle that there are five universal elements (wood, fire, earth, metal, and water) that affect a person's emotions, personality, health, and response to treatment. Each person is affected by one element more than the others. Also called traditional acupuncture.
five-year survival rate listen (... ser-VY-vul ...)
The percentage of people in a study or treatment group who are alive five years after they were diagnosed with or started treatment for a disease, such as cancer. The disease may or may not have come back.
FK463
An antibiotic/antifungal drug used to treat infection.
Flagyl listen (FLA-jul)
A drug that is used to treat infection and is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is type of antibacterial, antiprotozoal, and anthelmintic. Also called metronidazole.
flavonoid listen (FLAY-vuh-noyd)
A member of a group of substances found in many plants and plant-based foods. Flavonoids have shown antioxidant effects.
flavopiridol listen (FLAH-voh-PIH-rih-dol)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It stops cells from dividing and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase (CDK) inhibitor. Also called alvocidib and HMR 1275.
flaxseed listen (FLAX-seed)
The seed of the flax plant. It is a rich source of omega-3 fatty acid, fiber, and a compound called lignin. It is being studied in the prevention of several types of cancer. Also called linseed.
FLCN gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called folliculin, which may help control cell growth and other important cell functions. Mutated (changed) forms of the FLCN gene may increase the growth of abnormal cells. The mutated FLCN gene has been found in patients with an inherited condition called Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome (BHDS). Patients with BHDS have an increased risk of kidney cancer and tumors of the skin and lungs. The FLCN gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called folliculin gene.
flecainide listen (FLEH-kuh-nide)
A drug used to treat abnormal heart rhythms. It may also relieve neuropathic pain, the burning, stabbing, or stinging pain that may arise from damage to nerves caused by some types of cancer or cancer treatment.
Flomax listen (FLOH-max)
A drug used to treat urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. Flomax relaxes the muscles of the prostate and bladder, which helps the flow of urine. It is a type of alpha blocker. Also called tamsulosin hydrochloride.
flow chart listen (floh …)
A diagram that shows the order of steps in a complex process. Also called flow sheet.
flow cytometry listen (floh sy-TAH-meh-tree)
A method of measuring the number of cells in a sample, the percentage of live cells in a sample, and certain characteristics of cells, such as size, shape, and the presence of tumor markers on the cell surface. The cells are stained with a light-sensitive dye, placed in a fluid, and passed in a stream before a laser or other type of light. The measurements are based on how the light-sensitive dye reacts to the light.
flow sheet listen (floh …)
A diagram that shows the order of steps in a complex process. Also called flow chart.
floxuridine listen (flox-YOOR-ih-deen)
A drug used in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of antimetabolite.
FLT3 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called FMS-like tyrosine kinase 3 (FLT3), which is involved in the formation and growth of new blood cells. Mutated (changed) forms of the FLT3 gene may cause an over-active FLT3 protein to be made. This may cause the body to make too many immature white blood cells. These changes have been found in some types of leukemia, including acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL).
flt3L
A drug that increases the number of immune cells and may stimulate the immune system to kill cancer cells.
fluconazole listen (floo-KAH-nuh-zole)
A drug that treats infections caused by fungi.
flucytosine listen (floo-SY-toh-seen)
A drug that treats infections caused by fungi.
fludarabine phosphate listen (floo-DAR-uh-been FOS-fayt)
A drug used to treat B-cell chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) that has not responded to treatment with other anticancer drugs or that has gotten worse. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Fludarabine phosphate blocks cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of purine antagonist and a type of ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor.
fludrocortisone listen (floo-droh-KOR-tih-sone)
A synthetic corticosteroid. It is used to replace steroid hormones normally produced by the adrenal gland.
fluid listen (FLOO-id)
A substance that flows smoothly and takes the shape of its container. Liquids and gases are fluids.
fluid deprivation test listen (FLOO-id DEH-prih-VAY-shun …)
A test to measure how much urine is made and how concentrated it becomes when no fluid is given to a patient for a certain amount of time. This test is used to see how well the kidneys work and to help diagnose diabetes insipidus (a condition in which a person is very thirsty and makes large amounts of urine). Also called water deprivation test.
fluid replacement therapy listen (FLOO-id reh-PLAYS-ment THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment to replace fluids that are lost from the body because of surgery, injury, dehydration, disease, or other conditions.
fluorescence in situ hybridization listen (floor-EH-sents in SY-too HY-brih-dih-ZAY-shun)
A laboratory technique used to look at genes or chromosomes in cells and tissues. Pieces of DNA that contain a fluorescent dye are made in the laboratory and added to cells or tissues on a glass slide. When these pieces of DNA bind to specific genes or areas of chromosomes on the slide, they light up when viewed under a microscope with a special light. Also called FISH.
fluorescence microscopy listen (floor-EH-sents my-KROS-koh-pee)
The use of a special microscope to see objects that give off fluorescent light. For example, cells or tissue can be treated with a substance that contains a fluorescent dye. The dye lights up when viewed under a microscope with a special light.
fluorescence-guided surgery listen (floor-EH-sents-GY-ded SER-juh-ree)
Surgery that uses a fluorescent substance and a special microscope to show tumor margins (edges) so that more of the tumor can be removed. The substance is given by mouth and is taken up by fast-growing cells. These cells light up when seen under a microscope with a special blue light. This may help doctors to remove as much tumor as possible without harming healthy tissue. Fluorescence-guided surgery is being studied in the treatment of certain types of brain tumors.
fluoride listen (FLOOR-ide)
A form of the element fluorine that helps prevent tooth decay. Fluoride may be naturally present in drinking water or may be added to it. Fluoride may also be put directly on the teeth, as a gel, toothpaste, or a rinse.
fluorine F 18-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol listen (FLOOR-een … AL-fuh-FLOOR-oh-es-truh-DY-ol)
A radiolabeled substance being studied as an imaging agent in breast cancer. Fluorine F 18-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol binds to estrogen receptors and gives off radiation that can be detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. The PET scan forms an image that shows where cancer cells with estrogen receptors can be found in the body. Also called 18F-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol and 18F-FES.
fluorine F 18-EF5 listen (FLOOR-een ...)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. This may help predict how well the cancer will respond to treatment. Also called 18F-EF5.
fluorine F 18-FEQA listen (FLOOR-een …)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to diagnose cancer and to find out how well some types of cancer respond to treatment. Fluorine F 18-FEQA binds to the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some cancer cells. The PET scan forms an image that shows where cancer cells with EGFR can be found in the body.
fluorine F 18-fludeoxyglucose listen (FLOOR-een ... FLOO-dee-OK-see-GLOO-kose)
A radioactive form of glucose used in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging. Fluorine F 18-fludeoxyglucose gets taken up by cells in the body, and a PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken it up. Since more fluorine F 18-fludeoxyglucose is taken up by abnormal cells, including cancer cells, than by normal cells, it can be used to find cancer cells in the body and to diagnose cancer and other conditions. Also called 18F-fludeoxyglucose.
fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine listen (FLOOR-een … FLOOR-oh-MEH-thul-KOH-leen)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. Fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine. Also called 18F-choline, 18F-fluoromethylcholine, and 18F-FMCH.
fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole listen (FLOOR-een ... FLOOR-oh-MY-soh-NIH-duh-zole)
A radioactive substance being studied as an imaging agent in head and neck cancer and other types of cancer. It binds to large molecules in cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. Radiation given off by fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole is detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Knowing the amount of fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole in the cancer cells may help plan the best treatment and help predict whether the cancer will come back after treatment. Also called 18F-fluoromisonidazole, 18F-MISO, and FMISO.
fluorine F 18-fluorothymidine listen (FLOOR-een ... FLOOR-oh-THY-mih-deen)
A radioactive substance being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. Fluorine F 18-fluorothymidine is injected into the blood and builds up in cells that are dividing, including cancer cells. The radiation that it gives off as it decays (breaks down) helps make clear pictures of tumors during a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Also called 18F-FLT, 18F-fluorothymidine, and 3’-deoxy-3’-(18F) fluorothymidine.
fluorine F 18-sodium fluoride PET listen (FLOOR-een … SOH-dee-um FLOOR-ide …)
A procedure used to find out if cancer has spread to the bone. A small amount of a radioactive substance called fluorine F 18-sodium fluoride is injected into a vein. A PET scan is then used to make detailed pictures of the bones. Bones with cancer in them take up more fluorine F 18-sodium fluoride than normal bones do. Also called 18F-NaF PET and 18F-sodium fluoride positron emission tomography.
Fluoroplex listen (FLOOR-oh-plex)
A drug used as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). Fluoroplex stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It contains the active ingredient fluorouracil. Fluoroplex is a type of antimetabolite.
fluoropyrimidine listen (FLOOR-oh-py-RIH-mih-deen)
One of a group of substances used to treat cancer. A fluoropyrimidine is a type of antimetabolite. Examples are capecitabine, floxuridine, and fluorouracil (5-FU).
fluoroquinolone listen (FLOOR-oh-KWIH-noh-lone)
A type of drug used to prevent and treat infections.
fluoroscope listen (FLOOR-oh-skope)
An x-ray machine that makes it possible to see internal organs in motion.
fluoroscopy listen (floor-OS-koh-pee)
An x-ray procedure that makes it possible to see internal organs in motion.
fluorouracil listen (floor-oh-YOOR-uh-sil)
A drug used to treat cancers of the breast, colon, rectum, stomach, and pancreas. It is used under the brand names Carac, Tolak, Efudex, and Fluoroplex as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). It is also used under the brand name Efudex as a cream to treat basal cell skin cancer that is superficial (not invasive) and cannot be treated with other therapy. Fluorouracil is being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. Fluorouracil is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 5-fluorouracil and 5-FU.
fluoxetine listen (floo-OK-seh-teen)
A drug used to treat depression. It is a type of antidepressant.
fluphenazine hydrochloride listen (floo-FEH-nuh-ZEEN HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug that is used to treat mental and emotional disorders and is being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. Fluphenazine hydrochloride may stop tumor growth by keeping myeloma cells from dividing and causing them to die. It is a type of antipsychotic.
flutamide listen (FLOO-tuh-mide)
A drug used with another drug to treat certain types of prostate cancer. Flutamide binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Flutamide blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen.
fluvoxamine listen (floo-VOK-suh-meen)
A drug used to treat obsessive-compulsive disorder. It is a type of antidepressant agent and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called Luvox.
FMISO
A radioactive substance being studied as an imaging agent in head and neck cancer and other types of cancer. It binds to large molecules in cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. Radiation given off by FMISO is detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Knowing the amount of FMISO in the cancer cells may help plan the best treatment and help predict whether the cancer will come back after treatment. Also called 18F-fluoromisonidazole, 18F-MISO, and fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole.
FNA biopsy listen (... BY-op-see)
The removal of tissue or fluid with a thin needle for examination under a microscope. Also called fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
FOBT
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Guaiac FOBT and immunochemical FOBT are two types of FOBTs. Guaiac FOBT uses a chemical substance called guaiac to check for blood in the stool. Immunochemical FOBT uses an antibody to check for blood in the stool. Also called fecal occult blood test.
focal listen (FOH-kul)
In terms of cancer, limited to a specific area.
folate listen (FOH-layt)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Folate helps to make red blood cells. It is found in whole-grain breads and cereals, liver, green vegetables, orange juice, lentils, beans, and yeast. Folate is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough folate can cause anemia (a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal), diseases of the heart and blood vessels, and defects in the brain and spinal cord in a fetus. Folate is being studied with vitamin B12 in the prevention and treatment of cancer. Also called folic acid.
folate antagonist listen (FOH-layt an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug that stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. Certain folate antagonists are used to treat some types of cancer and inflammatory conditions, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called antifolate and folic acid antagonist.
FOLFIRI listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced colorectal cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called FOLFIRI regimen.
FOLFIRI regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced colorectal cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called FOLFIRI.
FOLFIRI-Avastin regimen listen (…uh-VAS-tin REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used as an initial treatment of colorectal cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs leucovorin (folinic acid), fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and bevacizumab. Also called FOLFIRI-bevacizumab and FOLFIRI-bevacizumab regimen.
FOLFIRI-bevacizumab listen (... beh-vuh-SIH-zoo-mab)
A chemotherapy combination used as an initial treatment of colorectal cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs leucovorin (folinic acid), fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and bevacizumab. Also called FOLFIRI-Avastin regimen and FOLFIRI-bevacizumab regimen.
FOLFIRI-bevacizumab regimen listen (…. beh-vuh-SIH-zoo-mab REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used as an initial treatment of colorectal cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs leucovorin (folinic acid), fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and bevacizumab. Also called FOLFIRI-Avastin regimen and FOLFIRI-bevacizumab.
FOLFIRI-cetuximab listen (... seh-TUK-sih-mab)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and cetuximab. Also called FOLFIRI-cetuximab regimen.
FOLFIRI-cetuximab regimen listen (... seh-TUK-sih-mab REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and cetuximab. Also called FOLFIRI-cetuximab.
FOLFIRINOX listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium, fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and oxaliplatin. Also called FOLFIRINOX regimen.
FOLFIRINOX regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium, fluorouracil, irinotecan hydrochloride, and oxaliplatin. Also called FOLFIRINOX.
FOLFOX listen
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens, including FOLFOX-4, FOLFOX-6, modified FOLFOX-6 (mFOLFOX-6), and FOLFOX-7. They differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX regimen.
FOLFOX regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens, including FOLFOX-4, FOLFOX-6, modified FOLFOX-6 (mFOLFOX-6), and FOLFOX-7. They differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX.
FOLFOX-4 listen
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-4 regimen.
FOLFOX-4 regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-4.
FOLFOX-6 listen
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-6 regimen.
FOLFOX-6 regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-6.
FOLFOX-7 listen
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-7 regimen.
FOLFOX-7 regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called FOLFOX-7.
folic acid listen (FOH-lik A-sid)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Folic acid helps to make red blood cells. It is found in whole-grain breads and cereals, liver, green vegetables, orange juice, lentils, beans, and yeast. Folic acid is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough folic acid can cause anemia (a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal), diseases of the heart and blood vessels, and defects in the brain and spinal cord in a fetus. Folic acid is being studied with vitamin B12 in the prevention and treatment of cancer. Also called folate.
folic acid antagonist listen (FOH-lik A-sid an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug that stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. Certain folic acid antagonists are used to treat some types of cancer and inflammatory conditions, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called antifolate and folate antagonist.
folinic acid listen (foh-LIN-ik A-sid)
A drug used to lessen the toxic effects of the anticancer drug methotrexate or other substances that block the action of folic acid. It is also used to treat some types of anemia and is used with fluorouracil to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Folinic acid is a form of folic acid. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called calcium levoleucovorin, citrovorum factor, Fusilev, and leucovorin calcium.
follicle listen (FAH-lih-kul)
A sac or pouch-like cavity formed by a group of cells. In the ovaries, one follicle contains one egg. In the skin, one follicle contains one hair.
follicle-stimulating hormone listen (FAH-lih-kul-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting HOR-mone)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make the follicles and eggs grow. In males, it acts on the testes to make sperm. Also called follitropin and FSH.
follicular large cell lymphoma listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler larj sel lim-FOH-muh)
A rare type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer that begins in the cells of the immune system) that is marked by enlarged lymph nodes and large cancer cells that may look cleaved (u-shaped) under the microscope. Follicular large cell lymphoma is treated as aggressive (fast-growing) lymphoma, but it sometimes recurs years later and acts like indolent (slow-growing) lymphoma.
follicular lymphoma listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler lim-FOH-muh)
A type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer of the immune system) that is usually indolent (slow-growing). The tumor cells grow as groups to form nodules. There are several subtypes of follicular lymphoma.
follicular mixed cell lymphoma listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler mikst sel lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer of the lymphatic system) in which there are both small and large cancer cells.
follicular thyroid cancer listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in follicular cells in the thyroid. It grows slowly and is highly treatable.
folliculin gene listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-lin jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called folliculin, which may help control cell growth and other important cell functions. Mutated (changed) forms of the folliculin gene may increase the growth of abnormal cells. The mutated folliculin gene has been found in patients with an inherited condition called Birt-Hogg-Dube syndrome (BHDS). Patients with BHDS have an increased risk of kidney cancer and tumors of the skin and lungs. The folliculin gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called FLCN gene.
folliculitis listen (fuh-LIH-kyoo-LY-tis)
Inflammation of a follicle (a sac or pouch-like cavity), usually a hair follicle.
follitropin listen (FAH-lih-TROH-pin)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make the follicles and eggs grow. In males, it acts on the testes to make sperm. Also called follicle-stimulating hormone and FSH.
follow-up listen (FAH-loh-up)
Monitoring a person's health over time after treatment. This includes keeping track of the health of people who participate in a clinical study or clinical trial for a period of time, both during the study and after the study ends.
follow-up care listen (FAH-loh-up kayr)
Care given to a patient over time after finishing treatment for a disease. Follow-up care involves regular medical checkups, which may include a physical exam, blood tests, and imaging tests. Follow-up care checks for health problems that may occur months or years after treatment ends, including the development of other types of cancer. Follow-up care is given after positive screening test results, such as a positive Pap test result. In cancer patients, one purpose of follow-up care is checking to see if the cancer has come back or has spread to other parts of the body.
follow-up care plan listen (FAH-loh-up kayr plan)
A detailed plan given to a patient after treatment ends, that contains a summary of the patient’s treatment, along with recommendations for follow-up care. In cancer, the plan is based on the type of cancer and the treatment the patient received. A follow-up care plan may include schedules for physical exams and medical tests to see if the cancer has come back or spread to other parts of the body. Getting follow-up care also helps check for health problems that may occur months or years after treatment ends, including other types of cancer. A follow-up care plan may also include information to help meet the emotional, social, legal, and financial needs of the patient. It may include referrals to specialists and recommendations for a healthy lifestyle, such as changes in diet and exercise and quitting smoking. Also called survivorship care plan.
Folotyn listen (FOH-loh-tin)
A drug used to treat peripheral T-cell lymphoma (a fast-growing form of non-Hodgkin lymphoma) that recurred (came back) or did not get better with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Folotyn stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Folotyn is a type of dihydrofolate reductase (DHFR) inhibitor. Also called pralatrexate.
fondaparinux sodium listen (fon-duh-PAYR-ih-nux SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to prevent blood clots from forming inside blood vessels in the leg. It is being studied in the prevention of blood clots in some cancer patients, including women having surgery for cancer of the reproductive tract. It is a type of anticoagulant. Also called Arixtra.
Food and Drug Administration listen (... ad-MIH-nih-STRAY-shun)
An agency in the U.S. federal government whose mission is to protect public health by making sure that food, cosmetics, and nutritional supplements are safe to use and truthfully labeled. The Food and Drug Administration also makes sure that drugs, medical devices, and equipment are safe and effective, and that blood for transfusions and transplant tissue are safe. Also called FDA.
foreign listen (FOR-in)
In medicine, foreign describes something that comes from outside the body. A foreign substance in the body’s tissues, such as a bacterium or virus, may be recognized by the immune system as not belonging to the body. This causes an immune response. Other foreign substances in the body, such as artificial joints, are designed to not cause an immune response.
foreskin listen (FOR-skin)
The loose skin that covers the head of the penis.
foretinib listen (for-eh-TIH-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Foretinib blocks enzymes involved in the growth and spread of tumor cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called MET/VEGFR-2 inhibitor GSK1363089 and XL880.
Form FDA 1572-Statement of Investigator listen (... STAYT-ment … in-VES-tih-GAY-ter)
A form that must be filed by an investigator running a clinical trial to study a new drug or agent. The investigator agrees to follow the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) Code of Federal Regulations for the clinical trial. The investigator verifies that he or she has the experience and background needed to conduct the trial and that it will be done in a way that is ethical and scientifically sound. Also called 1572 form.
formaldehyde listen (for-MAL-deh-hide)
A chemical commonly used to kill germs and to preserve laboratory specimens and tissues. It is also used to make building materials (such as wood), glue, fabric, paint, fertilizers, pesticides, and other substances. Formaldehyde is also found in tobacco smoke and in the vapor made from burning fuel, such as the exhaust from cars or household stoves and heaters. It has a strong odor and catches fire easily. Formaldehyde is known to cause cancer. Being exposed to formaldehyde increases the risk of developing myeloid leukemia and cancers of the paranasal sinuses, nasal cavity, and nasopharynx.
forodesine hydrochloride listen (FOR-oh-deh-seen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of leukemia and lymphoma. It is a type of purine nucleoside phosphorylase (PNP) inhibitor. Also called BCX-1777.
fortified food listen (FOR-tih-fide …)
A food that has extra nutrients added to it or has nutrients added that are not normally there. Examples are milk with vitamin D added and salt with iodine added.
Fosamax listen (FAH-suh-max)
A drug used to treat certain bone conditions, such as osteoporosis and Paget disease of the bone. It is also being studied in the treatment of hypercalcemia (high levels of calcium in the blood) and bone pain caused by cancer. Fosamax slows the breakdown of bone and prevents the loss of calcium. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called alendronate sodium.
fosaprepitant dimeglumine listen (FOS-uh-PREH-pih-tunt dy-MEG-loo-meen)
A drug used together with other drugs to prevent and control nausea and vomiting caused by cancer treatment. It is given in a vein. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of substance P/neurokinin 1 receptor antagonist. Also called Emend for Injection.
foscarnet sodium listen (fos-KAR-net SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat infections with herpesviruses in people whose immune systems are weakened by AIDS. It blocks the viruses from making copies of themselves. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called Foscavir and phosphonoformate trisodium.
Foscavir listen (FOS-kuh-veer)
A drug used to treat infections with herpesviruses in people whose immune systems are weakened by AIDS. It blocks the viruses from making copies of themselves. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called foscarnet sodium and phosphonoformate trisodium.
fostamatinib disodium listen (FOS-tuh-MA-tih-nib dy-SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. Fostamatinib disodium is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme called Syk, which may help keep the immune system from destroying platelets. Fostamatinib disodium is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called R788 sodium, Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788, and Tavalisse.
fotemustine listen (foh-teh-MUS-teen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced melanoma, glioblastoma (a type of brain tumor) that has come back, and certain types of lymphoma. Fotemustine damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea.
FR901228
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma and peripheral T-cell lymphoma that have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. FR901228 blocks certain enzymes, which may help kill cancer cells. It is a type of depsipeptide and a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called Istodax and romidepsin.
fractionation listen (FRAK-shuh-NAY-shun)
A way of dividing a total dose of radiation or chemotherapy into separate doses that are larger or smaller than usual.
Fragmin listen (FRAG-min)
A drug used to prevent blood clots from forming or to treat blood clots that have formed in patients with cancer or other conditions. Fragmin is a type of anticoagulant. Also called dalteparin sodium.
fragrance listen (FRAY-grunts)
A pleasant, sweet odor.
frankincense tree listen (FRAN-kin-SENTS…)
A tree that belongs to the incense tree family. The tree’s amber-colored resin is used in incense. The resin has anti-inflammatory effects and has been used to treat arthritis, asthma, and ulcerative colitis. It is also being studied in the treatment of brain tumors. Also called Boswellia serrata.
free flap listen (… flap)
A type of surgery used to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy. A tissue flap, including blood vessels, skin, fat, and sometimes muscle, is removed from one area of the body, such as the back or abdomen. It is then reattached to the chest to form a new breast mound. The blood vessels from the tissue are reconnected to blood vessels under the arm or in the chest. A free flap is a type of breast reconstruction.
free PSA listen (free …)
The amount of the protein prostate-specific antigen (PSA) in the blood that is not attached to other proteins. It is compared with the amount of PSA in the blood that is attached to other proteins. The amount of free PSA is higher in men with benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH).The amount of PSA attached to other proteins is higher in men with prostate cancer.
free radical listen (free RA-dih-kul)
A type of unstable molecule that is made during normal cell metabolism (chemical changes that take place in a cell). Free radicals can build up in cells and cause damage to other molecules, such as DNA, lipids, and proteins. This damage may increase the risk of cancer and other diseases.
free radical scavenger listen (free RA-dih-kul SKA-ven-jer)
A substance, such as an antioxidant, that helps protect cells from the damage caused by free radicals. Free radicals are unstable molecules that are made during normal cell metabolism (chemical changes that take place in a cell). They can build up in cells and cause damage to other molecules. This damage may increase the risk of cancer and other diseases.
freeze-dried listen (freez-dride)
A method used to dry substances, such as food, to make them last longer. The substance is frozen and then dried in a vacuum.
fresolimumab listen (FREH-soh-LIM-yoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other cancers and conditions. Fresolimumab binds to a protein called transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-beta), which is found on some cancer cells. Fresolimumab may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called anti-TGF-beta monoclonal antibody GC1008 and GC1008.
frontal sinus listen (FRUN-tul SY-nus)
A type of paranasal sinus (a hollow space in the bones around the nose). There are two, large frontal sinuses in the frontal bone, which forms the lower part of the forehead and reaches over the eye sockets and eyebrows. The frontal sinuses are lined with cells that make mucus to keep the nose from drying out.
fruit acid listen (froot A-sid)
One of a group of substances that are found in several types of fruit and in milk. They are used in skin care products to reduce wrinkles and soften the skin. Examples of fruit acids are glycolic acid, lactic acid, and citric acid. Also called AHA and alpha hydroxyl acid.
FSH
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make the follicles and eggs grow. In males, it acts on the testes to make sperm. Also called follicle-stimulating hormone and follitropin.
Ftorafur listen (FTOR-uh-fer)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a combination of tegafur and uracil. The tegafur is taken up by the cancer cells and breaks down into 5-FU, a substance that kills tumor cells. The uracil causes higher amounts of 5-FU to stay inside the cells and kill them. Ftorafur is a type of antimetabolite. Also called tegafur-uracil and UFT.
fulguration listen (ful-guh-RAY-shun)
A procedure that uses heat from an electric current to destroy abnormal tissue, such as a tumor or other lesion. It may also be used to control bleeding during surgery or after an injury. The electric current passes through an electrode that is placed on or near the tissue. The tip of the electrode is heated by the electric current to burn or destroy the tissue. Fulguration is a type of electrosurgery. Also called electrocautery, electrocoagulation, and electrofulguration.
full blood count listen (… blud kownt)
A measure of the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood. The amount of hemoglobin (substance in the blood that carries oxygen) and the hematocrit (the amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells) are also measured. A full blood count is used to help diagnose and monitor many conditions. Also called blood cell count, CBC, and complete blood count.
Fulphila listen (FUL-fih-luh)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Fulphila helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a form of filgrastim and is able to stay in the body longer. Fulphila is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called filgrastim-SD/01, Neulasta, and pegfilgrastim.
fulvestrant listen (ful-VES-trunt)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer. It is used alone in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy or whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used with palbociclib or abemaciclib in women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Fulvestrant binds to proteins called estrogen receptors, which are found in some breast cancer cells. These proteins may cause cancer cells to grow. Fulvestrant blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiestrogen. Also called Faslodex and ICI 182780.
fumarase listen (FYOO-muh-rays)
An enzyme that helps cells in the body use oxygen and make energy. Mutations (changes) in the gene that makes fumarase may cause cells to lose the ability to use oxygen, which may increase the growth of some cells, including abnormal cells and cancer cells. Also called fumarate hydratase.
fumarate hydratase listen (FYOO-muh-rayt HY-druh-tays)
An enzyme that helps cells in the body use oxygen and make energy. Mutations (changes) in the gene that makes fumarate hydratase may cause cells to lose the ability to use oxygen, which may increase the growth of some cells, including abnormal cells and cancer cells. Also called fumarase.
fumarate hydratase gene listen (FYOO-muh-rayt HY-druh-tays jeen)
A gene that makes an enzyme called fumarase, which helps cells in the body use oxygen and make energy. Mutated (changed) forms of the fumarate hydratase gene may cause cells to lose the ability to use oxygen. This may increase the growth of some cells, including abnormal cells and cancer cells. The mutated fumarate hydratase gene has been found in patients with an inherited condition called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer (HLRCC). Patients with HLRCC have an increased risk of kidney cancer and tumors in the skin and uterus. Also called FH gene.
functional magnetic resonance imaging listen (FUNK-shuh-nul mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts IH-muh-jing)
A noninvasive tool used to observe functioning in the brain or other organs by detecting changes in chemical composition, blood flow, or both.
functioning tumor listen (FUNK-shuh-ning TOO-mer)
A tumor that is found in endocrine tissue and makes hormones (chemicals that travel in the bloodstream and control the actions of other cells or organs).
fundoscopy listen (fun-DOS-koh-pee)
An exam that uses a magnifying lens and a light to check the fundus of the eye (back of the inside of the eye, including the retina and optic nerve). The pupils may be dilated (enlarged) with medicated eye drops so the doctor can see through the pupil to the back of the eye. Fundoscopy may be used to check for eye problems, such as glaucoma, macular degeneration, eye cancer, optic nerve problems, or eye injury. Also called funduscopy and ophthalmoscopy.
fundus listen (FUN-dus)
The part of a hollow organ that is across from, or farthest away from, the organ’s opening. Depending on the organ, the fundus may be at the top or bottom of the organ. For example, the fundus of the uterus is the top part of the uterus that is across from the cervix (the opening of the uterus). The fundus of the bladder is the back, bottom part of the bladder. Certain organs, including the bladder, gallbladder, stomach, uterus, and eye, have a fundus.
funduscopy listen (fun-DUS-koh-pee)
An exam that uses a magnifying lens and a light to check the fundus of the eye (back of the inside of the eye, including the retina and optic nerve). The pupils may be dilated (enlarged) with medicated eye drops so the doctor can see through the pupil to the back of the eye. Funduscopy may be used to check for eye problems, such as glaucoma, macular degeneration, eye cancer, optic nerve problems, or eye injury. Also called fundoscopy and ophthalmoscopy.
fungating lesion listen (FUN-gayt-ing LEE-zhun)
A type of skin lesion that is marked by ulcerations (breaks on the skin or surface of an organ) and necrosis (death of living tissue) and that usually has a bad smell. This kind of lesion may occur in many types of cancer, including breast cancer, melanoma, and squamous cell carcinoma, and especially in advanced disease.
fungicide listen (FUN-jih-side)
Any substance used to kill fungi (plant-like organisms that do not make chlorophyll), such as yeast and molds.
fungus listen (FUN-gus)
A plant-like organism that does not make chlorophyll. Mushrooms, yeasts, and molds are examples. The plural is fungi.
Fusilev listen (FYOO-sih-lev)
A drug used to lessen the toxic effects of the anticancer drug methotrexate or other substances that block the action of folic acid. It is also used to treat some types of anemia and is used with fluorouracil to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Fusilev is a form of folic acid. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called calcium levoleucovorin, citrovorum factor, folinic acid, and leucovorin calcium.
fusion gene listen (FYOO-zhun jeen)
A gene made by joining parts of two different genes. Fusion genes, and the fusion proteins that come from them, may be made in the laboratory, or made naturally in the body when part of the DNA from one chromosome moves to another chromosome. Fusion proteins produced by this change may lead to the development of some types of cancer. For example, the BCR-ABL fusion gene and protein are found in some types of leukemia. Fusion genes and proteins may also be found in several other types of cancer, including soft tissue sarcoma, cancers of the prostate, breast, lung, bladder, colon, and rectum, and CNS tumors. Fusion genes and proteins are being studied in the diagnosis and treatment of cancer.
fusion protein listen (FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
A protein made from a fusion gene, which is created by joining parts of two different genes. Fusion genes may occur naturally in the body by transfer of DNA between chromosomes. For example, the BCR-ABL gene found in some types of leukemia is a fusion gene that makes the BCR-ABL fusion protein. Fusion genes and proteins can also be made in the laboratory by combining genes or parts of genes from the same or different organisms.
G6PD deficiency listen (… deh-FIH-shun-see)
An inherited disorder in which a person doesn’t have enough of an enzyme called G6PD that helps red blood cells work the way they should. In G6PD deficiency, the red blood cells break down when the body is exposed to infection, severe stress, or certain drugs, chemicals, or foods. This may lead to a condition called hemolytic anemia. This disorder is most common in African-American men and in men of Middle Eastern or Mediterranean descent. Also called glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency.
gabapentin listen (GA-buh-PEN-tin)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for relieving hot flashes in women with breast cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called anticonvulsants.
GAD
A condition marked by excessive worry and feelings of fear, dread, and uneasiness that last six months or longer. Other symptoms of GAD include being restless, being tired or irritable, muscle tension, not being able to concentrate or sleep well, shortness of breath, fast heartbeat, sweating, and dizziness. Also called generalized anxiety disorder.
gadobenate dimeglumine listen (GA-doh-BEH-nayt dy-MEG-loo-meen)
A drug used in MRI to help make clear pictures of blood vessels in the brain, spine, and nearby tissues. It is also being studied as a way to find abnormal areas in the liver and other organs and to help diagnose cancer. Gadobenate dimeglumine is a type of contrast agent. Also called MultiHance.
gadolinium listen (GA-duh-LIH-nee-um)
A metal element that is used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) and other imaging methods. It is a contrast agent, which helps show abnormal tissue in the body during imaging with a special machine.
gadolinium texaphyrin listen (GA-doh-LIH-nee-um tek-SA-fih-rin)
A substance being studied in the treatment and diagnosis of some types of cancer. It builds up in some cancer cells, which may make them easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. Gadolinium texaphyrin is also used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to help find cancer cells in the body. It is a type of radiosensitizing agent, a type of chemosensitizing agent, and a type of contrast agent. Also called motexafin gadolinium.
gadopentetate dimeglumine listen (GA-doh-PEN-teh-tayt dy-MEG-loo-meen)
A substance used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to help make clear pictures of the brain, spine, heart, soft tissue of joints, and inside bones. Gadopentetate dimeglumine is being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. It is a type of contrast agent. Also called Gd-DTPA and Magnevist.
Gail model listen (... MAH-dul)
A computer program that uses personal and family medical history information to estimate a woman’s chance of developing breast cancer. Also called Gail risk model.
Gail risk model listen (... MAH-dul)
A computer program that uses personal and family medical history information to estimate a woman’s chance of developing breast cancer. Also called Gail model.
galactography listen (GA-lak-TAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to create pictures of milk ducts in the breast. A very thin catheter (tube) is inserted into the nipple, and a small amount of dye is injected into the duct. This makes the duct easier to see on the x-ray. Galactography is used in patients who have a bloody or clear discharge from one nipple. A small amount of the fluid may be collected to check for infection or cancer cells. Galactography may be used to help diagnose certain breast conditions, such as papillomas (wart-like growths) in a milk duct, fibrocystic breast changes, and breast cancer. Also called ductography.
galiximab listen (guh-LIK-sih-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of follicular non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It binds to the protein CD80, which is found on certain normal white blood cells and on white blood cells that are cancer. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
gallbladder listen (GAWL-bla-der)
The pear-shaped organ found below the liver. Bile is concentrated and stored in the gallbladder.
gallbladder cancer listen (GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the gallbladder. The gallbladder is a pear-shaped organ below the liver that collects and stores bile (a fluid made by the liver to digest fat). Gallbladder cancer begins in the innermost layer of tissue and spreads through the outer layers as it grows.
gallium nitrate listen (GA-lee-um NY-trayt)
A drug that lowers blood calcium. Used as treatment for hypercalcemia (too much calcium in the blood) and for cancer that has spread to the bone (bone metastases).
gallium scan listen (GA-lee-um skan)
A procedure to detect areas of the body where cells are dividing rapidly. It is used to locate cancer cells or areas of inflammation. A very small amount of radioactive gallium is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. The gallium is taken up by rapidly dividing cells in the bones, tissues, and organs and is detected by a scanner.
gallstone listen (GAWL-stone)
Solid material that forms in the gallbladder or common bile duct. Gallstones are made of cholesterol or other substances found in the gallbladder. They may occur as one large stone or as many small ones, and vary from the size of a golf ball to a grain of sand. Also called cholelith.
galvanic skin response listen (gal-VA-nik ... reh-SPONTS)
A change in the heat and electricity passed through the skin by nerves and sweat. Galvanic skin response increases in certain emotional states and during hot flashes that happen with menopause. Also called electrodermal response and skin conduction.
Gamifant listen (GA-mih-fant)
A drug used to treat a rare immune system disorder called primary hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis (HLH) that came back, got worse, or did not get better with other therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with other therapy. Gamifant binds to an immune system protein called interferon gamma, which is found at higher than normal levels in patients with HLH. This may help lower the body’s immune response and reduce inflammation. Gamifant is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called emapalumab.
gamma irradiation listen (GA-muh ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy that uses gamma radiation. Gamma radiation is a type of high-energy radiation that is different from x-rays.
Gamma Knife therapy listen (GA-muh nife THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment using gamma rays, a type of high-energy radiation that can be tightly focused on small tumors or other lesions in the head or neck, so very little normal tissue receives radiation. The gamma rays are aimed at the tumor from many different angles at once, and deliver a large dose of radiation exactly to the tumor in one treatment session. This procedure is a type of stereotactic radiosurgery. Gamma Knife therapy is not a knife and is not surgery. Gamma Knife is a registered trademark of Elekta Instruments, Inc.
gamma ray listen (GA-muh ...)
A type of high-energy radiation that is different from an x-ray.
ganciclovir listen (gan-SY-kloh-veer)
An antiviral agent used to prevent or treat cytomegalovirus infections that may occur when the body's immune system is suppressed. In gene therapy, ganciclovir is used with an altered herpes simplex virus-1 gene to kill advanced melanoma cells and brain tumor cells.
ganetespib listen (guh-NEH-tes-pib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Ganetespib blocks the activity of a protein called HSP90. This prevents the breakdown of certain proteins inside cells. Blocking the activity of this protein in cancer cells may help keep the cells from dividing and cause them to die. It may also make cancer cells easier to kill with chemotherapy and radiation therapy. Ganetespib is a type of heat-shock protein inhibitor.
ganglioside listen (GANG-glee-oh-side)
A complex molecule that contains both lipids (fats) and carbohydrates (sugars) and is found in the plasma (outer) membrane of many kinds of cells. Several different types of gangliosides have been identified.
Gardasil listen (GAR-duh-sil)
A vaccine used to prevent anal, cervical, vaginal, and vulvar cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16 and 18 and genital warts caused by HPV types 6 and 11. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to anal, cervical, vaginal, or vulvar cancer. Gardasil is approved for use in males and females aged 9 to 26 years. It is a type of quadrivalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against four different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called recombinant human papillomavirus quadrivalent vaccine.
Gardasil 9 listen (GAR-duh-sil …)
A vaccine used to prevent anal, cervical, vaginal, and vulvar cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52, and 58 and genital warts caused by HPV types 6 and 11. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to anal, cervical, vaginal, or vulvar cancer. Gardasil 9 is approved for use in females and males aged 9 to 26 years. It is a type of nonavalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against nine different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called recombinant human papillomavirus nonavalent vaccine.
garden heliotrope listen (GAR-den HEE-lee-oh-TROPE)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden valerian, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
garden valerian listen (GAR-den vuh-LEER-ee-un)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
Gardner syndrome (GARD-ner SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which many polyps (abnormal growths of tissue) form on the inner walls of the colon and rectum. Other signs and symptoms of Gardner syndrome include dental problems and benign (not cancer) growths or tumors in the bone, soft tissue, skin, adrenal glands, stomach, and small intestine. People with Gardner syndrome have a very high risk of developing colorectal cancer at an early age. They are also at risk of developing cancers of the small bowel, stomach, pancreas, thyroid, central nervous system, liver, bile ducts, and adrenal gland. Gardner syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called APC. It is a type of familial adenomatous polyposis and a type of autosomal dominant genetic disease.
garlic listen (GAR-lik)
A European plant that has a bulb used to flavor food. It has also been used in some cultures to treat certain medical conditions including high cholesterol, high blood pressure, infections, and cancer. The scientific name is Allium sativum.
gastrectomy listen (ga-STREK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove all or part of the stomach.
gastric listen (GAS-trik)
Having to do with the stomach.
gastric acid listen (GAS-trik A-sid)
Acid that is released into the stomach from glands in the stomach wall. It helps digest food. Gastric acid is made of hydrochloric acid.
gastric acid secretion test listen (GAS-trik A-sid seh-KREE-shun …)
A test used to measure the amount of gastric acid made by the stomach. The patient receives an injection of the hormone gastrin or insulin. A tube is put through the nose or throat into the stomach and samples are taken from the stomach and sent to a laboratory for testing. Also called stomach acid stimulation test and stomach acid test.
gastric atrophy listen (GAS-trik A-troh-fee)
A condition marked by thinning of the inner lining of the stomach wall and the loss of gland cells in the lining that release substances that help with digestion. It may be caused by infection with the bacterium H. pylori or by certain autoimmune conditions. Gastric atrophy may increase the risk of stomach cancer.
gastric cancer listen (GAS-trik KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues lining the stomach. Also called stomach cancer.
gastric feeding tube listen (GAS-trik FEE-ding toob)
A tube that is inserted through the nose, down the throat and esophagus, and into the stomach. It can be used to give drugs, liquids, and liquid food, or used to remove substances from the stomach. Giving food through a gastric feeding tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called nasogastric tube and NG tube.
gastric mucosal hypertrophy listen (GAS-trik myoo-KOH-sul hy-PER-troh-fee)
A condition marked by inflammation and ulcers (breaks on the skin or on the surface of an organ) of the mucosa (inner lining) of the stomach and by overgrowth of the cells that make up the mucosa. Symptoms include vomiting, diarrhea, and weight loss. Patients with gastric mucosal hypertrophy may be at a higher risk of stomach cancer. Also called giant hypertrophic gastritis and Ménétrier disease.
gastric reflux listen (GAS-trik REE-flux)
The backward flow of stomach acid contents into the esophagus (the tube that connects the mouth to the stomach). Also called esophageal reflux and gastroesophageal reflux.
gastric scirrhous carcinoma listen (GAS-trik SKIR-us KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of stomach cancer that begins in the lining of the stomach and spreads to the muscles of the stomach wall. This causes the wall of the stomach to become thick, hard, and rubbery, which leads to trouble digesting food. Also called linitis plastica.
gastrin listen (GAS-trin)
A hormone released from special cells in the lining of the stomach after eating. Gastrin causes the stomach to release an acid that helps digest food.
gastrinoma listen (gas-trih-NOH-muh)
A tumor that causes overproduction of gastric acid. It usually begins in the duodenum (first part of the small intestine that connects to the stomach) or the islet cells of the pancreas. Rarely, it may also begin in other organs, including the stomach, liver, jejunum (the middle part of the small intestine), biliary tract (organs and ducts that make and store bile), mesentery, or heart. It is a type of neuroendocrine tumor, and it may metastasize (spread) to the liver and the lymph nodes.
gastritis listen (gas-TRY-tis)
Inflammation of the lining of the stomach.
gastroenteritis listen (GAS-troh-EN-teh-RY-tis)
Inflammation of the lining of the stomach and the intestines. Symptoms may include nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, and abdominal cramps (dull or sharp pains). Gastroenteritis may be caused by infection with bacteria, parasites, or viruses. It may also be caused by food poisoning, allergic reactions, or reactions to certain medicines or foods.
gastroenterologist listen (GAS-troh-EN-teh-RAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating disorders of the digestive system.
gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumor listen (GAS-troh-EN-teh-roh-PAN-kree-A-tik NOOR-oh-EN-doh-krin TOO-mer)
A rare type of tumor that can form in the pancreas or in other parts of the gastrointestinal tract, including the stomach, small intestine, colon, rectum, and appendix. Gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors usually form in cells that secrete hormones. Some of these tumors make extra amounts of hormones and other substances that may cause signs and symptoms of disease, including a condition called carcinoid syndrome. Gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They are sometimes called carcinoid tumors or islet cell tumors. Also called GEP-NET.
gastroesophageal junction listen (GAS-troh-ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul JUNK-shun)
The place where the esophagus is connected to the stomach.
gastroesophageal reflux listen (GAS-troh-ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul REE-flux)
The backward flow of stomach acid contents into the esophagus (the tube that connects the mouth to the stomach). Also called esophageal reflux and gastric reflux.
gastrointestinal listen (GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul)
Refers to the stomach and intestines. Also called GI.
gastrointestinal carcinoid tumor listen (GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul KAR-sih-noyd TOO-mer)
An indolent (slow-growing) cancer that forms in cells that make hormones in the lining of the gastrointestinal tract (the stomach and intestines). It usually occurs in the small intestine, rectum, or appendix (a small fingerlike pouch of the large intestine). Having gastrointestinal carcinoid tumor increases the risk of forming other cancers of the digestive system.
gastrointestinal stromal tumor listen (GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul STROH-mul TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that usually begins in cells in the wall of the gastrointestinal tract. It can be benign or malignant. Also called GIST.
gastrointestinal system listen (GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul SIS-tem)
The organs that take in food and liquids and break them down into substances that the body can use for energy, growth, and tissue repair. Waste products the body cannot use leave the body through bowel movements. The gastrointestinal system includes the mouth, pharynx (throat), esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large intestine, rectum, and anus. It also includes the salivary glands, liver, gallbladder, and pancreas, which make digestive juices and enzymes that help the body digest food and liquids. Also called digestive system.
gastrointestinal tract listen (GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul trakt)
The organs that food and liquids travel through when they are swallowed, digested, absorbed, and leave the body as feces. These organs include the mouth, pharynx (throat), esophagus, stomach, small intestine, large intestine, rectum, and anus. The gastrointestinal tract is part of the digestive system. Also called alimentary tract and digestive tract.
gastroscope listen (GAS-troh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the stomach. A gastroscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
gastroscopy listen (gas-TROS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the stomach using a gastroscope passed through the mouth and esophagus. A gastroscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called upper endoscopy.
gastrostomy tube listen (gas-TROS-toh-mee toob)
A tube inserted through the wall of the abdomen directly into the stomach. It allows air and fluid to leave the stomach and can be used to give drugs and liquids, including liquid food, to the patient. Giving food through a gastrostomy tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called PEG tube and percutaneous endoscopic tube.
gavage listen (guh-VAZH)
A way of giving medicines and liquids, including liquid foods, through a small tube placed through the nose or mouth into the stomach or small intestine. Sometimes the tube is placed into the stomach or small intestine through an incision (cut) made on the outside of the abdomen. Gavage may be added to what a person is able to eat and drink, or it may be the only source of nutrition. It is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called tubefeeding.
Gazyva listen (guh-ZY-vuh)
A drug used with other drugs to treat certain types of follicular lymphoma that have not already been treated. It is also used with bendamustine to treat follicular lymphoma that came back or has not gotten better after treatment with rituximab. Gazyva is also used with chlorambucil to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) that has not already been treated. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gazyva binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Gazyva is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called obinutuzumab.
GBM
A fast-growing type of central nervous system tumor that forms from glial (supportive) tissue of the brain and spinal cord and has cells that look very different from normal cells. GBM usually occurs in adults and affects the brain more often than the spinal cord. Also called glioblastoma, glioblastoma multiforme, and grade IV astrocytoma.
GBS
A rare condition in which the body’s immune system attacks the nerves located outside the brain and spinal cord. Symptoms of GBS include muscle weakness, muscle pain, numbness, and tingling that often begin in the legs or back and may spread to the arms, upper body, and face. Other symptoms may include problems with vision, speech, swallowing, digestion, and bladder control. GBS can get worse quickly and cause paralysis and other serious or life-threatening problems, such as breathing problems and an abnormal blood pressure or heart rate. Most people with GBS get better over time. GBS is a type of autoimmune disease. Also called Guillain-Barré syndrome.
GC1008
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other cancers and conditions. GC1008 binds to a protein called transforming growth factor-beta (TGF-beta), which is found on some cancer cells. GC1008 may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called anti-TGF-beta monoclonal antibody GC1008 and fresolimumab.
GCP
An international set of guidelines that helps make sure that the results of a clinical trial are reliable and that the patients are protected. GCP covers the way a clinical trial is designed, conducted, performed, monitored, audited, recorded, analyzed, and reported. Also called Good Clinical Practice.
G-CSF
A drug used under the brand names Neupogen, Zarxio, and Granix to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is also used under the brand names Neupogen and Zarxio to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer, to treat severe chronic neutropenia, and to prepare the blood for the collection of certain types of blood cells. G-CSF helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called filgrastim and granulocyte colony-stimulating factor.
GCT
A rare tumor that usually forms in bone, but may also form in cartilage, muscle, fat, blood vessels, or other supportive tissue in the body. Most GCTs occur at the ends of the long bones of the arms and legs, near a joint (such as the knee, wrist, hip, or shoulder). Most are benign (not cancer) but some are malignant (cancer). GCTs usually occur in young and middle-aged adults. Also called giant cell tumor.
GDC-0449
A drug used to treat advanced basal cell carcinoma that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after surgery. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. GDC-0449 blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of Hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called Erivedge and vismodegib.
Gd-DTPA
A substance used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to help make clear pictures of the brain, spine, heart, soft tissue of joints, and inside bones. Gd-DTPA is being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. It is a type of contrast agent. Also called gadopentetate dimeglumine and Magnevist.
gefitinib listen (geh-FIH-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated with other anticancer therapy. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gefitinib blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Gefitinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Iressa and ZD1839.
gel electrode listen (jel ee-LEK-trode)
A device that uses a gel to carry an electric current from the skin to a measuring instrument. A sticky patch may hold the gel electrode on the skin so that the electrical activity of the heart or brain can be measured.
Gelclair listen (JEL-klayr)
A gel used to lessen pain from mouth sores caused by chemotherapy or radiation therapy, oral surgery, braces, or disease. Gelclair is being studied in the treatment of pain caused by mouth sores in children receiving cancer treatment. It forms a thin layer over the surface of the mouth and throat to prevent irritation while eating, drinking, and talking. Also called polyvinylpyrrolidone-sodium hyaluronate gel.
geldanamycin analog listen (gel-DA-nuh-MY-sin A-nuh-log)
An antineoplastic antibiotic drug that belongs to the family of drugs called ansamycins.
GEM 231
A drug that may inhibit the growth of malignant tumors.
GEM640
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. GEM640 may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein called XIAP that helps cells live longer. It also makes cancer cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide, and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called AEG35156.
gemcitabine listen (jem-SY-tuh-been)
The active ingredient in a drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of breast, non-small cell lung, ovarian, and pancreatic cancers that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gemcitabine stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite.
gemcitabine hydrochloride listen (jem-SY-tuh-been HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of breast, non-small cell lung, ovarian, and pancreatic cancers that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gemcitabine hydrochloride stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Gemzar.
gemcitabine-cisplatin listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-sis-PLA-tin)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat malignant mesothelioma, advanced non-small cell lung cancer, advanced bladder cancer, advanced cervical cancer, pancreatic cancer, and epithelial ovarian cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and cisplatin. Also called gemcitabine-cisplatin regimen.
gemcitabine-cisplatin regimen listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-sis-PLA-tin REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat malignant mesothelioma, advanced non-small cell lung cancer, advanced bladder cancer, advanced cervical cancer, pancreatic cancer, and epithelial ovarian cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and cisplatin. Also called gemcitabine-cisplatin.
gemcitabine-erlotinib regimen listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-er-LOH-tih-nib REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used for the treatment of locally advanced and metastatic pancreatic cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and erlotinib hydrochloride. Also called gemcitabine-Tarceva regimen.
gemcitabine-oxaliplatin listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-ok-SA-lih-pla-tin)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer and some other types of cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and oxaliplatin. Also called gemcitabine-oxaliplatin regimen and GEMOX.
gemcitabine-oxaliplatin regimen listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-ok-SA-lih-pla-tin REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer and some other types of cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and oxaliplatin. Also called gemcitabine-oxaliplatin and GEMOX.
gemcitabine-Tarceva regimen listen (jem-SY-tuh-been-tar-SEE-vuh REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used for the treatment of locally advanced and metastatic pancreatic cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and erlotinib hydrochloride. Also called gemcitabine-erlotinib regimen.
GEMOX
A chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer and some other types of cancer. It includes the drugs gemcitabine hydrochloride and oxaliplatin. Also called gemcitabine-oxaliplatin and gemcitabine-oxaliplatin regimen.
gemtuzumab ozogamicin listen (gem-TOO-zoo-mab OH-zoh-ga-MIH-sin)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that is CD33 positive (expresses the protein CD33). It is used in patients whose disease is newly diagnosed. It is also used in patients aged 2 years or older whose disease has not gotten better with other treatment or has recurred (come back). Gemtuzumab ozogamicin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to CD33, which is found on some leukemia cells. It also contains a toxic substance, which may help kill cancer cells. Gemtuzumab ozogamicin is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Mylotarg.
Gemzar listen (JEM-zar)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of breast, non-small cell lung, ovarian, and pancreatic cancers that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gemzar stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called gemcitabine hydrochloride.
Genasense listen (JEH-nuh-sents)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein that makes cancer cells live longer and by making them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligodeoxyribonucleotide. Also called augmerosen, bcl-2 antisense oligodeoxynucleotide G3139, and oblimersen sodium.
gene listen (jeen)
The functional and physical unit of heredity passed from parent to offspring. Genes are pieces of DNA, and most genes contain the information for making a specific protein.
gene amplification listen (jeen AM-plih-fih-KAY-shun)
An increase in the number of copies of a gene. There may also be an increase in the RNA and protein made from that gene. Gene amplification is common in cancer cells, and some amplified genes may cause cancer cells to grow or become resistant to anticancer drugs. Genes may also be amplified in the laboratory for research purposes.
gene deletion listen (jeen deh-LEE-shun)
The loss of all or a part of a gene. There may also be a change in the RNA and protein made from that gene. Certain gene deletions are found in cancer and in other genetic diseases and abnormalities.
gene expression listen (jeen ek-SPREH-shun)
The process by which a gene gets turned on in a cell to make RNA and proteins. Gene expression may be measured by looking at the RNA, or the protein made from the RNA, or what the protein does in a cell.
gene expression profile listen (jeen ek-SPREH-shun PROH-file)
A laboratory test that identifies all of the genes in a cell or tissue that are making messenger RNA. Messenger RNA molecules carry the genetic information needed to make proteins. A gene expression profile may be used to find and diagnose a disease or condition or to see how well the body responds to treatment.
gene signature (jeen SIG-nuh-cher)
Information about the activity of a specific group of genes in a cell or tissue. In cancer, gene signatures can show how likely certain types of cancer are to grow and spread in the body or how likely they are to recur (come back). A gene signature may be used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer, plan treatment, find out how well treatment is working, and make a prognosis.
gene therapy listen (jeen THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of experimental treatment in which foreign genetic material (DNA or RNA) is inserted into a person's cells to prevent or fight disease. Gene therapy is being studied in the treatment of certain types of cancer.
gene transfer listen (jeen TRANZ-fer)
The insertion of genetic material into a cell.
gene-modified listen (jeen-MAH-dih-FIDE)
Cells that have been altered to contain different genetic material than they originally contained.
general anesthesia listen (JEH-neh-rul A-nes-THEE-zhuh)
A temporary loss of feeling and a complete loss of awareness that feels like a very deep sleep. It is caused by special drugs or other substances called anesthetics. General anesthesia keeps patients from feeling pain during surgery or other procedures.
general surgery listen (JEH-neh-rul SER-juh-ree)
The branch of surgery that covers the main areas of surgical treatment. General surgeons treat diseases of the abdomen, breast, head and neck, blood vessels, and digestive tract. They also manage care of patients who have been injured or who have deformities or other conditions that need surgery.
generalized anxiety disorder listen (JEH-neh-ruh-lized ang-ZY-eh-tee dis-OR-der)
A condition marked by excessive worry and feelings of fear, dread, and uneasiness that last six months or longer. Other symptoms of generalized anxiety disorder include being restless, being tired or irritable, muscle tension, not being able to concentrate or sleep well, shortness of breath, fast heartbeat, sweating, and dizziness. Also called GAD.
generic listen (jeh-NAYR-ik)
Official nonbrand names by which medicines are known. Generic names usually refer to the chemical name of the drug.
genetic listen (jeh-NEH-tik)
Having to do with genes. Most genes are sequences of DNA that contain information for making specific RNA molecules or proteins that perform important functions in a cell. The information in genes is passed down from parent to child. Sometimes, certain changes in genes can affect a person’s risk of disease, such as cancer. These changes may be inherited or they may occur with age or exposure to environmental factors, such as diet, exercise, drugs, and chemicals.
genetic analysis listen (jeh-NEH-tik uh-NA-lih-sis)
The study of a sample of DNA to look for mutations (changes) that may increase risk of disease or affect the way a person responds to treatment.
genetic counseling listen (jeh-NEH-tik KOWN-suh-ling)
A communication process between a specially trained health professional and a person concerned about the genetic risk of disease. The person's family and personal medical history may be discussed, and counseling may lead to genetic testing.
genetic counselor listen (jeh-NEH-tik KOWN-seh-ler)
A health professional who has special training in medical genetics and counseling. Genetic counselors help patients and families who have, or who may be at risk of, a genetic condition. They help patients find out their chances of having a genetic condition or of having a child or other family member with a genetic condition. They also help patients understand their options for genetic testing, including its risks and benefits. After genetic testing is done, genetic counselors help patients understand their genetic test results, including how the results can affect other family members, and provide counseling and support.
genetic infantile agranulocytosis listen (jeh-NEH-tik IN-fun-TILE ay-GRAN-yoo-loh-sy-TOH-sis)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called congenital neutropenia, infantile genetic agranulocytosis, Kostmann disease, Kostmann neutropenia, and Kostmann syndrome.
genetic marker listen (jeh-NEH-tik MAR-ker)
A specific sequence of DNA at a known location on a chromosome. There are many genetic markers on each chromosome. Genetic markers and genes that are close to each other on a chromosome are usually inherited (passed from parent to child) together. This may help researchers find a gene near a marker that may cause a certain disease or trait within a family. Examples of genetic markers are single polymorphism nucleotides (SNPs) and microsatellites.
genetic marker of susceptibility listen (jeh-NEH-tik MAR-ker … suh-SEP-tih-BIH-lih-tee)
A specific change in a person’s DNA that makes the person more likely to develop certain diseases such as cancer.
genetic predisposition listen (jeh-NEH-tik PREE-dih-spuh-ZIH-shun)
An inherited increase in the risk of developing a disease. Also called genetic susceptibility.
genetic profile listen (jeh-NEH-tik PROH-file)
Information about specific genes, including variations and gene expression, in an individual or in a certain type of tissue. A genetic profile may be used to help diagnose a disease or learn how the disease may progress or respond to treatment with drugs or radiation.
genetic susceptibility listen (jeh-NEH-tik suh-SEP-tih-BIH-lih-tee)
An inherited increase in the risk of developing a disease. Also called genetic predisposition.
genetic testing listen (jeh-NEH-tik TES-ting)
The process of analyzing cells or tissues to look for genetic changes that may be a sign of a disease or condition, such as cancer. These changes may be a sign that a person has an increased risk of developing a specific disease or condition. Genetic testing may also be done on tumor tissue to help diagnose cancer, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working.
geneticist listen (jeh-NEH-tih-sist)
A scientist who has special training in the study of genes and heredity (the passing of genetic information from parents to their children). A medical geneticist is a doctor who specializes in diagnosing and treating genetic disorders or conditions. Medical geneticists also counsel individuals and families at risk for certain genetic disorders or cancers.
genetics listen (jeh-NEH-tix)
The study of genes and heredity. Heredity is the passing of genetic information and traits (such as eye color and an increased chance of getting a certain disease) from parents to offspring.
genistein listen (jeh-NIS-teen)
An isoflavone found in soy products. Soy isoflavones are being studied to see if they help prevent cancer.
genital listen (JEH-nih-tul)
Refers to the genitalia (external and internal sex organs and glands).
genital wart listen (JEH-nih-tul wort)
A raised growth on the surface of the genitals caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) infection. The HPV in genital warts is very contagious and can be spread by skin-to-skin contact, usually during oral, anal, or genital sex with an infected partner. Also called condyloma.
genitourinary system listen (jeh-nih-toh-YOOR-ih-nayr-ee SIS-tem)
The parts of the body that play a role in reproduction, getting rid of waste products in the form of urine, or both.
genome listen (JEE-nome)
The complete set of DNA (genetic material) in an organism. In people, almost every cell in the body contains a complete copy of the genome. The genome contains all of the information needed for a person to develop and grow. Studying the genome may help researchers understand how different types of cancer form and respond to treatment. This may lead to new ways to diagnose, treat, and prevent cancer.
genome-wide association study listen (JEE-nome ... uh-SOH-see-AY-shun STUH-dee)
A study that compares DNA markers across the genome (the complete genetic material in a person) in people with a disease or trait to people without the disease or trait. These studies may uncover clues to help prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. Also called GWAS.
genomic characterization listen (jeh-NOH-mik KAYR-ik-ter-rih-ZAY-shun)
A laboratory method that is used to learn about all the genes in a person or in a specific cell type, and the way those genes interact with each other and with the environment. Genomic characterization may be used to find out why some people get certain diseases while others do not, or why people react in different ways to the same drug. It may also be used to help develop new ways to diagnose, treat, and prevent diseases, such as cancer. Also called genomic profiling.
genomic profiling listen (jeh-NOH-mik PROH-fy-ling)
A laboratory method that is used to learn about all the genes in a person or in a specific cell type, and the way those genes interact with each other and with the environment. Genomic profiling may be used to find out why some people get certain diseases while others do not, or why people react in different ways to the same drug. It may also be used to help develop new ways to diagnose, treat, and prevent diseases, such as cancer. Also called genomic characterization.
genomic sequencing listen (jeh-NOH-mik SEE-kwen-sing)
A laboratory method that is used to determine the entire genetic makeup of a specific organism or cell type. This method can be used to find changes in areas of the genome. These changes may help scientists understand how specific diseases, such as cancer, form. Results of genomic sequencing may also be used to diagnose and treat disease.
genomics listen (jeh-NOH-mix)
The study of the complete set of DNA (including all of its genes) in a person or other organism. Almost every cell in a person’s body contains a complete copy of the genome. The genome contains all the information needed for a person to develop and grow. Studying the genome may help researchers understand how genes interact with each other and with the environment and how certain diseases, such as cancer, diabetes, and heart disease, form. This may lead to new ways to diagnose, treat, and prevent disease.
GEP-NET
A rare type of tumor that can form in the pancreas or in other parts of the gastrointestinal tract, including the stomach, small intestine, colon, rectum, and appendix. GEP-NETs usually form in cells that secrete hormones. Some of these tumors make extra amounts of hormones and other substances that may cause signs and symptoms of disease, including a condition called carcinoid syndrome. GEP-NETs may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They are sometimes called carcinoid tumors or islet cell tumors. Also called gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumor.
geranium listen (jeh-RAY-nee-um)
A type of plant that is native to southern Africa and has white, pink, purple, or red flowers and 3- to 5-lobed leaves. An essential oil that smells like roses is taken from the leaves and used in perfume, in mosquito repellants, and in aromatherapy to treat skin problems and to reduce stress. The scientific name is Pelargonium graveolens. Also called pelargonium.
germ listen (jerm)
A bacterium, virus, or other microorganism that can cause infection and disease.
germ cell listen (jerm sel)
A reproductive cell of the body. Germ cells are egg cells in females and sperm cells in males.
germ cell tumor listen (jerm sel TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that begins in the cells that give rise to sperm or eggs. Germ cell tumors can occur almost anywhere in the body and can be either benign or malignant.
German chamomile listen (JER-mun KA-muh-mile)
A plant whose daisy-like flowers are used in tea to calm and relax, improve sleep, and help stomach problems. German chamomile has been studied in the prevention of mucositis (mouth sores) caused by chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It has also been used in some cultures to treat skin conditions, mild infections, and other disorders. The scientific name is Matricaria recutita.
German Commission E listen (JER-mun kuh-MIH-shun …)
The German Federal Institute for Drugs and Medical Devices Commission E. A committee made up of scientists, toxicologists, doctors, and pharmacists formed by the German government in 1978 to find out if herbs sold in Germany are safe and effective. The Commission has published information on the uses, side effects, and drug interactions of more than 300 herbs.
germfree listen (JERM-free)
Free of bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms that can cause infection and disease.
germicide listen (JER-mih-side)
Any substance or process that kills germs (bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms that can cause infection and disease). Also called microbicide.
germline DNA listen (JERM-line ...)
The DNA in germ cells (egg and sperm cells that join to form an embryo). Germline DNA is the source of DNA for all other cells in the body. Also called constitutional DNA.
germline mutation listen (JERM-line myoo-TAY-shun)
A gene change in a body's reproductive cell (egg or sperm) that becomes incorporated into the DNA of every cell in the body of the offspring. Germline mutations are passed on from parents to offspring. Also called hereditary mutation.
Gerota's capsule listen (gay-ROH-tuz KAP-sul)
A fibrous envelope of tissue that surrounds the kidney. Also called Gerota's fascia and renal fascia.
Gerota's fascia listen (gay-ROH-tuz FA-shuh)
A fibrous envelope of tissue that surrounds the kidney. Also called Gerota's capsule and renal fascia.
Gerson therapy listen (GER-sun THAYR-uh-pee)
A diet plan that has been claimed to be a treatment for cancer, migraine, tuberculosis, and other diseases. It is a vegetarian diet that includes eating organic fruits and vegetables and 13 glasses of fresh juice each day. It also includes supplements with iodine, vitamin B-12, potassium, thyroid hormone, liver extract, and pancreatic enzymes. No clinical trial to test Gerson therapy has been reported.
gestational carrier listen (jeh-STAY-shuh-nul KAYR-ee-er)
A woman who carries and gives birth to a baby for a person who is not able to have children. Eggs from an egg donor are fertilized in the laboratory with sperm from a sperm donor to make an embryo. The embryo is implanted in the uterus of the gestational carrier, who carries the baby until birth. The gestational carrier is not genetically related to the baby and is not the biological mother. Also called gestational surrogate.
gestational surrogate listen (jeh-STAY-shuh-nul SER-uh-gut)
A woman who carries and gives birth to a baby for a person who is not able to have children. Eggs from an egg donor are fertilized in the laboratory with sperm from a sperm donor to make an embryo. The embryo is implanted in the uterus of the gestational surrogate, who carries the baby until birth. The gestational surrogate is not genetically related to the baby and is not the biological mother. Also called gestational carrier.
gestational trophoblastic disease listen (jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik dih-ZEEZ)
A rare condition in which abnormal cells grow inside the uterus from tissue that forms after conception (the joining of sperm and egg). This tissue is made of trophoblastic cells, which normally surround the fertilized egg in the uterus and help connect the fertilized egg to the wall of the uterus. These cells also form part of the placenta (the organ that passes nutrients from the mother to the fetus). Most gestational trophoblastic diseases are benign (not cancer) and do not spread, but some types are malignant (cancer) and spread to nearby tissues or other parts of the body. The two main types of gestational trophoblastic diseases are hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. Also called gestational trophoblastic tumor, GTD, and GTT.
gestational trophoblastic tumor listen (jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik TOO-mer)
A rare condition in which abnormal cells grow inside the uterus from tissue that forms after conception (the joining of sperm and egg). This tissue is made of trophoblastic cells, which normally surround the fertilized egg in the uterus and help connect the fertilized egg to the wall of the uterus. These cells also form part of the placenta (the organ that passes nutrients from the mother to the fetus). Most gestational trophoblastic tumors are benign (not cancer) and do not spread, but some types are malignant (cancer) and spread to nearby tissues or other parts of the body. The two main types of gestational trophoblastic tumors are hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. Also called gestational trophoblastic disease, GTD, and GTT.
gFOBT
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. Small samples of stool are placed on special cards coated with a chemical substance called guaiac and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. A testing solution is put on the cards and the guaiac causes the stool sample to change color. If there is blood in the stool, the color changes very quickly. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called guaiac fecal occult blood test, guaiac smear test, and stool guaiac test.
GG745
A drug used to treat symptoms of an enlarged prostate gland. It is being studied in the treatment of male hair loss and prostate cancer. GG745 blocks enzymes the body needs to make male sex hormones. It is a type of 5-alpha reductase inhibitor. Also called Avodart and dutasteride.
GI
Refers to the stomach and intestines. Also called gastrointestinal.
GI14721
An antitumor drug that belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors. It is a camptothecin analog.
giant cell fibroblastoma listen (JY-unt sel FY-broh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare type of soft tissue tumor marked by painless nodules in the dermis (the inner layer of the two main layers of tissue that make up the skin) and subcutaneous (beneath the skin) tissue. These tumors may come back after surgery, but they do not spread to other parts of the body. They occur mostly in boys and are related to dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans.
giant cell tumor listen (JY-unt sel TOO-mer)
A rare tumor that usually forms in bone, but may also form in cartilage, muscle, fat, blood vessels, or other supportive tissue in the body. Most giant cell tumors occur at the ends of the long bones of the arms and legs, near a joint (such as the knee, wrist, hip, or shoulder). Most are benign (not cancer) but some are malignant (cancer). Giant cell tumors usually occur in young and middle-aged adults. Also called GCT.
giant hypertrophic gastritis listen (JY-unt hy-per-TROH-fik gas-TRY-tis)
A condition marked by inflammation and ulcers (breaks on the skin or on the surface of an organ) of the mucosa (inner lining) of the stomach and by overgrowth of the cells that make up the mucosa. Symptoms include vomiting, diarrhea, and weight loss. Patients with giant hypertrophic gastritis may be at a higher risk of stomach cancer. Also called gastric mucosal hypertrophy and Ménétrier disease.
giant lymph node hyperplasia listen (JY-unt limf node HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A rare disorder in which benign (not cancer) growths form in lymph node tissue. There are two main ways that giant lymph node hyperplasia occurs: localized (unicentric) and multicentric. Unicentric giant lymph node hyperplasia affects only one group of lymph nodes in one part of the body, usually in the chest or abdomen. It may not cause symptoms. Multicentric giant lymph node hyperplasia affects many groups of lymph nodes and lymphoid tissue all through the body. It can weaken the immune system and cause problems such as infection, fever, weight loss, fatigue, night sweats, nerve damage, and anemia. People with giant lymph node hyperplasia have an increased risk of lymphoma. Also called angiofollicular lymph node hyperplasia and Castleman disease.
gigantism listen (jy-GAN-tih-zum)
A condition in which the whole body or any of its parts grow much larger than normal.
Gilotrif listen (JEE-loh-trif)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also used to treat squamous cell NSCLC that has spread to other parts of the body and got worse after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gilotrif blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Gilotrif is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called afatinib dimaleate.
gilteritinib fumarate listen (GIL-teh-RIH-tih-nib FYOO-muh-rayt)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia that came back or did not get better with other treatment. It is used in adults whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gilteritinib fumarate blocks certain proteins made by the mutated FLT3 gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Xospata.
gimatecan listen (jih-muh-TEE-kan)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors. Also called ST1481.
ginger listen (JIN-jer)
An herb with a root that has been used in cooking, and by some cultures to treat nausea, vomiting, and certain other medical conditions. It is being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by cancer chemotherapy. The scientific name is Zingiber officianale.
gingiva listen (JIN-jih-vuh)
The tissue of the upper and lower jaws that surrounds the base of the teeth. Also called gums.
ginkgo listen (GING-koh)
A tree native to China. Substances taken from the leaves and seeds have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Ginkgo has been studied in the prevention and treatment of Alzheimer disease, dementia, certain blood vessel diseases, and memory loss. It may cause bleeding or high blood pressure when used with certain drugs. Also called ginkgo biloba and maidenhair tree.
ginkgo biloba listen (GING-koh by-LOH-buh)
A tree native to China. Substances taken from the leaves and seeds have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Ginkgo biloba has been studied in the prevention and treatment of Alzheimer disease, dementia, certain blood vessel diseases, and memory loss. It may cause bleeding or high blood pressure when used with certain drugs. Also called ginkgo and maidenhair tree.
ginseng listen (JIN-seng)
An herb with a root that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects.
GIST listen
A type of tumor that usually begins in cells in the wall of the gastrointestinal tract. It can be benign or malignant. Also called gastrointestinal stromal tumor.
gland listen (gland)
An organ that makes one or more substances, such as hormones, digestive juices, sweat, tears, saliva, or milk. Endocrine glands release the substances directly into the bloodstream. Exocrine glands release the substances into a duct or opening to the inside or outside of the body.
gland of Lieberkuhn listen (... LEE-ber-keen)
Tube-like gland found in the lining of the colon and rectum. Glands of Lieberkuhn renew the lining of the intestine and make mucus. Also called colon crypt.
glandular cell of the cervix listen (GLAN-juh-ler sel … SER-vix)
A type of cell that makes mucus and is found in tissue that lines the inner part of the cervix. Abnormal glandular cells may be found in Pap tests and may be a sign of cancer or other serious condition.
glans penis listen (glanz PEE-nis)
The rounded, gland-like head of the penis.
glasdegib maleate listen (glas-DEH-gib MAY-lee-AYT)
A drug used with low-dose cytarabine to treat acute myeloid leukemia that is newly diagnosed. It is used in patients who are 75 years and older or in patients who cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Glasdegib maleate blocks a type of protein involved in cell growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called Daurismo.
glaucoma listen (glaw-KOH-muh)
A condition in which there is a build-up of fluid in the eye, which presses on the retina and the optic nerve. The retina is the layer of nerve tissue inside the eye that senses light and sends images along the optic nerve to the brain. Glaucoma can damage the optic nerve and cause loss of vision or blindness.
Gleason score listen (GLEE-sun...)
A way of describing prostate cancer based on how abnormal the cancer cells in a biopsy sample look under a microscope and how quickly they are likely to grow and spread. Most prostate cancers contain cells that are different grades. The Gleason score is calculated by adding together the two grades of cancer cells that make up the largest areas of the biopsied tissue sample. The Gleason score usually ranges from 6 to 10. The lower the Gleason score, the more the cancer cells look like normal cells and are likely to grow and spread slowly. The Gleason score is used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis (outcome).
Gleevec listen (GLEE-vek)
A drug used to treat certain types of leukemia and other blood cancers. It is also used to treat gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST), skin tumors called dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans, and a rare condition called systemic mastocytosis. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gleevec blocks the protein made by the BCR-ABL oncogene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Gleevec is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called imatinib mesylate and STI571.
Gleolan listen (GLEE-oh-lan)
A drug used during surgery to help find certain types of brain tumors. When Gleolan is taken up by cancer cells and then exposed to certain types of light, it becomes active and may make the cancer cells easier to see. Gleolan contains the active ingredient aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride. It is a type of imaging agent and a type of photosensitizing agent.
Gleostine listen (GLEE-oh-steen)
A drug used to treat brain tumors that have already been treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma that has not gotten better with other types of treatment or has come back. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Gleostine damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called CCNU and lomustine.
Gliadel Wafer listen (GLY-uh-del WAY-fer)
A drug used with surgery and radiation therapy to treat malignant glioma that is high grade and has not already been treated. It is also used with surgery to treat glioblastoma multiforme that has recurred (come back). Gliadel Wafer is a form of carmustine contained in a wafer. The wafer has a coating that dissolves slowly and releases carmustine directly into the area where the brain tumor was removed. This form may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of carmustine. Gliadel Wafer is a type of alkylating agent. Also called carmustine implant and polifeprosan 20 carmustine implant.
glial cell listen (GLEE-ul sel)
Any of the cells that hold nerve cells in place and help them work the way they should. The types of glial cells include oligodendrocytes, astrocytes, microglia, and ependymal cells. Also called neuroglia.
glial tumor listen (GLEE-ul TOO-mer)
A general term for tumors of the central nervous system, including astrocytomas, ependymal tumors, glioblastoma multiforme, and primitive neuroectodermal tumors.
glioblastoma listen (GLEE-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A fast-growing type of central nervous system tumor that forms from glial (supportive) tissue of the brain and spinal cord and has cells that look very different from normal cells. Glioblastoma usually occurs in adults and affects the brain more often than the spinal cord. Also called GBM, glioblastoma multiforme, and grade IV astrocytoma.
glioblastoma multiforme listen (GLEE-oh-blas-TOH-muh MUL-tih-form)
A fast-growing type of central nervous system tumor that forms from glial (supportive) tissue of the brain and spinal cord and has cells that look very different from normal cells. Glioblastoma multiforme usually occurs in adults and affects the brain more often than the spinal cord. Also called GBM, glioblastoma, and grade IV astrocytoma.
glioma listen (glee-OH-muh)
A cancer of the brain that begins in glial cells (cells that surround and support nerve cells).
gliosarcoma listen (GLEE-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of glioma (cancer of the brain that comes from glial, or supportive, cells).
glossectomy listen (glah-SEK-toh-mee)
Surgical removal of all or part of the tongue.
glottis listen (GLAH-tis)
The middle part of the larynx; the area where the vocal cords are located.
glucagon listen (GLOO-kuh-gon)
A hormone produced by the pancreas that increases the level of glucose (sugar) in the blood.
glucagonoma listen (GLOO-kuh-guh-NOH-muh)
A rare pancreatic tumor that produces a hormone called glucagon. Glucagonomas can produce symptoms similar to diabetes.
glucarpidase listen (gloo-KAR-pih-dayz)
A drug used to treat toxic levels of methotrexate (an anticancer drug) in the blood of patients with kidney problems. It is a bacterial enzyme that breaks down proteins and other substances, such as methotrexate. Glucarpidase may also help certain drugs kill cancer cells. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of prodrug activator. Also called carboxypeptidase-G2 and Voraxaze.
glucocorticoid listen (GLOO-koh-KOR-tih-koyd)
A compound that belongs to the family of compounds called corticosteroids (steroids). Glucocorticoids affect metabolism and have anti-inflammatory and immunosuppressive effects. They may be naturally produced (hormones) or synthetic (drugs).
gluconeogenesis listen (GLOO-koh-NEE-oh-JEH-neh-sis)
The process of making glucose (sugar) from its own breakdown products or from the breakdown products of lipids (fats) or proteins. Gluconeogenesis occurs mainly in cells of the liver or kidney.
Glucophage listen (GLOO-koh-fayj)
A drug used to treat diabetes mellitus (a condition in which the body cannot control the level of sugar in the blood ). It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It decreases the amount of glucose (a type of sugar) released into the bloodstream from the liver and increases the body’s use of the glucose. Glucophage is a type of antidiabetic agent. Also called metformin hydrochloride.
glucose listen (GLOO-kose)
A type of sugar; the chief source of energy for living organisms.
glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency listen (GLOO-kose-6-FOS-fayt dee-hy-DRAH-jeh-nays deh-FIH-shun-see)
An inherited disorder in which a person doesn’t have enough of an enzyme called G6PD that helps red blood cells work the way they should. In glucose-6-phosphate dehydrogenase deficiency, the red blood cells break down when the body is exposed to infection, severe stress, or certain drugs, chemicals, or foods. This may lead to a condition called hemolytic anemia. This disorder is most common in African-American men and in men of Middle Eastern or Mediterranean descent. Also called G6PD deficiency.
glucuronic acid listen (GLOO-kyoo-RAH-nik A-sid)
A form of a type of sugar called glucose that helps remove harmful substances from the body. Glucuronic acid and the harmful substance combine in the liver and then are passed in the urine. Glucuronic acid is also found in other substances in the body, such as cartilage and synovial fluid (fluid found in the joints).
glufosfamide listen (GLOO-FOS-fuh-mide)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
glutamic acid listen (gloo-TA-mik A-sid)
One of twenty amino acids (molecules that join together to form proteins). Glutamic acid may help nerve cells send and receive information from other cells. It is being studied for its ability to decrease or prevent nerve damage caused by anticancer drugs. Also called L-glutamic acid.
glutamine listen (GLOO-tuh-meen)
An amino acid used in nutrition therapy. It is also being studied for the treatment of diarrhea caused by radiation therapy to the pelvis.
glutathione listen (GLOO-tuh-THY-one)
A substance found in plant and animal tissues that has many functions in a cell. These include activating certain enzymes and destroying toxic compounds and chemicals that contain oxygen.
glutathione S-transferase listen (GLOO-tuh-THY-one ... TRANZ-feh-rays)
A family of enzymes involved in metabolism and in making toxic compounds less harmful to the body.
glycan listen (GLY-kan)
A large carbohydrate molecule. It contains many small sugar molecules that are joined chemically. Also called polysaccharide.
glycan analysis listen (GLY-kan uh-NA-lih-sis)
A study of the types of carbohydrate (sugar) molecules attached to proteins in cells. Proteins with carbohydrate molecules are called glycoproteins. Glycan analysis is being studied to find out if glycoproteins on cancer cells may be used as biomarkers for cancer.
glycemia listen (gly-SEE-mee-uh)
Glucose (a type of sugar) found in the blood. Also called blood sugar.
glycemic index listen (gly-SEE-mik IN-dex)
A measure of the increase in the level of blood glucose (a type of sugar) caused by eating a specific carbohydrate (food that contains sugar) compared with eating a standard amount of glucose. Foods with a high glycemic index release glucose quickly and cause a rapid rise in blood glucose. Foods with a low glycemic index release glucose slowly into the blood. A relationship between the glycemic index and recurrent colorectal cancer is being studied.
glycinamide ribonucleotide formyltransferase inhibitor listen (gly-SIH-nuh-mide RY-boh-NOO-klee-oh-tide FOR-mil-TRANZ-feh-rays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that blocks DNA synthesis and may prevent tumor growth. It is being studied as a treatment for cancer.
Glycine max listen (GLY-seen ...)
A product from a plant of Asian origin that produces beans used in many food products. Glycine max contains isoflavones (estrogen-like substances) that are being studied for the prevention of cancer, hot flashes that occur with menopause, and osteoporosis (loss of bone density). Glycine max in the diet may lower cholesterol levels and reduce the risk of heart disease. Also called soy, soya, and soybean.
glycogen storage disease listen (GLY-koh-jen STOR-ij dih-ZEEZ)
A type of inherited disorder in which there are problems with how a form of glucose (sugar) called glycogen is stored and used in the body. Certain enzymes that help make or break down glycogen are missing or do not work the way they should. This causes abnormal amounts or types of glycogen in the tissues, especially in the liver and in muscle tissue. There are many types of glycogen storage disease, which can cause problems in different parts of the body, including the liver, muscles, kidneys, and heart. Also called GSD.
glycolic acid listen (gly-KAH-lik A-sid)
A substance found in some fruits, sugar beets, and sugar cane. It is used in skin care products to reduce wrinkles and soften the skin. It is a type of alpha hydroxyl acid.
glycolysis listen (gly-KAH-lih-sis)
A process in which glucose (sugar) is partially broken down by cells in enzyme reactions that do not need oxygen. Glycolysis is one method that cells use to produce energy. When glycolysis is linked with other enzyme reactions that use oxygen, more complete breakdown of glucose is possible and more energy is produced.
glycopeptide listen (gly-koh-PEP-tide)
A short chain of amino acids (the building blocks of proteins) that has sugar molecules attached to it. Some glycopeptides have been studied for their ability to stimulate the immune system.
glycoprotein listen (gly-koh-PROH-teen)
A protein that has sugar molecules attached to it.
glycoprotein 100 listen (gly-koh-PROH-teen …)
gp100. A tumor-specific antigen used in the development of cancer vaccines. Also called gp100.
glycosaminoglycan listen (GLY-koh-suh-MEE-noh-GLY-kan)
A type of long, unbranched polysaccharide molecule. Glycosaminoglycans are major structural components of cartilage and are also found in the cornea of the eye.
GM2-KLH vaccine listen (... vak-SEEN)
A substance used to stimulate the production of antibodies that fight certain cancer cells.
GM-CSF
A substance that helps make more white blood cells, especially granulocytes, macrophages, and cells that become platelets. It is a cytokine that is a type of hematopoietic (blood-forming) agent. Also called granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor and sargramostim.
GM-CSF-secreting breast tumor vaccine listen (… seh-KREE-ting brest TOO-mer vak-SEEN)
A vaccine that is being studied as a way to help the body’s immune system kill breast cancer cells. To make the vaccine, the GM-CSF gene is put into breast cancer cells in the laboratory. The cells are then treated with radiation to stop them from growing and injected into the same or a different patient. The GM-CSF protein made by the changed breast cancer cells may help the immune system kill breast cancer cells in the body.
GnRH
A hormone made by a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. GnRH causes the pituitary gland in the brain to make and secrete the hormones luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH). In men, these hormones cause the testicles to make testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to make estrogen and progesterone. Also called gonadotropin-releasing hormone, LH-RH, LHRH, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone.
GnRH agonist listen (… A-guh-nist)
A substance that keeps the testicles and ovaries from making sex hormones by blocking other hormones that are needed to make them. In men, GnRH agonists cause the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some GnRH agonists are used to treat prostate cancer. Also called GnRHa, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist, LHRH agonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonist.
GnRH antagonist listen (… an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that blocks the pituitary gland from making hormones called follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). In men, this causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, this causes the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some GnRH antagonists are used to treat advanced prostate cancer. They are also used to treat certain gynecologic conditions and are being studied in the treatment of hormone-sensitive breast cancer. Also called gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonist, LHRH antagonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonist.
GnRHa
A substance that keeps the testicles and ovaries from making sex hormones by blocking other hormones that are needed to make them. In men, GnRHas cause the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some GnRHas are used to treat prostate cancer. Also called GnRH agonist, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist, LHRH agonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonist.
goiter listen (GOY-ter)
An enlarged thyroid. It may be caused by too little iodine in the diet or by other conditions. Most goiters are not cancer.
gold fiducial marker seeds listen (… fih-DOO-shul MAR-ker …)
Tiny, gold seeds, about the size of a grain of rice, that are put in and/or around a tumor to show exactly where it is in the body. Doctors are then able to target the tumor directly and give higher doses of radiation with less harm to nearby healthy tissue. Also called gold fiducial markers, gold seeds, and gold-seed fiducial markers.
gold fiducial markers listen (… fih-DOO-shul MAR-kers)
Tiny, gold seeds, about the size of a grain of rice, that are put in and/or around a tumor to show exactly where it is in the body. Doctors are then able to target the tumor directly and give higher doses of radiation with less harm to nearby healthy tissue. Also called gold fiducial marker seeds, gold seeds, and gold-seed fiducial markers.
gold seeds listen (gold seeds)
Tiny, gold seeds, about the size of a grain of rice, that are put in and/or around a tumor to show exactly where it is in the body. Doctors are then able to target the tumor directly and give higher doses of radiation with less harm to nearby healthy tissue. Also called gold fiducial marker seeds, gold fiducial markers, and gold-seed fiducial markers.
gold therapy listen (… THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses gold salts (a salt form of the metal element gold) to treat diseases, such as rheumatoid arthritis. The gold salts stop cells from releasing chemicals that can harm tissues. Also called aurotherapy and chrysotherapy.
gold-seed fiducial markers listen (… fih-DOO-shul MAR-kers)
Tiny, gold seeds, about the size of a grain of rice, that are put in and/or around a tumor to show exactly where it is in the body. Doctors are then able to target the tumor directly and give higher doses of radiation with less harm to nearby healthy tissue. Also called gold fiducial marker seeds, gold fiducial markers, and gold seeds.
Golgi apparatus listen (GOL-jee A-puh-RA-tus)
A stack of small flat sacs formed by membranes inside the cell’s cytoplasm (gel-like fluid). The Golgi apparatus prepares proteins and lipid (fat) molecules for use in other places inside and outside the cell. The Golgi apparatus is a cell organelle. Also called Golgi body and Golgi complex.
Golgi body listen (GOL-jee BAH-dee)
A stack of small flat sacs formed by membranes inside the cell’s cytoplasm (gel-like fluid). The Golgi body prepares proteins and lipid (fat) molecules for use in other places inside and outside the cell. The Golgi body is a cell organelle. Also called Golgi apparatus and Golgi complex.
Golgi complex listen (GOL-jee KOM-plex)
A stack of small flat sacs formed by membranes inside the cell’s cytoplasm (gel-like fluid). The Golgi complex prepares proteins and lipid (fat) molecules for use in other places inside and outside the cell. The Golgi complex is a cell organelle. Also called Golgi apparatus and Golgi body.
gonad listen (GOH-nad)
The part of the reproductive system that produces and releases eggs (ovary) or sperm (testicle/testis).
gonadal dysgenesis listen (goh-NA-dul dis-JEH-neh-sis)
Abnormal development of a gonad (ovary or testicle). Men with gonadal dysgenesis have a greater risk of developing testicular cancer. Gonadal dysgenesis is usually part of a genetic syndrome.
gonadal shielding listen (goh-NA-dul SHEEL-ding)
A procedure used to help keep a person fertile by preventing damage to reproductive organs during radiation therapy. A protective shield is placed on the outside of the body to cover the area of the gonads (the testicles or ovaries) and other parts of the reproductive system during radiation therapy. For males, this would also include the prostate and penis. For females, it would also include the fallopian tubes, uterus, cervix, and vagina. Gonadal shielding is a type of fertility preservation.
gonadoblastoma listen (goh-NA-doh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare tumor that is made up of more than one type of cell found in the gonads (testicles and ovaries), including germ cells, stromal cells, and granulosa cells. Gonadoblastomas are usually benign (not cancer), but they may sometimes become malignant (cancer) if not treated. Most patients with gonadoblastoma have certain chromosome abnormalities and abnormal gonads. Gonadoblastomas occur most often in children and young adults.
gonadotropin-releasing hormone listen (goh-NA-doh-TROH-pin-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone)
A hormone made by a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. Gonadotropin-releasing hormone causes the pituitary gland in the brain to make and secrete the hormones luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH). In men, these hormones cause the testicles to make testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to make estrogen and progesterone. Also called GnRH, LH-RH, LHRH, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone.
gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist listen (goh-NA-doh-TROH-pin-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone A-guh-nist)
A substance that keeps the testicles and ovaries from making sex hormones by blocking other hormones that are needed to make them. In men, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonists cause the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonists are used to treat prostate cancer. Also called GnRH agonist, GnRHa, LHRH agonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonist.
gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonist listen (goh-NA-doh-TROH-pin-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that blocks the pituitary gland from making hormones called follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). In men, this causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, this causes the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonists are used to treat advanced prostate cancer. They are also used to treat certain gynecologic conditions and are being studied in the treatment of hormone-sensitive breast cancer. Also called GnRH antagonist, LHRH antagonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonist.
gonioscopy listen (GOH-nee-OS-koh-pee)
A procedure in which a gonioscope (special lens) is used to look at the front part of the eye between the cornea (the clear layer) and the iris (the colored part of the eye). Gonioscopy checks for blockages in the area where fluid drains out of the eye.
Gonzalez regimen listen (gun-ZAH-les REH-jih-men)
An alternative therapy that is being studied as a treatment for pancreatic cancer. It includes a special diet, nutritional supplements, pancreatic enzymes, and coffee enemas.
Good Clinical Practice listen (… KLIH-nih-kul PRAK-tis)
An international set of guidelines that helps make sure that the results of a clinical trial are reliable and that the patients are protected. Good Clinical Practice covers the way a clinical trial is designed, conducted, performed, monitored, audited, recorded, analyzed, and reported. Also called GCP.
Gorlin syndrome listen (GOR-lin SIN-drome)
A genetic condition that causes unusual facial features and disorders of the skin, bones, nervous system, eyes, and endocrine glands. People with this syndrome have a higher risk of basal cell carcinoma. Also called basal cell nevus syndrome and nevoid basal cell carcinoma syndrome.
goserelin acetate listen (GOH-seh-REH-lin A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer and to relieve the symptoms of advanced breast cancer. It is also used to treat problems with the endometrium (lining of the uterus). Goserelin acetate keeps the body from making the hormones luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone (LHRH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). This causes the testicles to stop making testosterone (a male hormone) in men, and the ovaries to stop making estradiol (a form of the hormone estrogen) in women. Goserelin acetate may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone or estrogen to grow. It is a type of LHRH agonist. Also called ZDX and Zoladex.
gossypol acetic acid listen (GAH-sih-pole uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It is a form of a chemical taken from the seed of the cotton plant (Gossypium). It blocks the growth of cells and may kill cancer cells. Gossypol acetic acid may also act as a male contraceptive (form of birth control).
gout listen (gowt)
A condition marked by increased levels of uric acid in the blood, joints, and tissue. The buildup of uric acid in the joints and tissues causes arthritis and inflammation.
gp100
A tumor-specific antigen used in the development of cancer vaccines. Also called glycoprotein 100.
gp209-2M
A peptide (short piece of protein) made from the tumor-specific antigen gp100, and used to make vaccines being studied in the treatment of melanoma.
gp96 heat shock protein-peptide complex vaccine listen (… PROH-teen-PEP-tide KOM-plex vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made from a patient’s tumor cells that may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. This vaccine is used to treat kidney cancer, a type of brain cancer called glioma, and metastatic melanoma (a type of skin cancer that has spread). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called gp96 HSP-peptide complex, Oncophage, and vitespen.
gp96 HSP-peptide complex listen (… PEP-tide KOM-plex)
A vaccine made from a patient’s tumor cells that may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. This vaccine is used to treat kidney cancer, a type of brain cancer called glioma, and metastatic melanoma (a type of skin cancer that has spread). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called gp96 heat shock protein-peptide complex vaccine, Oncophage, and vitespen.
GPX-100
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antitumor antibiotics. It is an anthracycline.
grade listen (grayd)
In cancer, a description of a tumor based on how abnormal the cancer cells and tissue look under a microscope and how quickly the cancer cells are likely to grow and spread. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells and tend to grow and spread more slowly than high-grade cancer cells. Grading systems are different for each type of cancer. They are used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis. Also called histologic grade and tumor grade.
grade 1 follicular lymphoma listen (... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by enlarged lymph nodes and small cells that have cleaved (u-shaped) nuclei.
grade 2 follicular lymphoma listen (... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by enlarged lymph nodes and a mix of large cells and small cells that have cleaved (u-shaped) nuclei.
grade 3 follicular lymphoma listen (... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler lim-FOH-muh)
A type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by large cells and enlarged lymph nodes. Grade 3 follicular lymphoma is less common, and more aggressive than grades 1 or 2 follicular lymphoma.
Grade Group listen (grayd groop)
A way of describing prostate cancer based on how abnormal the cancer cells in a biopsy sample look under a microscope and how quickly they are likely to grow and spread. It is based on the Gleason score, which is another type of prostate cancer grading system. Grade Group scores range from 1 to 5. The lower the Grade Group score, the more the cancer cells look like normal cells and are likely to grow and spread slowly. The Grade Group system is used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis (outcome).
grade IV astrocytoma listen (... AS-troh-sy-TOH-muh)
A fast-growing type of central nervous system tumor that forms from glial (supportive) tissue of the brain and spinal cord and has cells that look very different from normal cells. Grade IV astrocytoma usually occurs in adults and affects the brain more often than the spinal cord. Also called GBM, glioblastoma, and glioblastoma multiforme.
grading listen (GRAY-ding)
A system for classifying cancer cells in terms of how abnormal they appear when examined under a microscope. The objective of a grading system is to provide information about the probable growth rate of the tumor and its tendency to spread. The systems used to grade tumors vary with each type of cancer. Grading plays a role in treatment decisions.
graft listen (graft)
Healthy skin, bone, or other tissue taken from one part of the body and used to replace diseased or injured tissue removed from another part of the body.
graft-versus-host disease listen (... dih-ZEEZ)
A disease caused when cells from a donated stem cell graft attack the normal tissue of the transplant patient. Symptoms include jaundice, skin rash or blisters, a dry mouth, or dry eyes. Also called GVHD.
graft-versus-tumor listen (graft-VER-sus-TOO-mer)
An immune response to a person's tumor cells by immune cells present in a donor's transplanted tissue, such as bone marrow or peripheral blood.
gram listen (gram)
A unit of weight in the metric system. One gram is equal to one thousandth of a kilogram and is approximately 30-times less than an ounce.
granisetron listen (gra-NIH-seh-tron)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Granisetron blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Granisetron is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called Sancuso and Sustol.
granisetron hydrochloride listen (gra-NIH-seh-tron HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is also used to prevent and treat nausea and vomiting after surgery. Granisetron hydrochloride blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Granisetron hydrochloride is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic.
Granix listen (GRA-nix)
A drug used to treat severe neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used in patients with certain types of cancer. Granix helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It contains the active ingredient filgrastim. Granix is a type of colony-stimulating factor.
granular cell tumor listen (GRAN-yoo-lur sel TOO-mer)
A rare type of soft tissue tumor that usually begins in Schwann cells (cells that hold nerve cells in place). It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in or under the skin of the head and neck (especially the mouth or tongue). It may also occur in the chest, breast, esophagus, stomach, or other internal organ. Most granular cell tumors are benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer) and spread quickly to nearby tissue. They usually occur in middle-aged adults. Also called Abrikossoff tumor.
granular leukocyte listen (GRAN-yoo-lur LOO-koh-site)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during infections, allergic reactions, and asthma. Neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils are granular leukocytes. A granular leukocyte is a type of white blood cell. Also called granulocyte, PMN, and polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
granulocyte listen (GRAN-yoo-loh-SITE)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during infections, allergic reactions, and asthma. Neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils are granulocytes. A granulocyte is a type of white blood cell. Also called granular leukocyte, PMN, and polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
granulocyte colony-stimulating factor listen (GRAN-yoo-loh-SITE KAH-luh-nee-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting FAK-ter)
A drug used under the brand names Neupogen, Zarxio, and Granix to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is also used under the brand names Neupogen and Zarxio to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer, to treat severe chronic neutropenia, and to prepare the blood for the collection of certain types of blood cells. Granulocyte colony-stimulating factor helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called filgrastim and G-CSF.
granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor listen (GRAN-yoo-loh-SITE-MA-kroh-FAYJ KAH-luh-nee-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting FAK-ter)
A substance that helps make more white blood cells, especially granulocytes, macrophages, and cells that become platelets. It is a cytokine that is a type of hematopoietic (blood-forming) agent. Also called GM-CSF and sargramostim.
granulocytic sarcoma listen (GRAN-yoo-loh-SIH-tik sar-KOH-muh)
A malignant, green-colored tumor of myeloid cells (a type of immature white blood cell). This tumor is usually associated with myelogenous leukemia. Also called chloroma.
granulocytopenia listen (GRAN-yoo-loh-SY-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of granulocytes (a type of white blood cell).
granulosa cell tumor listen (GRAN-yoo-LOH-suh sel TOO-mer)
A type of slow-growing, malignant tumor that usually affects the ovary.
gray elm listen (gray elm)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called Indian elm, red elm, slippery elm, sweet elm, Ulmus fulva, and Ulmus rubra.
green tea extract listen (green tee EK-strakt)
A mixture that is prepared from the leaves of the Camellia sinensis plant. It contains substances called flavonoids and polyphenols, which are antioxidants. Antioxidants help protect cells from damage caused by certain chemicals that may increase the risk of cancer and other diseases. Green tea extract may be taken to treat certain conditions. It is also being studied in the prevention of cancer and other diseases.
Greene Menopause Index listen (green MEH-nuh-pawz IN-dex)
A tool used by researchers to study the symptoms of menopause. It is a standard list of 21 questions which women use to rate how much they are bothered by menopause symptoms such as hot flashes, night sweats, rapid heartbeat, and difficulty sleeping.
grief listen (greef)
The normal response to a major loss, such as the death of a loved one. Grief may also be felt by a person with a serious, long-term illness or with a terminal illness. It may include feelings of great sadness, anger, guilt, and despair. Physical problems, such as not being able to sleep and changes in appetite, may also be part of grief.
grief counseling listen (greef KOWN-suh-ling)
The process by which a trained counselor or a support group helps a person work through normal feelings of sorrow after a loss, such as the death of a loved one.
grief therapy listen (greef THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that helps a person work through a greater than normal reaction to a loss, such as the death of a loved one. This reaction may include behavioral and physical problems, extreme mourning, and being unable to separate emotionally from the person who died. Grief therapy may be individual or group therapy.
groin listen (groyn)
The area where the thigh meets the abdomen.
growth and development milestones listen (grothe … dee-VEH-lup-MENT MILE-stones)
Goals for the expected sizes of infants and children and activities they should be able to do at specific ages, such as sit, stand, play, speak, think, and interact with others.
growth factor listen (grothe FAK-ter)
A substance made by the body that functions to regulate cell division and cell survival. Some growth factors are also produced in the laboratory and used in biological therapy.
growth hormone listen (grothe HOR-mone)
A protein made by the pituitary gland that helps control body growth and the use of glucose and fat in the body. Also called somatotropin.
GSD
A type of inherited disorder in which there are problems with how a form of glucose (sugar) called glycogen is stored and used in the body. Certain enzymes that help make or break down glycogen are missing or do not work the way they should. This causes abnormal amounts or types of glycogen in the tissues, especially in the liver and in muscle tissue. There are many types of GSD, which can cause problems in different parts of the body, including the liver, muscles, kidneys, and heart. Also called glycogen storage disease.
GSK1070916A
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes (Aurora kinases) involved in cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase inhibitor. Also called Aurora B/C kinase inhibitor GSK1070916A.
GTD
A rare condition in which abnormal cells grow inside the uterus from tissue that forms after conception (the joining of sperm and egg). This tissue is made of trophoblastic cells, which normally surround the fertilized egg in the uterus and help connect the fertilized egg to the wall of the uterus. These cells also form part of the placenta (the organ that passes nutrients from the mother to the fetus). Most GTDs are benign (not cancer) and do not spread, but some types are malignant (cancer) and spread to nearby tissues or other parts of the body. The two main types of GTDs are hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. Also called gestational trophoblastic disease, gestational trophoblastic tumor, and GTT.
GTI-2040
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks the production of a protein called ribonucleotide reductase, which helps cells make DNA. This may kill cancer cells that need ribonucleotide reductase to grow. It may also make cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide, and a type of ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor.
GTT
A rare condition in which abnormal cells grow inside the uterus from tissue that forms after conception (the joining of sperm and egg). This tissue is made of trophoblastic cells, which normally surround the fertilized egg in the uterus and help connect the fertilized egg to the wall of the uterus. These cells also form part of the placenta (the organ that passes nutrients from the mother to the fetus). Most GTTs are benign (not cancer) and do not spread, but some types are malignant (cancer) and spread to nearby tissues or other parts of the body. The two main types of GTTs are hydatidiform mole and choriocarcinoma. Also called gestational trophoblastic disease, gestational trophoblastic tumor, and GTD.
guaiac listen (GWY-ak)
A substance from a type of tree called Guaiacum that grows in the Caribbean. Guaiac is used in the fecal occult blood test (a test for blood in human stool samples).
guaiac fecal occult blood test listen (GWY-ak FEE-kul uh-KULT …)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. Small samples of stool are placed on special cards coated with a chemical substance called guaiac and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. A testing solution is put on the cards and the guaiac causes the stool sample to change color. If there is blood in the stool, the color changes very quickly. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called gFOBT, guaiac smear test, and stool guaiac test.
guaiac smear test listen (GWY-ak smeer …)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. Small samples of stool are placed on special cards coated with a chemical substance called guaiac and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. A testing solution is put on the cards and the guaiac causes the stool sample to change color. If there is blood in the stool, the color changes very quickly. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called gFOBT, guaiac fecal occult blood test, and stool guaiac test.
guanine listen (GWAH-neen)
A chemical compound that is used to make one of the building blocks of DNA and RNA. It is a type of purine.
guided imagery listen (GY-ded IH-muh-jree)
A technique in which a person focuses on positive images in his or her mind. It can help people reach a relaxed, focused state and help reduce stress and give a sense of well-being. Also called imagery.
Guillain-Barré syndrome (gee-YAN-bah-RAY SIN-drome)
A rare condition in which the body’s immune system attacks the nerves located outside the brain and spinal cord. Symptoms of Guillain-Barré syndrome include muscle weakness, muscle pain, numbness, and tingling that often begin in the legs or back and may spread to the arms, upper body, and face. Other symptoms may include problems with vision, speech, swallowing, digestion, and bladder control. Guillain-Barré syndrome can get worse quickly and cause paralysis and other serious or life-threatening problems, such as breathing problems and an abnormal blood pressure or heart rate. Most people with Guillain-Barré syndrome get better over time. Guillain-Barré syndrome is a type of autoimmune disease. Also called GBS.
gums listen (gumz)
The tissue of the upper and lower jaws that surrounds the base of the teeth. Also called gingiva.
gut flora listen (... FLOR-uh)
Bacteria and other organisms that live inside the intestines. They help digest food. Vitamins such as biotin and vitamin K are made by gut flora. Also called gut microflora, intestinal flora, intestinal microflora, and microflora.
gut microflora listen (... MY-kroh-FLOR-uh)
Bacteria and other organisms that live inside the intestines. They help digest food. Vitamins such as biotin and vitamin K are made by gut microflora. Also called gut flora, intestinal flora, intestinal microflora, and microflora.
gutka listen (GUT-kuh)
A type of smokeless tobacco that is made in India and is widely used throughout Asia. It is a mixture of tobacco, crushed areca nut (also called betel nut), spices, and other ingredients. It is used like chewing tobacco and is placed in the mouth, usually between the gum and cheek. Gutka contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the lip, mouth, tongue, throat, and esophagus. Also called betel quid with tobacco.
GVHD
A disease caused when cells from a donated stem cell graft attack the normal tissue of the transplant patient. Symptoms include jaundice, skin rash or blisters, a dry mouth, or dry eyes. Also called graft-versus-host disease.
GW572016
A drug used to treat HER2 positive (HER2+) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with capecitabine in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is used with letrozole in postmenopausal women whose cancer is hormone receptor positive (HR+) and who need hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. GW572016 blocks epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. GW572016 is a type of ErbB2 and EGFR dual tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called lapatinib, lapatinib ditosylate, and Tykerb.
GW786034
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma, which is the most common type of kidney cancer. It is also used to treat advanced soft tissue sarcoma that has been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. GW786034 may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called pazopanib hydrochloride and Votrient.
GWAS listen
A study that compares DNA markers across the genome (the complete genetic material in a person) in people with a disease or trait to people without the disease or trait. These studies may uncover clues to help prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. Also called genome-wide association study.
gynecologic listen (GY-neh-kuh-LAH-jik)
Having to do with the female reproductive tract (including the cervix, endometrium, fallopian tubes, ovaries, uterus, and vagina).
gynecologic cancer listen (GY-neh-kuh-LAH-jik KAN-ser)
Cancer of the female reproductive tract, including the cervix, endometrium, fallopian tubes, ovaries, uterus, and vagina.
gynecologic oncologist listen (GY-neh-kuh-LAH-jik on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating cancers of the female reproductive organs.
gynecologist listen (GY-neh-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the female reproductive organs.
gynecomastia listen (GY-neh-koh-MAS-tee-uh)
The abnormal growth of breast gland tissue in males. Gynecomastia in infants and boys may be caused by an imbalance in certain hormones. It may also be caused by conditions that affect hormones, such as tumors; malnutrition; kidney, liver, or thyroid disease; or treatment with certain drugs. It can occur at any age.
H. pylori listen (… py-LOR-ee)
A type of bacterium that causes inflammation and ulcers in the stomach or small intestine. People with H. pylori infections may be more likely to develop cancer in the stomach, including MALT (mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue) lymphoma. Also called Helicobacter pylori.
hA20
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of lymphoma. It binds to the protein CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of immune system cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. This causes the immune system to kill the cancer cells. hA20 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called HCD20, IMMU-106, and veltuzumab.
HAART listen
Treatment that uses a combination of three or more drugs to treat HIV infection. HAART stops the virus from making copies of itself in the body. This may lessen the damage to the immune system caused by HIV and may slow down the development of AIDS. It may also help prevent transmission of HIV to others, including from mother to child during birth. Also called cART, combination antiretroviral therapy, and highly active antiretroviral therapy.
hair follicle listen (… FAH-lih-kul)
A shaft or opening on the surface of the skin through which hair grows.
hairy cell leukemia listen (HAYR-ee sel loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A rare type of leukemia in which abnormal B-lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) are present in the bone marrow, spleen, and peripheral blood. When viewed under a microscope, these cells appear to be covered with tiny hair-like projections.
Halaven listen (HA-lih-ven)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has already been treated with an anthracycline and a taxane (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used to treat liposarcoma (a type of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has already been treated with an anthracycline. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Halaven blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antitubulin agent. Also called E7389 and eribulin mesylate.
Haldol listen (HAL-dol)
A drug used to treat certain mental and neurological disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of antipsychotic. Also called haloperidol.
half-sibling listen (haf-SIB-ling)
A person’s brother or sister who has one parent in common.
hallucination listen (huh-LOO-sih-NAY-shun)
A sight, sound, smell, taste, or touch that a person believes to be real but is not real. Hallucinations can be caused by nervous system disease, certain drugs, or mental disorders.
halofuginone hydrobromide listen (HA-loh-FYOO-jih-none HY-droh-BROH-mide)
A substance that is being studied for its ability to slow the growth of connective tissue and to prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of quinazolinone alkaloid and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
haloperidol listen (ha-loh-PAYR-ih-dol)
A drug used to treat certain mental and neurological disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of antipsychotic. Also called Haldol.
Halsted radical mastectomy listen (HAWL-sted RA-dih-kul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery for breast cancer in which the breast, chest muscles, and all of the lymph nodes under the arm are removed. For many years, this was the breast cancer operation used most often, but it is used rarely now. Doctors consider radical mastectomy only when the tumor has spread to the chest muscles. Also called radical mastectomy.
hamartoma listen (HA-mar-TOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) growth made up of an abnormal mixture of cells and tissues normally found in the area of the body where the growth occurs.
hand-foot syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A condition marked by pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet. It sometimes occurs as a side effect of certain anticancer drugs. Also called palmar-plantar erythrodysesthesia.
happy major listen (HA-pee MAY-jer)
A plant whose seeds and root have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. The scientific name is Arctium lappa. Also called burdock and lappa.
hard palate listen (... PAL-et)
The front, bony part of the roof of the mouth.
Hashimoto disease listen (HAH-shee-MOH-toh dih-ZEEZ)
An autoimmune condition of the thyroid gland (a gland located beneath the larynx). It is caused by the formation of antibodies that attack the thyroid gland and it usually causes hypothyroidism (too little thyroid hormone). Symptoms include fatigue, weight gain, constipation, dry skin, depression, and the inability to exercise. It is more common in females and can run in families. Also called autoimmune thyroiditis and Hashimoto thyroiditis.
Hashimoto thyroiditis listen (HAH-shee-MOH-toh thy-roy-DY-tis)
An autoimmune condition of the thyroid gland (a gland located beneath the larynx). It is caused by the formation of antibodies that attack the thyroid gland and it usually causes hypothyroidism (too little thyroid hormone). Symptoms include fatigue, weight gain, constipation, dry skin, depression, and the inability to exercise. It is more common in females and can run in families. Also called autoimmune thyroiditis and Hashimoto disease.
hawthorn fruit listen (HAW-thorn froot)
The fruit of the hawthorn tree or bush. It has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including heart problems and gastrointestinal problems.
hazard ratio listen (HA-zurd RAY-shee-oh)
A measure of how often a particular event happens in one group compared to how often it happens in another group, over time. In cancer research, hazard ratios are often used in clinical trials to measure survival at any point in time in a group of patients who have been given a specific treatment compared to a control group given another treatment or a placebo. A hazard ratio of one means that there is no difference in survival between the two groups. A hazard ratio of greater than one or less than one means that survival was better in one of the groups.
HBOC syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder in which the risk of breast cancer (especially before the age of 50) and ovarian cancer is higher than normal. Most cases of HBOC syndrome are caused by certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or the BRCA2 gene. People with HBOC syndrome may also have an increased risk of other types of cancer, including pancreatic cancer, prostate cancer, and melanoma. Also called hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome.
HBV
A virus that causes hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is carried and passed to others through the blood and other body fluids. Different ways the virus is spread include sharing needles with an infected person and being stuck accidentally by a needle contaminated with the virus. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Although many patients who are infected with HBV may not have symptoms, long-term infection may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver cancer. Also called hepatitis B virus.
HCA
A chemical that is formed when meat, poultry, or fish is cooked at high temperatures, such as frying, broiling, and barbecuing. HCAs are carcinogens (substances that may cause cancer). Also called heterocyclic amine.
HCD20
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of lymphoma. It binds to the protein CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of immune system cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. This causes the immune system to kill the cancer cells. HCD20 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called hA20, IMMU-106, and veltuzumab.
HCP
Healthcare proxy. A type of advance directive that gives a person (such as a relative, lawyer, or friend) the authority to make healthcare decisions for another person. It becomes active when that person loses the ability to make decisions for himself or herself. Also called healthcare proxy.
hCRF
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain cancer. It is made naturally by the hypothalamus (a part of the brain) and can also be made in the laboratory. hCRF may help reduce symptoms caused by edema (swelling) of the brain. It is a type of neurohormone. Also called human corticotropin-releasing factor.
HCT
The amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells. It depends on the number and size of red blood cells. A HCT test is usually part of a complete blood count (CBC). It may be used to check for conditions such as anemia, dehydration, malnutrition, and leukemia. Also called hematocrit.
HCV
A virus that causes hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is carried and passed to others through the blood and other body fluids. Different ways the virus is spread include sharing needles with an infected person and being stuck accidentally by a needle contaminated with the virus. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Although patients who are infected with HCV may not have symptoms, long-term infection may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver cancer. These patients may also have an increased risk for certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called hepatitis C virus.
HDAC
An enzyme that removes a small molecule called an acetyl group from histones (proteins found in chromosomes). This changes the way the histones bind to DNA and may affect its activity. HDAC inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called histone deacetylase.
HDAC inhibitor listen (...in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that causes a chemical change that stops tumor cells from dividing. HDAC inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called histone deacetylase inhibitor.
HDAC inhibitor SNDX-275 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor. Also called entinostat and SNDX-275.
HDR
An amount of radiation that is greater than that given in typical radiation therapy. HDR is precisely directed at the tumor to avoid damaging healthy tissue, and may kill more cancer cells in fewer treatments. Also called high-dose radiation.
HE4
A protein found on cells that line the lungs and reproductive organs, such as the ovaries. HE4 may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including ovarian epithelial cancer. Measuring the amount of HE4 in the blood may help plan cancer treatment or find out if cancer is getting worse or has come back. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called human epididymis protein 4.
head and neck cancer listen (... KAN-ser)
Cancer that arises in the head or neck region (in the nasal cavity, sinuses, lips, mouth, salivary glands, throat, or larynx [voice box]).
healing touch listen (HEEL-ing tuch)
A form of complementary and alternative medicine based on the belief that vital energy flows through the human body. This energy is said to be balanced or made stronger by practitioners who pass their hands over, or gently touch, a patient's body. Healing touch is being studied in patients receiving cancer therapy, to find out if it can improve quality of life, boost the immune system, or reduce side effects. Healing touch is a type of energy therapy. Also called therapeutic touch.
health history (helth HIH-stuh-ree)
A record of information about a person’s health. A personal health history may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams and tests. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. A family health history includes health information about a person’s close family members (parents, grandparents, children, brothers, and sisters). This includes their current and past illnesses. A family health history may show a pattern of certain diseases in a family. Also called medical history.
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act listen (helth in-SHOOR-ents por-tuh-BIH-lih-tee ... uh-KOWN-tuh-BIH-lih-tee ...)
A 1996 U.S. law that allows workers and their families to keep their health insurance when they change or lose their jobs. The privacy rule of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act protects the privacy of a person’s health information and keeps it from being misused. It gives people the right to receive and review their health records and to choose with whom their healthcare providers and health insurance companies share their information (including friends, family members, and caregivers). The law also includes standards for setting up and maintaining secure electronic health records. Also called HIPAA and Kassebaum Kennedy Act.
health insurance premium listen (helth in-SHOOR-ents PREE-mee-um)
The amount of money that a patient pays monthly to a health insurance company for healthcare coverage. Coverage may include visits to the doctor, laboratory tests, prescription medicines, and hospital stays.
healthcare provider listen (HELTH-kayr proh-VY-der)
A licensed person or organization that provides healthcare services.
healthcare proxy listen (HELTH-kayr PRAK-see)
A type of advance directive that gives a person (such as a relative, lawyer, or friend) the authority to make healthcare decisions for another person. It becomes active when that person loses the ability to make decisions for himself or herself. Also called HCP.
healthy control listen (HEL-thee kun-TROLE)
In a clinical study, a person who does not have the disorder or disease being studied. Results from healthy controls are compared to results from the group being studied.
heart cancer listen (hart KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that develops in tissues of the heart. Also called cardiac sarcoma.
heart disease listen (hart dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disease that affects the heart or blood vessels. The risk of certain heart diseases may be increased by smoking, high blood pressure, high cholesterol, unhealthy diet, lack of exercise, and obesity. The most common heart disease is coronary artery disease (narrow or blocked coronary arteries), which can lead to chest pain, heart attacks, or stroke. Other heart diseases include congestive heart failure, heart rhythm problems, congenital heart disease (heart disease at birth), and endocarditis (inflamed inner layer of the heart). Also called cardiovascular disease.
heart rate listen (hart rayt)
In medicine, the number of times the heart beats within a certain time period, usually a minute. The heart rate can be felt at the wrist, side of the neck, back of the knees, top of the foot, groin, and other places in the body where an artery is close to the skin. The resting heart rate is normally between 60 and 100 beats a minute in a healthy adult who is at rest. Measuring the heart rate gives important information about a person’s health. Also called pulse.
heat-shock protein listen (... PROH-teen)
One of a group of proteins that help protect cells from stresses such as heat, cold, and low amounts of oxygen or glucose (sugar). Heat-shock proteins help other proteins function in normal cells and may be present at high levels in cancer cells. Blocking the activity of a heat-shock protein called HSP90 is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Other heat-shock proteins including HSP70 and gp96 are being studied in vaccines to treat cancer. Also called HSP and stress protein.
Hedyotis diffusa listen (heh-dee-OH-tis dih-FYOO-suh)
An herb used in traditional Chinese medicine to treat certain medical problems. It has been used to boost the immune system and may have anticancer effects.
helical computed tomography listen (HEE-lih-kul kum-PYOO-ted toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The x-ray machine scans the body in a spiral path. This allows more images to be made in a shorter time than with older CT methods. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the organs or tissues show up more clearly on the x-ray. Helical computed tomography also creates more detailed pictures and may be better at finding small abnormal areas inside the body. It may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called spiral CT scan.
helical tomotherapy listen (HEE-lih-kul toh-mah-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy in which radiation is aimed at a tumor from many different directions. The patient lays on a table and is moved through a donut-shaped machine. The radiation source in the machine rotates around the patient in a spiral pattern. Before radiation, a 3-dimensional (3-D) image of the tumor is taken. This helps doctors find the highest dose of radiation that can be used to kill tumor cells while causing less damage to nearby tissue. Helical tomotherapy is a type of intensity-modulated radiation therapy (IMRT). Also called tomotherapy.
Helicobacter pylori listen (HEEL-ih-koh-BAK-ter py-LOR-ee)
A type of bacterium that causes inflammation and ulcers in the stomach or small intestine. People with Helicobacter pylori infections may be more likely to develop cancer in the stomach, including MALT (mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue) lymphoma. Also called H. pylori.
helper T cell listen (HEL-per … sel)
A type of immune cell that stimulates killer T cells, macrophages, and B cells to make immune responses. A helper T cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called CD4-positive T lymphocyte.
hemagglutinin-neuraminidase listen (HEE-muh-GLOO-tih-nin-NOOR-uh-MIH-nih-days)
A protein found in the outer coat of paramyxoviruses. This protein helps virus particles bind to cells, making infection easier.
Hemangeol listen (hee-MAN-jee-ol)
A drug used to treat infantile hemangioma (a benign blood vessel tumor). It is used in infants 5 weeks to 5 months of age. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and some types of cancer. Hemangeol may help shrink certain types of vascular tumors. Hemangeol contains the active ingredient propranolol hydrochloride. It is a type of beta blocker.
hemangiopericytoma listen (hee-MAN-jee-oh-PAYR-ih-sy-TOH-muh)
A type of cancer involving blood vessels and soft tissue.
hemangiosarcoma listen (hee-MAN-jee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in the cells that line blood vessels.
hematocrit listen (hee-MA-toh-krit)
The amount of whole blood that is made up of red blood cells. It depends on the number and size of red blood cells. A hematocrit test is usually part of a complete blood count (CBC). It may be used to check for conditions such as anemia, dehydration, malnutrition, and leukemia. Also called HCT.
hematogenous listen (HEE-muh-TAH-jeh-nus)
Originating in the blood or spread through the bloodstream.
hematologic cancer listen (HEE-muh-tuh-LAH-jik KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in blood-forming tissue, such as the bone marrow, or in the cells of the immune system. Examples of hematologic cancer are leukemia, lymphoma, and multiple myeloma. Also called blood cancer.
hematologist listen (HEE-muh-TAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating blood disorders.
hematoma listen (HEE-muh-TOH-muh)
A pool of clotted or partially clotted blood in an organ, tissue, or body space, usually caused by a broken blood vessel.
hematopathology laboratory listen (hee-MA-toh-pa-THAH-loh-jee LA-bruh-tor-ee)
A laboratory that specializes in doing tests that help to diagnose and treat diseases of the blood, bone marrow, and lymph system.
hematopoiesis listen (hee-MA-toh-poy-EE-sis)
The formation of new blood cells.
hematopoietic growth factor listen (hee-MA-toh-poy-EH-tik ...)
A group of proteins that causes blood cells to grow and mature.
hematopoietic stem cell listen (hee-MA-toh-poy-EH-tik stem sel)
An immature cell that can develop into all types of blood cells, including white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets. Hematopoietic stem cells are found in the peripheral blood and the bone marrow. Also called blood stem cell.
hematopoietic tissue listen (hee-MA-toh-poy-EH-tik TIH-shoo)
Tissue in which new blood cells are formed.
hematoporphyrin derivative listen (HEE-muh-toh-POR-fih-rin deh-RIH-vuh-tiv)
A drug used in photodynamic therapy that is absorbed by tumor cells. When exposed to light, it becomes active and kills the cancer cells.
hematuria listen (HEE-muh-TOOR-ee-uh)
Blood in the urine.
heme listen (heem)
The part of certain molecules that contains iron. The heme part of hemoglobin is the substance inside red blood cells that binds to oxygen in the lungs and carries it to the tissues.
hemihyperplasia listen (HEH-mee-HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which one side of the body or a part of one side is larger than the other. Children with hemihyperplasia have an increased risk of developing certain types of cancer, including Wilms tumor (a childhood kidney cancer) and liver cancer. Also called hemihypertrophy.
hemihypertrophy listen (HEH-mee-hy-PER-troh-fee)
A condition in which one side of the body or a part of one side is larger than the other. Children with hemihypertrophy have an increased risk of developing certain types of cancer, including Wilms tumor (a childhood kidney cancer) and liver cancer. Also called hemihyperplasia.
hemilaryngectomy listen (HEM-ee-LAYR-in-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove one side of the larynx (voicebox).
hemochromatosis listen (HEE-moh-kroh-muh-TOH-sis)
A condition in which the body takes up and stores more iron than it needs. The extra iron is stored in the liver, heart, and pancreas, which may cause liver disease, heart problems, organ failure, and cancer. It may also cause bronze skin, diabetes, pain in the joints and abdomen, tiredness, and impotence. Hemochromatosis may be inherited, or it may be caused by blood transfusions. Also called iron overload.
hemoglobin listen (HEE-moh-GLOH-bin)
A protein inside red blood cells that carries oxygen from the lungs to tissues and organs in the body and carries carbon dioxide back to the lungs. Testing for the amount of hemoglobin in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test.
hemolysis listen (hee-MAH-lih-sis)
The breakdown of red blood cells. Some diseases, medicines, and toxins may cause red blood cells to break down more quickly than usual.
hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis listen (HEE-moh-FA-goh-SIH-tik LIM-foh-HIS-tee-oh-sy-TOH-sis)
A rare disorder in which histiocytes and lymphocytes (types of white blood cells) build up in organs including the skin, spleen, and liver, and destroy other blood cells. Hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis may be inherited or caused by certain conditions or diseases, including infections, immunodeficiency (inability of the body to fight infections), and cancer. Also called HLH.
hemophilia listen (HEE-moh-FIH-lee-uh)
Group of hereditary disorders in which affected individuals fail to make enough of certain proteins needed to form blood clots.
hemoptysis listen (hee-MOP-tih-sis)
Coughing or spitting up blood from the respiratory tract.
hemorrhage listen (HEH-muh-rij)
In medicine, loss of blood from damaged blood vessels. A hemorrhage may be internal or external, and usually involves a lot of bleeding in a short time.
hemorrhagic cerebrovascular accident listen (HEH-muh-RA-jik seh-REE-broh-VAS-kyoo-ler AK-sih-dent)
A type of stroke that occurs when a blood vessel in the brain or on the surface of the brain leaks or breaks open, causing bleeding in or around the brain. This leads to swelling and pressure, which can damage cells and tissue in the brain. Hemorrhagic cerebrovascular accident is usually caused by high blood pressure, aneurysm, arteriovenous malformation, head injury, or a bleeding disorder. Also called hemorrhagic stroke.
hemorrhagic cystitis listen (HEH-muh-RA-jik sis-TY-tis)
A condition in which the lining of the bladder becomes inflamed and starts to bleed. The blood can be seen in the urine. Symptoms include pain and a burning feeling while urinating, feeling a need to urinate often, and being unable to control the flow of urine. Hemorrhagic cystitis may be caused by anticancer drugs, radiation therapy, infection, or being exposed to chemicals, such as dyes or insecticides.
hemorrhagic stroke listen (HEH-muh-RA-jik stroke)
A type of stroke that occurs when a blood vessel in the brain or on the surface of the brain leaks or breaks open, causing bleeding in or around the brain. This leads to swelling and pressure, which can damage cells and tissue in the brain. Hemorrhagic stroke is usually caused by high blood pressure, aneurysm, arteriovenous malformation, head injury, or a bleeding disorder. Also called hemorrhagic cerebrovascular accident.
hemorrhoid listen (HEH-muh-ROYD)
An enlarged or swollen blood vessel, usually located near the anus or the rectum.
heparin listen (HEH-puh-rin)
A substance that slows the formation of blood clots. Heparin is made by the liver, lungs, and other tissues in the body and can also made in the laboratory. Heparin may be injected into muscle or blood to prevent or break up blood clots. It is a type of anticoagulant.
hepatectomy listen (HEH-puh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all or part of the liver.
hepatic listen (heh-PA-tik)
Refers to the liver.
hepatic arterial infusion listen (heh-PA-tik ar-TEER-ee-ul in-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure to deliver chemotherapy directly to the liver. Catheters are put into an artery in the groin that leads directly to the liver, and drugs are given through the catheters.
hepatic arterial occlusion listen (heh-PA-tik ar-TEER-ee-ul uh-KLOO-zhun)
A block in blood flow to the liver. It can happen while giving chemotherapy through a catheter in the hepatic artery. Sometimes doctors use drugs or other agents to cause hepatic arterial occlusion on purpose. This block of blood flow to the liver helps kill cancer cells growing in the liver.
hepatic artery listen (heh-PA-tik AR-tuh-ree)
The major blood vessel that carries blood to the liver.
hepatic portal vein listen (heh-PA-tik POR-tul vayn)
A blood vessel that carries blood to the liver from the intestines, spleen, pancreas, and gallbladder. Also called portal vein.
hepatic veno-occlusive disease listen (heh-PA-tik VEE-noh-uh-KLOO-siv dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which some of the veins in the liver are blocked. This causes a decrease in blood flow inside the liver and may lead to liver damage. Signs and symptoms include weight gain, yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes, dark-colored urine, and increased liver size. It may occur at some point in time after radiation therapy to the liver and bile ducts or after high-dose anticancer drugs were given before a stem cell transplant. Also called sinusoidal obstruction syndrome.
hepatitis listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis)
Disease of the liver causing inflammation. Symptoms include an enlarged liver, fever, nausea, vomiting, abdominal pain, and dark urine.
hepatitis A vaccine listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis ... vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent infection with the hepatitis A virus, which causes a serious liver disease. The vaccine is made of a weakened form of the virus that cannot cause disease but causes the body’s immune system to make antibodies that destroy the hepatitis A virus.
hepatitis A virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis ... VY-rus)
A virus that causes a serious liver disease. It is usually spread by contact with an infected person’s stool by eating food he or she has handled after not washing hands, but it can be spread in other ways. Symptoms of infection include jaundice, dark urine, and fever and other flu-like symptoms.
hepatitis B virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis ... VY-rus)
A virus that causes hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is carried and passed to others through the blood and other body fluids. Different ways the virus is spread include sharing needles with an infected person and being stuck accidentally by a needle contaminated with the virus. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Although many patients who are infected with hepatitis B virus may not have symptoms, long-term infection may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver cancer. Also called HBV.
hepatitis C virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis ... VY-rus)
A virus that causes hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is carried and passed to others through the blood and other body fluids. Different ways the virus is spread include sharing needles with an infected person and being stuck accidentally by a needle contaminated with the virus. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Although patients who are infected with hepatitis C virus may not have symptoms, long-term infection may lead to cirrhosis (scarring of the liver) and liver cancer. These patients may also have an increased risk for certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called HCV.
hepatitis D virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis … VY-rus)
A type of hepatitis virus that may be present in the body at the same time as the hepatitis B virus. It makes the hepatitis (inflammation of the liver) caused by hepatitis B much worse. The hepatitis D virus and the hepatitis B virus are spread to others through blood or sexual contact. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Also called hepatitis delta virus.
hepatitis delta virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis DEL-tuh VY-rus)
A type of hepatitis virus that may be present in the body at the same time as the hepatitis B virus. It makes the hepatitis (inflammation of the liver) caused by hepatitis B much worse. The hepatitis delta virus and the hepatitis B virus are spread to others through blood or sexual contact. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus. Also called hepatitis D virus.
hepatitis E virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis … VY-rus)
A virus that causes hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is usually spread through food that has been handled by an infected person, or through drinking water that is contaminated with human waste.
hepatitis G virus listen (HEH-puh-TY-tis … VY-rus)
A virus that may be found in patients with hepatitis (inflammation of the liver). It is spread to others through blood or sexual contact. Infants born to infected mothers may also become infected with the virus.
hepatobiliary listen (heh-PA-toh-BIH-lee-AYR-ee)
Having to do with the liver, bile ducts, and/or gallbladder.
hepatoblastoma listen (HEH-puh-toh-bla-STOH-muh)
A type of liver tumor that occurs in infants and children.
hepatocellular carcinoma listen (heh-PA-toh-SEL-yoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of adenocarcinoma and the most common type of liver tumor.
hepatocyte listen (heh-PA-toh-site)
A liver cell.
hepatolenticular degeneration (heh-PA-toh-len-TIH-kyoo-ler dee-JEH-neh-RAY-shun)
A rare, inherited disorder in which too much copper builds up in the body. The extra copper is stored in the body’s tissues and organs, especially in the liver, brain, and eyes. This can cause liver disease, central nervous system (brain and spinal cord) problems, and mental problems. Signs and symptoms of hepatolenticular degeneration include yellowing of the skin and the whites of the eyes, a gold or brown ring around the colored part of the eyes, swelling in the abdomen and legs, fatigue, loss of appetite, problems with speech and swallowing, uncontrolled movements or muscle stiffness, anxiety, depression, and mood swings. Hepatolenticular degeneration is caused by mutations (changes) in the ATP7B gene. It is a genetic disorder that is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner and is usually diagnosed in teens and young adults. It is a type of copper storage disease. Also called Wilson disease.
hepatoma listen (HEH-puh-TOH-muh)
A liver tumor.
hepatomegaly listen (HEH-puh-toh-MEH-guh-lee)
Enlarged liver.
HER1 listen
The protein found on the surface of some cells and to which epidermal growth factor binds, causing the cells to divide. It is found at abnormally high levels on the surface of many types of cancer cells, so these cells may divide excessively in the presence of epidermal growth factor. Also called EGFR, epidermal growth factor receptor, and ErbB1.
HER1 gene listen
A gene that makes a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is involved in cell growth and cell survival. Mutated (changed) forms of the HER1 gene and protein have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Checking for changes in the HER1 gene in tumor tissue may help plan cancer treatment. Also called EGFR gene, epidermal growth factor receptor gene, and ERBB1 gene.
HER2
A protein involved in normal cell growth. HER2 may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer cells, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Checking the amount of HER2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. Also called c-erbB-2, HER2/neu, human EGF receptor 2, and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2.
HER2 negative listen (… NEH-guh-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that do not have a large amount of a protein called HER2 on their surface. In normal cells, HER2 helps to control cell growth. Cancer cells that are HER2 negative may grow more slowly and are less likely to recur (come back) or spread to other parts of the body than cancer cells that have a large amount of HER2 on their surface. Checking for the amount of HER2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. These cancers include breast, bladder, ovarian, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. Also called human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 negative.
HER2 positive listen (… PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have too much of a protein called HER2 on their surface. In normal cells, HER2 helps to control cell growth. When it is made in larger than normal amounts by cancer cells, the cells may grow more quickly and be more likely to spread to other parts of the body. Checking to see if a cancer is HER2 positive may help plan treatment, which may include drugs that kill HER2 positive cancer cells. Cancers that may be HER2 positive include breast, bladder, pancreatic, ovarian, and stomach cancers. Also called c-erbB-2 positive and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive.
HER2 test listen
A laboratory test that measures the amount of HER2 protein on cancer cells or how many copies of the HER2 gene are in the DNA. The HER2 protein is involved in normal cell growth. It may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancer. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. A HER2 test may be done to help plan treatment. It is a type of tumor marker test. Also called HER2/neu test and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 test.
HER2/neu listen
A protein involved in normal cell growth. HER2/neu may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer cells, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Checking the amount of HER2/neu on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. Also called c-erbB-2, HER2, human EGF receptor 2, and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2.
HER2/neu test listen
A laboratory test that measures the amount of HER2/neu protein on cancer cells or how many copies of the HER2 gene are in the DNA. The HER2/neu protein is involved in normal cell growth. It may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancer. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. A HER2/neu test may be done to help plan treatment. It is a type of tumor marker test. Also called HER2 test and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 test.
herba Scutellaria barbatae listen (ER-buh skoo-teh-LAYR-ee-uh BAR-buh-tay)
An herb used in traditional Chinese medicine to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects.
herbal listen (ER-bul)
Having to do with plants.
herbal cigarette listen (ER-bul SIH-guh-ret)
A type of cigarette that contains a mixture of flowers, herbs, and other natural ingredients. Herbal cigarettes do not contain tobacco or nicotine. When they are smoked, they make many of the same harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke, including tar and carbon monoxide.
herbal medicine listen (ER-bul MEH-dih-sin)
A type of medicine that uses roots, stems, leaves, flowers, or seeds of plants to improve health, prevent disease, and treat illness.
herbal supplement listen (ER-bul SUH-pleh-ment)
A product made from a plant that is thought to be useful in treating disease or staying healthy. Herbal supplements are taken by mouth.
herbicide listen (ER-bih-side)
A chemical that kills plants.
Herceptin listen (her-SEP-tin)
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat HER2-positive stomach cancer or HER2-positive gastroesophageal junction cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Herceptin binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Herceptin contains the active ingredient trastuzumab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of HER2 receptor antagonist.
Herceptin Hylecta listen (her-SEP-tin hy-LEK-tuh)
A combination of two drugs used to treat certain types of HER2-positive breast cancer. It is a combination of trastuzumab and hyaluronidase. Trastuzumab binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Hyaluronidase allows trastuzumab to be given by injection under the skin. Herceptin Hylecta can be given more quickly than trastuzumab alone, which is given as an infusion. This shortens the amount of time it takes to receive each treatment. Also called trastuzumab and hyaluronidase.
hereditary listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee)
In medicine, describes the passing of genetic information from parent to child through the genes in sperm and egg cells. Also called inherited.
hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee brest … oh-VAYR-ee-un KAN-ser SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder in which the risk of breast cancer (especially before the age of 50) and ovarian cancer is higher than normal. Most cases of hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome are caused by certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or the BRCA2 gene. People with hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome may also have an increased risk of other types of cancer, including pancreatic cancer, prostate cancer, and melanoma. Also called HBOC syndrome.
hereditary cancer syndrome listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee KAN-ser SIN-drome)
A type of inherited disorder in which there is a higher-than-normal risk of certain types of cancer. Hereditary cancer syndromes are caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes passed from parents to children. In a hereditary cancer syndrome, certain patterns of cancer may be seen within families. These patterns include having several close family members (such as a mother, daughter, and sister) with the same type of cancer, developing cancer at an early age, or having two or more types of cancer develop in the same person. Examples of hereditary cancer syndromes are hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome, Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome, and Lynch syndrome. Also called family cancer syndrome and inherited cancer syndrome.
hereditary hemochromatosis (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee HEE-moh-kroh-muh-TOH-sis)
An inherited condition in which too much iron builds up in the body. The extra iron is stored in the body’s tissues and organs, especially the liver, heart, pancreas, skin, and joints. This can cause liver disease, heart problems, diabetes, and organ failure. Symptoms include changes in skin color, pain in the joints and abdomen, fatigue, and loss of sex drive. Patients with hereditary hemochromatosis also have an increased risk of liver cancer. There are five types of hereditary hemochromatosis. Each type is caused by changes in different genes. Symptoms for each type typically begin at different ages. Type 1 hemochromatosis is one of the most common genetic disorders in the United States.
hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer syndrome listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee LY-oh-MY-oh-muh-TOH-sis ... REE-nul sel KAN-ser SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which benign (not cancer) skin lesions called leiomyomas form in the smooth muscle tissue around the hair follicles. They usually form on the arms, legs, chest, and abdomen. Benign leiomyomas may also form as fibroids in the uterus in females. Patients with hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer syndrome have an increased risk of kidney cancer. The signs and symptoms of hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer syndrome usually do not appear until young adulthood. Hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer syndrome is caused by a mutation in the FH gene. It is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner. Also called HLRCC.
hereditary mutation listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee myoo-TAY-shun)
A gene change in a body's reproductive cell (egg or sperm) that becomes incorporated into the DNA of every cell in the body of the offspring. Hereditary mutations are passed on from parents to offspring. Also called germline mutation.
hereditary nonpolyposis colon cancer listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee non-PAH-lee-POH-sis KOH-lun KAN-ser)
An inherited disorder in which affected individuals have a higher-than-normal chance of developing colorectal cancer and certain other types of cancer, often before the age of 50. Also called HNPCC and Lynch syndrome.
hereditary papillary renal cancer listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee PA-pih-LAYR-ee REE-nul KAN-ser)
A rare, inherited disorder that increases the risk of a type of kidney cancer called type 1 papillary kidney cancer. This cancer forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. Hereditary papillary renal cancer often affects both kidneys, and often there is more than one tumor in each kidney. It is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called MET. Hereditary papillary renal cancer is a type of hereditary cancer syndrome. Also called hereditary papillary renal carcinoma and HPRC.
hereditary papillary renal carcinoma listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee PA-pih-LAYR-ee REE-nul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare, inherited disorder that increases the risk of a type of kidney cancer called type 1 papillary kidney cancer. This cancer forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. Hereditary papillary renal carcinoma often affects both kidneys, and often there is more than one tumor in each kidney. It is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called MET. Hereditary papillary renal carcinoma is a type of hereditary cancer syndrome. Also called hereditary papillary renal cancer and HPRC.
hereditary paraganglioma-pheochromocytoma syndrome listen (heh-REH-dih-tayr-ee PAYR-uh-GANG-glee-OH-muh-FEE-oh-KROH-moh-sy-TOH-muh SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder marked by tumors called paragangliomas, which are found in paraganglia. Paraganglia are groups of nerve-like cells found near the adrenal glands and near blood vessels or nerves in the head, neck, chest, abdomen, and pelvis. Paragangliomas that form in the adrenal glands are called pheochromocytomas. Paragangliomas are usually benign (not cancer), but sometimes become malignant (cancerous). People with hereditary paraganglioma-pheochromocytoma syndrome usually have more than one paraganglioma, and may have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, such as kidney cancer and thyroid cancer.
heritable listen (HAYR-ih-tuh-bul)
In medicine, describes a characteristic or trait that can be passed from a parent to a child through the genes. Several types of cancer have heritable forms, in which the risk of developing a particular type of cancer is inherited from a parent. Some signs of heritable cancer are a family history of the cancer, mutations (changes) in certain genes passed from a parent to a child, or a mutation that occurs at the time of conception (fertilization of an egg by a sperm). Heritable forms of cancer often develop at an early age.
heritage listen (HAYR-ih-tij)
Something handed down from the past, such as a tradition, birthright, or inherited traits.
hernia listen (HER-nee-uh)
The bulging of an internal organ through a weak area or tear in the muscle or other tissue that holds it in place. Most hernias occur in the abdomen.
heroin listen (HAYR-oh-win)
A substance made from morphine. Heroin is very addictive, and it is illegal to use or sell it in the United States. It may be used outside the United States to treat severe pain. Heroin binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opiate. Also called diacetylmorphine hydrochloride and diamorphine hydrochloride.
herpes simplex virus listen (HER-peez SIM-plex VY-rus)
A type of virus that causes herpes infections and has DNA as its genetic material. There are two types of herpes simplex viruses. Infections with type 1 viruses cause cold sores on the lips or nostrils. Infections with type 2 viruses cause sores on the genitals (external and internal sex organs and glands). Also called HHV, HSV, and human herpesvirus.
herpesvirus listen (HER-peez-VY-rus)
A member of the herpes family of viruses.
Herzuma listen (her-ZOO-muh)
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Herzuma binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Herzuma contains the active ingredient trastuzumab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of HER2 receptor antagonist.
heterocyclic amine listen (HEH-teh-roh-SY-klik A-meen)
A chemical that is formed when meat, poultry, or fish is cooked at high temperatures, such as frying, broiling, and barbecuing. Heterocyclic amines are carcinogens (substances that may cause cancer). Also called HCA.
heterogeneous listen (HEH-teh-roh-JEE-nee-us)
Made up of elements or ingredients that are not alike.
heterogeneously dense breast tissue listen (HEH-teh-roh-JEE-nee-us-lee dents brest TIH-shoo)
A term used to describe breast tissue that has large areas of dense fibrous tissue and glandular tissue and also has some fatty tissue. The dense areas of the breast make it harder to find tumors or other changes on a mammogram. Heterogeneously dense breast tissue is one of four categories used to describe a level of breast density seen on a mammogram. About 40% of women have this type of breast tissue.
heterogenic listen (HEH-teh-roh-JEH-nik)
Derived from a different source or species. Also called heterogenous.
heterogenous listen (HEH-teh-RAH-jeh-nus)
Derived from a different source or species. Also called heterogenic.
hexyl 5-aminolevulinate listen (HEK-sul 5-uh-MEE-noh-LEH-vyoo-LIH-nayt)
A substance that is used to find and kill tumor cells. It enters tumor cells and becomes activated when exposed to a special type of light. A chemical reaction causes the cells to produce fluorescent light and die.
HGS-ETR1
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL R1 on the surface of some tumor cells. This may kill the tumor cells. HGS-ETR1 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-TRAIL R1-mAb and mapatumumab.
HGS-ETR2
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL-R2 on the surface of some tumor cells, which may kill the tumor cells. HGS-ETR2 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-TRAIL R2 mAb HGS-ETR2 and lexatumumab.
HHV
A type of virus that causes herpes infections and has DNA as its genetic material. There are two types of HHVs. Infections with type 1 viruses cause cold sores on the lips or nostrils. Infections with type 2 viruses cause sores on the genitals (external and internal sex organs and glands). Also called herpes simplex virus, HSV, and human herpesvirus.
HHV8
A type of virus that causes Kaposi sarcoma (a rare cancer in which lesions grow in the skin, lymph nodes, lining of the mouth, nose, and throat, and other tissues of the body). HHV8 also causes certain types of lymphoma (cancer that begins in cells of the immune system). Also called human herpesvirus 8, Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus, and KSHV.
HIFU
A procedure in which high-energy sound waves are aimed directly at an area of abnormal cells or tissue in the body. The waves create heat that kills the cells. HIFU is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer and some other types of cancer and other diseases. Also called high-intensity focused ultrasound therapy.
high blood pressure listen (hy blud PREH-sher)
A blood pressure of 140/90 or higher. High blood pressure usually has no symptoms. It can harm the arteries and cause an increase in the risk of stroke, heart attack, kidney failure, and blindness. Also called hypertension.
high blood sugar listen (hy blud SHUH-ger)
Higher than normal amount of glucose (a type of sugar) in the blood. High blood sugar can be a sign of diabetes or other conditions. Also called hyperglycemia.
high grade listen (hy grayd)
A term used to describe cells and tissue that look abnormal under a microscope. High-grade cancer cells tend to grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells. Cancer grade may be used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis. High-grade cancers usually have a worse prognosis than low-grade cancers and may need treatment right away or treatment that is more aggressive (intensive).
high-dose chemotherapy listen (hy-dose kee-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
An intensive drug treatment to kill cancer cells, but that also destroys the bone marrow and can cause other severe side effects. High-dose chemotherapy is usually followed by bone marrow or stem cell transplantation to rebuild the bone marrow.
high-dose radiation listen (hy-dose RAY-dee-AY-shun)
An amount of radiation that is greater than that given in typical radiation therapy. High-dose radiation is precisely directed at the tumor to avoid damaging healthy tissue, and may kill more cancer cells in fewer treatments. Also called HDR.
high-dose-rate remote brachytherapy listen (hy-dose-rayt ree-MOTE BRAY-kee-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of internal radiation treatment in which the radioactive source is removed between treatments. Also called high-dose-rate remote radiation therapy and remote brachytherapy.
high-dose-rate remote radiation therapy listen (hy-dose-rayt ree-MOTE RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of internal radiation treatment in which the radioactive source is removed between treatments. Also called high-dose-rate remote brachytherapy and remote brachytherapy.
high-energy photon therapy listen (hy-EH-ner-jee FOH-ton THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses high-energy photons (units of light energy). High-energy photons penetrate deeply into tissues to reach tumors while giving less radiation to superficial tissues such as the skin.
high-grade lymphoma listen (... lim-FOH-muh)
A type of lymphoma that grows and spreads quickly and has severe symptoms. Also called aggressive lymphoma and intermediate-grade lymphoma.
high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion listen (... SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul LEE-zhun)
An area of abnormal cells that forms on the surface of certain organs, such as the cervix, vagina, vulva, anus, and esophagus. High-grade squamous intraepithelial lesions look somewhat to very abnormal when looked at under a microscope. They are usually caused by chronic infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and are found when a Pap test or biopsy are done. If not treated, these abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. A high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion is sometimes called moderate or severe dysplasia. Also called HSIL.
high-intensity focused ultrasound therapy listen (hy-in-TEN-sih-tee FOH-kust UL-truh-sownd THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure in which high-energy sound waves are aimed directly at an area of abnormal cells or tissue in the body. The waves create heat that kills the cells. High-intensity focused ultrasound therapy is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer and some other types of cancer and other diseases. Also called HIFU.
highly active antiretroviral therapy listen (...AN-tee-REH-troh-VY-rul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses a combination of three or more drugs to treat HIV infection. Highly active antiretroviral therapy stops the virus from making copies of itself in the body. This may lessen the damage to the immune system caused by HIV and may slow down the development of AIDS. It may also help prevent transmission of HIV to others, including from mother to child during birth. Also called cART, combination antiretroviral therapy, and HAART.
high-risk cancer listen (hy-risk KAN-ser)
Cancer that is likely to recur (come back), or spread.
high-risk HPV listen (hy-risk …)
A type of human papilloma virus (HPV) that can cause cervical cancer and other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Most high-risk HPV infections go away on their own without treatment, and do not cause cancer. Also called high-risk human papillomavirus.
high-risk human papillomavirus listen (hy-risk HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus)
A type of human papilloma virus (HPV) that can cause cervical cancer and other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Most high-risk human papillomavirus infections go away on their own without treatment, and do not cause cancer. Also called high-risk HPV.
high-selenium Brassica juncea listen (hy-seh-LEE-nee-um BRA-sih-kuh JUN-see-uh)
Brassica juncea that has been grown in high levels of selenium. Brassica juncea is a plant of the cabbage family that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including arthritis, colds, stomach disorders, and tumors. The plant stores minerals, including selenium which may stop tumor cells from growing. High-selenium Brassica juncea is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Brassica juncea is also known as Indian mustard.
hilar listen (HY-ler)
Refers to the area where nerves and blood vessels attach to an organ.
HIPAA listen (HIH-puh)
A 1996 U.S. law that allows workers and their families to keep their health insurance when they change or lose their jobs. The privacy rule of the HIPAA protects the privacy of a person’s health information and keeps it from being misused. It gives people the right to receive and review their health records and to choose with whom their healthcare providers and health insurance companies share their information (including friends, family members, and caregivers). The law also includes standards for setting up and maintaining secure electronic health records. Also called Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and Kassebaum Kennedy Act.
Hirschsprung disease listen (HIRSH-sprung dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which certain nerve cells are missing from the muscle layers of part of the large intestine. This causes severe constipation or blockage of the large intestine. Constipation is when stool becomes hard, dry, and difficult to pass and bowel movements occur less often than normal. Other symptoms include swollen abdomen, vomiting, bloody diarrhea, gas, lack of energy, and trouble gaining weight. Hirschsprung disease is present from birth, but the symptoms may not appear until later in a child’s life. This condition has been linked to an increased risk of thyroid cancer and neuroblastoma. Also called aganglionic megacolon.
histamine listen (HIS-tuh-meen)
A substance that has many effects in the body. It is released from some types of white blood cells during allergic reactions. It causes small blood vessels to dilate (widen) and become leaky, which can cause tissues to swell. It also causes smooth muscles to contract, gastric acid to be made, and the heart rate to increase. Histamine is used in tests for allergies, asthma, and gastric acid secretion. It is a type of neurotransmitter.
histamine dihydrochloride listen (HIS-tuh-meen dy-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. When used together with interleukin-2, histamine dihydrochloride may help some immune cells find and kill tumor cells. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Maxamine.
histiocytoid hemangioma listen (HIS-tee-oh-SY-toyd hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A rare benign (not cancer) tumor of small blood vessels surrounded by lymphocytes and eosinophils (types of white blood cells). Histiocytoid hemangioma usually forms on or in the skin, especially the skin of the head, but can occur in other areas of the body, such as in bone. On the skin, it may appear as firm pink to red bumps that may be itchy or painful. If the tumor is in bone, it may cause swelling and pain. Histiocytoid hemangioma is sometimes caused by injury and often comes back after treatment. Histiocytoid hemangioma is most common in young and middle-aged adults. It is a type of vascular tumor. Also called angiolymphoid hyperplasia with eosinophilia and epithelioid hemangioma.
histiocytosis listen (HIS-tee-oh-sy-TOH-sis)
A group of rare disorders in which too many histiocytes (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs, including the skin, bones, spleen, liver, lungs, and lymph nodes. This can cause damage to tissue or tumors to form in one or more parts of the body. The tumor may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). There are different types of histiocytosis, including Langerhans cell histiocytosis (LCH), hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis (HLH), and malignant histiocytic disorders. Histiocytosis occurs most often in children, but can occur at any age.
histologic examination listen (HIS-tuh-LAH-jik eg-ZA-mih-NAY-shun)
The examination of tissue specimens under a microscope.
histologic grade listen (HIS-tuh-LAH-jik grayd)
A description of a tumor based on how abnormal the cancer cells and tissue look under a microscope and how quickly the cancer cells are likely to grow and spread. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells and tend to grow and spread more slowly than high-grade cancer cells. Grading systems are different for each type of cancer. They are used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis. Also called grade and tumor grade.
histology listen (his-TAH-loh-jee)
The study of tissues and cells under a microscope.
histone listen (HIS-tone)
A type of protein found in chromosomes. Histones bind to DNA, help give chromosomes their shape, and help control the activity of genes.
histone deacetylase listen (HIS-tone dee-uh-SEH-tih-lays)
An enzyme that removes a small molecule called an acetyl group from histones (proteins found in chromosomes). This changes the way the histones bind to DNA and may affect its activity. Histone deacetylase inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called HDAC.
histone deacetylase inhibitor listen (HIS-tone dee-uh-SEH-tih-lays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that causes a chemical change that stops tumor cells from dividing. Histone deacetylase inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called HDAC inhibitor.
histone methyltransferase inhibitor listen (HIS-tone MEH-thul-TRANZ-feh-rays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks certain enzymes involved in gene expression and cell division. These enzymes may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking them may help keep cancer cells from growing. Histone methyltransferase inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called HMT inhibitor.
histopathology listen (HIS-toh-puh-THAH-loh-jee)
The study of diseased cells and tissues using a microscope.
historic cohort study listen (hih-STOR-ik KOH-hort STUH-dee)
A research study in which the medical records of groups of individuals who are alike in many ways but differ by a certain characteristic (for example, female nurses who smoke and those who do not smoke) are compared for a particular outcome (such as lung cancer). Also called retrospective cohort study.
historical control subject listen (hih-STOR-ih-kul kun-TROLE SUB-jekt)
An individual treated in the past and used in a comparison group when researchers analyze the results of a clinical study that had no control group. The use of a control, or comparison, group helps researchers determine the effects of a new treatment more accurately.
HIV
The cause of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). Also called human immunodeficiency virus.
HIV antibody listen (... AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A substance produced by certain white blood cells in reaction to contact with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV).
HIV antibody test listen (… AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A test to check for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). An HIV antibody test checks for HIV antibodies in a sample of blood, urine, or saliva. It can take from 2 weeks to 6 months after a person is infected with HIV before the antibodies are found with this test. It is the most common type of HIV test.
HIV DNA test listen
A test to check for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). An HIV DNA test checks for DNA (genetic material) from the virus in a sample of blood. This test can find HIV in the blood about 9-11 days after the person is infected with the virus. An HIV DNA test may be used to test someone who has just become infected with HIV and it may also be used to test for infection in infants born to mothers infected with HIV.
HIV negative listen (... NEH-guh-tiv)
Refers to a person who is not infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS).
HIV positive listen (... PAH-zih-tiv)
Refers to a person who is infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS).
HIV RNA test listen
A test to check for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). An HIV RNA test checks for RNA (genetic material) from the virus in a sample of blood. This test can find HIV in the blood about 9-11 days after the person is infected with the virus. An HIV RNA test is used to test someone who may have just become infected with HIV.
HIV test listen (… test)
A test to check for human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) infection. HIV is the virus that causes acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). The most common type of HIV test is called the HIV antibody test, which checks for antibodies against HIV in a sample of blood, urine, or fluid from the mouth. It can take from 2 weeks to 6 months after a person is infected with HIV before the antibodies are found with an HIV antibody test. Another type of HIV test checks for RNA or DNA from HIV in a sample of blood. This test can find HIV in a person’s blood about 9-11 days after the person is infected with the virus.
HIV window period listen (… WIN-doh PEER-ee-ud)
The time period that starts when a person becomes infected with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and ends when the body makes enough antibodies against the virus or HIV DNA or RNA to be found with an HIV test. For the test that looks for antibodies against HIV, the HIV window period can last from 2 weeks to 6 months. For the HIV DNA or RNA test, the HIV window period is about 9-11 days. During the HIV window period, an infected person may have negative HIV test results but still be able to infect other people.
hives listen (hyvz)
Itchy, raised red areas on the skin. Hives are caused by a reaction to certain foods, drugs, infections, or emotional stress. Also called urticaria.
HLA
A type of molecule found on the surface of most cells in the body. HLAs play an important part in the body's immune response to foreign substances. They make up a person’s tissue type, which varies from person to person. HLA tests are done before a donor stem cell or organ transplant, to find out if tissues match between the donor and the person receiving the transplant. Also called human leukocyte antigen and human lymphocyte antigen.
HLA matching listen (… MA-ching)
A process in which blood or tissue samples are tested for human leukocyte antigens (HLAs). HLAs are molecules found on the surface of most cells in the body. They make up a person’s tissue type, which varies from person to person. They play an important part in the body's immune response to foreign substances. HLA matching is done before a donor stem cell or organ transplant to find out if tissues match between the donor and the person receiving the transplant. Also called human leukocyte antigen matching.
HLH
A rare disorder in which histiocytes and lymphocytes (types of white blood cells) build up in organs including the skin, spleen, and liver, and destroy other blood cells. HLH may be inherited or caused by certain conditions or diseases, including infections, immunodeficiency (inability of the body to fight infections), and cancer. Also called hemophagocytic lymphohistiocytosis.
hLL1
A substance being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma and several other types of cancer. It binds to CD74, a protein on the surface of myeloma cells and certain other types of cells. It may help kill cancer cells. hLL1 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called IMMU-110 and milatuzumab.
HLRCC
A rare, inherited disorder in which benign (not cancer) skin lesions called leiomyomas form in the smooth muscle tissue around the hair follicles. They usually form on the arms, legs, chest, and abdomen. Benign leiomyomas may also form as fibroids in the uterus in females. Patients with HLRCC have an increased risk of kidney cancer. The signs and symptoms of HLRCC usually do not appear until young adulthood. HLRCC is caused by a mutation in the FH gene. It is inherited in an autosomal dominant manner. Also called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer syndrome.
HMGA1
A protein that binds to the DNA and certain proteins in chromosomes. It is involved in many functions in the cell, and helps protect cells from dying. HMGA1 is found at high levels in several types of cancer cells.
HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor listen (HMG-koh-A ree-DUK-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme needed by the body to make cholesterol and lowers the amount of cholesterol in the blood. HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor drugs are called statins. Also called hydroxymethylglutaryl-coenzyme A reductase inhibitor.
HMR 1275
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It stops cells from dividing and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase (CDK) inhibitor. Also called alvocidib and flavopiridol.
HMT inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks certain enzymes involved in gene expression and cell division. These enzymes may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking them may help keep cancer cells from growing. HMT inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called histone methyltransferase inhibitor.
HNPCC
An inherited disorder in which affected individuals have a higher-than-normal chance of developing colorectal cancer and certain other types of cancer, often before the age of 50. Also called hereditary nonpolyposis colon cancer and Lynch syndrome.
Hodgkin disease listen (HOJ-kin dih-ZEEZ)
A cancer of the immune system that is marked by the presence of a type of cell called the Reed-Sternberg cell. The two major types of Hodgkin disease are classic Hodgkin lymphoma and nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma. Signs and symptoms include painless, swollen lymph nodes, an enlarged spleen, fever, weight loss, fatigue, and night sweats. Also called Hodgkin lymphoma.
Hodgkin lymphoma listen (HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
A cancer of the immune system that is marked by the presence of a type of cell called the Reed-Sternberg cell. The two major types of Hodgkin lymphoma are classic Hodgkin lymphoma and nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma. Signs and symptoms include painless, swollen lymph nodes, an enlarged spleen, fever, weight loss, fatigue, and night sweats. Also called Hodgkin disease.
holy thistle listen (... THIH-sul)
A plant whose leaves, stems, and flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Holy thistle may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Cnicus benedictus. Also called blessed thistle, cardin, spotted thistle, and St. Benedict's thistle.
homeopathic medicine listen (HOH-mee-uh-PA-thik MEH-dih-sin)
An alternative approach to medicine based on the belief that natural substances, prepared in a special way and used most often in very small amounts, restore health. According to these beliefs, in order for a remedy to be effective, it must cause in a healthy person the same symptoms being treated in the patient. Also called homeopathy.
homeopathy listen (HOH-mee-AH-puh-thee)
An alternative approach to medicine based on the belief that natural substances, prepared in a special way and used most often in very small amounts, restore health. According to these beliefs, in order for a remedy to be effective, it must cause in a healthy person the same symptoms being treated in the patient. Also called homeopathic medicine.
homeostasis listen (HOH-mee-oh-STAY-sis)
A state of balance among all the body systems needed for the body to survive and function correctly. In homeostasis, body levels of acid, blood pressure, blood sugar, electrolytes, energy, hormones, oxygen, proteins, and temperature are constantly adjusted to respond to changes inside and outside the body, to keep them at a normal level.
homeostatic listen (HOH-mee-oh-STA-tik)
Having to do with homeostasis, which is a state of balance among all the body systems, needed for the body to function correctly.
homoharringtonine listen (hoh-moh-HAYR-ing-tuh-neen)
A drug used to treat certain types of chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that have not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Homoharringtonine blocks certain proteins involved in cancer cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of plant alkaloid. Also called omacetaxine mepesuccinate and Synribo.
hookah listen (HOOK-uh)
A device used to smoke a special type of tobacco that comes in different flavors. In a hookah, charcoal is used to heat the tobacco. The smoke from the heated tobacco is cooled by passing it through a water-filled bowl. It is then inhaled through a flexible tube with a mouthpiece. Hookah tobacco smoke contains nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Hookah smoking can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause many of the same health problems as cigarette smoking. Hookah smoking is not safer than cigarette smoking. Also called water pipe.
hormonal contraception listen (hor-MOH-nul KON-truh-SEP-shun)
A type of birth control that uses hormones to prevent pregnancy. Hormonal contraceptives contain estrogen and progesterone, or progesterone only. They prevent pregnancy by blocking the release of eggs from the ovaries, thinning the lining of the uterus, or thickening the mucus in the cervix to help keep sperm from reaching the egg. Hormonal contraceptives may be taken by mouth, injected or inserted under the skin, placed on the skin as a patch, or placed in the vagina or uterus.
hormonal therapy listen (hor-MOH-nul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that adds, blocks, or removes hormones. For certain conditions (such as diabetes or menopause), hormones are given to adjust low hormone levels. Hormones can cause certain cancers (such as prostate and breast cancer) to grow. To slow or stop the growth of cancer, synthetic hormones or other drugs may be given to block the body’s natural hormones. Sometimes surgery is needed to remove the gland that makes a certain hormone. Also called endocrine therapy, hormone therapy, and hormone treatment.
hormone listen (HOR-mone)
One of many substances made by glands in the body. Hormones circulate in the bloodstream and control the actions of certain cells or organs. Some hormones can also be made in the laboratory.
hormone receptor listen (HOR-mone reh-SEP-ter)
A cell protein that binds a specific hormone. The hormone receptor may be on the surface of the cell or inside the cell. Many changes take place in a cell after a hormone binds to its receptor.
hormone receptor negative listen (HOR-mone reh-SEP-ter NEH-guh-tiv)
Describes cells that do not have a group of proteins that bind to a specific hormone. For example, some breast cancer cells do not have receptors for the hormones estrogen or progesterone. These cells are hormone receptor negative and they do not need estrogen or progesterone to grow. This can affect how the cancer is treated. Knowing if the cancer is hormone receptor negative may help plan treatment.
hormone receptor positive listen (HOR-mone reh-SEP-ter PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cells that have a group of proteins that bind to a specific hormone. For example, some breast cancer cells have receptors for the hormones estrogen or progesterone. These cells are hormone receptor positive and they need estrogen or progesterone to grow. This can affect how the cancer is treated. Knowing if the cancer is hormone receptor positive may help plan treatment.
hormone receptor test listen (HOR-mone reh-SEP-ter test)
A test to measure the amount of certain proteins, called hormone receptors, in cancer tissue. Hormones can attach to these proteins. A high level of hormone receptors may mean that hormones help the cancer grow.
hormone replacement therapy listen (HOR-mone reh-PLAYS-ment THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with hormones to replace natural hormones when the body does not make enough. For example, hormone replacement therapy may be given when the thyroid gland does not make enough thyroid hormone or when the pituitary gland does not make enough growth hormone. Or, it may be given to women after menopause to replace the hormones estrogen and progesterone that are no longer made by the body. Also called HRT.
hormone responsive listen (HOR-mone reh-SPONT-siv)
In oncology, describes cancer that responds to hormone treatment.
hormone therapy listen (HOR-mone THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that adds, blocks, or removes hormones. For certain conditions (such as diabetes or menopause), hormones are given to adjust low hormone levels. Hormones can cause certain cancers (such as prostate and breast cancer) to grow. To slow or stop the growth of cancer, synthetic hormones or other drugs may be given to block the body’s natural hormones. Sometimes surgery is needed to remove the gland that makes a certain hormone. Also called endocrine therapy, hormonal therapy, and hormone treatment.
hormone treatment listen (HOR-mone TREET-ment)
Treatment that adds, blocks, or removes hormones. For certain conditions (such as diabetes or menopause), hormones are given to adjust low hormone levels. Hormones can cause certain cancers (such as prostate and breast cancer) to grow. To slow or stop the growth of cancer, synthetic hormones or other drugs may be given to block the body’s natural hormones. Sometimes surgery is needed to remove the gland that makes a certain hormone. Also called endocrine therapy, hormonal therapy, and hormone therapy.
hormone-refractory listen (HOR-mone-reh-FRAK-tor-ee)
In medicine, describes a disease or condition that does not respond to treatment with hormones. Also called hormone-resistant.
hormone-resistant listen (HOR-mone-reh-ZIH-stunt)
In medicine, describes a disease or condition that does not respond to treatment with hormones. Also called hormone-refractory.
Horner syndrome listen (...SIN-drome)
A condition in which one side of the face is flushed, does not produce sweat, and has a constricted pupil and drooping eyelid. It can be caused by an injury to, or paralysis of, nerves in the neck, or by a tumor.
hospice listen (HOS-pis)
A program that gives special care to people who are near the end of life and have stopped treatment to cure or control their disease. Hospice offers physical, emotional, social, and spiritual support for patients and their families. The main goal of hospice care is to control pain and other symptoms of illness so patients can be as comfortable and alert as possible. It is usually given at home, but may also be given in a hospice center, hospital, or nursing home.
hospitalist listen (HOS-pih-tuh-list)
A medical doctor who manages and coordinates the daily medical care of patients while they are in the hospital. A hospitalist may also supervise and teach medical students, interns, and residents. A patient’s personal doctor will work with a hospitalist to care for his or her patient while the patient is in the hospital.
host cell listen (... sel)
A cell that is infected by a virus or another type of microorganism.
hot flash listen (hot flash)
A sudden, temporary onset of body warmth, flushing, and sweating (often associated with menopause).
hot nodule listen (hot NAH-jool)
When radioactive material is used to examine the thyroid with a scanner, nodules that collect more radioactive material than the surrounding thyroid tissue are considered "hot." Hot nodules are rarely malignant. Hot nodules are sometimes called hyperfunctioning nodules.
hotspot listen (hot-spot)
In genetics, an area of DNA that is likely to mutate (change).
HPPH
2-(1-hexyloxyethyl)-2-devinyl pyropheophorbide-a. A drug that is used in photodynamic therapy that is absorbed by tumor cells; when exposed to light, it becomes active and kills the cancer cells.
HPRC
A rare, inherited disorder that increases the risk of a type of kidney cancer called type 1 papillary kidney cancer. This cancer forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. HPRC often affects both kidneys, and often there is more than one tumor in each kidney. It is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called MET. HPRC is a type of hereditary cancer syndrome. Also called hereditary papillary renal cancer and hereditary papillary renal carcinoma.
HPV
A type of virus that can cause abnormal tissue growth (for example, warts) and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with certain types of HPV can cause cervical cancer. HPV may also play a role in some other types of cancer, such as anal, vaginal, vulvar, penile, and oropharyngeal cancers. Also called human papillomavirus.
HPV DNA test listen (... test)
A laboratory test in which cells are scraped from the cervix to look for DNA of human papillomaviruses (HPV). HPV can cause abnormal tissue growth (for example, warts) and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with certain types of HPV can cause cervical cancer. HPV can also play a role in other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Also called human papillomavirus DNA test.
HPV RNA test listen (… test)
A laboratory test in which cells are scraped from the cervix to look for RNA of the most common types of human papillomavirus (HPV). Certain types of HPV may cause abnormal tissue growth, such as warts, and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with other types of HPV may cause cervical cancer. An HPV RNA test may be done with a Pap test to check for HPV infection and cervical cancer. HPV infection may also cause other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Also called human papillomavirus RNA test.
HPV test listen
A laboratory test in which cells are tested for DNA or RNA from certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) that are known to cause cervical cancer. These high-risk types of HPV can also cause other types of cancer, including cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. An HPV test may be done at the same time as a Pap test for cervical cancer screening in women aged 30 to 65 years. An HPV test may also be done after certain abnormal Pap test results. Also called human papillomavirus test.
HPV vaccine listen (... vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent genital warts, anal cancer, cervical cancer, vulvar cancer, and vaginal cancer caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It is also used to prevent lesions that are caused by those viruses and that can lead to anal, cervical, vulvar, or vaginal cancer. Also called human papillomavirus vaccine.
HPV/Pap cotest listen
A procedure in which a human papillomavirus (HPV) test and a Pap test are done at the same time to check for cervical cancer. The HPV test looks for DNA or RNA from certain high-risk types of HPV in samples of cells taken from the cervix. The Pap test checks for cervical cancer cells and cell changes that may lead to cervical cancer. The same cell sample may be used for both the HPV test and the Pap test. Women aged 30 to 65 years may have an HPV/Pap cotest every 5 years. Cotesting is more likely to find abnormal cells or cervical cancer than a Pap test alone is. Also called Pap/HPV cotest.
HRAS gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called HRAS, which is involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth and cell death. Mutated (changed) forms of the HRAS gene may be found in some types of cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Also called H-RAS gene.
H-RAS gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called HRAS, which is involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth and cell death. Mutated (changed) forms of the H-RAS gene may be found in some types of cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Also called HRAS gene.
HRT
Treatment with hormones to replace natural hormones when the body does not make enough. For example, HRT may be given when the thyroid gland does not make enough thyroid hormone or when the pituitary gland does not make enough growth hormone. Or, it may be given to women after menopause to replace the hormones estrogen and progesterone that are no longer made by the body. Also called hormone replacement therapy.
HSIL
An area of abnormal cells that forms on the surface of certain organs, such as the cervix, vagina, vulva, anus, and esophagus. HSILs look somewhat to very abnormal when looked at under a microscope. They are usually caused by chronic infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and are found when a Pap test or biopsy are done. If not treated, these abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. A HSIL is sometimes called moderate or severe dysplasia. Also called high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.
HSP
One of a group of proteins that help protect cells from stresses such as heat, cold, and low amounts of oxygen or glucose (sugar). HSPs help other proteins function in normal cells and may be present at high levels in cancer cells. Blocking the activity of a HSP called HSP90 is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Other HSPs including HSP70 and gp96 are being studied in vaccines to treat cancer. Also called heat-shock protein and stress protein.
HSV
A type of virus that causes herpes infections and has DNA as its genetic material. There are two types of HSVs. Infections with type 1 viruses cause cold sores on the lips or nostrils. Infections with type 2 viruses cause sores on the genitals (external and internal sex organs and glands). Also called herpes simplex virus, HHV, and human herpesvirus.
HTLV-1
A type of virus that infects T cells (a type of white blood cell) and can cause leukemia and lymphoma. HTLV-1 is spread by sharing syringes or needles, through blood transfusions or sexual contact, and from mother to child during birth or breast-feeding. Also called human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 and human T-cell lymphotropic virus type 1.
hu14.18-interleukin-2 fusion protein listen (… in-ter-LOO-kin-2 FYOO-zhun PROH-teen)
An anticancer drug in which hu14.18, a monoclonal antibody, is combined with interleukin-2. The monoclonal antibody binds to the cancer cells and delivers IL-2, which stimulates the immune system to destroy the cancer cells.
Hu3S193
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. Hu3S193 binds to the protein Lewis(y), which is found on colon, breast, lung, ovary, and prostate cancer cells.
HuAFP31
A monoclonal antibody being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. HuAFP31 attaches to tumor cells that make alpha fetoprotein (AFP). This makes it easier for T cells to find and kill the tumor cells.
Huang Lian listen (hwang lyan)
A Chinese herb that has been used as a treatment for a variety of medical problems. It is being studied as an anticancer drug.
huC242-DM4
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is made by linking the monoclonal antibody huC242 to a toxic substance called maytansinoid DM4. The monoclonal antibody binds to the surfaces of cancer cells and the maytansinoid DM4 enters the cells and blocks their growth. It is a type of immunotoxin. Also called maytansinoid DM4-conjugated humanized monoclonal antibody huC242.
HuHMFG1
A monoclonal antibody that binds to the protein MUC1, which is found on breast, ovarian, pancreatic, gastric, and colon cancer cells. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. HuHMFG1 is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer.
HuLuc63
A drug used with lenalidomide and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients whose cancer was treated with one to three anticancer therapies. HuLuc63 binds to a protein called CS1, which is found on myeloma cells and some types of immune cells. HuLuc63 may block CS1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called elotuzumab and Empliciti.
human corticotropin-releasing factor listen (HYOO-mun KOR-tih-koh-TROH-pin-reh-LEE-sing FAK-ter)
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain cancer. It is made naturally by the hypothalamus (a part of the brain) and can also be made in the laboratory. Human corticotropin-releasing factor may help reduce symptoms caused by edema (swelling) of the brain. It is a type of neurohormone. Also called hCRF.
human EGF receptor 2 listen (HYOO-mun … reh-SEP-ter ...)
A protein involved in normal cell growth. Human EGF receptor 2 may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer cells, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Checking the amount of human EGF receptor 2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. Also called c-erbB-2, HER2, HER2/neu, and human epidermal growth factor receptor 2.
human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 listen (HYOO-mun eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter ...)
A protein involved in normal cell growth. Human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer cells, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Checking the amount of human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. Also called c-erbB-2, HER2, HER2/neu, and human EGF receptor 2.
human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 negative listen (HYOO-mun eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter … NEH-guh-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that do not have a large amount of a protein called HER2 on their surface. In normal cells, HER2 helps to control cell growth. Cancer cells that are human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 negative may grow more slowly and are less likely to recur (come back) or spread to other parts of the body than cancer cells that have a large amount of HER2 on their surface. Checking for the amount of HER2 on some types of cancer cells may help plan treatment. These cancers include breast, bladder, ovarian, pancreatic, and stomach cancers. Also called HER2 negative.
human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive listen (HYOO-mun eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter … PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have too much of a protein called HER2 on their surface. In normal cells, HER2 helps to control cell growth. When it is made in larger than normal amounts by cancer cells, the cells may grow more quickly and be more likely to spread to other parts of the body. Checking to see if a cancer is human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive may help plan treatment, which may include drugs that kill human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive cancer cells. Cancers that may be human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 positive include breast, bladder, pancreatic, ovarian, and stomach cancers. Also called c-erbB-2 positive and HER2 positive.
human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 test listen (HYOO-mun eh-pih-DER-mul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter 2 …)
A laboratory test that measures the amount of HER2 protein on cancer cells or how many copies of the HER2 gene are in the DNA. The HER2 protein is involved in normal cell growth. It may be made in larger than normal amounts by some types of cancer, including breast, ovarian, bladder, pancreatic, and stomach cancer. This may cause cancer cells to grow more quickly and spread to other parts of the body. A human epidermal growth factor receptor 2 test may be done to help plan treatment. It is a type of tumor marker test. Also called HER2 test and HER2/neu test.
human epididymis protein 4 listen (HYOO-mun eh-pih-DIH-dih-mis PROH-teen …)
A protein found on cells that line the lungs and reproductive organs, such as the ovaries. Human epididymis protein 4 may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including ovarian epithelial cancer. Measuring the amount of human epididymis protein 4 in the blood may help plan cancer treatment or find out if cancer is getting worse or has come back. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called HE4.
human herpesvirus listen (HYOO-mun HER-peez-VY-rus)
A type of virus that causes herpes infections and has DNA as its genetic material. There are two types of human herpesviruses. Infections with type 1 viruses cause cold sores on the lips or nostrils. Infections with type 2 viruses cause sores on the genitals (external and internal sex organs and glands). Also called herpes simplex virus, HHV, and HSV.
human herpesvirus 8 listen (HYOO-mun HER-peez-VY-rus...)
A type of virus that causes Kaposi sarcoma (a rare cancer in which lesions grow in the skin, lymph nodes, lining of the mouth, nose, and throat, and other tissues of the body). Human herpesvirus 8 also causes certain types of lymphoma (cancer that begins in cells of the immune system). Also called HHV8, Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus, and KSHV.
human immunodeficiency virus listen (HYOO-mun IH-myoo-noh-deh-FIH-shun-see VY-rus)
The cause of acquired immunodeficiency syndrome (AIDS). Also called HIV.
human leukocyte antigen listen (HYOO-mun LOO-koh-site AN-tih-jen)
A type of molecule found on the surface of most cells in the body. Human leukocyte antigens play an important part in the body's immune response to foreign substances. They make up a person’s tissue type, which varies from person to person. Human leukocyte antigen tests are done before a donor stem cell or organ transplant, to find out if tissues match between the donor and the person receiving the transplant. Also called HLA and human lymphocyte antigen.
human leukocyte antigen matching listen (HYOO-mun LOO-koh-site AN-tih-jen MA-ching)
A process in which blood or tissue samples are tested for human leukocyte antigens (HLAs). HLAs are molecules found on the surface of most cells in the body. They make up a person’s tissue type, which varies from person to person. They play an important part in the body's immune response to foreign substances. Human leukocyte antigen matching is done before a donor stem cell or organ transplant to find out if tissues match between the donor and the person receiving the transplant. Also called HLA matching.
human lymphocyte antigen listen (HYOO-mun LIM-foh-site AN-tih-jen)
A type of molecule found on the surface of most cells in the body. Human lymphocyte antigens play an important part in the body's immune response to foreign substances. They make up a person’s tissue type, which varies from person to person. Human lymphocyte antigen tests are done before a donor stem cell or organ transplant, to find out if tissues match between the donor and the person receiving the transplant. Also called HLA and human leukocyte antigen.
human papillomavirus listen (HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus)
A type of virus that can cause abnormal tissue growth (for example, warts) and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with certain types of human papillomavirus can cause cervical cancer. Human papillomavirus may also play a role in some other types of cancer, such as anal, vaginal, vulvar, penile, and oropharyngeal cancers. Also called HPV.
human papillomavirus DNA test listen (HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus …)
A laboratory test in which cells are scraped from the cervix to look for DNA of human papillomaviruses (HPV). HPV can cause abnormal tissue growth (for example, warts) and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with certain types of HPV can cause cervical cancer. HPV can also play a role in other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Also called HPV DNA test.
human papillomavirus RNA test listen (HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus … test)
A laboratory test in which cells are scraped from the cervix to look for RNA of the most common types of human papillomavirus (HPV). Certain types of HPV may cause abnormal tissue growth, such as warts, and other changes to cells. Infection for a long time with other types of HPV may cause cervical cancer. A human papillomavirus RNA test may be done with a Pap test to check for HPV infection and cervical cancer. HPV infection may also cause other types of cancer, such as cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. Also called HPV RNA test.
human papillomavirus test listen (HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus …)
A laboratory test in which cells are tested for DNA or RNA from certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) that are known to cause cervical cancer. These high-risk types of HPV can also cause other types of cancer, including cancers of the anus, vagina, vulva, penis, and oropharynx. A human papillomavirus test may be done at the same time as a Pap test for cervical cancer screening in women aged 30 to 65 years. A human papillomavirus test may also be done after certain abnormal Pap test results. Also called HPV test.
human papillomavirus vaccine listen (HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent genital warts, anal cancer, cervical cancer, vulvar cancer, and vaginal cancer caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It is also used to prevent lesions that are caused by those viruses and that can lead to anal, cervical, vulvar, or vaginal cancer. Also called HPV vaccine.
human participant protection regulations listen (HYOO-mun par-TIH-sih-punt proh-TEK-shun REH-gyoo-LAY-shunz)
Laws set by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) to protect a person from risks in research studies that any federal agency or department has a part in. Also called 45 CFR 46, 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 46, and Protection of Human Subjects.
human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 listen (HYOO-mun T-sel loo-KEE-mee-uh VY-rus...)
A type of virus that infects T cells (a type of white blood cell) and can cause leukemia and lymphoma. Human T-cell leukemia virus type 1 is spread by sharing syringes or needles, through blood transfusions or sexual contact, and from mother to child during birth or breast-feeding. Also called HTLV-1 and human T-cell lymphotropic virus type 1.
human T-cell lymphotropic virus type 1 listen (HYOO-mun T-sel LIM-foh-TROH-pik VY-rus...)
A type of virus that infects T cells (a type of white blood cell) and can cause leukemia and lymphoma. Human T-cell lymphotropic virus type 1 is spread by sharing syringes or needles, through blood transfusions or sexual contact, and from mother to child during birth or breast-feeding. Also called HTLV-1 and human T-cell leukemia virus type 1.
humanized monoclonal antibody listen (HYOO-muh-nized MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A type of antibody made in the laboratory by combining a human antibody with a small part of a mouse or rat monoclonal antibody. The mouse or rat part of the antibody binds to the target antigen, and the human part makes it less likely to be destroyed by the body's immune system.
humanized monoclonal antibody MEDI-522 listen (HYOO-muh-nized MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Humanized monoclonal antibody MEDI-522 binds to a protein on the surface of blood vessels and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It may also prevent the spread of cancer. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent, a type of metastasis inhibitor, and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Abegrin, etaracizumab, and MEDI-522.
HuMax-CD20
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. HuMax-CD20 binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. HuMax-CD20 may block CD20 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Arzerra and ofatumumab.
humidifier listen (hyoo-MIH-dih-fy-er)
A machine that puts moisture in the air.
humor therapy listen (HYOO-mer THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses humor to help relieve pain and stress and improve a person’s sense of well-being. It may be used to help people cope with a serious disease, such as cancer. Humor therapy may include laughter exercises, clowns, and comedy movies, books, games, and puzzles. It is a type of complementary therapy. Also called laughter therapy.
Hurthle cell neoplasm listen (HEERT-leh...NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
An uncommon type of thyroid tumor that can be benign or malignant.
hyaluronidase listen (HY-al-yoo-RAH-nih-days)
An enzyme that breaks down a substance in the body called hyaluronic acid. Hyaluronic acid is found throughout the body in connective tissue, skin, and fluids in the joints and inside the eye. It causes fluids to have a jelly-like thickness, which can help moisten and protect tissues and joints. In medicine, hyaluronidase is made in the laboratory and given with other drugs by injection under the skin to treat certain conditions. Using hyaluronidase to break down hyaluronic acid helps make the fluids and connective tissue thinner so the drugs can move more easily into the tissues.
Hycamtin listen (hy-KAM-tin)
A drug used to treat certain types of ovarian cancer, small cell lung cancer, and cervical cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Hycamtin blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called topotecan hydrochloride.
hydatidiform mole listen (HY-duh-TIH-dih-form...)
A slow-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta) after fertilization of an egg by a sperm. A hydatidiform mole contains many cysts (sacs of fluid). It is usually benign (not cancer) but it may spread to nearby tissues (invasive mole). It may also become a malignant tumor called choriocarcinoma. Hydatidiform mole is the most common type of gestational trophoblastic tumor. Also called molar pregnancy.
hydration listen (hy-DRAY-shun)
The process of combining with water. In medicine, the process of giving fluids needed by the body.
hydrazine sulfate listen (HY-druh-ZEEN SUL-fayt)
A substance that has been studied as a treatment for cancer and as a treatment for cachexia (body wasting) associated with advanced cancer.
Hydrea listen (hy-DREE-uh)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also used with radiation therapy and other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of head and neck cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Hydrea stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Hydrea contains the active ingredient hydroxyurea. It is a type of antimetabolite.
hydrocarbon listen (HY-droh-KAR-bun)
A substance made of only hydrogen and carbon. Examples of hydrocarbons are coal, petroleum, natural gas and tar. They are used as energy sources. Being exposed to hydrocarbons may increase the risk of certain types of cancer.
hydrocephalus listen (HY-droh-SEH-fuh-lus)
The abnormal buildup of cerebrospinal fluid in the ventricles of the brain.
hydrocodone bitartrate listen (HY-droh-KOH-done by-TAR-trayt)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain and cough. Hydrocodone bitartrate is made from codeine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent, a type of antitussive, and a type of opiate.
hydrocortisone listen (HY-droh-KOR-tih-sone)
A drug used to relieve the symptoms of certain hormone shortages and to suppress an immune response.
hydrogen cyanide listen (HY-droh-jen SY-uh-nide)
A liquid or gas form of cyanide. Cyanide is a poisonous chemical found in some foods and plants, tobacco smoke, and when certain substances are burned. It is used to make products, such as paper, fabric, and plastic, and is used as a pesticide. Cyanide keeps cells in the body from using oxygen, so they die. Exposure to cyanide may cause serious health problems, including death.
hydrogen peroxide listen (HY-droh-jen peh-ROK-side)
A chemical used in bleaches, dyes, cleansers, antiseptics, and disinfectants. In a concentrated form, it is toxic and irritating to tissues.
hydrolysis listen (hy-DRAH-lih-sis)
A chemical reaction that uses water to break down a compound.
hydromorphone hydrochloride listen (HY-droh-MOR-fone HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It may also be used to treat certain types of cough. Hydromorphone hydrochloride is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Dilaudid, Exalgo, and Hydrostat IR.
hydronephrosis listen (HY-droh-neh-FROH-sis)
Abnormal enlargement of a kidney, which may be caused by blockage of the ureter (such as by a kidney stone) or chronic kidney disease that prevents urine from draining into the bladder.
Hydrostat IR listen (HY-droh-STAT …)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It may also be used to treat certain types of cough. Hydrostat IR is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Dilaudid, Exalgo, and hydromorphone hydrochloride.
hydroureter listen (HY-droh-YER-eh-ter)
Abnormal enlargement of the ureter caused by any blockage that prevents urine from draining into the bladder.
hydroxychloroquine listen (hy-DROK-see-KLOR-oh-kwin)
A substance that decreases immune responses in the body. It is used to treat some autoimmune diseases, and is being studied as a treatment for graft-versus-host disease. Hydroxychloroquine belongs to the family of drugs called antiprotozoals.
hydroxydaunorubicin listen (hy-DROK-see-DAW-noh-ROO-bih-sin)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer, including leukemia, lymphoma, neuroblastoma, sarcoma, Wilms tumor, and cancers of the lung, breast, stomach, ovary, thyroid, and bladder. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Hydroxydaunorubicin comes from the bacterium Streptomyces peucetius. It damages DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. The brand names Adriamycin PFS, Adriamycin RDF, and Rubex have been taken off the market and are no longer available. Also called doxorubicin and doxorubicin hydrochloride.
hydroxymethylglutaryl-coenzyme A reductase inhibitor listen (hy-DROK-see-MEH-thul-GLOO-tuh-ril-koh-EN-zime A ree-DUK-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme needed by the body to make cholesterol and lowers the amount of cholesterol in the blood. Hydroxymethylglutaryl-coenzyme A reductase inhibitor drugs are called statins. Also called HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor.
hydroxyurea listen (hy-DROK-see-yoo-REE-uh)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also used with radiation therapy and other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of head and neck cancer. It is used under the brand name Hydrea to treat these cancers. It is also used under the brand name Droxia to treat certain patients with sickle cell anemia. Hydroxyurea is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Hydroxyurea is a type of antimetabolite.
hygiene listen (HY-jeen)
The science of health, and the practice of cleanliness that promotes good health and well-being.
hyperactivity listen (HY-per-ak-TIH-vih-tee)
A higher than normal level of activity. Hyperactivity can be used to describe the increased action of a body function, such as hormone production, or behavior. A person who is hyperactive may seem to be always moving or fidgeting, impulsive, unable to concentrate, and talking too much.
hyperalgesia listen (HY-per-al-JEE-zee-uh)
An increased sensitivity to feeling pain and an extreme response to pain. Hyperalgesia may occur when there is damage to the nerves or chemical changes to the nerve pathways involved in sensing pain. This may be caused by tissue injury or inflammation or by taking certain drugs, such as opioids, for chronic pain. People with hyperalgesia tend to feel extreme pain even though an injury or medical condition has not gotten worse. This pain may get worse over time, and it may extend to other areas of the body. It may also become a new or different type of pain than the original pain.
hyperalimentation listen (HY-per-A-lih-men-TAY-shun)
A form of nutrition that is delivered into a vein. Hyperalimentation does not use the digestive system. It may be given to people who are unable to absorb nutrients through the intestinal tract because of vomiting that won't stop, severe diarrhea, or intestinal disease. It may also be given to those undergoing high-dose chemotherapy or radiation and bone marrow transplantation. It is possible to give all of the protein, calories, vitamins and minerals a person needs using hyperalimentation. Also called parenteral nutrition, total parenteral nutrition, and TPN.
hyperbaric oxygen listen (HY-per-BAYR-ik OK-sih-jen)
Oxygen that is given at a pressure that is higher than the pressure of the atmosphere at sea level. In medicine, breathing hyperbaric oxygen increases the amount of oxygen in the body. It is used in treating certain kinds of wounds, injuries, and infections. It is also used to treat carbon monoxide poisoning and other conditions in which the tissues are not getting enough oxygen. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Hyperbaric oxygen may increase the amount of oxygen in cancer cells, which may make them easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. It is a type of radiosensitizing agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent.
hyperbilirubinemia listen (HY-per-bih-lih-ROO-bih-NEE-mee-uh)
Higher-than-normal amount of bilirubin in the blood. Bilirubin is a substance formed when red blood cells break down.
hypercalcemia listen (HY-per-kal-SEE-mee-uh)
Higher than normal levels of calcium in the blood. Some types of cancer increase the risk of hypercalcemia.
hyper-CVAD listen (HY-per ...)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat some types of acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) and non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL). Hyper-CVAD includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and dexamethasone. It also includes the drugs methotrexate and cytarabine. It is given as hyperfractionated therapy, in which the total dose of the drugs is divided into small doses and given more than once a day. Also called hyper-CVAD regimen.
hyper-CVAD regimen listen (HY-per ... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat some types of acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) and non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL). Hyper-CVAD regimen includes the drugs cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and dexamethasone. It also includes the drugs methotrexate and cytarabine. It is given as hyperfractionated therapy, in which the total dose of the drugs is divided into small doses and given more than once a day. Also called hyper-CVAD.
hyperfractionated radiation therapy listen (HY-per-FRAK-shuh-NAY-ted RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is divided into small doses and treatments are given more than once a day. Hyperfractionated radiation therapy is given over the same period of time (days or weeks) as standard radiation therapy. Also called superfractionated radiation therapy.
hyperfractionation listen (HY-per-FRAK-shuh-NAY-shun)
A treatment schedule in which the total dose of radiation or chemotherapy is divided into small doses and treatments are given more than once a day.
hyperglycemia listen (HY-per-gly-SEE-mee-uh)
Higher than normal amount of glucose (a type of sugar) in the blood. Hyperglycemia can be a sign of diabetes or other conditions. Also called high blood sugar.
Hypericum perforatum listen (hy-PAYR-ih-kum per-fuh-RAY-tum)
An herbal product sold as an over-the-counter treatment for depression. It is being studied for its ability to lessen certain side effects of cancer treatment. Also called St. John's wort.
hyperkeratosis listen (HY-per-KAYR-uh-TOH-sis)
A condition marked by thickening of the outer layer of the skin, which is made of keratin (a tough, protective protein). It can result from normal use (corns, calluses), chronic inflammation (eczema), or genetic disorders (X-linked ichthyosis, ichthyosis vulgaris).
hypernephroma listen (HY-per-neh-FROH-muh)
The most common type of kidney cancer. It begins in the lining of the renal tubules in the kidney. The renal tubules filter the blood and produce urine. Also called renal cell adenocarcinoma, renal cell cancer, and renal cell carcinoma.
hyperparathyroidism listen (HY-per-PAYR-uh-THY-roy-dih-zum)
A condition in which the parathyroid gland (one of four pea-sized organs found on the thyroid) makes too much parathyroid hormone. This causes a loss of calcium from the bones and an increased level of calcium in the blood. Symptoms include bone pain and kidney problems.
hyperplasia listen (HY-per-PLAY-zhuh)
An increase in the number of cells in an organ or tissue. These cells appear normal under a microscope. They are not cancer, but may become cancer.
hypersensitivity listen (HY-per-SEN-sih-tih-vih-tee)
An exaggerated response by the immune system to a drug or other substance.
hypertension listen (HY-per-TEN-shun)
A blood pressure of 140/90 or higher. Hypertension usually has no symptoms. It can harm the arteries and cause an increase in the risk of stroke, heart attack, kidney failure, and blindness. Also called high blood pressure.
hyperthermia listen (HY-per-THER-mee-uh)
Abnormally high body temperature. This may be caused as part of treatment, by an infection, or by exposure to heat.
hyperthermia therapy listen (HY-per-THER-mee-uh THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment in which body tissue is exposed to high temperatures to damage and kill cancer cells or to make cancer cells more sensitive to the effects of radiation and certain anticancer drugs.
hyperthermic perfusion listen (HY-per-THER-mik per-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure in which a warmed solution containing anticancer drugs is used to bathe, or is passed through the blood vessels of, the tissue or organ containing the tumor.
hyperthyroidism listen (HY-per-THY-roy-dih-zum)
Too much thyroid hormone. Symptoms include weight loss, chest pain, cramps, diarrhea, and nervousness. Also called overactive thyroid.
hyperuricemia listen (HY-per-YOO-rih-SEE-mee-uh)
A buildup of uric acid (a byproduct of metabolism) in the blood. Hyperuricemia is a side effect of some anticancer drugs.
hypervascular listen (HY-per-VAS-kyoo-ler)
Having a large number of blood vessels.
hypnosis listen (hip-NOH-sis)
A trance-like state in which a person becomes more aware and focused on particular thoughts, feelings, images, sensations, or behaviors. While under hypnosis, a person may feel calm, relaxed, and more open to suggestion. Hypnosis is usually done with the help of a specially trained therapist. It may be used to help relieve stress, anxiety, and pain, and to help a person quit smoking or lose weight. Hypnosis is a type of complementary and alternative medicine (CAM).
hypofractionated radiation therapy listen (HY-poh-FRAK-shuh-NAY-ted RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is divided into large doses and treatments are given once a day or less often. Hypofractionated radiation therapy is given over a shorter period of time (fewer days or weeks) than standard radiation therapy.
hypofractionation listen (HY-poh-FRAK-shuh-NAY-shun)
A treatment schedule in which the total dose of radiation is divided into large doses and treatments are given once a day or less often.
hypogammaglobulinemia listen (HY-poh-GA-muh-GLAH-byoo-lih-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the level of immunoglobulins (antibodies) in the blood is low and the risk of infection is high.
hypoglycemia listen (HY-poh-gly-SEE-mee-uh)
Abnormally low blood sugar.
hypohidrosis listen (HY-poh-hih-DROH-sis)
A rare condition in which the sweat glands make little or no sweat. It can affect the whole body or a small part of the body. Hypohidrosis may be caused by severe burns, radiation, infection, inflammation, or other injuries to the skin. It may also be caused by certain medicines and some conditions that affect the skin, nerves, connective tissue, or sweat glands. It may be inherited as part of a genetic condition or develop later in life. Also called anhidrosis.
hypomagnesemia listen (HY-poh-MAG-neh-SEE-mee-uh)
Lower-than-normal amount of magnesium in the blood.
hyponatremia listen (HY-poh-nuh-TREE-mee-uh)
Lower-than-normal amount of sodium in the blood.
hypopharyngeal cancer listen (HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the hypopharynx (the bottom part of the throat). The most common type is squamous cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the hypopharynx).
hypopharynx listen (HY-poh-FAYR-inx)
The bottom part of the throat. Cancer of the hypopharynx is also known as hypopharyngeal cancer.
hypophosphatemia listen (HY-poh-FOS-fuh-TEE-mee-uh)
Lower-than-normal amount of phosphorus in the blood.
hypospadias listen (HY-poh-SPAY-dee-us)
A birth defect in which the opening of the urethra (the tube through which urine leaves the body) is not in its normal place. In males with hypospadias, the urethra opens on the underside of the penis or between the anus and the scrotum. In females with hypospadias, it opens into the vagina. Hypospadias is much more common in males than in females, and can be corrected by surgery. Children with hypospadias have an increased risk of developing Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer).
hypotension listen (HY-poh-TEN-shun)
Abnormally low blood pressure.
hypothalamus listen (HY-poh-THA-luh-mus)
The area of the brain that controls body temperature, hunger, and thirst.
hypothesis listen (hy-PAH-theh-sis)
A tentative proposal made to explain certain observations or facts that requires further investigation to be verified.
hypothyroidism listen (HY-poh-THY-roy-dih-zum)
Too little thyroid hormone. Symptoms include weight gain, constipation, dry skin, and sensitivity to the cold. Also called underactive thyroid.
hypotrichosis listen (HY-poh-trih-KOH-sis)
A rare condition in which there is little or no hair growth on the head, including the brows above the eyes and the edge of the eyelids, or other areas of the body where hair normally grows. Hair in the affected areas usually stays short and is dry and rough. It may also be tightly curled, lighter in color, and break easily. Hypotrichosis is usually congenital (present at birth) and is linked to several different genetic syndromes.
hypoxemia listen (HY-pok-SEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which there is not enough oxygen in the blood.
hypoxia listen (hy-POK-see-uh)
A condition in which there is a decrease in the oxygen supply to a tissue. In cancer treatment, the level of hypoxia in a tumor may help predict the response of the tumor to the treatment.
hypoxic listen (hy-POK-sik)
Having too little oxygen.
hysterectomy listen (HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the uterus and, sometimes, the cervix. When the uterus and the cervix are removed, it is called a total hysterectomy. When only the uterus is removed, it is called a partial hysterectomy.
Hytrin listen (HY-trin)
A drug used to treat urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. It is also used to treat high blood pressure and is being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Hytrin relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate. It is a type of alpha blocker. Also called terazosin hydrochloride.
ibandronate listen (i-BAN-droh-nayt)
A drug that is used to prevent and treat osteoporosis, and is being studied in the treatment of cancer that has spread to the bones. It belongs to the family of drugs called bisphosphonates.
IBMFS
Inherited bone marrow failure syndrome. A rare disorder in which a person’s bone marrow is unable to make enough blood cells and there is a family history of the same disorder. There are several different inherited bone marrow failure syndromes. Patients with an IBMFS are at high risk of forming acute leukemia or certain solid tumors. Also called inherited bone marrow failure syndrome.
Ibrance listen (I-brans)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2 negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with fulvestrant in women whose disease has gotten worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ibrance blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called palbociclib.
ibritumomab tiuxetan listen (ih-brih-TOO-moh-mab ty-UK-seh-tan)
A drug used to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ibritumomab tiuxetan contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells and some types of lymphoma cells. It also contains the compound tiuxetan, which allows certain radioactive substances to be attached to the monoclonal antibody. This may help kill cancer cells. Ibritumomab tiuxetan is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immunoconjugate. Also called Zevalin.
ibrutinib listen (i-BROO-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, small lymphocytic lymphoma, and Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia (a type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma). It is also used to treat mantle cell lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma in patients who have received at least one other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ibrutinib blocks a protein called Bruton’s tyrosine kinase (BTK), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Imbruvica.
IBS
A disorder of the intestines commonly marked by abdominal pain, bloating, and changes in a person’s bowel habits. This may include diarrhea or constipation, or both, with one occurring after the other. Also called irritable bowel syndrome, irritable colon, mucus colitis, and spastic colon.
ibuprofen listen (I-byoo-PROH-fen)
A drug used to treat fever, swelling, pain, and redness by preventing the body from making a substance that causes inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called Advil and Motrin.
ICD
A small device used to correct a heartbeat that is abnormal (too fast, too slow, or irregular). The device is placed by surgery in the chest or abdomen. Wires are passed through a vein to connect the device to the heart. When it detects abnormal heartbeats, it sends an electrical shock to the heart to restore the heartbeat to normal. Also called implantable cardioverter-defibrillator.
ICE listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin and Hodgkin lymphomas that have come back and do not respond to other treatments. It includes the drugs ifosfamide, carboplatin, and etoposide phosphate. Also called ICE regimen.
ICE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin and Hodgkin lymphomas that have come back and do not respond to other treatments. It includes the drugs ifosfamide, carboplatin, and etoposide phosphate. Also called ICE.
ICI 182780
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer. It is used alone in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy or whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used with palbociclib or abemaciclib in women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ICI 182780 binds to proteins called estrogen receptors, which are found in some breast cancer cells. These proteins may cause cancer cells to grow. ICI 182780 blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiestrogen. Also called Faslodex and fulvestrant.
ICI D1694
An anticancer drug that stops tumor cells from growing by blocking the ability of cells to make DNA. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors. Also called raltitrexed.
Iclusig listen (i-KLOO-sig)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) and Philadelphia chromosome-positive acute lymphoblastic leukemia. It is used in patients whose cancer has the T315I mutation or whose cancer cannot be treated with other tyrosine kinase inhibitors. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Iclusig blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Iclusig is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called ponatinib hydrochloride.
Idamycin PFS listen (I-duh-MY-sin ...)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Idamycin PFS blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called 4-demethoxydaunorubicin and idarubicin hydrochloride.
idarubicin hydrochloride listen (I-duh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Idarubicin hydrochloride blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called 4-demethoxydaunorubicin and Idamycin PFS.
IDEC-Y2B8
A drug used with the drug rituximab to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of B-cell tumors. IDEC-Y2B8 contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. IDEC-Y2B8 is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan, 90Y-Zevalin, and yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan.
idelalisib listen (i-deh-luh-LIH-sib)
A drug used with rituximab to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) that has come back. It is also used to treat follicular B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) and small lymphocytic lymphoma (SLL) that have come back after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Idelalisib blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called Zydelig.
IDH1 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called isocitrate dehydrogenase 1 (IDH1). The IDH1 protein helps break down fats for energy and protect cells from harmful molecules. Mutations (changes) in the IDH1 gene have been found in several genetic conditions and in some types of cancer, including acute myelogenous leukemia, myelodysplastic syndromes, and brain cancer. These changes may cause abnormal cells, including cancer cells, to grow and spread in the body. Also called isocitrate dehydrogenase-1 gene.
IDH2 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called isocitrate dehydrogenase 2 (IDH2). This protein is found inside small structures in cells called mitochondria. The IDH2 protein helps the mitochondria make energy for many cell functions. Mutations (changes) in the IDH2 gene have been found in some types of cancer, including acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) and brain cancer, and in certain genetic conditions. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Also called isocitrate dehydrogenase-2 gene.
Idhifa listen (ide-HEE-fuh)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has recurred (come back) or has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called isocitrate dehydrogenase-2 (IDH2). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Idhifa blocks the protein made by the mutated IDH2 gene. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Idhifa is a type of enzyme inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called enasidenib mesylate.
idiopathic listen (IH-dee-oh-PA-thik)
Describes a disease of unknown cause.
idiopathic myelofibrosis listen (IH-dee-oh-PA-thik MY-eh-loh-fy-BROH-sis)
A progressive, chronic disease in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue and blood is made in organs such as the liver and the spleen, instead of in the bone marrow. This disease is marked by an enlarged spleen and progressive anemia. Also called agnogenic myeloid metaplasia, chronic idiopathic myelofibrosis, myelosclerosis with myeloid metaplasia, and primary myelofibrosis.
idiopathic pneumonia syndrome listen (IH-dee-oh-PA-thik noo-MOH-nyuh SIN-drome)
A set of pneumonia-like symptoms (such as fever, chills, coughing, and breathing problems) that occur with no sign of infection in the lung. Idiopathic pneumonia syndrome is a serious condition that can occur after a stem cell transplant.
idiopathic pulmonary fibrosis listen (IH-dee-oh-PA-thik PUL-muh-NAYR-ee fy-BROH-sis)
A disease in which the alveoli (tiny air sacs at the end of the bronchioles in the lungs) are overgrown with fibrous tissue. The cause of the disease is unknown and it gets worse over time. Symptoms include difficult, painful breathing and shortness of breath.
idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura listen (IH-dee-oh-PA-thik THROM-boh-sy-toh-PEE-nik PUR-pyoo-ruh)
A condition in which platelets (blood cells that cause blood clots to form) are destroyed by the immune system. The low platelet count causes easy bruising and bleeding, which may be seen as purple areas in the skin, mucous membranes, and outer linings of organs. Also called immune thrombocytopenia, immune thrombocytopenic purpura, and ITP.
idoxifene listen (i-DOK-sih-feen)
A drug that blocks the effects of estrogen.
idoxuridine listen (I-dox-YOOR-ih-deen)
A drug that reduces the risk of cancer cell growth by interfering with the cells' DNA.
IEN
A condition in which abnormal cells are found on the surface of or in the tissue that lines an organ, such as the prostate, breast, or cervix. The changes in the cells may be low grade or high grade, depending on how much of the tissue is affected and how abnormal the cells look under a microscope. Sometimes, the abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Also called intraepithelial neoplasia.
IEP
An education plan for children with certain disabilities or health conditions, such as cancer. By law, these children must receive special education services and other support they need in school. An IEP describes which special services the child needs and how those needs will be met. This may include special class placement, extra help with class assignments and tests, tutoring, and other services such as counseling, speech therapy, and physical therapy. IEPs are covered in the U.S. law, Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. Also called individualized education plan.
IFA
A mixture of oil and water that is combined with a specific antigen to boost the immune response to that antigen. It is being studied in immunotherapy and as a way to increase the immune response to cancer vaccines. It is a type of immune modulator. Also called incomplete Freund's adjuvant and Montanide ISA-51.
Ifex listen (I-fex)
A drug used with other drugs to treat malignant testicular germ cell tumors that have already been treated with two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ifex damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of antimetabolite. Also called ifosfamide.
IFN alpha-2B listen (… AL-fuh …)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in certain patients, hairy cell leukemia, and melanoma that has been removed by surgery. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat a certain type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. IFN alpha-2B is also used to treat some infections caused by viruses, such as the hepatitis C virus. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. IFN alpha-2B is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) and is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called interferon alfa-2b, Intron A, and recombinant interferon alfa-2b.
iFOBT
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called fecal immunochemical test, FIT, immunoassay fecal occult blood test, immunochemical fecal occult blood test, and immunologic fecal occult blood test.
ifosfamide listen (i-FOS-fuh-mide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat malignant testicular germ cell tumors that have already been treated with two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ifosfamide damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of antimetabolite. Also called Ifex.
Ig listen (I-jee)
A protein that is made by B cells and plasma cells (types of white blood cells) and helps the body fight infection. Some Igs may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain conditions or certain types of cancer, including multiple myeloma and Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia. Measuring the amount of specific Igs in the blood and urine may help diagnose cancer or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. Some Igs may be used as tumor markers. Also called immunoglobulin.
IGF
A protein made by the body that stimulates the growth of many types of cells. IGF is similar to insulin (a hormone made in the pancreas). There are two forms of IGF called IGF-1 and IGF-2. Higher than normal levels of IGF-1 may increase the risk of several types of cancer. IGF is a type of growth factor and a type of cytokine. Also called insulin-like growth factor and somatomedin.
IGF-1R inhibitor OSI-906 listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks a protein called IGF-1R, which is found at high levels in some types of tumors. IGF-1R is needed for cell growth and blocking it may cause tumor cells to die. IGF-1R inhibitor OSI-906 is a type of IGF-1R inhibitor. Also called OSI-906.
IGFR
A protein found on the surface of some types of cells that binds to insulin-like growth factor (IGF). This causes the cells to grow and divide. IGFR is found at high levels on the surface of several types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow rapidly in the presence of IGF. Also called insulin-like growth factor receptor.
IgG-RFT5-dgA
A monoclonal antibody linked to a toxic substance. It is being studied in the treatment of melanoma that has spread to distant parts of the body. IgG-RFT5-dgA is made in the laboratory. It can find and kill certain white blood cells that prevent the immune system from killing cancer cells. Also called RFT5-dgA immunotoxin.
IGRT
A procedure that uses a computer to create a picture of a tumor to help guide the radiation beam during radiation therapy. The pictures are made using CT, ultrasound, X-ray, or other imaging techniques. IGRT makes radiation therapy more accurate and causes less damage to healthy tissue. Also called image-guided radiation therapy.
IH636 grape seed extract listen (… grayp seed EK-strakt)
A substance being studied for its ability to prevent damage to normal tissue caused by radiation therapy. It is a type of antioxidant.
IL
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. ILs regulate immune responses. ILs made in the laboratory are used as biological response modifiers to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. An interleukin is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin.
IL-1
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-1 is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. There are two forms of IL-1, alpha and beta, which act the same. IL-1 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-1 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-1.
IL-10
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-10 is made by activated macrophages and by some T lymphocytes. It reduces inflammation by blocking production of cytokines by immune cells. IL-10 also increases antibody production by plasma cells and helps them live longer. IL-10 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system. It is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-10.
IL-11
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-11 is made by support cells in the bone marrow. It causes the growth of several types of blood cells. Oprelvekin (IL-11 made in the laboratory) is used as a biological response modifier to increase the number of platelets, especially in patients receiving chemotherapy for cancer. IL-11 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-11.
IL-12
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-12 is made mainly by B lymphocytes and macrophages. It causes other immune cells to make cytokines and increases the growth of T lymphocytes. It may also block the growth of new blood vessels. IL-12 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-12 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-12.
IL-13
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-13 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It reduces inflammation by blocking production of cytokines by macrophages. It also increases the number and activity of B lymphocytes. IL-13 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. It is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-13.
IL-1-alfa listen (... AL-fuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-1-alfa, one form of IL-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of IL-1, IL-1-beta, acts the same as IL-1-alfa. IL-1-alfa made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-1-alfa is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-alpha, interleukin-1-alfa, and interleukin-1-alpha.
IL-1-alpha listen (... AL-fuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-1-alpha, one form of IL-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of IL-1, IL-1-beta, acts the same as IL-1-alpha. IL-1-alpha made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-1-alpha is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-alfa, interleukin-1-alfa, and interleukin-1-alpha.
IL-1B
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-1B, one form of IL-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of IL-1, IL-1-alpha, acts the same as IL-1B. IL-1B made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-1B is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-beta and interleukin-1-beta.
IL-1-beta listen (... BAY-tuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-1-beta, one form of IL-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of IL-1, IL-1-alpha, acts the same as IL-1-beta. IL-1-beta made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-1-beta is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1B and interleukin-1-beta.
IL-2
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-2 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It increases the growth and activity of other T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes, and affects the development of the immune system. Aldesleukin (IL-2 made in the laboratory) is being used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-2 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-2.
IL-3
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-3 is made mainly by a type of T lymphocyte. It increases the number of blood cells made by the bone marrow. IL-3 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-3 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-3.
IL-4
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-4 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It causes B lymphocytes to increase and to make antibodies and also increases the production of T lymphocytes. IL-4 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-4 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-4.
IL-5
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-5 is made mainly by some T lymphocytes. It causes B lymphocytes to make more antibodies and increases the number of eosinophils. IL-5 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. It is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-5.
IL-6
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-6 is made mainly by some T lymphocytes. It causes B lymphocytes to make more antibodies and also causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. IL-6 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-6 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-6.
IL-7
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. IL-7 is made by cells that cover and support organs, glands, and other structures in the body. It causes the growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes. IL-7 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. IL-7 is a type of cytokine. Also called interleukin-7 and lymphopoietin-1.
ileostomy listen (IL-ee-OS-toh-mee)
An opening into the ileum, part of the small intestine, from the outside of the body. An ileostomy provides a new path for waste material to leave the body after part of the intestine has been removed.
ileum listen (IH-lee-um)
The last part of the small intestine. It connects to the cecum (first part of the large intestine). The ileum helps to further digest food coming from the stomach and other parts of the small intestine. It absorbs nutrients (vitamins, minerals, carbohydrates, fats, proteins) and water from food so they can be used by the body.
ileus listen (IH-lee-us)
Blockage of the intestines
iloprost listen (I-loh-prost)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of lung cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called prostaglandin analogs.
ILX23-7553
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer drug.
ILX-295501
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer drug. It belongs to the family of drugs called diarylsulfonylureas.
IM
Within or into muscle. Also called intramuscular.
IM-862
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors.
image-guided radiation therapy listen (IH-mij-GY-ded RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses a computer to create a picture of a tumor to help guide the radiation beam during radiation therapy. The pictures are made using CT, ultrasound, X-ray, or other imaging techniques. Image-guided radiation therapy makes radiation therapy more accurate and causes less damage to healthy tissue. Also called IGRT.
imagery listen (IH-muh-jree)
A technique in which a person focuses on positive images in his or her mind. It can help people reach a relaxed, focused state and help reduce stress and give a sense of well-being. Also called guided imagery.
imaging listen (IH-muh-jing)
In medicine, a process that makes pictures of areas inside the body. Imaging uses methods such as x-rays (high-energy radiation), ultrasound (high-energy sound waves), and radio waves.
imaging procedure listen (IH-muh-jing proh-SEE-jer)
A type of test that makes detailed pictures of areas inside the body. Imaging procedures use different forms of energy, such as x-rays (high-energy radiation), ultrasound (high-energy sound waves), radio waves, and radioactive substances. They may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Examples of imaging procedures are computed tomography (CT), ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and nuclear medicine tests. Also called imaging test.
imaging test listen (IH-muh-jing …)
A type of test that makes detailed pictures of areas inside the body. Imaging tests use different forms of energy, such as x-rays (high-energy radiation), ultrasound (high-energy sound waves), radio waves, and radioactive substances. They may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Examples of imaging tests are computed tomography (CT), ultrasonography, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI), and nuclear medicine tests. Also called imaging procedure.
imatinib mesylate listen (ih-MA-tih-nib MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to treat certain types of leukemia and other blood cancers. It is also used to treat gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST), skin tumors called dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans, and a rare condition called systemic mastocytosis. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Imatinib mesylate blocks the protein made by the BCR-ABL oncogene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Imatinib mesylate is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Gleevec and STI571.
Imbruvica listen (im-BROO-vih-kuh)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, small lymphocytic lymphoma, and Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia (a type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma). It is also used to treat mantle cell lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma in patients who have received at least one other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Imbruvica blocks a protein called Bruton’s tyrosine kinase (BTK), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called ibrutinib.
IMC-1121B
A drug used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) in certain patients who have already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used alone or with another drug to treat cancer of the stomach or gastroesophageal junction (the area where the esophagus connects to the stomach) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. IMC-1121B binds to receptors for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor, which may be found on some types of cancer cells. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. IMC-1121B is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B, Cyramza, and ramucirumab.
IMC-3G3
A drug used with doxorubicin to treat soft tissue sarcoma that cannot be treated with radiation therapy or surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated with an anthracycline (a type of anticancer drug). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. IMC-3G3 binds to a receptor for a protein called platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein receptor may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. IMC-3G3 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, Lartruvo, and olaratumab.
IMC-A12
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a monoclonal antibody that is made in the laboratory and can bind to substances in the body. IMC-A12 blocks the action of a protein needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of insulin-like growth factor-1 receptor (IGF-1R) inhibitor. Also called cixutumumab.
imexon listen (i-MEK-son)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer, including pancreatic, lung, breast, prostate, melanoma, and multiple myeloma. It belongs to the family of drugs called cyanoaziridine derivatives. Also called Amplimexon.
Imfinzi listen (im-FIN-zee)
A drug used to treat stage III non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC) that cannot be removed by surgery. It is used in patients whose disease did not get worse after treatment with radiation therapy and anticancer drugs that included platinum. Imfinzi is also used to treat urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose disease got worse during or after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Imfinzi binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Imfinzi may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called durvalumab.
imipenem listen (IH-mih-PEH-nem)
An antibiotic drug used to treat severe or very resistant infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called carbapenems.
imiquimod listen (IH-mih-KWIH-mod)
A drug used to treat early basal cell skin cancer. It is also used to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer) and genital warts. Imiquimod is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It may help the immune system kill abnormal cells, including cancer cells. Imiquimod is a type of immune response modifier. Also called Aldara.
Imlygic listen (im-LY-jik)
A drug used to treat melanoma that has recurred (come back) after surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer is in the skin and lymph nodes and cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Imlygic is made with a form of the herpesvirus that has been changed in the laboratory to infect and break down cancer cells without harming normal cells. It may also help the immune system kill cancer cells. Imlygic is injected directly into tumors in the skin and lymph nodes. It is a type of oncolytic virus therapy. Also called T-VEC and talimogene laherparepvec.
immature teratoma listen (IH-muh-CHOOR TAYR-uh-TOH-muh)
A type of germ cell tumor that is often made up of several different types of tissue, such as hair, muscle, and bone. Immature teratomas have cells that look very different from normal cells under a microscope. They are usually malignant (cancer) and may spread to other parts of the body. Some immature teratomas make enzymes or hormones that may cause signs and symptoms of disease. Immature teratomas usually occur in the sacrum or tailbone in newborns or in the ovaries of girls at the start of puberty.
IMMU-106
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of lymphoma. It binds to the protein CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of immune system cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. This causes the immune system to kill the cancer cells. IMMU-106 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called hA20, HCD20, and veltuzumab.
IMMU-110
A substance being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma and several other types of cancer. It binds to CD74, a protein on the surface of myeloma cells and certain other types of cells. It may help kill cancer cells. IMMU-110 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called hLL1 and milatuzumab.
immune adjuvant listen (ih-MYOON A-juh-vunt)
A drug that stimulates the immune system to respond to disease.
immune checkpoint inhibitor listen (ih-MYOON CHEK-poynt in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug that blocks certain proteins made by some types of immune system cells, such as T cells, and some cancer cells. These proteins help keep immune responses in check and can keep T cells from killing cancer cells. When these proteins are blocked, the “brakes” on the immune system are released and T cells are able to kill cancer cells better. Examples of checkpoint proteins found on T cells or cancer cells include PD-1/PD-L1 and CTLA-4/B7-1/B7-2. Some immune checkpoint inhibitors are used to treat cancer.
immune complex hemolytic anemia listen (ih-MYOON KOM-plex HEE-moh-LIH-tik uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the body’s immune system stops red blood cells from forming or causes them to clump together. Immune complex hemolytic anemia can occur in patients who have chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). Also called autoimmune hemolytic anemia and immunohemolytic anemia.
immune function listen (ih-MYOON FUNK-shun)
Production and action of cells that fight disease or infection.
immune response listen (ih-MYOON reh-SPONTS)
The activity of the immune system against foreign substances (antigens).
immune system listen (ih-MYOON SIS-tem)
A complex network of cells, tissues, organs, and the substances they make that helps the body fight infections and other diseases. The immune system includes white blood cells and organs and tissues of the lymph system, such as the thymus, spleen, tonsils, lymph nodes, lymph vessels, and bone marrow.
immune system disorder listen (ih-MYOON SIS-tem dis-OR-der)
A condition that affects the immune system. The immune system is made up of cells, tissues, and organs that help the body fight infections and other diseases. There are many different types of immune system disorders, including immunodeficiency disease, autoimmune disorders, and allergic disorders. Immunodeficiency disease occurs when a part of the immune system is missing or not working properly. Autoimmune disorders occur when the immune system recognizes its own tissues as foreign and attacks them. Allergic disorders occur when the immune system overreacts to substances that are usually not harmful, such as pollen, molds, and certain foods. Cancers of the immune system (such as leukemia and lymphoma) are also immune system disorders.
immune system tolerance listen (ih-MYOON SIS-tem TAH-leh-runts)
The failure of the immune system to respond to an antigen that previously caused an immune response.
immune thrombocytopenia listen (ih-MYOON THROM-boh-sy-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which platelets (blood cells that cause blood clots to form) are destroyed by the immune system. The low platelet count causes easy bruising and bleeding, which may be seen as purple areas in the skin, mucous membranes, and outer linings of organs. Also called idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura, immune thrombocytopenic purpura, and ITP.
immune thrombocytopenic purpura listen (ih-MYOON THROM-boh-sy-toh-PEE-nik PUR-pyoo-ruh)
A condition in which platelets (blood cells that cause blood clots to form) are destroyed by the immune system. The low platelet count causes easy bruising and bleeding, which may be seen as purple areas in the skin, mucous membranes, and outer linings of organs. Also called idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura, immune thrombocytopenia, and ITP.
immunity listen (ih-MYOO-nih-tee)
The condition of being protected against an infectious disease. Immunity can be caused by a vaccine, previous infection with the same agent, or by transfer of immune substances from another person or animal.
immunization listen (IH-myoo-nih-ZAY-shun)
A technique used to cause an immune response that results in resistance to a specific disease, especially an infectious disease.
immunoassay listen (IH-myoo-noh-A-say)
A test that uses the binding of antibodies to antigens to identify and measure certain substances. Immunoassays may be used to diagnose disease. Also, test results can provide information about a disease that may help in planning treatment (for example, when estrogen receptors are measured in breast cancer).
immunoassay fecal occult blood test listen (IH-myoo-noh-A-say FEE-kul uh-KULT ...)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called fecal immunochemical test, FIT, iFOBT, immunochemical fecal occult blood test, and immunologic fecal occult blood test.
immunochemical fecal occult blood test listen (IH-myoo-noh-KEH-mih-kul FEE-kul uh-KULT...)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called fecal immunochemical test, FIT, iFOBT, immunoassay fecal occult blood test, and immunologic fecal occult blood test.
immunocompetence listen (IH-myoo-noh-KOM-peh-tents)
The ability to produce a normal immune response.
immunocompetent listen (IH-myoo-noh-KOM-peh-tent)
Having the ability to produce a normal immune response.
immunocompromised listen (IH-myoo-noh-KOM-proh-mized)
Having a weakened immune system. Patients who are immunocompromised have a reduced ability to fight infections and other diseases. This may be caused by certain diseases or conditions, such as AIDS, cancer, diabetes, malnutrition, and certain genetic disorders. It may also be caused by certain medicines or treatments, such as anticancer drugs, radiation therapy, and stem cell or organ transplant. Also called immunosuppressed.
immunoconjugate listen (IH-myoo-noh-KON-jih-gut)
An agent made up of an immune substance, such as a monoclonal antibody, that is chemically linked to a cell-killing substance such as a toxin, a radioactive molecule, or a drug. The antibody part of the immunoconjugate targets cancer cells and the linked substance may kill the cells or make them visible in the body. Some immunoconjugates are used to treat cancer or to help find cancer cells in the body.
immunoconjugate therapy listen (IH-myoo-noh-KON-jih-gut THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses an immune substance, such as a monoclonal antibody, that is chemically linked to a cell-killing substance such as a toxin, radioisotope, or drug. The immune substance targets certain types of cells and the linked substance kills the targeted cells without harming other cells. Immunoconjugates are used in the treatment of cancer. Examples include antibody-drug conjugates, immunotoxins, and some targeted therapy drugs.
immunocytochemistry listen (IH-myoo-noh-SY-toh-KEH-mih-stree)
A lab test that uses antibodies to test for certain antigens (markers) in a sample of cells. The antibodies are usually linked to an enzyme or a fluorescent dye. When the antibodies bind to the antigen in the cell sample, the enzyme or dye is activated, and the antigen can then be seen under a microscope. Immunocytochemistry is used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer. It may also be used to help tell the difference between different types of cancer.
immunodeficiency listen (IH-myoo-noh-deh-FIH-shun-see)
The decreased ability of the body to fight infections and other diseases.
immunodeficiency syndrome listen (IH-myoo-noh-deh-FIH-shun-see SIN-drome)
The inability of the body to produce an immune response.
immunoglobulin listen (IH-myoo-noh-GLAH-byoo-lin)
A protein that is made by B cells and plasma cells (types of white blood cells) and helps the body fight infection. Some immunoglobulins may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with certain conditions or certain types of cancer, including multiple myeloma and Waldenstrom macroglobulinemia. Measuring the amount of specific immunoglobulins in the blood and urine may help diagnose cancer or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. Some immunoglobulins may be used as tumor markers. Also called Ig.
immunohemolytic anemia listen (IH-myoo-noh-HEE-moh-LIH-tik uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the body’s immune system stops red blood cells from forming or causes them to clump together. Immunohemolytic anemia can occur in patients who have chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). Also called autoimmune hemolytic anemia and immune complex hemolytic anemia.
immunohistochemistry listen (IH-myoo-noh-HIS-toh-KEH-mih-stree)
A lab test that uses antibodies to test for certain antigens (markers) in a sample of tissue. The antibodies are usually linked to an enzyme or a fluorescent dye. When the antibodies bind to the antigen in the tissue sample, the enzyme or dye is activated, and the antigen can then be seen under a microscope. Immunohistochemistry is used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer. It may also be used to help tell the difference between different types of cancer.
immunologic fecal occult blood test listen (IH-myoo-noh-LAH-jik FEE-kul uh-KULT...)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. A small sample of stool is placed in a special collection tube or on a special card and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. An antibody that binds to a blood protein called hemoglobin is used to detect any blood. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called fecal immunochemical test, FIT, iFOBT, immunoassay fecal occult blood test, and immunochemical fecal occult blood test.
immunological adjuvant listen (IH-myoo-noh-LAH-jih-kul A-juh-vunt)
A substance used to help boost the immune response to a vaccine so that less vaccine is needed.
immunology listen (IH-myoo-NAH-loh-jee)
The study of the body's immune system.
immunomodulating agent listen (IH-myoo-noh-MOD-yoo-lay-ting AY-jent)
A substance that stimulates or suppresses the immune system and may help the body fight cancer, infection, or other diseases. Specific immunomodulating agents, such as monoclonal antibodies, cytokines, and vaccines, affect specific parts of the immune system. Nonspecific immunomodulating agents, such as BCG and levamisole, affect the immune system in a general way.
immunomodulation listen (IH-myoo-noh-MAH-juh-LAY-shun)
Change in the body's immune system, caused by agents that activate or suppress its function.
immunophenotyping listen (IH-myoo-noh-FEE-noh-ty-ping)
A process that uses antibodies to identify cells based on the types of antigens or markers on the surface of the cells. This process is used to diagnose specific types of leukemia and lymphoma by comparing the cancer cells to normal cells of the immune system. Immunophenotyping may also be used to separate cells into different groups based on the markers they have on the surface.
immunoscintigraphy listen (IH-myoo-noh-sin-TIH-gruh-fee)
An imaging procedure in which antibodies labeled with radioactive substances are given to the person. A picture is taken of sites in the body where the antibody localizes.
immunosignature listen (IH-myoo-noh-SIG-nuh-cher)
Information about the antibodies in a person’s blood at a given point in time. Over time, the antibodies can change and immunosignatures might be used to help track a person’s health and diagnose infections, cancer, or other medical conditions earlier.
immunostimulant listen (IH-myoo-noh-STIM-yoo-lunt)
A substance that increases the ability of the immune system to fight infection and disease.
immunosuppressed listen (IH-myoo-noh-suh-PREST)
Having a weakened immune system. Patients who are immunosuppressed have a reduced ability to fight infections and other diseases. This may be caused by certain diseases or conditions, such as AIDS, cancer, diabetes, malnutrition, and certain genetic disorders. It may also be caused by certain medicines or treatments, such as anticancer drugs, radiation therapy, and stem cell or organ transplant. Also called immunocompromised.
immunosuppression listen (IH-myoo-noh-suh-PREH-shun)
Suppression of the body's immune system and its ability to fight infections and other diseases. Immunosuppression may be deliberately induced with drugs, as in preparation for bone marrow or other organ transplantation, to prevent rejection of the donor tissue. It may also result from certain diseases such as AIDS or lymphoma or from anticancer drugs.
immunosuppressive listen (IH-myoo-noh-suh-PREH-siv)
Describes the ability to decrease the body's immune system responses.
immunosuppressive agent listen (IH-myoo-noh-suh-PREH-siv AY-jent)
An agent that decreases the body’s immune responses. It reduces the body’s ability to fight infections and other diseases, such as cancer. Immunosuppressive agents may be used to keep a person from rejecting a bone marrow or organ transplant. They are also used in the treatment of conditions marked by overactive immune responses, such as autoimmune diseases and allergies.
immunosuppressive therapy listen (IH-myoo-noh-suh-PREH-siv THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that lowers the activity of the body’s immune system. This reduces its ability to fight infections and other diseases, such as cancer. Immunosuppressive therapy may be used to keep a person from rejecting a bone marrow or organ transplant. It may also be used to treat conditions in which the immune system is overactive, such as autoimmune diseases and allergies. Some types of immunosuppressive therapy may increase a person’s risk of cancer by lowering the body’s ability to kill cancer cells.
immunotherapy listen (IH-myoo-noh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses substances to stimulate or suppress the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, and other diseases. Some types of immunotherapy only target certain cells of the immune system. Others affect the immune system in a general way. Types of immunotherapy include cytokines, vaccines, bacillus Calmette-Guerin (BCG), and some monoclonal antibodies.
immunotoxin listen (IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
An immune substance, such as a monoclonal antibody, cytokine, or immunoglobulin, chemically linked to a toxic substance. The immune substance binds to specific proteins or receptors found on some cancer cells. This allows the linked toxic substance to enter the cancer cells and kill them without harming nearby healthy cells.
Imodium listen (ih-MOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat diarrhea. Imodium slows the movement of the muscles in the small intestine to allow more water to be taken out of the feces (waste matter) and more nutrients to be absorbed. Also called loperamide hydrochloride.
impairment listen (im-PAYR-ment)
A loss of part or all of a physical or mental ability, such as the ability to see, walk, or learn.
implant listen (IM-plant)
A substance or object that is put in the body as a prosthesis, or for treatment or diagnosis.
implant displacement views listen (… dis-PLAYS-ment vyooz)
A procedure used to do a mammogram (x-ray of the breasts) in women with breast implants. The implant is pushed back against the chest wall and the breast tissue is pulled forward and around it so the tissue can be seen in the mammogram. Also called Eklund displacement views and Eklund views.
implant radiation therapy listen (... RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into or near a tumor. Also called brachytherapy, internal radiation therapy, and radiation brachytherapy.
implantable cardioverter-defibrillator listen (im-PLAN-tuh-bul KAR-dee-oh-VER-ter-dee-FIH-brih-LAY-ter)
A small device used to correct a heartbeat that is abnormal (too fast, too slow, or irregular). The device is placed by surgery in the chest or abdomen. Wires are passed through a vein to connect the device to the heart. When it detects abnormal heartbeats, it sends an electrical shock to the heart to restore the heartbeat to normal. Also called ICD.
implantable pump listen (im-PLAN-tuh-bul …)
A small device installed under the skin to administer a steady dose of drugs.
impotence listen (IM-puh-tents)
In medicine, refers to the inability to have an erection of the penis adequate for sexual intercourse. Also called erectile dysfunction.
impotent listen (IM-poh-tent)
In medicine, describes the inability to have an erection of the penis adequate for sexual intercourse.
IMRT
A type of 3-dimensional radiation therapy that uses computer-generated images to show the size and shape of the tumor. Thin beams of radiation of different intensities are aimed at the tumor from many angles. This type of radiation therapy reduces the damage to healthy tissue near the tumor. Also called intensity-modulated radiation therapy.
in situ listen (in SY-too)
In its original place. For example, in carcinoma in situ, abnormal cells are found only in the place where they first formed. They have not spread.
in vitro listen (in VEE-troh)
In the laboratory (outside the body). The opposite of in vivo (in the body).
in vitro fertilization listen (in VEE-troh FER-tih-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which eggs are removed from a woman’s ovary and combined with sperm outside the body to form embryos. The embryos are grown in the laboratory for several days and then either placed in a woman’s uterus or cryopreserved (frozen) for future use.
in vivo listen (in VEE-voh)
In the body. The opposite of in vitro (outside the body or in the laboratory).
inalimarev listen (IH-nuh-LIH-muh-rev)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins, including the tumor markers called CEA and MUC-1, that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called PANVAC-V and recombinant vaccinia-CEA-MUC-1-TRICOM vaccine.
incidence listen (IN-sih-dents)
The number of new cases of a disease diagnosed each year.
incision listen (in-SIH-zhun)
A cut made in the body to perform surgery.
incisional biopsy listen (in-SIH-zhuh-nul BY-op-see)
A surgical procedure in which a portion of a lump or suspicious area is removed for diagnosis. The tissue is then examined under a microscope to check for signs of disease.
incomplete Freund's adjuvant listen (in-kum-PLEET froyndz A-juh-vunt)
A mixture of oil and water that is combined with a specific antigen to boost the immune response to that antigen. It is being studied in immunotherapy and as a way to increase the immune response to cancer vaccines. It is a type of immune modulator. Also called IFA and Montanide ISA-51.
incontinence listen (in-KON-tih-nents)
Inability to control the flow of urine from the bladder (urinary incontinence) or the escape of stool from the rectum (fecal incontinence).
incubated listen (IN-kyoo-bay-ted)
Grown in the laboratory under controlled conditions. For example, white blood cells can be grown in special conditions so that they attack specific cancer cells when returned to the body.
IND
A substance that has been tested in the laboratory and has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for testing in people. Clinical trials test how well INDs work and whether they are safe to use. An IND may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition but still be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called experimental drug, investigational agent, investigational drug, and investigational new drug.
Inderal listen (IN-deh-ral)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure, including before surgery for pheochromocytoma, and to treat chest pain (angina), abnormal heartbeat (arrhythmia), and several other conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Inderal blocks certain receptors on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to relax and dilate (widen). This allows blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure and heart rate. Inderal contains the active ingredient propranolol hydrochloride. It is a type of beta blocker.
Indian cress listen (IN-dee-un kres)
Parts of the flowering plant have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects. The scientific name is Nasturtium officinale. Also called watercress.
Indian elm listen (IN-dee-un elm)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, red elm, slippery elm, sweet elm, Ulmus fulva, and Ulmus rubra.
Indian rhubarb listen (IN-dee-un ROO-barb)
The root of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rheum palmatum or Rheum officinale. Also called Chinese rhubarb, da-huang, rhubarb, and Turkish rhubarb.
Indian saffron listen (IN-dee-un SA-fron)
An East Indian plant that is a member of the ginger family and is used as a spice and food color. The underground stems are used in some cultures to treat certain stomach problems. The substance in Indian saffron that gives it a yellow color (curcumin) is being studied in the treatment of cancer, Alzheimer disease, cystic fibrosis, and psoriasis. The scientific name is Curcuma longa. Also called jiang huang and turmeric.
Indian valerian listen (IN-dee-un vuh-LEER-ee-un)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
indication listen (IN-dih-KAY-shun)
In medicine, a sign, symptom, or medical condition that leads to the recommendation of a treatment, test, or procedure.
indinavir listen (in-DIH-nuh-veer)
A drug that interferes with the ability of a virus to make copies of itself.
indirect ophthalmoscopy listen (IN-duh-REKT OF-thul-MOS-koh-pee)
An exam of the inside of the back of the eye using a beam of light and a hand-held lens. Indirect ophthalmoscopy gives a wider view inside the eye than an exam using an ophthalmoscope does.
indium In 111-anti-CEA monoclonal antibody M5A listen (IN-dee-um … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the imaging of some types of cancer. M5A is a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CEA on the surface of some tumor cells. It is linked to a radioisotope called indium In 111. The combined substance is injected into the blood, and a machine is used to find cells in the body that bind to it. Indium In 111-anti-CEA monoclonal antibody M5A is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
indium In 111-CHX-A DTPA trastuzumab listen (IN-dee-um … tras-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the imaging of breast cancer and some other types of cancer. It is made by attaching a radioactive substance called indium In 111 to the monoclonal antibody trastuzumab. Trastuzumab binds to the human growth factor receptor 2 (HER2/neu) on some breast cancer cells and on several other types of cancer cells. Indium In 111-CHX-A DTPA trastuzumab is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan listen (IN-dee-um … ih-brih-TOO-moh-mab ty-UK-seh-tan)
A radiolabeled monoclonal antibody used to find certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the diagnosis of other types of B-cell tumors. Indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan is made up of the monoclonal antibody ibritumomab plus the radioisotope indium In 111. It binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. A machine is used to find which cells in the body have taken up indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan. Indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan and 111In-Zevalin.
indium In 111-pentetreotide listen (IN-dee-um … PEN-teh-TREE-oh-tide)
A radioactive drug used to find certain types of neuroendocrine tumors (tumors that form from cells that release hormones). Indium In 111-pentetreotide binds to a protein called somatostatin receptor, which is found on some neuroendocrine tumor cells. Indium In 111-pentetreotide builds up in these cells and gives off radiation that can be detected by a scanner to help show where the tumor cells are in the body.
individualized education plan listen (in-dih-VIH-joo-wuh-lized EH-juh-KAY-shun plan)
An education plan for children with certain disabilities or health conditions, such as cancer. By law, these children must receive special education services and other support they need in school. An individualized education plan describes which special services the child needs and how those needs will be met. This may include special class placement, extra help with class assignments and tests, tutoring, and other services such as counseling, speech therapy, and physical therapy. Individualized education plans are covered in the U.S. law, Individuals with Disabilities Education Act. Also called IEP.
indole listen (IN-dole)
A type of chemical found in plants and in certain vegetables, such as broccoli, cabbage, and cauliflower. Indoles may promote good health and are being studied in the prevention of certain types of cancer, including breast cancer, prostate cancer, and colon cancer. An indole is a type of phytochemical.
indole-3-carbinol listen (IN-dole … KAR-bih-nol)
A substance that is being studied as a cancer prevention drug. It is found in cruciferous vegetables.
indolent listen (IN-doh-lent)
A type of cancer that grows slowly.
indolent lymphoma listen (IN-doh-lent lim-FOH-muh)
A type of lymphoma that tends to grow and spread slowly, and has few symptoms. Also called low-grade lymphoma.
indomethacin listen (IN-doh-MEH-thuh-sin)
A drug that reduces pain, fever, swelling, and redness. It is also being used to reduce tumor-induced suppression of the immune system and to increase the effectiveness of anticancer drugs. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID).
induction therapy listen (in-DUK-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
The first treatment given for a disease. It is often part of a standard set of treatments, such as surgery followed by chemotherapy and radiation. When used by itself, induction therapy is the one accepted as the best treatment. If it doesn’t cure the disease or it causes severe side effects, other treatment may be added or used instead. Also called first-line therapy, primary therapy, and primary treatment.
infantile fibrosarcoma listen (IN-fun-TILE FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue. Infantile fibrosarcoma usually occurs in infants and young children but it may also be found before birth by ultrasound. It can occur anywhere in the body. The tumor is often large and fast-growing, but it rarely spreads to other parts of the body. The cancer cells usually have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Infantile fibrosarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called congenital fibrosarcoma.
infantile genetic agranulocytosis listen (IN-fun-TILE jeh-NEH-tik ay-GRAN-yoo-loh-sy-TOH-sis)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called congenital neutropenia, genetic infantile agranulocytosis, Kostmann disease, Kostmann neutropenia, and Kostmann syndrome.
infantile hemangioma listen (IN-fun-TILE hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that forms on the skin, in the tissue below the skin, or in an organ. Infantile hemangiomas may be raised or flat and usually appear as bright red-blue lesions on the skin. They may sometimes be called a “strawberry mark”. They can occur anywhere on or in the body, but usually form on the skin of the head and neck. Infantile hemangiomas are not usually seen at birth but appear when the infant is 3 to 6 weeks old. They usually get bigger, then stop growing and slowly go away on their own. Infantile hemangiomas are the most common type of vascular tumor in children.
infantile hemangiopericytoma listen (IN-fun-TILE hee-MAN-jee-oh-PAYR-ih-sy-TOH-muh)
A rare type of soft tissue tumor that begins in cells that wrap around blood vessels. Infantile hemangiopericytomas may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They usually occur in infants and young children but may also be found before birth by ultrasound. They can occur anywhere in the body, but usually occur in the arms, legs, pelvis, or head and neck. In children older than 1 year, infantile hemangiopericytomas are more likely to spread to other parts of the body, including the lymph nodes and lungs. Children younger than 1 year may have a better prognosis.
infantile myofibromatosis listen (IN-fun-TILE MY-oh-FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis)
A rare condition in which one or more fibrous (connective tissue) tumors form in the skin, muscle, or bone. Sometimes, they also form in internal organs. The tumors are usually benign (not cancer) and do not spread to other parts of the body, but they can grow large and damage nearby organs. They may go away without treatment. Infantile myofibromatosis occurs most often in the first 2 years of life, or it may be present at birth. It is a type of soft tissue tumor.
infantile rickets listen (IN-fun-TILE RIH-kets)
A condition in children in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet or by not getting enough sunlight. In adults, this condition is called osteomalacia. Also called juvenile rickets, rachitis, and rickets.
infection listen (in-FEK-shun)
The invasion and growth of germs in the body. The germs may be bacteria, viruses, yeast, fungi, or other microorganisms. Infections can begin anywhere in the body and may spread all through it. An infection can cause fever and other health problems, depending on where it occurs in the body. When the body’s immune system is strong, it can often fight the germs and cure an infection. Some cancer treatments can weaken the immune system, which may lead to infection.
inferior vena cava listen (in-FEER-ee-er VEE-nuh KAY-vuh)
A large vein that empties into the heart. It carries blood from the legs and feet and from organs in the abdomen and pelvis.
infertile listen (in-FER-til)
Unable to produce children.
infertility listen (IN-fer-TIH-lih-tee)
The inability to produce children.
infiltrating breast cancer listen (IN-fil-TRAY-ting brest KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread from where it began in the breast to surrounding normal tissue. The most common type of infiltrating breast cancer is infiltrating ductal carcinoma, which begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple). Another type is infiltrating lobular carcinoma, which begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast. Infiltrating breast cancer can spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called invasive breast cancer.
infiltrating cancer listen (IN-fil-TRAY-ting KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread beyond the layer of tissue in which it developed and is growing into surrounding, healthy tissues. Also called invasive cancer.
infiltrating ductal carcinoma listen (IN-fil-TRAY-ting DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The most common type of infiltrating breast cancer. It begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple) and spreads outside the ducts to surrounding normal tissue. Infiltrating ductal carcinoma can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called invasive ductal carcinoma.
infiltrating lobular carcinoma listen (IN-fil-TRAY-ting LAH-byoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of invasive breast cancer that begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast and spreads to surrounding normal tissue. It can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called invasive lobular carcinoma.
inflammation listen (IN-fluh-MAY-shun)
Redness, swelling, pain, and/or a feeling of heat in an area of the body. This is a protective reaction to injury, disease, or irritation of the tissues.
inflammatory listen (in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee)
Having to do with inflammation (redness, swelling, pain, and a feeling of heat that helps protect tissues affected by injury or disease).
inflammatory bowel disease listen (in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee BOW-ul dih-ZEEZ)
A general term that refers to the inflammation of the colon and rectum. Inflammatory bowel disease includes ulcerative colitis and Crohn disease.
inflammatory breast cancer listen (in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee brest KAN-ser)
A type of breast cancer in which the breast looks red and swollen and feels warm. The skin of the breast may also show the pitted appearance called peau d'orange (like the skin of an orange). The redness and warmth occur because the cancer cells block the lymph vessels in the skin.
inflammatory myofibroblastic tumor listen (in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee MY-oh-FY-broh-BLAS-tik TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that is made up of smooth muscle cells, connective tissue cells, and certain types of immune cells. It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in the lung, abdomen, pelvis, or back of the abdomen. Inflammatory myofibroblastic tumors rarely spread to other parts of the body but they are likely to recur (come back) after treatment. The tumor cells may have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Inflammatory myofibroblastic tumors usually occur in children and young adults. They are a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
infliximab listen (in-FLIK-sih-mab)
A monoclonal antibody that blocks the action of a cytokine called tumor necrosis factor alfa. It is being studied in the treatment and prevention of weight loss and loss of appetite in patients with advanced cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called monoclonal antibodies.
influenza A virus listen (IN-floo-EN-zuh … VY-rus)
One of three types of virus that cause the illness called influenza (flu). The influenza A virus can infect people, birds, pigs, horses, and other animals. It is the main cause of most influenza epidemics.
informed consent listen (in-FORMD kun-SENT)
A process in which patients are given important information, including possible risks and benefits, about a medical procedure or treatment, genetic testing, or a clinical trial. This is to help them decide if they want to be treated, tested, or take part in the trial. Patients are also given any new information that might affect their decision to continue. Also called consent process.
infrared coagulation listen (IN-fruh-RED koh-A-gyuh-LAY-shun)
A technique in which abnormal tissue is exposed to a burst of infrared light (a type of radiation). This causes blood in veins in the tissue to coagulate (harden) and the abnormal tissue to shrink. It is being studied in the prevention of anal cancer in some patients with HIV.
infrared thermography listen (IN-fruh-RED ther-MAH-gruh-fee)
In medicine, a procedure in which an infrared camera (one that senses heat) is used to measure temperature differences on the surface of the body. The camera makes pictures that show areas of possible abnormal cell growth because abnormal tissue gives off more heat than normal tissue does.
infratentorium listen (IN-fruh-ten-TOR-ee-um)
The lower back part of the brain that contains the cerebellum and brain stem. Examples of tumors that form in the infratentorium are medulloblastomas and brain stem gliomas.
infusion listen (in-FYOO-zhun)
A method of putting fluids, including drugs, into the bloodstream. Also called intravenous infusion.
ingenol mebutate gel listen (IN-jeh-nol MEH-byoo-tayt …)
A drug applied to the skin to treat actinic keratosis (thick, scaly growths on the skin that may become cancer). Ingenol mebutate gel may help kill abnormal cells. It is a type of cytotoxic agent. Also called Picato.
ingestion listen (in-JES-chun)
Taking into the body by mouth.
inguinal orchiectomy listen (IN-gwih-nul OR-kee-EK-toh-mee)
An operation in which the testicle is removed through an incision in the groin.
inhalation listen (IN-huh-LAY-shun)
In medicine, refers to the act of taking a substance into the body by breathing.
inhaler listen (in-HAY-ler)
A device for giving medicines in the form of a spray that is inhaled (breathed in) through the nose or mouth. Inhalers are used to treat certain medical problems, such as bronchitis, angina, emphysema, and asthma. They are also used to help relieve symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking.
inherited listen (in-HAYR-ih-ted)
In medicine, describes the passing of genetic information from parent to child through the genes in sperm and egg cells. Also called hereditary.
inherited bone marrow failure syndrome listen (in-HAYR-ih-ted bone MAYR-oh FAYL-yer SIN-drome)
A rare disorder in which a person’s bone marrow is unable to make enough blood cells and there is a family history of the same disorder. There are several different types of inherited bone marrow failure syndrome, and patients with one of them are at high risk of forming acute leukemia or certain solid tumors. Also called IBMFS.
inherited cancer syndrome listen (in-HAYR-ih-ted KAN-ser SIN-drome)
A type of inherited disorder in which there is a higher-than-normal risk of certain types of cancer. Inherited cancer syndromes are caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes passed from parents to children. In an inherited cancer syndrome, certain patterns of cancer may be seen within families. These patterns include having several close family members (such as a mother, daughter, and sister) with the same type of cancer, developing cancer at an early age, or having two or more types of cancer develop in the same person. Examples of inherited cancer syndromes are hereditary breast and ovarian cancer syndrome, Li-Fraumeni syndrome, Cowden syndrome, and Lynch syndrome. Also called family cancer syndrome and hereditary cancer syndrome.
inherited erythroblastopenia listen (in-HAYR-ih-ted eh-RITH-roh-BLAS-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A very rare disorder in which the bone marrow doesn’t make enough red blood cells. It is usually seen in the first year of life. Patients may have deformed thumbs and other physical problems. They also have an increased risk of leukemia and sarcoma, especially osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Patients with inherited erythroblastopenia may have a mutation (change) in one of the genes that make proteins found in the cell’s ribosomes. Also called Blackfan–Diamond anemia, congenital hypoplastic anemia, congenital pure red cell aplasia, DBA, Diamond-Blackfan anemia, and erythrogenesis imperfecta.
iniparib listen (ih-nih-PAR-ib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Iniparib may kill cancer cells. Also called BSI-201.
injection listen (in-JEK-shun)
Use of a syringe and needle to push fluids or drugs into the body; often called a "shot."
Inlyta listen (in-LY-tuh)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (the most common type of kidney cancer). It is used in patients who have not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Inlyta blocks the action of proteins called growth factor receptors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called axitinib.
Innohep listen (IH-noh-HEP)
A drug that is used with another drug, warfarin, to treat blood clots that form deep in the veins and to prevent new blood clots from forming. It is a type of anticoagulant. Also called tinzaparin sodium.
inoperable listen (in-AH-peh-ruh-bul)
Describes a condition that cannot be treated by surgery.
inositol listen (ih-NOH-sih-TOL)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Inositol helps cells make membranes and respond to messages from their environment. It has the same chemical formula as glucose (the chief source of energy for living organisms) but has a different arrangement of atoms. It is found in beans, peas, brown rice, wheat bran and nuts. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Inositol is being studied in the prevention of cancer. Also called myoinositol.
inositol hexaphosphate listen (ih-NOH-sih-TOL HEK-suh-FOS-fayt)
A substance found in many foods that come from plants, including corn, wheat, rice, and soybeans, and in large amounts in cereals and legumes. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer. Also called IP6 and phytic acid.
inotuzumab ozogamicin listen (ih-noh-TOO-zoo-mab OH-zoh-ga-MIH-sin)
A drug used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) that has not gotten better with other treatment or has recurred (come back). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Inotuzumab ozogamicin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on some leukemia cells. It also contains a toxic substance, which may help kill cancer cells. Inotuzumab ozogamicin is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Besponsa.
INS316
A substance being studied in the diagnosis of lung diseases, including lung cancer. It helps bring up a sample of mucus from deep in the lungs and improves the quality of the sample for testing. It is a type of nucleoside triphosphate.
insomnia listen (in-SOM-nee-uh)
Difficulty in going to sleep or getting enough sleep.
instillation listen (in-stih-LAY-shun)
In medicine, a method used to put a liquid into the body slowly or drop by drop.
Institutional Review Board listen (IN-stih-TOO-shuh-nul reh-VYOO bord)
A group of scientists, doctors, clergy, and patient advocates that reviews and approves the detailed plan for a clinical trial. Institutional Review Boards are meant to protect the people who take part in a clinical trial. They check to see that the trial is well designed, legal, ethical, does not involve unneeded risks, and includes a safety plan for patients. There is an Institutional Review Board at every health care facility that does clinical research, and every trial is reviewed by an Institutional Review Board before the trial begins. Also called IRB.
insulin listen (IN-suh-lin)
A hormone made by the islet cells of the pancreas. Insulin controls the amount of sugar in the blood by moving it into the cells, where it can be used by the body for energy.
insulin glargine listen (IN-suh-lin GLAR-jeen)
A drug used to control the amount of sugar in the blood of patients with diabetes. It is a form of the hormone insulin that is made in the laboratory. Insulin glargine controls blood sugar longer than insulin does. It is a type of therapeutic insulin. Also called insulin glargine recombinant and Lantus.
insulin glargine recombinant listen (IN-suh-lin GLAR-jeen ree-KOM-bih-nunt)
A drug used to control the amount of sugar in the blood of patients with diabetes. It is a form of the hormone insulin that is made in the laboratory. Insulin glargine recombinant controls blood sugar longer than insulin does. It is a type of therapeutic insulin. Also called insulin glargine and Lantus.
insulin glulisine listen (IN-suh-lin GLOO-lih-seen)
A drug used to control the amount of sugar in the blood of patients with diabetes mellitus. It is a form of the hormone insulin that is made in the laboratory. Insulin glulisine gets into the blood faster than insulin when it is injected under the skin before or shortly after a meal. It is a type of therapeutic insulin. Also called Apidra.
insulin-like growth factor listen (IN-suh-lin-like grothe FAK-ter)
A protein made by the body that stimulates the growth of many types of cells. Insulin-like growth factor is similar to insulin (a hormone made in the pancreas). There are two forms of insulin-like growth factor called IGF-1 and IGF-2. Higher than normal levels of IGF-1 may increase the risk of several types of cancer. Insulin-like growth factor is a type of growth factor and a type of cytokine. Also called IGF and somatomedin.
insulin-like growth factor receptor listen (IN-suh-lin-like grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found on the surface of some types of cells that binds to insulin-like growth factor (IGF). This causes the cells to grow and divide. Insulin-like growth factor receptor is found at high levels on the surface of several types of cancer cells, which causes these cells to grow rapidly in the presence of IGF. Also called IGFR.
insulinoma listen (IN-suh-lih-NOH-muh)
An abnormal mass that grows in the beta cells of the pancreas that make insulin. Insulinomas are usually benign (not cancer). They secrete insulin and are the most common cause of low blood sugar caused by having too much insulin in the body. Also called beta cell neoplasm, beta cell tumor of the pancreas, and pancreatic insulin-producing tumor.
integrative medicine listen (IN-teh-gray-tiv MEH-dih-sin)
A type of medical care that combines conventional (standard) medical treatment with complementary and alternative (CAM) therapies that have been shown to be safe and to work. CAM therapies treat the mind, body, and spirit.
intensification therapy listen (in-TEN-sih-fih-KAY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given after cancer has disappeared following the initial therapy. Intensification therapy is used to kill any cancer cells that may be left in the body. It may include radiation therapy, a stem cell transplant, or treatment with drugs that kill cancer cells. Also called consolidation therapy and postremission therapy.
intensity-modulated radiation therapy listen (in-TEN-sih-tee-MAH-juh-LAY-tid RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of 3-dimensional radiation therapy that uses computer-generated images to show the size and shape of the tumor. Thin beams of radiation of different intensities are aimed at the tumor from many angles. This type of radiation therapy reduces the damage to healthy tissue near the tumor. Also called IMRT.
intensive chemotherapy listen (in-TEN-siv KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses anticancer drugs given at high doses or over several months to try to cure cancer or cause a remission. Intensive chemotherapy is used to treat certain types of cancer, including leukemia and lymphoma, and may be given with other therapy before a bone marrow or stem cell transplant. It can lower the number of normal blood-forming cells in the bone marrow and can cause other severe side effects, so it is usually given in a hospital.
intercellular communication listen (IN-ter-SEL-yoo-ler kuh-MYOO-nih-KAY-shun)
The transfer of information from one cell to another. Cells signal each other by direct contact with each other or by the release of a substance from one cell that is taken up by another cell. Intercellular communication is important for cells to grow and work normally. Cells that lose the ability to respond to signals from other cells may become cancer cells. Also called cell-cell signaling and cell-to-cell signaling.
interfering thought listen (IN-ter-FEER-ing thawt)
An unpleasant memory or idea that occurs often in a person’s everyday thoughts and keeps him or her from thinking about other things. Interfering thoughts can make sleep difficult and make a person unable to carry out daily activities. Also called intrusive thought.
interferon listen (in-ter-FEER-on)
A natural substance that helps the body’s immune system fight infection and other diseases, such as cancer. Interferons are made in the body by white blood cells and other cells, but they can also be made in the laboratory to use as treatments for different diseases. In cancer therapy, interferons may help keep cancer cells from growing and may help kill cancer cells. There are three main types of interferons: interferon-alfa, interferon-beta, and interferon-gamma. An interferon is a type of cytokine and type of immunomodulating agent.
interferon alfa-2b listen (in-ter-FEER-on AL-fuh …)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in certain patients, hairy cell leukemia, and melanoma that has been removed by surgery. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat a certain type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Interferon alfa-2b is also used to treat some infections caused by viruses, such as the hepatitis C virus. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. Interferon alfa-2b is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) and is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called IFN alpha-2B, Intron A, and recombinant interferon alfa-2b.
interleukin listen (in-ter-LOO-kin)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukins regulate immune responses. Interleukins made in the laboratory are used as biological response modifiers to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. An interleukin is a type of cytokine. Also called IL.
interleukin-1 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin …)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-1 is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. There are two forms of interleukin-1, alpha and beta, which act the same. Interleukin-1 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-1 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1.
interleukin-10 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin …)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-10 is made by activated macrophages and by some T lymphocytes. It reduces inflammation by blocking production of cytokines by immune cells. Interleukin-10 also increases antibody production by plasma cells and helps them live longer. Interleukin-10 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system. It is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-10.
interleukin-11 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-11 is made by support cells in the bone marrow. It causes the growth of several types of blood cells. Oprelvekin (interleukin-11 made in the laboratory) is used as a biological response modifier to increase the number of platelets, especially in patients receiving chemotherapy for cancer. Interleukin-11 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-11.
interleukin-12 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin ...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-12 is made mainly by B lymphocytes and macrophages. It causes other immune cells to make cytokines and increases the growth of T lymphocytes. It may also block the growth of new blood vessels. Interleukin-12 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-12 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-12.
interleukin-13 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin …)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-13 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It reduces inflammation by blocking production of cytokines by macrophages. It also increases the number and activity of B lymphocytes. Interleukin-13 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. It is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-13.
interleukin-13 PE38QQR immunotoxin listen (in-ter-LOO-kin … IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by combining interleukin-13 with a toxin from Pseudomonas bacteria. It is a type of recombinant chimeric protein.
interleukin-1-alfa listen (in-ter-LOO-kin ... AL-fuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-1-alfa, one form of interleukin-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of interleukin-1, interleukin-1-beta, acts the same as interleukin-1-alfa. Interleukin-1-alfa made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-1-alfa is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-alfa, IL-1-alpha, and interleukin-1-alpha.
interleukin-1-alpha listen (in-ter-LOO-kin … AL-fuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-1-alpha, one form of interleukin-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of interleukin-1, interleukin-1-beta, acts the same as interleukin-1-alpha. Interleukin-1-alpha made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-1-alpha is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-alfa, IL-1-alpha, and interleukin-1-alfa.
interleukin-1-beta listen (in-ter-LOO-kin ... BAY-tuh)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-1-beta, one form of interleukin-1, is made mainly by one type of white blood cell, the macrophage, and helps another type of white blood cell, the lymphocyte, fight infections. It also helps leukocytes pass through blood vessel walls to sites of infection and causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. The other form of interleukin-1, interleukin-1-alpha, acts the same as interleukin-1-beta. Interleukin-1-beta made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-1-beta is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-1-beta and IL-1B.
interleukin-2 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-2 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It increases the growth and activity of other T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes, and affects the development of the immune system. Aldesleukin (interleukin-2 made in the laboratory) is being used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-2 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-2.
interleukin-3 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-3 is made mainly by a type of T lymphocyte. It increases the number of blood cells made by the bone marrow. Interleukin-3 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-3 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-3.
interleukin-4 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-4 is made by a type of T lymphocyte. It causes B lymphocytes to increase and to make antibodies and also increases the production of T lymphocytes. Interleukin-4 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-4 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-4.
interleukin-4 PE38KDEL cytotoxin listen (in-ter-LOO-kin ... SY-toh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by combining interleukin-4 with a bacterial toxin. Interleukin-4 PE38KDEL cytotoxin is a type of recombinant chimeric protein. Also called interleukin-4 PE38KDEL immunotoxin and NBI-3001.
interleukin-4 PE38KDEL immunotoxin listen (in-ter-LOO-kin ... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by combining interleukin-4 with a bacterial toxin. Interleukin-4 PE38KDEL immunotoxin is a type of recombinant chimeric protein. Also called interleukin-4 PE38KDEL cytotoxin and NBI-3001.
interleukin-5 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin …)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-5 is made mainly by some T lymphocytes. It causes B lymphocytes to make more antibodies and increases the number of eosinophils. Interleukin-5 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. It is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-5.
interleukin-6 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-6 is made mainly by some T lymphocytes. It causes B lymphocytes to make more antibodies and also causes fever by affecting areas of the brain that control body temperature. Interleukin-6 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-6 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-6.
interleukin-7 listen (in-ter-LOO-kin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Interleukin-7 is made by cells that cover and support organs, glands, and other structures in the body. It causes the growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes. Interleukin-7 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Interleukin-7 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-7 and lymphopoietin-1.
intermediate grade listen (IN-ter-MEE-dee-ut grayd)
A term used to describe how abnormal cancer cells look under a microscope. Intermediate-grade cancer cells look more abnormal than low-grade cancer cells but not as abnormal as high-grade cancer cells. They also tend to grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells but not as quickly as high-grade cancer cells. Cancer cell grade, along with cancer type and stage, may be used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis.
intermediate-grade lymphoma listen (IN-ter-MEE-dee-ut-grayd lim-FOH-muh)
A type of lymphoma that grows and spreads quickly and has severe symptoms. Also called aggressive lymphoma and high-grade lymphoma.
internal exam listen (in-TER-nul eg-ZAM)
A physical exam of the vagina, cervix, uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and rectum. First, the area outside the vagina is checked for signs of disease. A speculum is then inserted into the vagina to widen it so the vagina and cervix can be checked for signs of disease. Cell samples may be taken for a Pap test, or to test for sexually transmitted diseases or other infections. The doctor or nurse then inserts one or two lubricated, gloved fingers of one hand into the vagina and presses on the lower abdomen with the other hand to feel for lumps and check the size, shape, and position of the uterus and ovaries. The rectum may also be checked for lumps or abnormal areas. Also called pelvic exam.
internal medicine listen (in-TER-nul MEH-dih-sin)
A branch of medicine that specializes in preventing, diagnosing, and treating diseases in adults, without using surgery. An internal medicine doctor is often a person’s main health care provider and may coordinate treatment given by other specialists.
internal radiation therapy listen (in-TER-nul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into or near a tumor. Also called brachytherapy, implant radiation therapy, and radiation brachytherapy.
International Unit listen (IN-ter-NA-shuh-nul YOO-nit)
A unit used to measure the activity of many vitamins, hormones, enzymes, and drugs. An International Unit is the amount of a substance that has a certain biological effect. For each substance there is an international agreement on the biological effect that is expected for 1 International Unit. Also called IU.
internist listen (in-TER-nist)
A doctor who has special training in internal medicine. An internist works with adult patients to prevent, diagnose, and treat diseases without using surgery.
interstitial cell-stimulating hormone listen (IN-ter-STIH-shul sel-STIM-yoo-LAY-ting HOR-mone)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make follicles release their eggs and to make hormones that get the uterus ready for a fertilized egg to be implanted. In males, it acts on the testes to cause cells to grow and make testosterone. Also called LH, luteinizing hormone, and lutropin.
interstitial fluid listen (IN-ter-STIH-shul FLOO-id)
Fluid found in the spaces around cells. It comes from substances that leak out of blood capillaries (the smallest type of blood vessel). It helps bring oxygen and nutrients to cells and to remove waste products from them. As new interstitial fluid is made, it replaces older fluid, which drains towards lymph vessels. When it enters the lymph vessels, it is called lymph. Also called tissue fluid.
interstitial radiation therapy listen (IN-ter-STIH-shul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of internal radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into a tumor or body tissue.
intervention listen (IN-ter-VEN-shun)
In medicine, a treatment, procedure, or other action taken to prevent or treat disease, or improve health in other ways.
intervention group listen (IN-ter-VEN-shun groop)
The group in a clinical research study that receives the drug, vaccine, or other intervention being tested. Interventions may also include medical procedures (such as radiation therapy and surgery), medical devices, behavior changes (such as diet and exercise), education programs, and counseling. Also called experimental group and investigational group.
intestinal listen (in-TES-tih-nul)
Having to do with the intestines.
intestinal flora listen (in-TES-tih-nul FLOR-uh)
Bacteria and other organisms that live inside the intestines. They help digest food. Vitamins such as biotin and vitamin K are made by intestinal flora. Also called gut flora, gut microflora, intestinal microflora, and microflora.
intestinal microflora listen (in-TES-tih-nul MY-kroh-FLOR-uh)
Bacteria and other organisms that live inside the intestines. They help digest food. Vitamins such as biotin and vitamin K are made by intestinal microflora. Also called gut flora, gut microflora, intestinal flora, and microflora.
intestinal obstruction listen (in-TES-tih-nul ub-STRUK-shun)
A partial or complete block of the small or large intestine that keeps food, liquid, gas, and stool from moving through the intestines in a normal way. Intestinal obstructions may be caused by a twist in the intestines, hernias, inflammation, scar tissue from surgery, and certain types of cancer, such as cancers of the stomach, colon, and ovary. They may also be caused by conditions that affect the muscles of the intestine, such as paralysis. Signs and symptoms may include pain and swelling in the abdomen, constipation, diarrhea, vomiting, and problems passing gas. Most intestinal obstructions occur in the small intestine. Also called bowel obstruction.
intestinal villi listen (in-TES-tih-nul VIH-ly)
Tiny hair-like projections that line the inside of the small intestine. They contain blood vessels and help absorb nutrients.
intestine listen (in-TES-tin)
The long, tube-shaped organ in the abdomen that completes the process of digestion. The intestine has two parts, the small intestine and the large intestine. Also called bowel.
intoplicine listen (in-TOP-lih-seen)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Intoplicine blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
intoxicating pepper listen (in-TOK-sih-KAYT-ing PEH-per)
An herb native to islands in the South Pacific. Substances taken from the root have been used in some cultures to relieve stress, anxiety, tension, sleeplessness, and problems of menopause. Intoxicating pepper may increase the effect of alcohol and of certain drugs used to treat anxiety and depression. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration advises users that intoxicating pepper may cause severe liver damage. The scientific name is Piper methysticum. Also called kava kava, rauschpfeffer, tonga, and yangona.
intra-arterial listen (IN-truh-ar-TEER-ee-ul)
Within an artery (blood vessel that carries blood from the heart to tissues and organs in the body).
intra-arterial brachytherapy listen (IN-truh-ar-TEER-ee-ul BRAY-kee-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy used to treat liver cancer or cancer that has spread to the liver. A thin, flexible tube is used to inject tiny beads that hold the radioactive substance yttrium Y 90 into the main blood vessel that carries blood to the liver. The beads collect in the tumor and in blood vessels near the tumor, and the yttrium Y 90 gives off radiation. This destroys the blood vessels that the tumor needs to grow and kills the cancer cells. Intra-arterial brachytherapy is a type of internal radiation therapy. Also called radioembolization.
intracarotid infusion listen (IN-truh-kuh-RAH-tid in-FYOO-zhun)
The introduction of fluids and drugs directly into the carotid artery, the main artery in the neck that carries blood from the heart to the brain.
intracavitary listen (IN-truh-KA-vih-tayr-ee)
Within a cavity or space, such as the abdomen, pelvis, or chest.
intracavitary radiation therapy listen (IN-truh-KA-vih-tayr-ee RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of internal radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into a body cavity such as the chest cavity or the vagina.
intracellular listen (IN-truh-SEL-yoo-ler)
Inside a cell.
intracolonic listen (IN-truh-koh-LAH-nik)
Within the colon.
intracranial tumor listen (IN-truh-KRAY-nee-ul TOO-mer)
A tumor that occurs in the brain.
intracutaneous listen (IN-truh-kyoo-TAY-nee-us)
Within the skin. Also called intradermal.
intradermal listen (IN-truh-DER-mul)
Within the skin. Also called intracutaneous.
intraductal breast papilloma listen (IN-truh-DUK-tul brest PA-pih-LOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer), wart-like growth in a milk duct of the breast. It is usually found close to the nipple and may cause a discharge from the nipple. It may also cause pain and a lump in the breast that can be felt. It usually affects women aged 35-55 years. Having a single papilloma does not increase the risk of breast cancer. When there are multiple intraductal breast papillomas, they are usually found farther from the nipple. There may not be a nipple discharge and the papillomas may not be felt. Having multiple intraductal breast papillomas may increase the risk of breast cancer. Also called intraductal papilloma.
intraductal carcinoma listen (IN-truh-DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A noninvasive condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct. The abnormal cells have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. In some cases, intraductal carcinoma may become invasive cancer and spread to other tissues. At this time, there is no way to know which lesions could become invasive. Also called DCIS and ductal carcinoma in situ.
intraductal papilloma listen (IN-truh-DUK-tul PA-pih-LOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer), wart-like growth in a milk duct of the breast. It is usually found close to the nipple and may cause a discharge from the nipple. It may also cause pain and a lump in the breast that can be felt. It usually affects women aged 35-55 years. Having a single papilloma does not increase the risk of breast cancer. When there are multiple intraductal papillomas, they are usually found farther from the nipple. There may not be a nipple discharge and the papillomas may not be felt. Having multiple intraductal papillomas may increase the risk of breast cancer. Also called intraductal breast papilloma.
intraepithelial listen (IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul)
Within the layer of cells that form the surface or lining of an organ.
intraepithelial neoplasia listen (IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found on the surface of or in the tissue that lines an organ, such as the prostate, breast, or cervix. The changes in the cells may be low grade or high grade, depending on how much of the tissue is affected and how abnormal the cells look under a microscope. Sometimes, the abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Also called IEN.
intrahepatic listen (IN-truh-heh-PA-tik)
Within the liver.
intrahepatic bile duct listen (IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt)
A bile duct that passes through and drains bile from the liver.
intrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the bile ducts inside the liver. A bile duct is a tube that carries bile (fluid made by the liver) between the liver and gallbladder and the small intestine. Only a small number of bile duct cancers are intrahepatic.
intrahepatic infusion listen (IN-truh-heh-PA-tik in-FYOO-zhun)
The delivery of anticancer drugs directly to the blood vessels of the liver.
intralesional listen (IN-truh-LEE-zhuh-nul)
Within an area of cancer, for example, within a tumor in the skin.
intraluminal intubation and dilation listen (IN-truh-LOO-mih-nul IN-too-BAY-shun … dy-LAY-shun)
A procedure in which a plastic or metal tube is inserted through the mouth into the esophagus (the tube that carries food to the stomach) to keep it open. This procedure may be used during radiation therapy for esophageal cancer.
intramuscular listen (IN-truh-MUS-kyoo-ler)
Within or into muscle. Also called IM.
intramuscular injection listen (IN-truh-MUS-kyoo-ler in-JEK-shun)
Injection into muscle.
in-transit metastasis listen (in-TRAN-zit meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
A type of metastasis in which skin cancer spreads through a lymph vessel and begins to grow more than 2 centimeters away from the primary tumor but before it reaches the nearest lymph node.
intraocular listen (IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler)
Within the eyeball.
intraocular melanoma listen (IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
A rare cancer of melanocytes (cells that produce the pigment melanin) found in the eye. Also called ocular melanoma.
intraoperative radiation therapy listen (IN-truh-AH-pruh-tiv RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment aimed directly at a tumor during surgery. Also called IORT.
intraoperative ultrasound listen (IN-truh-AH-pruh-tiv UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure that uses ultrasound (high-energy sound waves that are bounced off internal tissues and organs) during surgery. Sonograms (pictures made by ultrasound) of the inside of the body are viewed on a computer to help a surgeon find tumors or other problems during the operation. Also called IOUS.
intrapelvic listen (IN-truh-PEL-vik)
Within the pelvis, the lower part of the abdomen between the hip bones.
intraperitoneal listen (IN-truh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul)
Within the peritoneal cavity (the area that contains the abdominal organs). Also called IP.
intraperitoneal chemotherapy listen (IN-truh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which anticancer drugs are put directly into the abdominal cavity through a thin tube.
intraperitoneal infusion listen (IN-truh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul in-FYOO-zhun)
A method of delivering fluids and drugs directly into the abdominal cavity through a thin tube. Also called peritoneal infusion.
intraperitoneal radiation therapy listen (IN-truh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which a radioactive liquid is put directly into the abdomen through a thin tube.
intrapleural listen (IN-truh-PLOOR-ul)
Within the pleural cavity.
intraspinal listen (IN-truh-SPY-nul)
Within the spine (backbone).
intrathecal listen (IN-truh-THEE-kul)
Describes the fluid-filled space between the thin layers of tissue that cover the brain and spinal cord. Drugs can be injected into the fluid or a sample of the fluid can be removed for testing.
intrathecal chemotherapy listen (IN-truh-THEE-kul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which anticancer drugs are injected into the fluid-filled space between the thin layers of tissue that cover the brain and spinal cord.
intratumoral listen (IN-truh-TOO-mer-ul)
Within a tumor.
intrauterine listen (IN-truh-YOO-teh-rin)
Inside the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman’s pelvis in which a fetus develops).
intrauterine device listen (IN-truh-YOO-teh-rin dee-VISE)
A small, plastic T-shaped device that is placed inside the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman’s pelvis in which a fetus develops) to prevent pregnancy. Intrauterine devices prevent sperm from fertilizing an egg, and prevent fertilized eggs from implanting in the uterus. The use of intrauterine devices is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of endometrial cancer and other conditions. Also called IUD.
intravaginal listen (IN-truh-VA-jih-nul)
Having to do with the inside of the vagina (the birth canal).
intravasation listen (in-TRA-vuh-SAY-shun)
The movement of a cell or a foreign substance through the wall of a blood or lymph vessel into the vessel itself. In cancer, this is how cancer cells pass through a vessel wall and enter the blood or lymph systems. It is one way that cancer spreads in the body.
intravenous listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus)
Into or within a vein. Intravenous usually refers to a way of giving a drug or other substance through a needle or tube inserted into a vein. Also called IV.
intravenous chemotherapy listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which anticancer drugs are given through a needle or tube inserted into a vein. The anticancer drugs travel through the blood to kill cancer cells in the body.
intravenous immunoglobulin listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus IH-myoo-noh-GLAH-byoo-lin)
A substance made from antibodies that have been taken from the blood of many healthy donors. It is given to a patient through a needle or tube inserted into a vein. Intravenous immunoglobulins are used to treat certain types of immune disorders in which there are low amounts of antibodies in the blood. They are also used to treat many different autoimmune disorders, infections, or other conditions. They may also be used to help prevent infections in patients who have had a stem cell or organ transplant. Intravenous immunoglobulins are a type of immunotherapy. Also called IVIG.
intravenous infusion listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus in-FYOO-zhun)
A method of putting fluids, including drugs, into the bloodstream. Also called infusion.
intravenous injection listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus in-JEK-shun)
Injection into a vein.
intravenous pyelogram listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus PY-eh-loh-GRAM)
An x-ray image of the kidneys, ureters, and bladder. It is made after a substance that shows up on x-rays is injected into a blood vessel. The substance outlines the kidneys, ureters, and bladder as it flows through the system and collects in the urine. An intravenous pyelogram is usually made to look for a block in the flow of urine.
intravenous pyelography listen (IN-truh-VEE-nus PY-eh-LAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure in which x-ray images of the kidneys, ureters, and bladder are taken at regular times after a substance that shows up on x-rays is injected into a blood vessel. The substance outlines the kidneys, ureters, and bladder as it flows through the system and collects in the urine. Intravenous pyelography is usually done to look for a block in the flow of urine. Also called IVP.
intraventricular infusion listen (IN-truh-ven-TRIH-kyoo-ler in-FYOO-zhun)
The delivery of a drug into a fluid-filled cavity within the heart or brain.
intravesical listen (IN-truh-VEH-sih-kul)
Within the bladder.
intravitreal chemotherapy listen (IN-truh-VIH-tree-ul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which anticancer drugs are injected directly into the vitreous humor (gel-like fluid inside the eye). Intravitreal chemotherapy is used to treat retinoblastoma that has spread to the vitreous humor and has come back or has not gotten better after other treatment.
Intron A listen (IN-tron…)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in certain patients, hairy cell leukemia, and melanoma that has been removed by surgery. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat a certain type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Intron A is also used to treat some infections caused by viruses, such as the hepatitis C virus. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. Intron A is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) and is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called IFN alpha-2B, interferon alfa-2b, and recombinant interferon alfa-2b.
intrusive thought listen (in-TROO-siv thawt)
An unpleasant memory or idea that occurs often in a person’s everyday thoughts and keeps him or her from thinking about other things. Interfering thoughts can make sleep difficult and make a person unable to carry out daily activities. Also called interfering thought.
invasive breast cancer listen (in-VAY-siv brest KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread from where it began in the breast to surrounding normal tissue. The most common type of invasive breast cancer is invasive ductal carcinoma, which begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple). Another type is invasive lobular carcinoma, which begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast. Invasive breast cancer can spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called infiltrating breast cancer.
invasive cancer listen (in-VAY-siv KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread beyond the layer of tissue in which it developed and is growing into surrounding, healthy tissues. Also called infiltrating cancer.
invasive cervical cancer listen (in-VAY-siv SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread from the surface of the cervix to tissue deeper in the cervix or to other parts of the body.
invasive ductal carcinoma listen (in-VAY-siv DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The most common type of invasive breast cancer. It begins in the lining of the milk ducts (thin tubes that carry milk from the lobules of the breast to the nipple) and spreads outside the ducts to surrounding normal tissue. Invasive ductal carcinoma can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called infiltrating ductal carcinoma.
invasive hydatidiform mole listen (in-VAY-siv HY-duh-TIH-dih-form …)
A type of cancer that grows into the muscular wall of the uterus. It is formed after conception (fertilization of an egg by a sperm). It may spread to other parts of the body, such as the vagina, vulva, and lung. Also called chorioadenoma destruens.
invasive lobular carcinoma listen (in-VAY-siv LAH-byoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of invasive breast cancer that begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast and spreads to surrounding normal tissue. It can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body. Also called infiltrating lobular carcinoma.
invasive procedure listen (in-VAY-siv proh-SEE-jer)
A medical procedure that invades (enters) the body, usually by cutting or puncturing the skin or by inserting instruments into the body.
inverted papilloma listen (in-VER-ted PA-pih-LOH-muh)
A type of tumor in which surface epithelial cells grow downward into the underlying supportive tissue. It may occur in the nose and/or sinuses or in the urinary tract (bladder, renal pelvis, ureter, urethra). When it occurs in the nose or sinuses, it may cause symptoms similar to those caused by sinusitis, such as nasal congestion. When it occurs in the urinary tract, it may cause blood in the urine.
investigational listen (in-VES-tih-GAY-shuh-nul)
In clinical trials, refers to a drug (including a new drug, dose, combination, or route of administration) or procedure that has undergone basic laboratory testing and received approval from the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) to be tested in human subjects. A drug or procedure may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition, but be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called experimental.
investigational agent listen (in-VES-tih-GAY-shuh-nul AY-jent)
A substance that has been tested in the laboratory and has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for testing in people. Clinical trials test how well investigational agents work and whether they are safe to use. An investigational agent may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition but still be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called experimental drug, IND, investigational drug, and investigational new drug.
investigational drug listen (in-VES-tih-GAY-shuh-nul ...)
A substance that has been tested in the laboratory and has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for testing in people. Clinical trials test how well investigational drugs work and whether they are safe to use. An investigational drug may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition but still be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called experimental drug, IND, investigational agent, and investigational new drug.
investigational group listen (in-VES-tih-GAY-shuh-nul groop)
The group in a clinical research study that receives the drug, vaccine, or other intervention being tested. Interventions may also include medical procedures (such as radiation therapy and surgery), medical devices, behavior changes (such as diet and exercise), education programs, and counseling. Also called experimental group and intervention group.
investigational new drug listen (in-VES-tih-GAY-shuh-nul ...)
A substance that has been tested in the laboratory and has been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) for testing in people. Clinical trials test how well investigational new drugs work and whether they are safe to use. An investigational new drug may be approved by the FDA for use in one disease or condition but still be considered investigational in other diseases or conditions. Also called experimental drug, IND, investigational agent, and investigational drug.
investigator listen (in-VES-tih-gay-ter)
In research, a person who is involved in running a clinical trial or research study. The investigator may help prepare and carry out the protocol (plan) for the study, monitor the safety of the study, collect and analyze the data, and report the results of the study. Investigators can include doctors, scientists, nurses, and other research staff. Some clinical trials or research studies may have more than one investigator. Usually one of the investigators is the principal investigator, who is in charge of the whole study.
inviable listen (in-VY-uh-bul)
Not able to survive.
involuntary listen (in-VAH-lun-TAYR-ee)
An action that is not made by choice. In the body, involuntary actions (such as blushing) occur automatically, and cannot be controlled by choice.
involuntary nervous system listen (in-VAH-lun-TAYR-ee NER-vus SIS-tem)
The part of the nervous system that controls muscles of internal organs (such as the heart, blood vessels, lungs, stomach, and intestines) and glands (such as salivary glands and sweat glands). One part of the involuntary nervous system helps the body rest, relax, and digest food and another part helps a person fight or take flight in an emergency. Also called ANS and autonomic nervous system.
iobenguane I 123 listen (I-oh-BEN-gwayn …)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 123 that is used to find certain types of tumors, including pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. Radiation from I 123 may help show where cancer cells are in the body. Iobenguane I 123 is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 123I-MIBG, AdreView, and iodine I 123-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
iobenguane I 131 listen (I-oh-BEN-gwayn …)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 131 that is used to treat malignant pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma. It is used in patients who need treatment with systemic anticancer therapy and whose tumor cells take up radioactive iobenguane and are detected by a scanner. Iobenguane I 131 is used to treat pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma that cannot be removed by surgery, are locally advanced, or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Iobenguane I 131 builds up in tumor cells and gives off radiation that may kill the tumor cells. It is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 131I-MIBG, Azedra, and iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
iobenguane scan listen (I-oh-BEN-gwayn skan)
A procedure used to find neuroendocrine tumors, such as neuroblastomas and pheochromocytomas. A small amount of a substance called radioactive iobenguane is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. Neuroendocrine tumor cells take up the radioactive iobenguane and are detected by a scanner. Also called metaiodobenzylguanidine scan and MIBG scan.
iodine listen (I-oh-dine)
An element that is necessary for the body to make thyroid hormone. It is found in shellfish and iodized salt.
iodine I 123-metaiodobenzylguanidine listen (I-oh-dine … meh-tuh-I-oh-doh-BEN-zul-GWAH-nih-deen)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 123 that is used to find certain types of tumors, including pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. Radiation from I 123 may help show where cancer cells are in the body. Iodine I 123-metaiodobenzylguanidine is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 123I-MIBG, AdreView, and iobenguane I 123.
iodine I 131-ethiodized oil listen (I-oh-dine … eh-THY-oh-dized oyl)
A radioactive substance being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. It is a form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine, some of which is the radioactive substance iodine I 131. Iodine I 131-ethiodized oil builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in the liver and may kill cancer cells. Also called iodine I 131-Lipiodol.
iodine I 131-Lipiodol listen (I-oh-dine … LIH-pee-oh-dol)
A radioactive substance being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. It is a form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine, some of which is the radioactive substance iodine I 131. Iodine I 131-Lipiodol builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in the liver and may kill cancer cells. Also called iodine I 131-ethiodized oil.
iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine listen (I-oh-dine ... meh-tuh-I-oh-doh-BEN-zul-GWAH-nih-deen)
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 131 that is used to treat malignant pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma. It is used in patients who need treatment with systemic anticancer therapy and whose tumor cells take up radioactive iobenguane and are detected by a scanner. Iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine is used to treat pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma that cannot be removed by surgery, are locally advanced, or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine builds up in tumor cells and gives off radiation that may kill the tumor cells. It is a type of radioconjugate. Also called 131I-MIBG, Azedra, and iobenguane I 131.
iodine I 131-monoclonal antibody BC8 listen (I-oh-dine … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee…)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of leukemia and lymphoma. BC8 is a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD45, which is found on most white blood cells and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. It is linked to a radioactive substance called iodine I 131, which may help kill cancer cells. Iodine I 131-monoclonal antibody BC8 is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
iodine I 131-tositumomab listen (I-oh-dine ... TAH-sih-TOO-moh-mab)
A drug used with another drug to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Iodine I 131-tositumomab is a form of the monoclonal antibody tositumomab that is linked to the radioactive substance iodine I 131. It is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
iodized oil listen (I-oh-dized oyl)
A form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine. Iodized oil is given by injection and builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in tumors. It is used for imaging (taking pictures) of the salivary glands and the lymph system. It is also being studied in the imaging of other organs such as the liver, lung, stomach, and thyroid. It is a type of diagnostic imaging agent. Also called ethiodized oil, Ethiodol, and Lipiodol.
iododoxorubicin listen (I-oh-doh-DOK-soh-ROO-bih-sin)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer and for primary systemic amyloidosis (a disease in which proteins are deposited in specific organs). It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic.
ion listen (I-on)
An atom or a molecule that has a positive or negative electrical charge. Examples are sodium, potassium, calcium, chloride, and phosphate. These ions help move nutrients into cells, help move waste out of cells, and help nerves, muscles, the heart, and the brain work the way they should.
ionizing radiation listen (I-uh-NY-zing RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of high-energy radiation that has enough energy to remove an electron (negative particle) from an atom or molecule, causing it to become ionized. Ionizing radiation can cause chemical changes in cells and damage DNA. This may increase the risk of developing certain health conditions, such as cancer. Ionizing radiation can come from natural sources, such as radon and cosmic rays (rays that enter the earth's atmosphere from outer space). It may also come from medical imaging equipment, such as x-ray, CT scan, or PET scan machines. Nuclear power plant accidents and atomic weapons also release high levels of ionizing radiation. Being exposed to very high doses of ionizing radiation can cause immediate damage to a person’s body, including severe skin or tissue damage, acute radiation sickness, and death.
ionomycin listen (I-on-oh-MY-sin)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection.
IORT
Radiation treatment aimed directly at a tumor during surgery. Also called intraoperative radiation therapy.
IOUS
A procedure that uses ultrasound (high-energy sound waves that are bounced off internal tissues and organs) during surgery. Sonograms (pictures made by ultrasound) of the inside of the body are viewed on a computer to help a surgeon find tumors or other problems during the operation. Also called intraoperative ultrasound.
IP
Within the peritoneal cavity (the area that contains the abdominal organs). Also called intraperitoneal.
IP6
A substance found in many foods that come from plants, including corn, wheat, rice, and soybeans, and in large amounts in cereals and legumes. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer. Also called inositol hexaphosphate and phytic acid.
ipilimumab listen (ih-pih-LIH-myoo-mab)
A drug used with nivolumab to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has mutations (changes) in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also used with nivolumab in some patients to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma that has not already been treated. Ipilimumab is also used alone to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat melanoma in the skin and lymph nodes in patients who have already had surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ipilimumab binds to a substance called CTLA-4, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Ipilimumab may block CTLA-4 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called MDX-010 and Yervoy.
ipsilateral listen (IP-sih-LA-teh-rul)
On the same side of the body as another structure or a given point.
iq’mik listen (IK-mik)
A type of smokeless tobacco that is made by mixing cured tobacco leaves with ashes from a certain type of fungus. It is used mainly in Alaska and is chewed. It contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using iq’mik can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancer of the mouth and other health problems.
IRB
A group of scientists, doctors, clergy, and patient advocates that reviews and approves the detailed plan for a clinical trial. IRBs are meant to protect the people who take part in a clinical trial. They check to see that the trial is well designed, legal, ethical, does not involve unneeded risks, and includes a safety plan for patients. There is an IRB at every health care facility that does clinical research, and every trial is reviewed by an IRB before the trial begins. Also called Institutional Review Board.
Iressa listen (i-REH-suh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated with other anticancer therapy. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Iressa blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Iressa is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called gefitinib and ZD1839.
irinotecan listen (I-rih-noh-TEE-kan)
The active ingredient in a drug used alone or with other drugs to treat colon cancer or rectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after treatment with fluorouracil. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog.
irinotecan hydrochloride listen (I-rih-noh-TEE-kan HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat colon cancer or rectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after treatment with fluorouracil. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called Camptosar and CPT 11.
irinotecan hydrochloride liposome listen (I-rih-noh-TEE-kan HY-droh-KLOR-ide LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan hydrochloride that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. Irinotecan hydrochloride liposome is used together with fluorouracil and leucovorin to treat a certain type of pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse after treatment with gemcitabine anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. Irinotecan hydrochloride liposome may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan hydrochloride. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02, Onivyde, and PEP02.
iris listen (I-ris)
The colored tissue at the front of the eye that contains the pupil in the center. The iris helps control the size of the pupil to let more or less light into the eye.
irofulven listen (i-roh-FUL-ven)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Irofulven attaches to the cell's DNA and may block cancer cell growth. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called 6-hydroxymethylacylfulvene.
iron listen (I-urn)
An important mineral the body needs to make hemoglobin, a substance in the blood that carries oxygen from the lungs to tissues throughout the body. Iron is also an important part of many other proteins and enzymes needed by the body for normal growth and development. It is found in red meat, fish, poultry, lentils, beans, and foods with iron added, such as cereal.
iron overload listen (I-urn OH-ver-lode)
A condition in which the body takes up and stores more iron than it needs. The extra iron is stored in the liver, heart, and pancreas, which may cause liver disease, heart problems, organ failure, and cancer. It may also cause bronze skin, diabetes, pain in the joints and abdomen, tiredness, and impotence. Iron overload may be inherited, or it may be caused by blood transfusions. Also called hemochromatosis.
irradiated listen (ih-RAY-dee-AY-ted)
Treated with radiation.
irradiation listen (ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
The use of high-energy radiation from x-rays, gamma rays, neutrons, protons, and other sources to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors. Radiation may come from a machine outside the body (external-beam radiation therapy), or it may come from radioactive material placed in the body near cancer cells (internal radiation therapy or brachytherapy). Systemic irradiation uses a radioactive substance, such as a radiolabeled monoclonal antibody, that travels in the blood to tissues throughout the body. Also called radiation therapy and radiotherapy.
irreversible enzyme inhibitor listen (eer-ree-VER-sih-bul EN-zime in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that permanently blocks the action of an enzyme. In cancer treatment, irreversible enzyme inhibitors may block certain enzymes that cancer cells need to grow and may kill cancer cells. They are being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer.
irreversible toxicity listen (eer-ree-VER-sih-bul tok-SIH-sih-tee)
Side effects that are caused by toxic substances or something harmful to the body and do not go away.
irrigation listen (EER-ih-GAY-shun)
In medicine, washing out an organ (such as the stomach or colon), a body cavity, or a wound by flushing it with a fluid. Also called lavage.
irritable bowel syndrome listen (EER-ih-tuh-bul BOW-ul SIN-drome)
A disorder of the intestines commonly marked by abdominal pain, bloating, and changes in a person’s bowel habits. This may include diarrhea or constipation, or both, with one occurring after the other. Also called IBS, irritable colon, mucus colitis, and spastic colon.
irritable colon listen (EER-ih-tuh-bul KOH-lun)
A disorder of the intestines commonly marked by abdominal pain, bloating, and changes in a person’s bowel habits. This may include diarrhea or constipation, or both, with one occurring after the other. Also called IBS, irritable bowel syndrome, mucus colitis, and spastic colon.
Isaac syndrome listen (I-zik SIN-drome)
A rare nerve disorder that causes constant muscle activity that cannot be controlled, even during sleep. It often affects the muscles in the arms and legs, but may affect the whole body. Symptoms include muscle twitching, weakness, stiffness, and cramping; increased skin temperature, sweating, and heart rate; and problems with chewing, swallowing, speech, and breathing. The disorder often gets worse over time. Isaac syndrome usually occurs in people aged 15 to 60 years. It may occur with certain types of cancer and is sometimes inherited. Also called neuromyotonia.
ischemia listen (is-KEE-mee-uh)
Lack of blood supply to a part of the body. Ischemia may cause tissue damage due to the lack of oxygen and nutrients.
ischemic necrosis listen (is-KEE-mik neh-KROH-sis)
A condition in which there is a loss of blood flow to bone tissue, which causes the bone to die. It is most common in the hips, knees, shoulders, and ankles. It may be caused by long-term use of steroid medicines, alcohol abuse, joint injuries, and certain diseases, such as cancer and arthritis. It may also occur at some point in time after cancer treatment that included methotrexate, bisphosphonates, or corticosteroids. Also called aseptic necrosis, avascular necrosis, and osteonecrosis.
iseganan hydrochloride listen (i-seh-GAN-an HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of oral mucositis (painful mouth sores) caused by cancer therapy and other conditions. Iseganan hydrochloride kills certain bacteria, fungi, and viruses by making holes in their outer membranes and causing them to burst. It is a type of synthetic antimicrobial peptide and a type of synthetic protegrin analog.
ISIS 2503
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
ISIS 3521
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
ISIS 5132
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
islet cell listen (I-let sel)
A pancreatic cell that produces hormones (e.g., insulin and glucagon) that are secreted into the bloodstream. These hormones help control the level of glucose (sugar) in the blood. Also called endocrine pancreas cell and islet of Langerhans cell.
islet cell carcinoma listen (I-let sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare cancer that forms in islet cells (hormone-making cells) of the pancreas. Islet cells make several different hormones that affect body functions, including controlling the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and helping digest food in the stomach. Functional islet cell carcinomas make extra amounts of these hormones, which can cause symptoms. Nonfunctional islet cell carcinomas do not make extra amounts of hormones, but they may cause symptoms as they grow and spread. Also called pancreatic endocrine cancer.
islet cell tumor listen (I-let sel TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms in islet cells (hormone-making cells) of the pancreas. Islet cell tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Islet cells make several different hormones that affect body functions, including controlling the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and helping digest food in the stomach. Functional islet cell tumors make extra amounts of these hormones, which can cause symptoms. Nonfunctional islet cell tumors do not make extra amounts of hormones, but they may cause symptoms as they grow and spread. Also called pancreatic endocrine tumor and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor.
islet of Langerhans cell listen (I-let … LANG-er-hanz sel)
A pancreatic cell that produces hormones (e.g., insulin and glucagon) that are secreted into the bloodstream. These hormones help control the level of glucose (sugar) in the blood. Also called endocrine pancreas cell and islet cell.
isocitrate dehydrogenase-1 gene listen (I-soh-SIH-trayt dee-hy-DRAH-jeh-nays … jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called isocitrate dehydrogenase 1 (IDH1). The IDH1 protein helps break down fats for energy and protect cells from harmful molecules. Mutations (changes) in the isocitrate dehydrogenase-1 gene have been found in several genetic conditions and in some types of cancer, including acute myelogenous leukemia, myelodysplastic syndromes, and brain cancer. These changes may cause abnormal cells, including cancer cells, to grow and spread in the body. Also called IDH1 gene.
isocitrate dehydrogenase-2 gene listen (I-soh-SIH-trayt dee-hy-DRAH-jeh-nays … jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called isocitrate dehydrogenase 2 (IDH2). This protein is found inside small structures in cells called mitochondria. The IDH2 protein helps the mitochondria make energy for many cell functions. Mutations (changes) in the isocitrate dehydrogenase-2 gene have been found in some types of cancer, including acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) and brain cancer, and in certain genetic conditions. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Also called IDH2 gene.
isoflavone listen (I-soh-FLAY-vone)
An estrogen-like substance made by some plants, including the soy plant. Soy isoflavones are being studied in the prevention of cancer, hot flashes that occur with menopause, and osteoporosis (loss of bone density).
isointense listen (I-soh-in-tents)
Having the same intensity as another object. Used to describe the results of imaging tests, such as x-rays, MRIs, or CT scans.
isolated hepatic perfusion listen (I-soh-LAY-ted heh-PA-tik per-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure in which a catheter is placed into the artery that provides blood to the liver. A second catheter is placed into the vein that takes blood away from the liver. This temporarily separates the liver's blood supply from blood circulating throughout the rest of the body and allows high doses of anticancer drugs to be directed to the liver only.
isolated limb infusion listen (I-soh-LAY-ted LIM in-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure used to deliver anticancer drugs directly to an arm or leg but not to the rest of the body. The flow of blood to and from the limb is temporarily stopped with a tourniquet (a tight band around the limb). Catheters (small, flexible tubes) attached to a pump are put into an artery and a vein in the limb so that blood can be circulated through the pump into the limb. Anticancer drugs are injected into the catheters. Wrapping the limb in a heated blanket or warming the drugs or blood may help the drugs work better.
isolated limb perfusion listen (I-soh-LAY-ted LIM per-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure that may be used to deliver anticancer drugs directly to an arm or leg. The flow of blood to and from the limb is temporarily stopped with a tourniquet (a tight band around the limb), and anticancer drugs are put directly into the blood of the limb. This allows the person to receive a high dose of drugs in the area where the cancer occurred. Also called limb perfusion.
isolated lung perfusion listen (I-soh-LAY-ted ... per-FYOO-zhun)
A surgical procedure during which the circulation of blood to the lungs is separated from the circulation of blood through the rest of the body, and a drug is delivered directly into the lung circulation. This allows a higher concentration of chemotherapy to reach tumors in the lungs.
isolation listen (I-soh-LAY-shun)
State of being separated from others. Isolation is sometimes used to prevent disease from spreading.
isomer listen (I-soh-mer)
One of two or more compounds that have the same chemical formula but different arrangements of the atoms within the molecules and that may have different physical/chemical properties.
isosulfan blue listen (I-soh-SUL-fan …)
A dye made in the laboratory that helps identify the sentinel lymph node (the first lymph node that cancer spreads to from a primary tumor). Isosulfan blue is injected at the edge of a tumor and travels through the lymph fluid to lymph nodes near the tumor. The sentinel lymph node is identified by removing lymph nodes that are stained with the blue dye and looking for cancer cells under a microscope.
isotope listen (I-soh-tope)
A form of a chemical element in which the atoms have the same number of protons (part of the nucleus of an atom) but with a different number of neutrons (part of the nucleus of an atom). For example, carbon 12, carbon 13, and carbon 14 are isotopes of carbon. They all have six protons in the nucleus, but each has different number of neutrons. Isotopes may be used in certain medical tests and procedures.
isotretinoin listen (I-soh-TREH-tih-noyn)
A drug that is used in the treatment of acne and psoriasis and is being studied in cancer prevention. It is a type of retinoid. Also called 13-cis retinoic acid.
ispinesib listen (is-PIN-eh-sib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Ispinesib blocks a protein that tumor cells need to divide. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor. Also called SB-715992.
isthmus listen (iz-muhs)
A narrow part inside the body that connects two larger structures.
Istodax listen (IH-stoh-dax)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma and peripheral T-cell lymphoma that have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Istodax blocks certain enzymes, which may help kill cancer cells. It is a type of depsipeptide and a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called FR901228 and romidepsin.
ITP
A condition in which platelets (blood cells that cause blood clots to form) are destroyed by the immune system. The low platelet count causes easy bruising and bleeding, which may be seen as purple areas in the skin, mucous membranes, and outer linings of organs. Also called idiopathic thrombocytopenic purpura, immune thrombocytopenia, and immune thrombocytopenic purpura.
itraconazole listen (IH-truh-KAH-nuh-zole)
A drug used to prevent or treat fungal infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called antifungal agents.
IU listen
A unit used to measure the activity of many vitamins, hormones, enzymes, and drugs. An IU is the amount of a substance that has a certain biological effect. For each substance there is an international agreement on the biological effect that is expected for 1 IU. Also called International Unit.
IUD
A small, plastic T-shaped device that is placed inside the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman’s pelvis in which a fetus develops) to prevent pregnancy. IUDs prevent sperm from fertilizing an egg, and prevent fertilized eggs from implanting in the uterus. The use of IUDs is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of endometrial cancer and other conditions. Also called intrauterine device.
IV
Into or within a vein. IV usually refers to a way of giving a drug or other substance through a needle or tube inserted into a vein. Also called intravenous.
IVIG
A substance made from antibodies that have been taken from the blood of many healthy donors. It is given to a patient through a needle or tube inserted into a vein. IVIGs are used to treat certain types of immune disorders in which there are low amounts of antibodies in the blood. They are also used to treat many different autoimmune disorders, infections, or other conditions. They may also be used to help prevent infections in patients who have had a stem cell or organ transplant. IVIGs are a type of immunotherapy. Also called intravenous immunoglobulin.
ivosidenib listen (I-voh-SIH-deh-nib)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called isocitrate dehydrogenase-1 (IDH1). It is used in adults whose cancer is newly diagnosed and who are either 75 years and older or cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. Ivosidenib is also used in adults whose cancer has relapsed (come back) or has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ivosidenib blocks the protein made by the mutated IDH1 gene. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Ivosidenib is a type of enzyme inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Tibsovo.
IVP
A procedure in which x-ray images of the kidneys, ureters, and bladder are taken at regular times after a substance that shows up on x-rays is injected into a blood vessel. The substance outlines the kidneys, ureters, and bladder as it flows through the system and collects in the urine. IVP is usually done to look for a block in the flow of urine. Also called intravenous pyelography.
ixabepilone listen (IK-suh-BEH-pih-lone)
A drug used to treat metastatic or locally advanced breast cancer that has not improved after treatment with certain other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ixabepilone stops the growth of tumor cells by blocking cell division. It is a type of epothilone analog. Also called BMS-247550 and Ixempra.
ixazomib citrate listen (ik-SA-zoh-mib SIH-trayt)
A drug used with lenalidomide and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients who received at least one other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ixazomib citrate blocks enzymes called proteasomes, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor. Also called Ninlaro.
Ixempra listen (ik-SEM-pruh)
A drug used to treat metastatic or locally advanced breast cancer that has not improved after treatment with certain other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ixempra stops the growth of tumor cells by blocking cell division. It is a type of epothilone analog. Also called BMS-247550 and ixabepilone.
J-107088
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase I inhibitor. Also called edotecarin.
JAK2 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called JAK2, which sends signals in cells that promote cell growth. This protein helps control the number of red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets that are made in the bone marrow. Mutated (changed) forms of the JAK gene have been found in some types of blood conditions, including polycythemia vera, essential thrombocythemia, and primary myelofibrosis. These changes may cause the body to make too many blood cells.
Jakafi listen (JA-kah-fy)
A drug used to treat polycythemia vera in patients who cannot be treated with or have not gotten better with hydroxyurea. It is also used to treat certain types of myelofibrosis. It is being studied in the treatment of other blood diseases and some types of cancer. Jakafi blocks a protein called JAK, which may help keep abnormal blood cells or cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called ruxolitinib phosphate.
Jamshidi needle listen (jam-SHEE-dee NEE-dul)
A long, hollow needle with a tapered cutting edge on one end and a handle with a place to attach a syringe on the other end. It is used to remove a sample of tissue from the bone marrow. The needle is inserted through the bone into the bone marrow and the syringe is attached to the top to remove the sample or to deliver drugs or fluid into the bone. A Jamshidi needle is a type of bone marrow needle.
jaundice listen (JAWN-dis)
A condition in which the skin and the whites of the eyes become yellow, urine darkens, and the color of stool becomes lighter than normal. Jaundice occurs when the liver is not working properly or when a bile duct is blocked.
Javlor listen (JAV-lor)
A substance being studied in the treatment of bladder cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. Also called vinflunine.
JEB
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat childhood ovarian and testicular germ cell cancers that have spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin (JM8), etoposide phosphate, and bleomycin sulfate. Also called JEB regimen.
JEB regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat childhood ovarian and testicular germ cell cancers that have spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin (JM8), etoposide phosphate, and bleomycin sulfate. Also called JEB.
jejunostomy listen (JEH-joo-NOS-toh-mee)
Surgery to create an opening into the jejunum (part of the small intestine) from the outside of the body. A jejunostomy allows a feeding tube to be put into the small intestine.
jejunum listen (jeh-JYOO-num)
The middle part of the small intestine. It is between the duodenum (first part of the small intestine) and the ileum (last part of the small intestine). The jejunum helps to further digest food coming from the stomach. It absorbs nutrients (vitamins, minerals, carbohydrates, fats, proteins) and water from food so they can be used by the body.
Jevtana listen (jev-TA-nuh)
A drug used with prednisone to treat hormone-resistant prostate cancer that has spread and that had been treated with docetaxel. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Jevtana blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimitotic agent. Also called cabazitaxel and taxoid XRP6258.
Jewett staging system listen (JOO-et STAY-jing SIS-tem)
A staging system for prostate cancer that uses ABCD. “A” and “B” refer to cancer that is confined to the prostate. “C” refers to cancer that has grown out of the prostate but has not spread to lymph nodes or other places in the body. “D” refers to cancer that has spread to lymph nodes or to other places in the body. Also called ABCD rating and Whitmore-Jewett staging system.
jiang huang listen (jyong hwong)
An East Indian plant that is a member of the ginger family and is used as a spice and food color. The underground stems are used in some cultures to treat certain stomach problems. The substance in jiang huang that gives it a yellow color (curcumin) is being studied in the treatment of cancer, Alzheimer disease, cystic fibrosis, and psoriasis. The scientific name is Curcuma longa. Also called Indian saffron and turmeric.
Jim’s Juice listen (jimz joos)
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in Jim’s Juice have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. Jim’s Juice is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Cantron, JS–101, JS–114, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
JM 216
A substance being studied in the treatment of prostate and other types of cancer. It contains the metal platinum and may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called BMS-182751 and satraplatin.
JMML
A rare form of childhood leukemia in which cancer cells often spread into tissues such as the skin, lung, and intestines. Also called juvenile myelomonocytic leukemia.
johimbe listen (yo-HIM-bay)
A tree native to West Africa. The bark is used as a supplement for bodybuilding and to enhance male sexual performance. It contains the chemical yohimbine, which is being studied in the treatment of sexual dysfunction. It may interact with certain drugs used to treat depression, high blood pressure, and high blood sugar. The scientific name is Pausinystalia yohimbe. Also called yohimbe.
joint listen (joynt)
In medicine, the place where two or more bones are connected. Examples include the shoulder, elbow, knee, and jaw.
J-pouch coloanal anastomosis listen (... powch KOH-loh-AY-nul uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A surgical procedure in which the colon is attached to the anus after the rectum has been removed. A 2-4 inch section of the colon is formed into a J-shaped pouch in order to replace the function of the rectum and store stool until it can be eliminated. This procedure is similar to the side-to-end coloanal anastomosis but a larger pouch is formed.
J-pouch colorectal anastomosis listen (… powch KOH-loh-REK-tul uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A surgical procedure in which the colon is attached to the remainder of the rectum after most of it has been removed during surgery for rectal cancer. A 2-inch to 4-inch section of the colon is formed into a J-shaped pouch to store stool until it can be eliminated.
JS–101
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in JS–101 have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. JS–101 is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–114, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
JS–114
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in JS–114 have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. JS–114 is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
junctional nevus listen (JUNK-shuh-nul NEE-vus)
A type of nevus (mole) found at the junction (border) between the epidermis (outer) and the dermis (inner) layers of the skin. These moles may be colored and slightly raised.
juvenile myelomonocytic leukemia listen (JOO-veh-NILE MY-eh-loh-MAH-noh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A rare form of childhood leukemia in which cancer cells often spread into tissues such as the skin, lung, and intestines. Also called JMML.
juvenile nasopharyngeal angiofibroma listen (JOO-veh-nile NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul AN-jee-oh-fy-BROH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor that is made up of blood vessels and fibrous (connective) tissue. Juvenile nasopharyngeal angiofibromas form in the back of the nose and may spread to the upper part of the throat, the sinuses around the nose, the bone around the eyes, and rarely, to the brain. Signs and symptoms may include runny nose, nosebleeds, problems breathing through the nose, hearing loss, and easy bruising. Juvenile nasopharyngeal angiofibromas are most common in young men. They are a type of vascular tumor.
juvenile pilocytic astrocytoma listen (JOO-veh-NILE PY-loh-SIH-tik AS-troh-sy-TOH-muh)
A slow-growing type of central nervous system tumor that forms from glial (supportive) tissue of the brain and spinal cord. Juvenile pilocytic astrocytoma usually occurs in children and young adults. It forms in the brain more often than the spinal cord.
juvenile rickets listen (JOO-veh-NILE RIH-kets)
A condition in children in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet or by not getting enough sunlight. In adults, this condition is called osteomalacia. Also called infantile rickets, rachitis, and rickets.
Kadcyla listen (kad-SY-luh)
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is used in certain patients who have already been treated with an anticancer drug called trastuzumab and a type of drug called a taxane. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Kadcyla contains a monoclonal antibody called trastuzumab that binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some breast cancer cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called DM1, which may help kill cancer cells. Kadcyla is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called ado-trastuzumab emtansine and T-DM1.
Kahler disease listen (KAH-ler dih-ZEEZ)
A type of cancer that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). Also called multiple myeloma, myelomatosis, and plasma cell myeloma.
Kaletra listen (kuh-LEH-truh)
A combination of the drugs ritonavir and lopinavir. It is used to treat infection with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS). It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Kaletra blocks the ability of HIV to make copies of itself and may help other anticancer drugs work better or may block the growth of cancer cells. Ritonavir blocks the breakdown of lopinavir. Kaletra is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called lopinavir/ritonavir.
Kaposi sarcoma listen (kuh-POH-zee sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer in which lesions (abnormal areas) grow in the skin, lymph nodes, lining of the mouth, nose, and throat, and other tissues of the body. The lesions are usually purple and are made of cancer cells, new blood vessels, and blood cells. They may begin in more than one place in the body at the same time. Kaposi sarcoma is caused by Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus (KSHV). In the United States, it usually occurs in people who have a weak immune system caused by AIDS or by drugs used in organ transplants. It is also seen in older men of Jewish or Mediterranean descent, or in young men in Africa.
Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus listen (kuh-POH-zee sar-KOH-muh-uh-SOH-see-ay-ted HER-peez-VY-rus)
A type of virus that causes Kaposi sarcoma (a rare cancer in which lesions grow in the skin, lymph nodes, lining of the mouth, nose, and throat, and other tissues of the body). Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus also causes certain types of lymphoma (cancer that begins in cells of the immune system). Also called HHV8, human herpesvirus 8, and KSHV.
kaposiform hemangioendothelioma listen (kuh-POH-zee-form hee-MAN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A rare blood vessel tumor that usually forms on the skin of the arms and legs, but may also form in deeper tissues, such as muscle and bone. Kaposiform hemangioendotheliomas may sometimes form in the lymph nodes, chest, abdomen, or bones. They are fast growing and can spread to nearby tissue, but usually do not spread to other parts of the body. Signs and symptoms may include firm, painful areas of skin that look bruised; purple or brownish-red areas on the skin; easy bruising; anemia; and abnormal bleeding. Kaposiform hemangioendotheliomas are most common in infants and young children. They are a type of vascular tumor.
karenitecin listen (kuh-REH-nih-TEE-kan)
A drug being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. It is related to the anticancer drug camptothecin.
Karnofsky Performance Status listen (kar-NOF-skee per-FOR-munts STA-tus)
A standard way of measuring the ability of cancer patients to perform ordinary tasks. The Karnofsky Performance Status scores range from 0 to 100. A higher score means the patient is better able to carry out daily activities. Karnofsky Performance Status may be used to determine a patient's prognosis, to measure changes in a patient’s ability to function, or to decide if a patient could be included in a clinical trial. Also called KPS.
Kasabach-Merritt syndrome listen (KAS-uh-bak-MAYR-it SIN-drome)
A rare condition in which the blood is not able to clot and serious bleeding may occur. It occurs in some patients who have blood vessel tumors called tufted angiomas and kaposiform hemangioendotheliomas. These tumors usually form on the skin but may also form in deeper tissues, such as muscle and bone. The tumors may grow quickly and trap and destroy platelets, which are needed to form clots and stop bleeding. Kasabach-Merritt syndrome is most common in infants and young children.
Kassebaum Kennedy Act listen (KAH-seh-bawm KEH-nuh-dee ...)
A 1996 U.S. law that allows workers and their families to keep their health insurance when they change or lose their jobs. The privacy rule of the Kassebaum Kennedy Act protects the privacy of a person’s health information and keeps it from being misused. It gives people the right to receive and review their health records and to choose with whom their healthcare providers and health insurance companies share their information (including friends, family members, and caregivers). The law also includes standards for setting up and maintaining secure electronic health records. Also called Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and HIPAA.
kava kava listen (KAH-vuh KAH-vuh)
An herb native to islands in the South Pacific. Substances taken from the root have been used in some cultures to relieve stress, anxiety, tension, sleeplessness, and problems of menopause. Kava kava may increase the effect of alcohol and of certain drugs used to treat anxiety and depression. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration advises users that kava kava may cause severe liver damage. The scientific name is Piper methysticum. Also called intoxicating pepper, rauschpfeffer, tonga, and yangona.
keloid listen (KEE-loyd)
A thick, irregular scar caused by excessive tissue growth at the site of an incision or wound.
kelp listen (kelp)
A type of seaweed. The stem-like parts of this plant have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have immunostimulatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Laminaria digitata.
Kemstro listen (KEM-stroh)
A drug that is used to treat certain types of muscle spasms and is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. Kemstro relaxes muscles by blocking certain nerve receptors in the spinal cord. It is a type of antispasmodic. Also called baclofen and Lioresal.
Kepivance listen (KEH-puh-vants)
A drug used to prevent and treat severe oral mucositis (mouth sores). It is used in patients with certain types of blood cancer who are being treated with high-dose chemotherapy and radiation therapy followed by a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of common side effects in other types of cancer. Kepivance is form of keratinocyte growth factor (KGF) that is made in the laboratory. KGF stimulates the growth of cells in the lining of the mouth, stomach, and intestines. Kepivance is a type of recombinant human keratinocyte growth factor. Also called palifermin.
Keppra listen (KEH-pruh)
A drug used to treat seizures (involuntary muscle movements) caused by epilepsy (a group of brain disorders). Keppra is being studied in the treatment of seizures in patients with cancer that has spread to the brain. It is a type of anticonvulsant. Also called levetiracetam.
keratan sulfate listen (KAYR-uh-tan SUL-fayt)
A glycosaminoglycan (a type of polysaccharide) found in cartilage and in the cornea of the eye.
keratin listen (KAYR-uh-tin)
A type of protein found on epithelial cells, which line the inside and outside surfaces of the body. Keratins help form the tissues of the hair, nails, and the outer layer of the skin. They are also found on cells in the lining of organs, glands, and other parts of the body. Certain keratins may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with different types of epithelial cell cancers, including lung, breast, colorectal, bladder, and head and neck cancers. Measuring the amount of specific keratins in the blood may help to plan cancer treatment or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. A keratin is a type of tumor marker. Also called cytokeratin.
keratinocyte growth factor listen (keh-RA-tih-noh-site grothe FAK-ter)
A natural substance that stimulates the growth of epithelial cells in the skin and in the lining of the mouth, stomach, and intestines. A form of keratinocyte growth factor made in the laboratory is called recombinant human keratinocyte growth factor. Also called KGF.
keratoacanthoma listen (KAYR-uh-toh-AK-un-THOH-muh)
A rapidly growing, dome-shaped skin tumor that usually occurs on sun-exposed areas of the body, especially around the head and neck. Keratoacanthoma occurs more often in males. Although in most patients it goes away on its own, in a few patients it comes back. Rarely, it may spread to other parts of the body.
Ketalar listen (KEE-tuh-lar)
A drug used to cause a loss of feeling and awareness and to induce sleep in patients having surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of nerve pain caused by chemotherapy. Ketalar blocks pathways to the brain that are involved in sensing pain. It is a type of general anesthetic. Also called ketamine hydrochloride.
ketamine hydrochloride listen (KEE-tuh-meen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to cause a loss of feeling and awareness and to induce sleep in patients having surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of nerve pain caused by chemotherapy. Ketamine hydrochloride blocks pathways to the brain that are involved in sensing pain. It is a type of general anesthetic. Also called Ketalar.
ketoconazole listen (KEE-toh-KAH-nuh-zole)
A drug that treats infection caused by a fungus. It is also used as a treatment for prostate cancer because it can block the production of male sex hormones.
ketogenic diet listen (KEE-toh-JEH-nik DY-et)
A diet high in fat and low in carbohydrates (sugars) that causes the body to break down fat into molecules called ketones. Ketones circulate in the blood and become the main source of energy for many cells in the body. A ketogenic diet is used to treat some types of epilepsy and is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer.
ketone listen (KEE-tone)
A type of chemical substance used in perfumes, paints, solvents, and found in essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants). Ketones are also made by the body when there is not enough insulin.
ketoprofen listen (KEE-toh-PROH-fen)
A drug used to treat mild pain. It is also used to treat menstrual cramps, fever, and symptoms of arthritis, such as pain, tenderness, swelling, and stiffness. Ketoprofen stops the body from making substances that cause pain and inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID).
ketorolac listen (KEE-tor-OH-lak)
A drug that belongs to a family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory agents. It is being studied in cancer prevention.
keyhole limpet hemocyanin listen (KEE-hole LIM-pet HEE-moh-SY-uh-nin)
A substance taken from a marine organism that may be linked to a specific antigen to boost the immune response to that antigen. Keyhole limpet hemocyanin is being studied as a way to increase the immune response to cancer vaccines. It is a type of immune modulator. Also called KLH.
Keytruda listen (kee-TROO-duh)
A drug used with axitinib to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that has not already been treated. It is also used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of small cell lung cancer, Merkel cell carcinoma, hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer), cervical cancer, stomach cancer, gastroesophageal junction cancer, urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer), Hodgkin lymphoma, primary mediastinal large B-cell lymphoma, non-small cell lung cancer, head and neck cancer, and melanoma. Keytruda is also used to treat some types of solid tumors, including colorectal cancer, that have certain mutations in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Keytruda binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells. Keytruda may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called pembrolizumab.
KGF
A natural substance that stimulates the growth of epithelial cells in the skin and in the lining of the mouth, stomach, and intestines. A form of KGF made in the laboratory is called recombinant human keratinocyte growth factor. Also called keratinocyte growth factor.
kidney listen (KID-nee)
One of a pair of organs in the abdomen. The kidneys remove waste and extra water from the blood (as urine) and help keep chemicals (such as sodium, potassium, and calcium) balanced in the body. The kidneys also make hormones that help control blood pressure and stimulate bone marrow to make red blood cells.
kidney cancer listen (KID-nee KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the kidneys. The most common type of kidney cancer in adults is renal cell carcinoma. It forms in the lining of very small tubes in the kidney that filter the blood and remove waste products. Transitional cell cancer of the renal pelvis is kidney cancer that forms in the center of the kidney where urine collects. Wilms tumor is a type of kidney cancer that usually develops in children under the age of 5.
kidney failure listen (KID-nee FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the kidneys stop working and are not able to remove waste and extra water from the blood or keep body chemicals in balance. Acute or severe kidney failure happens suddenly (for example, after an injury) and may be treated and cured. Chronic kidney failure develops over many years, may be caused by conditions like high blood pressure or diabetes, and cannot be cured. Chronic kidney failure may lead to total and long-lasting kidney failure, called end-stage renal disease (ESRD). A person in ESRD needs dialysis (the process of cleaning the blood by passing it through a membrane or filter) or a kidney transplant. Also called renal failure.
kidney function listen (KID-nee FUNK-shun)
A term used to describe how well the kidneys work. The kidneys remove waste and extra water from the blood (as urine) and help keep chemicals (such as sodium, potassium, and calcium) balanced in the body. They also make hormones that help control blood pressure and stimulate bone marrow to make red blood cells. Also called renal function.
kidney function test listen (KID-nee FUNK-shun ...)
A test in which blood or urine samples are checked for the amounts of certain substances released by the kidneys. A higher- or lower-than-normal amount of a substance can be a sign that the kidneys are not working the way they should. Also called renal function test.
killer T cell listen (KIH-ler ... sel)
A type of immune cell that can kill certain cells, including foreign cells, cancer cells, and cells infected with a virus. Killer T cells can be separated from other blood cells, grown in the laboratory, and then given to a patient to kill cancer cells. A killer T cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called cytotoxic T cell and cytotoxic T lymphocyte.
kilogram listen (KIH-loh-gram)
A measure of weight. A kilogram is equal to 2.2 pounds.
Kinaret listen (KIH-nuh-ret)
A substance that is used to treat rheumatoid arthritis, and is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Kinaret blocks the action of interleukin 1 (IL-1). It is a type of interleukin receptor antagonist. Also called anakinra.
kinase listen (KY-nays)
A type of enzyme (a protein that speeds up chemical reactions in the body) that adds chemicals called phosphates to other molecules, such as sugars or proteins. This may cause other molecules in the cell to become either active or inactive. Kinases are a part of many cell processes. Some cancer treatments target certain kinases that are linked to cancer.
kinase inhibitor listen (KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks a type of enzyme called a kinase. Human cells have many different kinases, and they help control important functions, such as cell signaling, metabolism, division, and survival. Certain kinases are more active in some types of cancer cells and blocking them may help keep the cancer cells from growing. Kinase inhibitors may also block the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Some kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer.
Kisqali listen (kis-KAH-lee)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2 negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor (a type of hormone therapy) in women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is used with fulvestrant in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy or whose cancer got worse during treatment with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Kisqali blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called ribociclib succinate.
kit ligand listen (... LIH-gund)
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. Kit ligand is a type of cytokine and a type of growth factor. Also called SCF and stem cell factor.
Klatskin tumor listen (KLAT-skin TOO-mer)
Cancer that develops in cells that line the bile ducts in the liver, where the right and left ducts meet. It is a type of cholangiocarcinoma.
Klebsiella listen (KLEB-see-EH-luh)
A bacterium that frequently causes lung, urinary tract, intestinal, and wound infections.
KLH
A substance taken from a marine organism that may be linked to a specific antigen to boost the immune response to that antigen. KLH is being studied as a way to increase the immune response to cancer vaccines. It is a type of immune modulator. Also called keyhole limpet hemocyanin.
Klinefelter syndrome listen (KLINE-fel-ter SIN-drome)
A genetic disorder in males caused by having one or more extra X chromosomes. Males with this disorder may have larger than normal breasts, a lack of facial and body hair, a rounded body type, and small testicles. They may learn to speak much later than other children and may have difficulty learning to read and write. Klinefelter syndrome increases the risk of developing extragonadal germ cell tumors and breast cancer.
Klippel-Trenaunay syndrome listen (klih-PEL-tray-noh-NAY SIN-drome)
A rare disorder that affects the blood vessels, soft tissues, and bones. It may also affect the lymph vessels. Klippel-Trenaunay syndrome is marked by a port-wine stain (a red or purplish birthmark caused by swelling of small blood vessels near the surface of the skin), abnormal overgrowth of bone and soft tissue, and varicose veins or other abnormal veins. It usually affects the legs, but it can also affect the arms or trunk. Klippel-Trenaunay syndrome is present at birth.
Korean acupuncture listen (kuh-REE-un AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A type of acupuncture based on a form of Oriental medicine in which treatment is based on a person’s constitution. According to this type of medicine, the constitution is the specific way a person’s organs affect health and how he or she looks, thinks, behaves, and responds to treatment. Also called constitutional acupuncture.
KOS-862
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and epothilone. Also called epothilone D.
Kostmann disease listen (KOST-mun dih-ZEEZ)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called congenital neutropenia, genetic infantile agranulocytosis, infantile genetic agranulocytosis, Kostmann neutropenia, and Kostmann syndrome.
Kostmann neutropenia listen (KOST-mun noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called congenital neutropenia, genetic infantile agranulocytosis, infantile genetic agranulocytosis, Kostmann disease, and Kostmann syndrome.
Kostmann syndrome listen (KOST-mun SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell that is important in fighting infections). Infants with the disorder get infections caused by bacteria, and are at an increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia (AML) or myelodysplasia (a bone marrow disorder). Also called congenital neutropenia, genetic infantile agranulocytosis, infantile genetic agranulocytosis, Kostmann disease, and Kostmann neutropenia.
KPS
A standard way of measuring the ability of cancer patients to perform ordinary tasks. The KPS scores range from 0 to 100. A higher score means the patient is better able to carry out daily activities. KPS may be used to determine a patient's prognosis, to measure changes in a patient’s ability to function, or to decide if a patient could be included in a clinical trial. Also called Karnofsky Performance Status.
KRAS gene listen (KAY-ras jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called KRAS, which is involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth, cell maturation, and cell death. The natural, unchanged form of the gene is called wild-type KRAS. Mutated (changed) forms of the KRAS gene have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), colorectal cancer, and pancreatic cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Knowing whether a patient’s tumor has a wild-type or mutated KRAS gene may help plan cancer treatment. Also called K-RAS gene.
K-RAS gene listen (KAY-ras jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called KRAS, which is involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth, cell maturation, and cell death. The natural, unchanged form of the gene is called wild-type KRAS. Mutated (changed) forms of the K-RAS gene have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), colorectal cancer, and pancreatic cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Knowing whether a patient’s tumor has a wild-type or mutated K-RAS gene may help plan cancer treatment. Also called KRAS gene.
kretek listen (KREE-tek)
A type of cigarette that is made in Indonesia. It is made using a mixture of tobacco, cloves, and other ingredients. Kreteks contain nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Smoking kreteks can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause lung cancer and other lung conditions. Also called clove cigarette.
KRN5500
An anticancer drug that is a type of antitumor antibiotic. It is an anthracycline.
KRN7000
A drug being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a biological response modifier that is a type of glycosphingolipid or agelasphin.
Krukenberg tumor listen (KROO-ken-berg TOO-mer)
A tumor in the ovary caused by the spread of stomach cancer.
KSHV
A type of virus that causes Kaposi sarcoma (a rare cancer in which lesions grow in the skin, lymph nodes, lining of the mouth, nose, and throat, and other tissues of the body). KSHV also causes certain types of lymphoma (cancer that begins in cells of the immune system). Also called HHV8, human herpesvirus 8, and Kaposi sarcoma-associated herpesvirus.
KW2189
A semisynthetic anticancer drug that is a type of antitumor antibiotic.
KX2-391
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. KX2-391 blocks an enzyme needed for growth of cells and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of Src kinase inhibitor.
Kymriah listen (kim-RY-uh)
A drug used to treat diffuse large B-cell lymphoma that relapsed (came back) or did not get better after treatment with at least two other types of anticancer therapy. Kymriah is also used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) in patients aged 25 years and younger. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other treatment or has relapsed two or more times. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Kymriah is made using a patient’s T cells (a type of immune system cell). A gene for a special receptor called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) is added to the T cells in the laboratory. These changed T cells called CAR T cells are grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. Kymriah binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on some leukemia and lymphoma cells. This helps the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Kymriah is a type of CAR T-cell therapy. Also called tisagenlecleucel.
kyphosis listen (ky-FOH-sis)
A condition marked by a humpback-like rounding or outward curve of the upper backbone. It may be present at birth or it may be caused by growth problems, arthritis, osteoporosis, tumors, or certain other disorders. It may also occur at some point in time after radiation therapy to the backbone.
Kyprolis listen (ky-PROH-lis)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat multiple myeloma that has gotten worse or came back after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Kyprolis blocks the action of enzymes called proteasomes, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor. Also called carfilzomib.
L listen
A measure of volume for a liquid, using the metric system. One L is equal to 1,000 cubic centimeters (cc), 1,000 milliliters (mL), or 1.0567 quarts (qt). Also called liter.
L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine listen (...TEH-truh-i-oh-doh-THY-roh-neen)
A hormone that is made by the thyroid gland and contains iodine. L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine increases the rate of chemical reactions in cells and helps control growth and development. L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine can also be made in the laboratory and is used to treat thyroid disorders. Also called T4, thyroxin, and thyroxine.
L-377,202
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
L-778,123
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called enzyme inhibitors. It may inhibit the transformation of normal cells into cancer cells.
labial mucosa listen (LAY-bee-ul myoo-KOH-suh)
The inner lining of the lips.
lab-on-a-chip listen (lab-on-uh-chip)
An instrument that uses very small amounts of fluid on a microchip to do certain laboratory tests. A lab-on-a-chip may use body fluids or solutions containing cells or cell parts to diagnose diseases. Also called microfluidic device.
laboratory study listen (LA-bruh-tor-ee STUH-dee)
Research done in a laboratory. A laboratory study may use special equipment and cells or animals to find out if a drug, procedure, or treatment is likely to be useful in humans. It may also be a part of a clinical trial, such as when blood or other samples are collected. These may be used to measure the effect of a drug, procedure, or treatment on the body.
laboratory test listen (LA-bruh-tor-ee...)
A medical procedure that involves testing a sample of blood, urine, or other substance from the body. Laboratory tests can help determine a diagnosis, plan treatment, check to see if treatment is working, or monitor the disease over time.
lacrimal gland listen (LA-krih-mul ...)
A gland that secretes tears. The lacrimal glands are found in the upper, outer part of each eye socket.
lactase listen (LAK-tays)
An enzyme that breaks down lactose, a type of sugar found in milk and milk products.
lactate dehydrogenase listen (LAK-tayt dee-hy-DRAH-jeh-nays)
One of a group of enzymes found in the blood and other body tissues and involved in energy production in cells. An increased amount of lactate dehydrogenase in the blood may be a sign of tissue damage and some types of cancer or other diseases. Also called lactic acid dehydrogenase and LDH.
lactic acid listen (LAK-tik A-sid)
A substance made from sugars in milk, by the action of certain enzymes. It is used in skin care products to reduce wrinkles and soften the skin. It is also being studied in the treatment of hand-foot syndrome (a condition marked by pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet) in patients receiving chemotherapy. Lactic acid is also made in muscles in the body and is used in many chemical processes in the body. It is a type of alpha hydroxyl acid.
lactic acid dehydrogenase listen (LAK-tik A-sid dee-hy-DRAH-jeh-nays)
One of a group of enzymes found in the blood and other body tissues, and involved in energy production in cells. An increased amount in the blood may be a sign of tissue damage and some types of cancer or other diseases. Also called lactate dehydrogenase and LDH.
lactobacillus listen (LAK-toh-buh-SIH-lus)
A type of bacterium that makes lactic acid (a substance that is made from sugars found in milk and is also made in the body). Lactobacilli usually do not cause disease, but may cause tooth decay. They are normally found in the mouth, gastrointestinal tract, and vagina. They are being studied in the prevention of infections in patients having donor stem cell transplants and in other conditions.
Lactobacillus rhamnosus GG listen (LAK-toh-buh-SIH-lus ram-NOH-sus ...)
A live form of a bacterium that makes lactic acid (a substance that is made from sugars found in milk and is also made in the body). Lactobacillus rhamnosus GG is given to help with digestion and normal bowel function. It may also help keep the gastrointestinal (GI) tract healthy. It is being studied in the prevention of infections in patients having donor stem cell transplants and in other conditions. Also called Culturelle.
lactoferrin listen (LAK-toh-fayr-in)
A protein that is found in milk, tears, mucus, bile, and some white blood cells and is being studied in the treatment and prevention of cancer. It is involved in fighting against infection and inflammation and it acts as an antioxidant.
lactose listen (LAK-tose)
A type of sugar found in milk and milk products.
lactose intolerance listen (LAK-tose in-TAH-leh-runts)
The inability to digest or absorb lactose, a type of sugar found in milk and other dairy products.
laetrile listen (LAY-eh-tril)
A purified form of amygdalin made in the laboratory. Amygdalin is a substance found in the pits of some fruits, such as apricots, and in raw nuts and plants. Laetrile has been used in some countries as a treatment for cancer, but it has not been shown to work in human clinical trials. It is not approved for use in the United States.
LAK cell listen (… sel)
A white blood cell that is stimulated in a laboratory to kill tumor cells. Also called lymphokine-activated killer cell.
lamina propria listen (LA-mih-nuh PROH-pree-uh)
A type of connective tissue found under the thin layer of tissues covering a mucous membrane.
lamivudine listen (luh-MIH-vyoo-deen)
A drug used to treat infection caused by viruses.
lamotrigine listen (luh-MOH-trih-jeen)
A drug that is used to help control some types of seizures. It is being studied in the prevention of peripheral neuropathy caused by some chemotherapy drugs. It belongs to the family of drugs called anticonvulsants.
Langerhans cell histiocytosis listen (LANG-er-hanz sel HIS-tee-oh-sy-TOH-sis)
A group of rare disorders in which too many Langerhans cells (a type of white blood cell) grow in certain tissues and organs including the bones, skin, and lungs, and damage them. Langerhans cell histiocytosis may also affect the pituitary gland (which makes hormones that control other glands and many body functions, especially growth). Langerhans cell histiocytosis is most common in children and young adults. Also called LCH.
lanolin listen (LA-noh-lin)
An oily substance taken from sheep's wool. Lanolin is used in moisturizing creams and lotions to treat dry, itchy skin.
Lanoxin listen (luh-NOK-sin)
A drug used to treat irregular heartbeat and some types of heart failure. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Lanoxin helps the heart work normally by controlling the amount of calcium that goes into the heart muscle. It also may kill cancer cells and make them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of cardiac glycoside. Also called digoxin.
lanreotide acetate listen (lan-REE-oh-tide A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to treat gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. These tumors form in the stomach, small and large intestines, rectum, and pancreas. Lanreotide acetate is used for tumors that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also used to treat carcinoid syndrome and some patients with acromegaly (a condition in which the pituitary gland makes too much growth hormone). Lanreotide acetate is like somatostatin (a hormone made by the body), and may help stop the body from making extra amounts of certain hormones, including growth hormone, insulin, glucagon, and hormones that affect digestion. It may also help keep certain types of tumor cells from growing. Lanreotide acetate is a type of somatostatin analog. Also called Somatuline Depot.
lansoprazole listen (lan-SOH-pruh-zole)
A drug that reduces the amount of acid made in the stomach. It is used to treat stomach ulcers, gastroesophageal reflux disease (a condition in which acid from the stomach causes heartburn), and conditions in which the stomach makes too much acid. Lansoprazole is a type of proton pump inhibitor (PPI). Also called Prevacid.
Lantus listen (LAN-tus)
A drug used to control the amount of sugar in the blood of patients with diabetes. It is a form of the hormone insulin that is made in the laboratory. Lantus controls blood sugar longer than insulin does. It is a type of therapeutic insulin. Also called insulin glargine and insulin glargine recombinant.
laparoscope listen (LA-puh-ruh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to look at tissues and organs inside the abdomen. A laparoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
laparoscopic prostatectomy listen (LA-puh-ruh-SKAH-pik PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all or part of the prostate with the aid of a laparoscope. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
laparoscopic surgery listen (LA-puh-ruh-SKAH-pik SER-juh-ree)
Surgery done with the aid of a laparoscope. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called laparoscopic-assisted resection.
laparoscopic-assisted colectomy listen (LA-puh-ruh-SKAH-pik-uh-SIS-ted koh-LEK-toh-mee)
Surgery done with the aid of a laparoscope to remove all or part of the colon through several small incisions made in the wall of the abdomen. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. The laparoscope is inserted through one opening to guide the surgery. Surgical instruments are inserted through the other openings to perform the surgery. When only part of the colon is removed, it is called a partial colectomy.
laparoscopic-assisted resection listen (LA-puh-ruh-SKAH-pik-uh-SIS-ted ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery done with the aid of a laparoscope. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called laparoscopic surgery.
laparoscopy listen (LA-puh-ROS-koh-pee)
A procedure that uses a laparoscope, inserted through the abdominal wall, to examine the inside of the abdomen. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
laparotomy listen (LA-puh-RAH-toh-mee)
A surgical incision made in the wall of the abdomen.
lapatinib listen (luh-PA-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat HER2 positive (HER2+) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with capecitabine in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is used with letrozole in postmenopausal women whose cancer is hormone receptor positive (HR+) and who need hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lapatinib blocks epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. Lapatinib is a type of ErbB2 and EGFR dual tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called GW572016, lapatinib ditosylate, and Tykerb.
lapatinib ditosylate listen (luh-PA-tih-nib dy-TOH-sih-layt)
A drug used to treat HER2 positive (HER2+) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with capecitabine in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is used with letrozole in postmenopausal women whose cancer is hormone receptor positive (HR+) and who need hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lapatinib ditosylate blocks epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. Lapatinib ditosylate is a type of ErbB2 and EGFR dual tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called GW572016, lapatinib, and Tykerb.
lappa listen (LA-puh)
A plant whose seeds and root have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. The scientific name is Arctium lappa. Also called burdock and happy major.
large cell carcinoma listen (...KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Lung cancer in which the cells are large and look abnormal when viewed under a microscope.
large granular lymphocyte listen (larj GRAN-yoo-lur LIM-foh-site)
A type of white blood cell that contains granules with enzymes that can kill tumor cells or microbial cells.
large intestine listen (larj in-TES-tin)
The long, tube-like organ that is connected to the small intestine at one end and the anus at the other. The large intestine has four parts: cecum, colon, rectum, and anal canal. Partly digested food moves through the cecum into the colon, where water and some nutrients and electrolytes are removed. The remaining material, solid waste called stool, moves through the colon, is stored in the rectum, and leaves the body through the anal canal and anus.
L-arginine listen (… AR-jih-neen)
One of the twenty common amino acids (building blocks of proteins). L-arginine is being studied as a nutritional supplement in the treatment and prevention of cancer and other conditions. Also called arginine.
laromustine listen (LAYR-oh-MUS-teen)
A drug used to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of several other types of cancer. It blocks cell growth by damaging the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Cloretazine and Onrigin.
larotrectinib sulfate listen (LAYR-oh-TREK-tih-nib SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat solid tumors that have spread to other parts of the body or cannot be removed by surgery and that got worse after other treatment or cannot be treated with other therapies. It is used in patients whose disease has the NTRK gene fusion but does not have certain mutations (changes) in the TRK protein. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Larotrectinib sulfate blocks the TRK protein, which is involved in cell signaling and cell growth. TRK may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Larotrectinib sulfate is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called LOXO-101, Trk inhibitor LOXO-101, and Vitrakvi.
Lartruvo listen (lar-TROO-voh)
A drug used with doxorubicin to treat soft tissue sarcoma that cannot be treated with radiation therapy or surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated with an anthracycline (a type of anticancer drug). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lartruvo binds to a receptor for a protein called platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein receptor may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Lartruvo is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, IMC-3G3, and olaratumab.
laryngeal listen (luh-RIN-jee-ul)
Having to do with the larynx.
laryngeal cancer listen (luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the larynx (area of the throat that contains the vocal cords and is used for breathing, swallowing, and talking). Most laryngeal cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the larynx).
laryngectomee listen (LAYR-in-JEK-toh-MEE)
A person whose larynx (voice box) has been removed.
laryngectomy listen (LAYR-in-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove all or part of the larynx (voice box).
laryngitis listen (LAYR-in-JY-tis)
Inflammation of the larynx.
laryngoscope listen (luh-RIN-goh-SKOPE)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the larynx (voice box). A laryngoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
laryngoscopy listen (LAYR-in-GOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the larynx (voice box) with a mirror (indirect laryngoscopy) or with a laryngoscope (direct laryngoscopy).
larynx listen (LAYR-inx)
The area of the throat containing the vocal cords and used for breathing, swallowing, and talking. Also called voice box.
laser listen (LAY-zer)
A device that forms light into intense, narrow beams that may be used to cut or destroy tissue, such as cancer tissue. It may also be used to reduce lymphedema (swelling caused by a buildup of lymph fluid in tissue) after breast cancer surgery. Lasers are used in microsurgery, photodynamic therapy, and many other procedures to diagnose and treat disease.
laser acupuncture listen (LAY-zer AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
The use of a low-level laser beam instead of an acupuncture needle to stimulate an acupuncture point.
laser surgery listen (LAY-zer SER-juh-ree)
A surgical procedure that uses the cutting power of a laser beam to make bloodless cuts in tissue or to remove a surface lesion such as a tumor.
laser therapy listen (LAY-zer THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that uses intense, narrow beams of light to cut and destroy tissue, such as cancer tissue. Laser therapy may also be used to reduce lymphedema (swelling caused by a buildup of lymph fluid in tissue) after breast cancer surgery.
L-asparaginase listen (... as-PAYR-uh-jih-NAYS)
A drug that is used to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) and is being studied in the treatment of some other types of cancer. It is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of tumor cells that need asparagine to grow. Also called asparaginase and Elspar.
lassitude listen (LA-sih-tood)
A feeling of tiredness, weakness, and lack of interest in daily activities.
late effect listen (layt eh-FEKT)
A health problem that occurs months or years after a disease is diagnosed or after treatment has ended. Late effects may be caused by cancer or cancer treatment. They may include physical, mental, and social problems and second cancers.
latency period listen (LAY-ten-see PEER-ee-ud)
The time that passes between being exposed to something that can cause disease (such as radiation or a virus) and having symptoms.
latent listen (LAY-tent)
Describes a condition that is present but not active or causing symptoms.
late-stage cancer listen (LAYT-stayj KAN-ser)
A term used to describe cancer that is far along in its growth, and has spread to the lymph nodes or other places in the body.
Latisse listen (LA-tees)
The drug bimatoprost used to increase the length, thickness, and darkness of eyelashes. It is being studied as a way to increase the growth of eyelashes and eyebrows in patients given chemotherapy for cancer. A sterile brush is used to apply Latisse on the upper and lower margins of the eyelids once a day.
latissimus dorsi flap listen (luh-TIH-sih-mus DOR-sy …)
A type of surgery used to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy. A muscle in the back called the latissimus dorsi, along with skin, fat, and blood vessels, is moved from the back to the chest to form a new breast mound or to form a pocket for a breast implant. This is usually done by passing the muscle tissue and blood vessels through a tunnel under the skin to the chest. A latissimus dorsi flap is a type of breast reconstruction.
laughter therapy listen (LAF-ter THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses humor to help relieve pain and stress and improve a person’s sense of well-being. It may be used to help people cope with a serious disease, such as cancer. Laughter therapy may include laughter exercises, clowns, and comedy movies, books, games, and puzzles. It is a type of complementary therapy. Also called humor therapy.
lavage listen (luh-VAZH)
In medicine, washing out an organ (such as the stomach or colon), a body cavity, or a wound by flushing it with a fluid. Also called irrigation.
lavender listen (LA-ven-der)
A plant with aromatic leaves and flowers that is a member of the mint family. Oil from the flowers has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, to keep insects away, and to wash in. It is also used in aromatherapy. Perillyl alcohol, a substance found in lavender, is being studied in cancer prevention and treatment. The scientific name is Lavandula angustifolia. Also called English lavender and true lavender.
laxative listen (LAK-suh-tiv)
A substance that promotes bowel movements.
LBH589
A drug used with bortezomib and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients who have already been treated with bortezomib and an immunomodulating agent. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. LBH589 blocks certain enzymes needed for cells to grow and divide and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Farydak and panobinostat.
L-carnitine listen (L-KAR-nih-teen)
A form of carnitine, which is a substance made in muscle and liver tissue and found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. L-carnitine is also a drug that is used to treat patients who do not make enough carnitine and is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is a type of dietary supplement. Also called Carnitor and levocarnitine.
LCH
A group of rare disorders in which too many Langerhans cells (a type of white blood cell) grow in certain tissues and organs including the bones, skin, and lungs, and damage them. LCH may also affect the pituitary gland (which makes hormones that control other glands and many body functions, especially growth). LCH is most common in children and young adults. Also called Langerhans cell histiocytosis.
LCIS
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules of the breast. This condition seldom becomes invasive cancer. However, having LCIS in one breast increases the risk of developing breast cancer in either breast. Also called lobular carcinoma in situ.
LDE225
A drug used to treat locally advanced basal cell carcinoma (BCC) that has come back after surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. LDE225 is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. LDE225 blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called erismodegib, Odomzo, and sonidegib phosphate.
LDH
One of a group of enzymes found in the blood and other body tissues, and involved in energy production in cells. An increased amount in the blood may be a sign of tissue damage and some types of cancer or other diseases. Also called lactate dehydrogenase and lactic acid dehydrogenase.
lead compound listen (leed KOM-pownd)
In medicine, a chemical compound that shows promise as a treatment for a disease and may lead to the development of a new drug. Thousands of compounds are tested in the laboratory to find a lead (“leading”) compound that may act on specific genes or proteins involved in a disease. Once a lead compound has been found, the chemical structure is used as a starting point to make a drug that has the most benefits and the least harms. Finding a lead compound is the first step in making a new drug to treat a disease.
lectin listen (LEK-tin)
A complex molecule that has both protein and sugars. Lectins are able to bind to the outside of a cell and cause biochemical changes in it. Lectins are made by both animals and plants.
LED therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs that become active and may kill cancer cells when exposed to light. LED therapy is a type of photodynamic therapy, which uses a special type of light to activate the drug. Also called light-emitting diode therapy.
LEEP listen
A technique that uses electric current passed through a thin wire loop to remove abnormal tissue. Also called loop electrosurgical excision procedure and loop excision.
leflunomide listen (leh-FLOO-noh-mide)
An anticancer drug that works by inhibiting a cancer cell growth factor. Also called SU101.
legal aid organization listen (LEE-gul ayd OR-guh-nih-ZAY-shun)
A group or agency that gives legal help to people with low incomes. Health legal aid workers help people with issues related to getting good healthcare, and getting insurance to cover certain patients and conditions.
leiomyoma listen (LY-oh-my-OH-muh)
A benign smooth muscle tumor, usually in the uterus or gastrointestinal tract. Also called fibroid.
leiomyosarcoma listen (LY-oh-MY-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A malignant (cancer) tumor of smooth muscle cells that can arise almost anywhere in the body, but is most common in the uterus, abdomen, or pelvis.
lemon listen (LEH-mun)
A small, yellow citrus fruit that is a source of citric acid and ascorbic acid (vitamin C). The juice is used to flavor food and drink and to prevent scurvy. Lemon oil (scented liquid taken from the peel) is used in aromatherapy. The scientific name of the lemon tree is Citrus limon.
lenalidomide listen (leh-nuh-LIH-doh-mide)
A drug that is similar to thalidomide, and is used with rituximab to treat follicular lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma in adults who have already received other treatment. It is also used alone or with dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma in adults. Lenalidomide is also used in adults to treat anemia caused by certain types of myelodysplastic syndromes and to treat mantle cell lymphoma that came back or got worse after treatment that included bortezomib. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Lenalidomide may help the immune system kill abnormal blood cells or cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Lenalidomide is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of immunomodulating agent. Also called CC-5013 and Revlimid.
lens listen (lenz)
A clear disk that focuses light, as in a camera or microscope. In the eye, the lens is a clear, curved structure at the front of the eye behind the pupil. It focuses light rays that enter the eye through the pupil, making an image on the retina (light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye).
lentinan listen (LEN-tih-nun)
A beta-glucan (a type of polysaccharide) from the mushroom Lentinus edodes (shiitake mushroom). It has been studied in Japan as a treatment for cancer.
lenvatinib mesylate listen (len-VA-tih-nib MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used with everolimus to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that was treated with antiangiogenesis therapy (a type of anticancer therapy). It is also used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that cannot be removed by surgery and has not already been treated. Lenvatinib mesylate is also used to treat thyroid cancer in certain patients with progressive, recurrent, or metastatic disease that did not respond to treatment with radioactive iodine. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lenvatinib mesylate blocks certain proteins needed for cells to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Lenvima.
Lenvima listen (len-VEE-muh)
A drug used with everolimus to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that was treated with antiangiogenesis therapy (a type of anticancer therapy). It is also used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that cannot be removed by surgery and has not already been treated. Lenvima is also used to treat thyroid cancer in certain patients with progressive, recurrent, or metastatic disease that did not respond to treatment with radioactive iodine. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lenvima blocks certain proteins needed for cells to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called lenvatinib mesylate.
LEP-ETU
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. LEP-ETU blocks the ability of cells to divide and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called liposomal paclitaxel, LipoTaxen, paclitaxel liposome, and PNU-93914.
lepirudin listen (LEH-pih-ROO-din)
A drug that inhibits blood clotting. It is being studied in cancer treatment.
leptin listen (LEP-tin)
A hormone made by fat cells that helps control the feeling of hunger, the amount of fat stored in the body, and body weight.
leptomeningeal listen (LEP-toh-meh-NIN-jee-ul)
Having to do with the two innermost meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord).
leptomeningeal carcinoma listen (LEP-toh-meh-NIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal carcinomatosis, meningeal metastasis, and neoplastic meningitis.
leptomeningeal carcinomatosis listen (LEP-toh-meh-NIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal carcinomatosis, meningeal metastasis, and neoplastic meningitis.
leptomeningeal metastasis listen (LEP-toh-meh-NIN-jee-ul meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, meningeal carcinomatosis, meningeal metastasis, and neoplastic meningitis.
leridistim listen (leh-RIH-dih-stim)
A substance being studied for its ability to stimulate the production of blood cells during chemotherapy. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called SC-70935.
lesion listen (LEE-zhun)
An area of abnormal tissue. A lesion may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer).
lestaurtinib listen (leh-STOR-tih-nib)
A drug being studied in the treatment of acute leukemias and some other types of cancer. It binds to a protein that is present on the surface of some types of cancer cells and stops them from dividing. Lestaurtinib is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of indolocarbazole alkaloid. Also called CEP-701.
lethargy listen (LEH-thur-jee)
A condition marked by drowsiness and an unusual lack of energy and mental alertness. It can be caused by many things, including illness, injury, or drugs.
letrozole listen (LEH-truh-zole)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in postmenopausal women. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Letrozole lowers the amount of estrogen made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need estrogen to grow. Letrozole is a type of aromatase inhibitor. Also called Femara.
leucovorin calcium listen (LOO-koh-VOR-in KAL-see-um)
A drug used to lessen the toxic effects of the anticancer drug methotrexate or other substances that block the action of folic acid. It is also used to treat some types of anemia and is used with fluorouracil to treat advanced colorectal cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Leucovorin calcium is a form of folic acid. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called calcium levoleucovorin, citrovorum factor, folinic acid, and Fusilev.
leukapheresis listen (LOO-kuh-feh-REE-sis)
Removal of the blood to collect specific blood cells. The remaining blood is returned to the body.
leukemia listen (loo-KEE-mee-uh)
Cancer that starts in blood-forming tissue, such as the bone marrow, and causes large numbers of abnormal blood cells to be produced and enter the bloodstream.
leukemic leptomeningitis listen (loo-KEE-mik MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in leukemia. In leukemic leptomeningitis, cancer cells have spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called leukemic meningitis and meningeal leukemia.
leukemic meningitis listen (loo-KEE-mik MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in leukemia. In leukemic meningitis, cancer cells have spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called leukemic leptomeningitis and meningeal leukemia.
Leukeran listen (LOO-keh-run)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia, Hodgkin lymphoma, and certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Leukeran damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called chlorambucil.
leukocyte listen (LOO-koh-site)
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood and lymph tissue. Leukocytes are part of the body’s immune system. They help the body fight infection and other diseases. Types of leukocytes are granulocytes (neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils), monocytes, and lymphocytes (T cells and B cells). Checking the number of leukocytes in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as infection, inflammation, allergies, and leukemia. Also called WBC and white blood cell.
leukopenia listen (LOO-koh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of leukocytes (white blood cells) in the blood.
leukoplakia listen (LOO-koh-PLAY-kee-uh)
An abnormal patch of white tissue that forms on mucous membranes in the mouth and other areas of the body. It may become cancer. Tobacco (smoking and chewing) and alcohol may increase the risk of leukoplakia in the mouth.
leuprolide acetate listen (LOO-proh-lide A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Leuprolide acetate keeps the testicles from making testosterone by blocking other hormones that are needed to make it. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. Leuprolide acetate is a type of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Also called Eligard, Lupron, and Lupron Depot.
leuvectin listen (loo-VEK-tin)
An agent that delivers the gene for interleukin-2 (IL-2) into cells to increase production of IL-2 by the cells.
levamisole listen (lee-VA-mih-sole)
An antiparasitic drug that is also being studied in cancer therapy with fluorouracil.
levels of evidence listen (LEH-vulz ... EH-vih-dents)
A ranking system used to describe the strength of the results measured in a clinical trial or research study. The design of the study (such as a case report for an individual patient or a randomized double-blinded controlled clinical trial) and the endpoints measured (such as survival or quality of life) affect the strength of the evidence.
levetiracetam listen (LEE-veh-ty-RA-seh-tam)
A drug used to treat seizures (involuntary muscle movements) caused by epilepsy (a group of brain disorders). Levetiracetam is being studied in the treatment of seizures in patients with cancer that has spread to the brain. It is a type of anticonvulsant. Also called Keppra.
levocarnitine listen (LEE-voh-KAR-nih-teen)
A form of carnitine, which is a substance made in muscle and liver tissue and found in certain foods, such as meat, poultry, fish, and some dairy products. Levocarnitine is also a drug that is used to treat patients who do not make enough carnitine and is being studied as a way to prevent tissue damage caused by chemotherapy. Carnitine is a type of dietary supplement. Also called Carnitor and L-carnitine.
levofloxacin listen (LEE-voh-FLOK-suh-sin)
A substance used to treat bacterial infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called quinolone antibiotics.
levonorgestrel listen (LEE-voh-nor-JES-trel)
A form of the hormone progesterone that is made in the laboratory and used to prevent pregnancy. It is being studied in the prevention of ovarian and endometrial cancer, and in the treatment of other conditions. Levonorgestrel is a type of oral contraceptive. Also called L-norgestrel and Plan B.
Levulan Kerastick listen (LEH-vyoo-lan KAYR-uh-stik)
A drug used to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). When Levulan Kerastick is taken up by abnormal cells, including cancer cells, and then exposed to certain types of light, it becomes active and kills the cells. Levulan Kerastick contains the active ingredient aminolevulinic acid hydrochloride. It is a type of photosensitizing agent.
Lexapro listen (LEK-suh-proh)
A drug used to treat depression and certain anxiety disorders. It belongs to the family of drugs called selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors (SSRIs). Also called escitalopram.
lexatumumab listen (lek-suh-TOO-moo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL-R2 on the surface of some tumor cells, which may kill the tumor cells. Lexatumumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-TRAIL R2 mAb HGS-ETR2 and HGS-ETR2.
LFS
A rare, inherited disorder that is caused by mutations (changes) in the TP53 gene. Having Li-Fraumeni syndrome increases the risk of developing many types of cancer. Cancers often develop at an early age, and more than one type of cancer may occur in the same person. LFS is a type of hereditary cancer syndrome. Also called Li-Fraumeni syndrome.
LGD1069
A drug used to treat skin problems caused by cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that have not gotten better after other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. LGD1069 is a type of retinoid. Also called bexarotene and Targretin.
L-glutamic acid listen (... gloo-TA-mik A-sid)
One of twenty amino acids (molecules that join together to form proteins). L-glutamic acid may help nerve cells send and receive information from other cells. It is being studied for its ability to decrease or prevent nerve damage caused by anticancer drugs. Also called glutamic acid.
LH
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make follicles release their eggs and to make hormones that get the uterus ready for a fertilized egg to be implanted. In males, it acts on the testes to cause cells to grow and make testosterone. Also called interstitial cell-stimulating hormone, luteinizing hormone, and lutropin.
Lhermitte's sign listen (layr-MEETZ ...)
A sensation similar to an electrical shock radiating from the back of the head down the spine as the neck is bent forward.
LHRH
A hormone made by a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. LHRH causes the pituitary gland in the brain to make and secrete the hormones luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH). In men, these hormones cause the testicles to make testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to make estrogen and progesterone. Also called GnRH, gonadotropin-releasing hormone, LH-RH, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone.
LH-RH
A hormone made by a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. LH-RH causes the pituitary gland in the brain to make and secrete the hormones luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH). In men, these hormones cause the testicles to make testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to make estrogen and progesterone. Also called GnRH, gonadotropin-releasing hormone, LHRH, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone.
LHRH agonist listen (... A-guh-nist)
A substance that keeps the testicles and ovaries from making sex hormones by blocking other hormones that are needed to make them. In men, LHRH agonists cause the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some LHRH agonists are used to treat prostate cancer. Also called GnRH agonist, GnRHa, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonist.
LHRH antagonist listen (… an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that blocks the pituitary gland from making hormones called follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). In men, this causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, this causes the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some LHRH antagonists are used to treat advanced prostate cancer. They are also used to treat certain gynecologic conditions and are being studied in the treatment of hormone-sensitive breast cancer. Also called GnRH antagonist, gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonist, and luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonist.
liarozole listen (lee-AYR-oh-zole)
An anticancer drug that promotes differentiation by increasing the levels of retinoic acid within the tumor.
libido listen (lih-BEE-doh)
Sexual desire or the mental energy or emotion related to sex.
Libtayo listen (lib-TY-oh)
A drug used to treat cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be cured by radiation therapy or surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Libtayo binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Libtayo may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called cemiplimab.
licorice root extract listen (LIH-kuh-rish … EK-strakt)
A substance prepared from dried roots of the plant Glycyrrhiza glabra. It is used as a flavoring in medicines, drinks, and sweets, and it is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Licorice root extract contains several compounds that reduce inflammation, kill certain bacteria and viruses, act like estrogen and other hormones, and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of antioxidant.
lidocaine listen (LY-doh-kane)
A substance used to relieve pain by blocking signals at the nerve endings in skin. It can also be given intravenously to stop heart arrhythmias. It is a type of local anesthetic and antiarrhythmic.
lifetime risk listen (LIFE-time risk)
A measure of the risk that a certain event will happen during a person’s lifetime. In cancer research, it is usually given as the likelihood that a person who is free of a certain type of cancer will develop or die from that type of cancer during his or her lifetime. For example, a woman with no known risk factors for breast cancer has a lifetime risk of developing breast cancer of about 12%. This means one out of every eight women will develop breast cancer during her lifetime.
Li-Fraumeni syndrome listen (lee-FRAH-meh-nee SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that is caused by mutations (changes) in the TP53 gene. Having Li-Fraumeni syndrome increases the risk of developing many types of cancer. Cancers often develop at an early age, and more than one type of cancer may occur in the same person. Li-Fraumeni syndrome is a type of hereditary cancer syndrome. Also called LFS.
ligation listen (ly-GAY-shun)
The process of tying off blood vessels so that blood cannot flow to a part of the body or to a tumor.
light cigarette listen (lite SIH-guh-ret)
A type of cigarette that is claimed to give off less tobacco tar than a regular cigarette when smoked. Light cigarettes have been shown to be no safer than regular cigarettes, and smoking them does not lower the risk of cancer or other diseases. A person smoking a light cigarette can inhale the same amount of tobacco tar, nicotine, and harmful, cancer-causing chemicals as in a regular cigarette, depending on how the cigarette is smoked. Cigarettes are no longer allowed to be labeled or advertised as light cigarettes. Also called low tar cigarette.
light microscope listen (lite MY-kroh-SKOPE)
A microscope (device to magnify small objects) in which objects are lit directly by white light.
light therapy listen (… THAYR-uh-pee)
The treatment of disease with certain types of light. Light therapy can use lasers, LED, fluorescent lamps, and ultraviolet or infrared radiation. Also called phototherapy.
light-emitting diode therapy listen (lite-ee-MIH-ting DY-ode THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs that become active and may kill cancer cells when exposed to light. Light-emitting diode therapy is type of photodynamic therapy which uses a special type of light to activate the drug. Also called LED therapy.
lignan listen (LIG-nun)
A member of a group of substances found in plants that have shown estrogenic and anticancer effects. Lignans have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems.
limb perfusion listen (lim per-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure that may be used to deliver anticancer drugs directly to an arm or leg. The flow of blood to and from the limb is temporarily stopped with a tourniquet (a tight band around the limb), and anticancer drugs are put directly into the blood of the limb. This allows the person to receive a high dose of drugs in the area where the cancer occurred. Also called isolated limb perfusion.
limbic system listen (LIM-bik SIS-tem)
A network of structures in the brain involved in memory and emotions.
limb-salvage surgery listen (lim-SAL-vij SER-juh-ree)
Surgery to remove a tumor in a limb (arm or leg) without removing the whole limb. The bone and tissue around the tumor may also be removed, and an implant may be used to replace the part of the limb removed. Limb-salvage surgery is done to help save the use and appearance of the limb. It is used to treat cancers of the bone and soft tissue. Also called limb-sparing surgery.
limb-sparing surgery listen (lim-SPAYR-ing SER-juh-ree)
Surgery to remove a tumor in a limb (arm or leg) without removing the whole limb. The bone and tissue around the tumor may also be removed, and an implant may be used to replace the part of the limb removed. Limb-sparing surgery is done to help save the use and appearance of the limb. It is used to treat cancers of the bone and soft tissue. Also called limb-salvage surgery.
limited-stage small cell lung cancer listen (LIH-mih-ted-stayj ... sel lung KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in one lung, the tissues between the lungs, and nearby lymph nodes only.
LIN
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules (glands that make milk) of the breast. This condition rarely becomes cancer. However, having LIN in one breast increases the risk of breast cancer in either breast. Types of LIN include atypical lobular hyperplasia and lobular carcinoma in situ (LCIS). Also called lobular intraepithelial neoplasia and lobular neoplasia.
linac listen (LIH-nak)
A machine that uses electricity to form a stream of fast-moving subatomic particles. This creates high-energy radiation that may be used to treat cancer. Also called linear accelerator, mega-voltage linear accelerator, and MeV linear accelerator.
linear accelerator listen (LIH-nee-er ak-SEH-leh-RAY-ter)
A machine that uses electricity to form a stream of fast-moving subatomic particles. This creates high-energy radiation that may be used to treat cancer. Also called linac, mega-voltage linear accelerator, and MeV linear accelerator.
linitis plastica listen (lih-NY-tis plas-TIH-kuh)
A rare type of stomach cancer that begins in the lining of the stomach and spreads to the muscles of the stomach wall. This causes the wall of the stomach to become thick, hard, and rubbery, which leads to trouble digesting food. Also called gastric scirrhous carcinoma.
linseed listen (LIN-seed)
The seed of the flax plant. It is a rich source of omega-3 fatty acid, fiber, and a compound called lignin. It is being studied in the prevention of several types of cancer. Also called flaxseed.
lintuzumab listen (lin-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of myelodysplastic syndromes and some types of leukemia. It binds to CD33, a protein on the surface of certain normal blood stem cells and some abnormal blood cells. It causes the immune system to kill these cells. Lintuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called MoAb HuM195 and monoclonal antibody HuM195.
Lioresal listen (lih-OR-eh-sal)
A drug that is used to treat certain types of muscle spasms and is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. Lioresal relaxes muscles by blocking certain nerve receptors in the spinal cord. It is a type of antispasmodic. Also called baclofen and Kemstro.
liothyronine sodium listen (LY-oh-THY-roh-neen SOH-dee-um)
A drug that is used to treat certain thyroid (a gland located near the voice box) conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of thyroid cancer. Liothyronine sodium is made in the laboratory and is a form of the thyroid hormone triiodthyronine (T3). Also called Cytomel and Triostat.
lipid listen (LIH-pid)
Fat.
Lipiodol listen (LIH-pee-oh-dol)
A form of poppy seed oil that contains iodine. Lipiodol is given by injection and builds up in the blood and lymph vessels in tumors. It is used for imaging (taking pictures) of the salivary glands and the lymph system. It is also being studied in the imaging of other organs such as the liver, lung, stomach, and thyroid. It is a type of diagnostic imaging agent. Also called ethiodized oil, Ethiodol, and iodized oil.
Lipitor listen (LIH-pih-tor)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood and to prevent stroke, heart attack, and angina (chest pain). It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Lipitor blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It also causes an increase in the breakdown of cholesterol. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called atorvastatin calcium.
lipoma listen (lih-POH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor made of fat cells.
lipophilic listen (LIH-poh-FIH-lik)
Able to dissolve, be dissolved in, or absorb lipids (fats).
liposarcoma listen (LIH-poh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that begins in fat cells. It usually forms in the layer of fat just under the skin or in the deep soft tissues of the legs (especially in the thigh or back of the knee) or in the abdomen. It may also form in other parts of the body. Most liposarcomas are painless and tend to grow slowly, but some may grow quickly and spread to nearby tissue or to other parts of the body. Liposarcomas usually occur in adults, and are rare in children and adolescents. They are a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
liposomal listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul)
A drug preparation that contains the active drug inside very tiny, fat-like particles. This form is easier for the body to absorb and allows more drug to get to the target area of the body, such as a tumor. Liposomal drugs may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of the drug.
liposomal cytarabine listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul sy-TAYR-uh-been)
A form of the anticancer drug cytarabine that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than cytarabine. It is used to treat lymphoma that has spread to the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called cytarabine liposome and Depo-Cyt.
liposomal doxorubicin hydrochloride listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul DOK-soh-ROO-bih-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A form of the anticancer drug doxorubicin that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than doxorubicin hydrochloride. Liposomal doxorubicin hydrochloride is used to treat ovarian cancer that got worse or recurred (came back) after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is also used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in patients who are not able to take other anticancer drugs or did not get better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used with bortezomib to treat multiple myeloma that was already treated with at least one other anticancer therapy. Liposomal doxorubicin hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of anthracycline antitumor antibiotic. Also called Doxil and doxorubicin hydrochloride liposome.
liposomal paclitaxel listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul PA-klih-TAK-sil)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Liposomal paclitaxel blocks the ability of cells to divide and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called LEP-ETU, LipoTaxen, paclitaxel liposome, and PNU-93914.
liposomal SN-38 listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul…)
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan alone. Liposomal SN-38 is being studied in the treatment of advanced colorectal cancer and other types of cancer. Liposomal SN-38 blocks the ability of cells to divide and grow. It may stop the growth of tumor cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of irinotecan (CPT-11) derivative. Also called SN-38 liposome.
liposomal vincristine sulfate listen (LY-poh-SOH-mul vin-KRIS-teen SUL-fayt)
A form of the anticancer drug vincristine sulfate that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than vincristine. Liposomal vincristine sulfate is used to treat adults with acute lymphoblastic leukemia that is Philadelphia chromosome negative and has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. Also called Marqibo and vincristine sulfate liposome.
liposome listen (LY-poh-some)
A very tiny, fat-like particle that is made in the laboratory. In medicine, liposomes containing drugs or other substances are used in the treatment of cancer and other diseases. Drugs given in liposomes may have fewer side effects and work better than the same drugs given alone.
liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02 listen (LY-poh-some-en-KAP-soo-lay-ted I-rih-noh-TEE-kan HY-droh-KLOR-ide …)
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan hydrochloride that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. Liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02 is used together with fluorouracil and leucovorin to treat a certain type of pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse after treatment with gemcitabine anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. Liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02 may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan hydrochloride. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called irinotecan hydrochloride liposome, Onivyde, and PEP02.
LipoTaxen listen (LIH-poh-TAK-sen)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. LipoTaxen blocks the ability of cells to divide and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called LEP-ETU, liposomal paclitaxel, paclitaxel liposome, and PNU-93914.
liquid biopsy listen (LIH-kwid BY-op-see)
A test done on a sample of blood to look for cancer cells from a tumor that are circulating in the blood or for pieces of DNA from tumor cells that are in the blood. A liquid biopsy may be used to help find cancer at an early stage. It may also be used to help plan treatment or to find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. Being able to take multiple samples of blood over time may also help doctors understand what kind of molecular changes are taking place in a tumor.
liquid-based Pap test listen (LIH-kwid-bayst ...)
A type of Pap test. A Pap test is a procedure in which cells are scraped from the cervix for examination under a microscope. It is used to detect cancer or changes that may lead to cancer. A Pap test can also show conditions that are not cancer, such as infection or inflammation. In a liquid-based Pap test, the cells are rinsed into a small container of liquid. The cells are then placed onto slides by a special machine and examined under a microscope to see if the cells are abnormal.
lisinopril listen (ly-SIH-noh-pril)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and certain heart conditions. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of side effects caused by some anticancer drugs. It blocks certain enzymes that cause blood vessels to constrict (narrow). It is a type of angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitor. Also called Prinivil and Zestril.
lisofylline listen (lih-SAH-fuh-lin)
A drug that may protect healthy cells from chemotherapy and radiation without inhibiting the effects of these therapies on tumor cells.
liter listen (LEE-ter)
A measure of volume for a liquid, using the metric system. One liter is equal to 1,000 cubic centimeters (cc), 1,000 milliliters (mL), or 1.0567 quarts (qt). Also called L.
lithium listen (LIH-thee-um)
A soft metal. Lithium salts are used to treat certain mental disorders, especially bipolar (manic depressive) disorder. Lithium salts include lithium carbonate and lithium citrate.
live virus vaccine listen (… VY-rus vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made from a virus that has been weakened so it does not cause the disease the virus usually causes. A live virus vaccine helps the body’s immune system recognize and fight infections caused by the non-weakened form of the virus. Examples of live virus vaccines are the chickenpox vaccine and the measles, mumps, and rubella (MMR) vaccine. It is not safe for pregnant women or people with weak immune systems to receive a live virus vaccine.
liver listen (LIH-ver)
A large organ located in the upper abdomen. The liver cleanses the blood and aids in digestion by secreting bile.
liver and bile duct cancer listen (LIH-ver ... bile dukt KAN-ser)
Primary liver cancer is cancer that forms in the tissues of the liver. The most common type of primary liver cancer is hepatocellular carcinoma, which occurs in the tissue of the liver. When cancer starts in other parts of the body and spreads to the liver, it is called liver metastasis. Bile duct cancer forms in the small ducts (tubes) that carry bile (fluid made by the liver that helps digest fat) between the liver and gallbladder and the intestine. Bile duct cancer is also called cholangiocarcinoma. Intrahepatic bile duct cancer is found inside the liver. Extrahepatic bile duct cancer is found outside the liver.
liver cancer listen (LIH-ver KAN-ser)
Primary liver cancer is cancer that forms in the tissues of the liver. Secondary liver cancer is cancer that spreads to the liver from another part of the body.
liver function test listen (LIH-ver FUNK-shun ...)
A blood test to measure the blood levels of certain substances released by the liver. A high or low level of certain substances can be a sign of liver disease.
liver metastasis listen (LIH-ver meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the liver.
liver X receptor alpha pathway listen (LIH-ver … reh-SEP-ter AL-fuh PATH-way)
Describes a group of proteins in a cell that work together to help control how certain genes are expressed and how cholesterol, lipids (fats), bile acids, and steroid hormones are made in the body. Changes in the liver X receptor alpha pathway may lead to diseases such as heart disease and cancer. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer and other diseases. Also called LXR alpha pathway.
liver-spleen scan listen (LIH-ver ... skan)
A procedure used to check for abnormal areas in the liver or spleen. A very small amount of a radioactive substance is injected into a vein and travels through the blood to the liver and spleen. It is detected by a scanner linked to a computer, which forms an image of the areas where the radioactive substance collects. A liver-spleen scan may be used to help find cancer in the liver or spleen, cirrhosis, hepatitis, and other liver or spleen problems.
living will listen (LIH-ving wil)
A type of advance directive that states the specific types of medical care that a person wishes to receive if that person is no longer able to make medical decisions because of a terminal illness or being permanently unconscious. A living will usually has instructions about whether to use certain treatments to help keep a person alive, such as the use of dialysis (kidney) machines, breathing tubes, feeding tubes, and CPR. In the United States, the laws for living wills may be different for each state, and not every state may allow them.
LMB-1 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
LMB-2 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
LMB-7 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
LMB-9 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A toxic substance linked to an antibody that attaches to tumor cells and kills them.
LMP400
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes that break and rejoin DNA strands. These enzymes are needed for cells to divide and grow. Blocking them may cause cancer cells to die. LMP400 also helps anticancer drugs kill cancers that are resistant to some other drugs. LMP400 is a type of indenoisoquinoline and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
LMP776
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes that break and rejoin DNA strands. These enzymes are needed for cells to divide and grow. Blocking them may cause cancer cells to die. LMP776 also helps anticancer drugs kill cancers that are resistant to some other drugs. LMP776 is a type of indenoisoquinoline and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
L-MTP-PE
A drug being studied in the treatment of young adults with bone cancer that has gotten worse or come back. L-MTP-PE activates certain types of white blood cells and helps the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of immunostimulant. Also called MEPACT, mifamurtide, and muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine.
L-norgestrel listen (... nor-JES-trel)
A form of the hormone progesterone that is made in the laboratory and used to prevent pregnancy. It is being studied in the prevention of ovarian and endometrial cancer, and in the treatment of other conditions. L-norgestrel is a type of oral contraceptive. Also called levonorgestrel and Plan B.
lobaplatin listen (LOH-buh-PLA-tin)
A substance that contains the metal platinum and may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent.
lobe listen (lobe)
A portion of an organ, such as the liver, lung, breast, thyroid, or brain.
lobectomy listen (loh-BEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a whole lobe (section) of an organ (such as the lungs, liver, brain, or thyroid gland).
lobeline listen (LOH-beh-leen)
A substance that comes from a plant known as Indian tobacco, which is different from the tobacco used to make smoking products. It has been studied as a way to help people stop smoking. It is a type of alkaloid.
lobradimil listen (loh-BRAY-dih-mil)
A substance that is being studied for its ability to help other drugs reach the brain. It belongs to the family of drugs called bradykinin agonists. Also called RMP-7.
lobular capillary hemangioma listen (LAH-byoo-ler KA-pih-layr-ee hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that usually forms on the skin. It may also form on mucous membranes and inside capillaries (small blood vessels) or other places on the body. Lobular capillary hemangiomas usually appear as raised, bright red lesions that may grow quickly and bleed a lot. The lesions are sometimes caused by injury or use of certain medicines and often come back after treatment. They usually occur in older children and young adults but may occur at any age. Lobular capillary hemangiomas are a type of vascular tumor. Also called pyogenic granuloma.
lobular carcinoma listen (LAH-byoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in the lobules (milk glands) of the breast. Lobular carcinoma may be either lobular carcinoma in situ (LCIS) or invasive lobular carcinoma. LCIS is a noninvasive condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules of the breast. LCIS rarely becomes invasive cancer, but having LCIS in one breast increases the risk of developing invasive cancer in either breast. In invasive lobular carcinoma, cancer has spread from the lobules to surrounding normal tissue. It can also spread through the blood and lymph systems to other parts of the body.
lobular carcinoma in situ listen (LAH-byoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules of the breast. This condition seldom becomes invasive cancer. However, having lobular carcinoma in situ in one breast increases the risk of developing breast cancer in either breast. Also called LCIS.
lobular intraepithelial neoplasia listen (LAH-byoo-ler IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules (glands that make milk) of the breast. This condition rarely becomes cancer. However, having lobular intraepithelial neoplasia in one breast increases the risk of breast cancer in either breast. Types of lobular intraepithelial neoplasia include atypical lobular hyperplasia and lobular carcinoma in situ (LCIS). Also called LIN and lobular neoplasia.
lobular neoplasia listen (LAH-byoo-ler NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the lobules (glands that make milk) of the breast. This condition rarely becomes cancer. However, having lobular neoplasia in one breast increases the risk of breast cancer in either breast. Types of lobular neoplasia include atypical lobular hyperplasia and lobular carcinoma in situ (LCIS). Also called LIN and lobular intraepithelial neoplasia.
lobule listen (LAH-byool)
A small lobe or a subdivision of a lobe.
local anesthesia listen (LOH-kul A-nes-THEE-zhuh)
A temporary loss of feeling in one small area of the body caused by special drugs called anesthetics. The patient stays awake but has no feeling in the area of the body treated with the anesthetic. Local anesthetics may be injected or put on the skin to lessen pain during medical, surgical, or dental procedures. Some are available over-the-counter (without a doctor’s order) and may help lessen local pain, irritation, and itching caused by conditions such as cold sores, sunburn, poison ivy, and minor cuts.
local cancer listen (LOH-kul KAN-ser)
An invasive malignant cancer confined entirely to the organ where the cancer began.
local therapy listen (LOH-kul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is directed to a specific organ or limited area of the body, such as the breast or an abnormal growth on the skin. Examples of local therapy used in cancer are surgery, radiation therapy, cryotherapy, laser therapy, and topical therapy (medicine in a lotion or cream that is applied to the skin).
localization listen (LOH-kuh-lih-ZAY-shun)
The process of determining or marking the location or site of a lesion or disease. May also refer to the process of keeping a lesion or disease in a specific location or site.
localized listen (LOH-kuh-lized)
In medicine, describes disease that is limited to a certain part of the body. For example, localized cancer is usually found only in the tissue or organ where it began, and has not spread to nearby lymph nodes or to other parts of the body. Some localized cancers can be completely removed by surgery.
localized gallbladder cancer listen (LOH-kuh-lized GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Cancer found only in the tissues that make up the wall of the gallbladder. Localized gallbladder cancer can be removed completely in an operation.
locally advanced cancer listen (LOH-kuh-lee ad-VANST KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread from where it started to nearby tissue or lymph nodes.
locally recurrent cancer listen (LOH-kuh-lee ree-KER-ent KAN-ser)
Cancer that has recurred (come back) at or near the same place as the original (primary) tumor, usually after a period of time during which the cancer could not be detected.
locus listen (LOH-kus)
Specific place where something is located or occurs. It may refer to a specific place on the body (such as an acupuncture point) or the place on a chromosome where a specific gene is found.
Lofibra listen (loh-FY-bruh)
A drug used to treat high levels of cholesterol and triglycerides in the blood. Lofibra is being studied in the treatment of advanced cancers in young patients and in the treatment of other conditions. It is a type of antilipidemic agent. Also called fenofibrate and TriCor.
lometrexol listen (loh-meh-TREK-sol)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antifolates.
lomustine listen (loh-MUS-teen)
A drug used to treat brain tumors that have already been treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma that has not gotten better with other types of treatment or has come back. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lomustine damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called CCNU and Gleostine.
lonafarnib listen (loh-nah-FAR-nib)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called enzyme inhibitors. Also called SCH 66336.
long-term side effect listen (... eh-FEKT)
A problem that is caused by a disease or treatment of a disease and may continue for months or years. Long-term side effects of cancer treatment include heart, lung, kidney, or gastrointestinal tract problems; pain, numbness, tingling, loss of feeling, or heat or cold sensitivity in the hands or feet; fatigue; hearing loss; cataracts; and dry eyes or dry mouth.
Lonsurf listen (LON-serf)
A combination of the drugs trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride used to treat stomach cancer and gastroesophageal junction cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has already been treated with other anticancer drugs and a biological therapy. Lonsurf is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lonsurf stops cells from making DNA, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Also called trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride.
loop electrosurgical excision procedure listen (loop ee-LEK-troh-SER-jih-kul ek-SIH-zhun proh-SEE-jer)
A technique that uses electric current passed through a thin wire loop to remove abnormal tissue. Also called LEEP and loop excision.
loop excision listen (...ek-SIH-zhun)
A technique that uses electric current passed through a thin wire loop to remove abnormal tissue. Also called LEEP and loop electrosurgical excision procedure.
loperamide hydrochloride listen (loh-PER-uh-mide HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat diarrhea. Loperamide hydrochloride slows the movement of the muscles in the small intestine to allow more water to be taken out of the feces (waste matter) and more nutrients to be absorbed. Also called Imodium.
lopinavir listen (loh-PIH-nuh-veer)
A drug used with another drug, called ritonavir, to treat infection with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS). It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Lopinavir blocks the ability of HIV to make copies of itself and may help some anticancer drugs work better. It is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor.
lopinavir/ritonavir listen (loh-PIH-nuh-veer/ry-TOH-nuh-veer)
A combination of the drugs ritonavir and lopinavir. It is used to treat infection with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS). It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Lopinavir/ritonavir blocks the ability of HIV to make copies of itself and may help other anticancer drugs work better or may block the growth of cancer cells. Ritonavir blocks the breakdown of lopinavir. Lopinavir/ritonavir is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called Kaletra.
lorazepam listen (lor-A-zeh-pam)
A drug that is used to treat anxiety and certain seizure disorders (such as epilepsy), and to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It belongs to the families of drugs called antiemetics and benzodiazepines.
Lorbrena listen (lor-BREH-nuh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is used in patients whose cancer got worse during treatment with crizotinib (a type of anticancer drug) and at least one other ALK inhibitor or during treatment with alectinib or ceritinib (other ALK inhibitors). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lorbrena blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Lorbrena is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called lorlatinib.
lorlatinib listen (lor-LA-tih-nib)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is used in patients whose cancer got worse during treatment with crizotinib (a type of anticancer drug) and at least one other ALK inhibitor or during treatment with alectinib or ceritinib (other ALK inhibitors). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lorlatinib blocks certain proteins made by the ALK gene. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Lorlatinib is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Lorbrena.
lorvotuzumab mertansine listen (LOR-voh-TOO-zoo-mab mer-TAN-seen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer, including Wilms tumor, neuroblastoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, and other types of soft tissue sarcoma. Lorvotuzumab mertansine contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD56 on some types of cancer cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called DM1, which may help kill cancer cells after lorvotuzumab mertansine binds to them. Lorvotuzumab mertansine is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called BB-10901.
losartan potassium listen (loh-SAR-tan puh-TA-see-um)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure. Losartan potassium blocks the action of chemicals that make blood vessels constrict (get narrower). It is a type of angiotensin II receptor antagonist. Also called Cozaar.
losoxantrone listen (loh-SOK-san-trone)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antipyrazoles.
lovastatin listen (LOH-vuh-STA-tin)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Lovastatin is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor (statin). Also called Mevacor.
low birth weight listen (loh berth wayt)
A term used to describe an infant born weighing 5.5 pounds (2500 grams) or less. A low birth weight may occur when an infant is born too early (premature). These infants may have an increased risk of serious health problems. Smoking cigarettes, being exposed to secondhand tobacco smoke, drinking alcohol, and taking certain drugs during pregnancy can increase the risk of having an infant with a low birth weight.
low grade listen (loh grayd)
A term used to describe cells and tissue that look almost normal under a microscope. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells and tend to grow and spread more slowly than high-grade cancer cells. Cancer grade may be used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis. Low-grade cancers usually have a better prognosis than high-grade cancers and may not need treatment right away.
low tar cigarette listen (loh tar SIH-guh-ret)
A type of cigarette that is claimed to give off less tobacco tar than a regular cigarette when smoked. Low tar cigarettes have been shown to be no safer than regular cigarettes, and smoking them does not lower the risk of cancer or other diseases. A person smoking a low tar cigarette can inhale the same amount of tobacco tar, nicotine, and harmful, cancer-causing chemicals as in a regular cigarette, depending on how the cigarette is smoked. Cigarettes are no longer allowed to be labeled or advertised as low tar cigarettes. Also called light cigarette.
low-dose chemotherapy listen (loh-dose KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which low doses of anticancer drugs are given on a continuous or frequent, regular schedule (such as daily or weekly), usually over a long time. Low-dose chemotherapy causes less severe side effects than standard chemotherapy. Giving low doses of chemotherapy may stop the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Also called metronomic chemotherapy.
low-dose radiation therapy listen (loh-dose RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is less than that given in standard radiation therapy. In low-dose radiation therapy, the total dose may be given in fewer treatments or over a shorter period of time (fewer days or weeks) than standard radiation therapy. This may cause less damage to nearby healthy tissue.
lower extremity listen (LOH-er ek-STREH-mih-tee)
The part of the body that includes the leg, ankle, and foot.
lower GI series listen (LOH-er ... SEER-eez)
X-rays of the colon and rectum that are taken after a person is given a barium enema.
low-grade fibromyxoid sarcoma listen (… FY-broh-MIK-soyd sar-KOH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing type of cancer that usually forms in the deep soft tissues of the legs or trunk (chest and abdomen). The cancer may come back many years after treatment and spread to the lungs and the lining of the wall of the chest cavity. The cancer cells usually have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Low-grade fibromyxoid sarcoma usually occurs in young and middle-aged adults. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
low-grade lymphoma listen (... lim-FOH-muh)
A type of lymphoma that tends to grow and spread slowly, and has few symptoms. Also called indolent lymphoma.
low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion listen (... SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul LEE-zhun)
Slightly abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion is caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is a common abnormal finding on a Pap test. It usually goes away on its own without treatment but sometimes the abnormal cells become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion is sometimes called mild dysplasia. Also called LSIL.
low-risk cancer listen (loh-risk KAN-ser)
Cancer that tends to grow slowly, usually does not spread to other parts of the body, and may have a good chance of being cured. Knowing whether a cancer is low risk may help plan treatment. Some low-risk cancers may not need treatment right away.
low-risk HPV listen (loh-risk …)
A type of human papilloma virus (HPV) that can cause skin warts, such as skin warts on the hands, feet, and skin around the genitals and anus. It may also cause respiratory papillomatosis, a condition in which warts form on the larynx or other areas of the respiratory tract and cause breathing problems. Low-risk HPV infections do not cause cancer, and many go away on their own without treatment. Also called low-risk human papillomavirus.
low-risk human papillomavirus listen (loh-risk HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus)
A type of human papilloma virus (HPV) that can cause skin warts, such as skin warts on the hands, feet, and skin around the genitals and anus. It may also cause respiratory papillomatosis, a condition in which warts form on the larynx or other areas of the respiratory tract and cause breathing problems. Low-risk human papillomavirus infections do not cause cancer, and many go away on their own without treatment. Also called low-risk HPV.
LOXO-101
A drug used to treat solid tumors that have spread to other parts of the body or cannot be removed by surgery and that got worse after other treatment or cannot be treated with other therapies. It is used in patients whose disease has the NTRK gene fusion but does not have certain mutations (changes) in the TRK protein. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. LOXO-101 blocks the TRK protein, which is involved in cell signaling and cell growth. TRK may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. LOXO-101 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called larotrectinib sulfate, Trk inhibitor LOXO-101, and Vitrakvi.
LPHL
A rare type of Hodgkin lymphoma (a cancer of the immune system). It is marked by the presence of lymphocyte-predominant cells, which used to be called popcorn cells. These cells are different from the typical Reed-Sternberg cells found in classic Hodgkin lymphoma. LPHL may change into diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma, NLPHL, and nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma.
LSIL
Slightly abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. LSIL is caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is a common abnormal finding on a Pap test. It usually goes away on its own without treatment but sometimes the abnormal cells become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. LSIL is sometimes called mild dysplasia. Also called low-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion.
L-threo-dihydrosphingosine listen (... THREE-oh-dy-HY-drose-SFING-goh-seen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called protein kinase inhibitors. Also called safingol.
LU 79553
An anticancer drug that kills cancer cells by affecting DNA synthesis.
LU-103793
An anticancer drug that reduces the risk of tumor cell growth and reproduction.
lubricant listen (LOO-brih-kunt)
An oily or slippery substance.
lumbar puncture listen (LUM-bar PUNK-cher)
A procedure in which a thin needle called a spinal needle is put into the lower part of the spinal column to collect cerebrospinal fluid or to give drugs. Also called spinal tap.
LUMBAR/PELVIS/SACRAL syndrome listen (LUM-bar/PEL-vus/SAY-krul SIN-drome)
A rare disorder marked by a hemangioma (a benign blood vessel tumor) that spreads across a large area of the lower back or genital area. Other health problems that affect the urinary system, genitals, rectum, anus, brain, spinal cord, and nerve function may also occur. LUMBAR/PELVIC/SACRAL syndrome is most common in infants.
lumen listen (LOO-men)
The cavity or channel within a tube or tubular organ such as a blood vessel or the intestine.
Lumigan listen (LOO-mih-gun)
The drug bimatoprost used to treat glaucoma (a build-up of fluid in the eye). It lowers pressure in the eye by increasing the flow of natural eye fluids out of the eye. One drop of Lumigan is put directly in the eye once a day.
Lumoxiti listen (loo-MOK-sih-tee)
A drug used to treat hairy cell leukemia that came back or did not get better with at least two other systemic therapies, including treatment with a purine nucleoside analog (a type of anticancer drug). Lumoxiti contains a monoclonal antibody called moxetumomab that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also contains a bacterial toxin called PE38, which may help kill cancer cells. Lumoxiti is a type of immunotoxin. Also called anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015, CAT-8015, and moxetumomab pasudotox.
lumpectomy listen (lum-PEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-conserving surgery, breast-sparing surgery, partial mastectomy, quadrantectomy, and segmental mastectomy.
lung listen (lung)
One of a pair of organs in the chest that supplies the body with oxygen, and removes carbon dioxide from the body.
lung biopsy listen (… BY-op-see)
The removal of a small piece of lung tissue to be checked by a pathologist for cancer or other diseases. The tissue may be removed using a bronchoscope (a thin, lighted, tube-like instrument that is inserted through the trachea and into the lung). It may also be removed using a fine needle inserted through the chest wall, by surgery guided by a video camera inserted through the chest wall, or by an open biopsy. In an open biopsy, a doctor makes an incision between the ribs, removes a sample of lung tissue, and closes the wound with stitches.
lung cancer listen (lung KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the lung, usually in the cells lining air passages. The two main types are small cell lung cancer and non-small cell lung cancer. These types are diagnosed based on how the cells look under a microscope.
lung disorder listen (… dis-OR-der)
A type of disease that affects the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. Lung disorders may be caused by infection, by smoking tobacco, or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, radon, asbestos, or other forms of air pollution. Lung disorders include asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, pneumonia, and lung cancer. Also called pulmonary disease and respiratory disease.
lung function listen (… FUNK-shun)
A term used to describe how well the lungs work in helping a person breathe. During breathing, oxygen is taken into the lungs, where it passes into the blood and travels to the body’s tissues. Carbon dioxide, a waste product made by the body’s tissues, is carried to the lungs, where it is breathed out. There are different tests to measure lung function. Also called pulmonary function.
lung function test listen (… FUNK-shun …)
A test used to measure how well the lungs work. It measures how much air the lungs can hold and how quickly air is moved into and out of the lungs. It also measures how much oxygen is used and how much carbon dioxide is given off during breathing. A lung function test can be used to diagnose a lung disease and to see how well treatment for the disease is working. Also called PFT and pulmonary function test.
lung metastasis listen (...meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Cancer that has spread from the original (primary) tumor to the lung.
Lupron listen (LOO-pron)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lupron keeps the testicles from making testosterone by blocking other hormones that are needed to make it. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. Lupron is a type of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Also called Eligard, leuprolide acetate, and Lupron Depot.
Lupron Depot listen (LOO-pron DEE-poh)
A drug used to treat advanced prostate cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lupron Depot keeps the testicles from making testosterone by blocking other hormones that are needed to make it. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone to grow. Lupron Depot is a type of gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Also called Eligard, leuprolide acetate, and Lupron.
lupus listen (LOO-pus)
A chronic, inflammatory, connective tissue disease that can affect the joints and many organs, including the skin, heart, lungs, kidneys, and nervous system. It can cause many different symptoms; however, not everyone with lupus has all of the symptoms. Also called SLE and systemic lupus erythematosus.
lurtotecan listen (LOOR-toh-TEE-kan)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
Lutathera listen (LOO-tuh-THAYR-uh)
A radioactive drug used to treat gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors that are somatostatin receptor positive. These tumors form from cells that release hormones and can occur in the stomach, small and large intestines, rectum, and pancreas. Lutathera is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lutathera binds to a protein called somatostatin receptor, which is found on some neuroendocrine tumor cells. Lutathera builds up in these cells and gives off radiation, which may help kill cancer cells. It is a type of somatostatin analog. Also called lutetium Lu 177-dotatate.
luteinizing hormone listen (LOO-tih-NY-zing HOR-mone)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make follicles release their eggs and to make hormones that get the uterus ready for a fertilized egg to be implanted. In males, it acts on the testes to cause cells to grow and make testosterone. Also called interstitial cell-stimulating hormone, LH, and lutropin.
luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone listen (LOO-tih-NY-zing HOR-mone-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone)
A hormone made by a part of the brain called the hypothalamus. Luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone causes the pituitary gland in the brain to make and secrete the hormones luteinizing hormone (LH) and follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH). In men, these hormones cause the testicles to make testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to make estrogen and progesterone. Also called GnRH, gonadotropin-releasing hormone, LH-RH, and LHRH.
luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonist listen (LOO-tih-NY-zing HOR-mone-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone A-guh-nist)
A substance that keeps the testicles and ovaries from making sex hormones by blocking other hormones that are needed to make them. In men, luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonists cause the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, they cause the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone agonists are used to treat prostate cancer. Also called GnRH agonist, GnRHa, gonadotropin-releasing hormone agonist, and LHRH agonist.
luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonist listen (LOO-tih-NY-zing HOR-mone-reh-LEE-sing HOR-mone an-TA-guh-nist)
A substance that blocks the pituitary gland from making hormones called follicle-stimulating hormone (FSH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). In men, this causes the testicles to stop making testosterone. In women, this causes the ovaries to stop making estrogen and progesterone. Some luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone antagonists are used to treat advanced prostate cancer. They are also used to treat certain gynecologic conditions and are being studied in the treatment of hormone-sensitive breast cancer. Also called GnRH antagonist, gonadotropin-releasing hormone antagonist, and LHRH antagonist.
lutetium Lu 177-dotatate listen (loo-TEE-shee-um … DOH-tuh-tayt)
A radioactive drug used to treat gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors that are somatostatin receptor positive. These tumors form from cells that release hormones and can occur in the stomach, small and large intestines, rectum, and pancreas. Lutetium Lu 177-dotatate is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lutetium Lu 177-dotatate binds to a protein called somatostatin receptor, which is found on some neuroendocrine tumor cells. Lutetium Lu 177-dotatate builds up in these cells and gives off radiation, which may help kill cancer cells. It is a type of somatostatin analog. Also called Lutathera.
lutetium texaphyrin listen (loo-TEE-shee-um tek-SA-fih-rin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer using photodynamic therapy. It belongs to the family of drugs called metallotexaphyrins. Also called motexafin lutetium.
lutropin listen (LOO-troh-pin)
A hormone made in the pituitary gland. In females, it acts on the ovaries to make follicles release their eggs and to make hormones that get the uterus ready for a fertilized egg to be implanted. In males, it acts on the testes to cause cells to grow and make testosterone. Also called interstitial cell-stimulating hormone, LH, and luteinizing hormone.
Luvox listen (LOO-vox)
A drug used to treat obsessive-compulsive disorder. It is a type of antidepressant agent and selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called fluvoxamine.
LXR alpha pathway listen (… AL-fuh PATH-way)
Describes a group of proteins in a cell that work together to help control how certain genes are expressed and how cholesterol, lipids (fats), bile acids, and steroid hormones are made in the body. Changes in the LXR alpha pathway may lead to diseases such as heart disease and cancer. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer and other diseases. Also called liver X receptor alpha pathway.
LY231514
A drug used alone or with cisplatin to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with cisplatin to treat malignant pleural mesothelioma in patients whose cancer cannot be treated with surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. LY231514 stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of folate antagonist. Also called Alimta and pemetrexed disodium.
LY293111
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called leukotriene B4 receptor antagonists.
LY317615
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of cancer, including non-Hodgkin lymphoma, breast, colon, lung, ovarian, and prostate. LY317615 blocks certain cell signaling pathways, and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of serine threonine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called enzastaurin hydrochloride.
LY335979
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. LY335979 may help kill cancer cells that are resistant to anticancer drugs. Also called zosuquidar trihydrochloride.
LY353381 hydrochloride listen (... HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of osteoporosis and breast cancer. LY353381 hydrochloride is made in the laboratory and binds to estrogen receptors in the body. It is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called arzoxifene hydrochloride.
lycopene listen (LY-kuh-peen)
A red pigment found in tomatoes and some fruits. It is an antioxidant and may help prevent some types of cancer.
lymph listen (limf)
The clear fluid that travels through the lymphatic system and carries cells that help fight infections and other diseases. Also called lymphatic fluid.
lymph gland listen (limf gland)
A small bean-shaped structure that is part of the body’s immune system. Lymph glands filter substances that travel through the lymphatic fluid, and they contain lymphocytes (white blood cells) that help the body fight infection and disease. There are hundreds of lymph glands found throughout the body. They are connected to one another by lymph vessels. Clusters of lymph glands are found in the neck, axilla (underarm), chest, abdomen, and groin. For example, there are about 20-40 lymph glands in the axilla. Also called lymph node.
lymph node listen (limf node)
A small bean-shaped structure that is part of the body’s immune system. Lymph nodes filter substances that travel through the lymphatic fluid, and they contain lymphocytes (white blood cells) that help the body fight infection and disease. There are hundreds of lymph nodes found throughout the body. They are connected to one another by lymph vessels. Clusters of lymph nodes are found in the neck, axilla (underarm), chest, abdomen, and groin. For example, there are about 20-40 lymph nodes in the axilla. Also called lymph gland.
lymph node biopsy listen (limf node BY-op-see)
A procedure in which all or part of a lymph node is removed and checked under a microscope for signs of infection or disease, such as cancer. There are several types of lymph node biopsies, including excisional biopsy (removal of entire lymph node), incisional biopsy (removal of part of a lymph node), core needle biopsy (removal of tissue from a lymph node using a wide needle), and fine-needle aspiration biopsy (removal of tissue from a lymph node using a thin needle).
lymph node dissection listen (limf node dy-SEK-shun)
A surgical procedure in which the lymph nodes are removed and a sample of tissue is checked under a microscope for signs of cancer. For a regional lymph node dissection, some of the lymph nodes in the tumor area are removed; for a radical lymph node dissection, most or all of the lymph nodes in the tumor area are removed. Also called lymphadenectomy.
lymph node drainage listen (limf node DRAY-nij)
The flow of lymph from an area of tissue into a particular lymph node.
lymph node mapping listen (limf node MA-ping)
The use of dyes and radioactive substances to identify lymph nodes that may contain tumor cells. Also called lymphatic mapping.
lymph system listen (limf SIS-tem)
The tissues and organs that produce, store, and carry white blood cells that fight infections and other diseases. This system includes the bone marrow, spleen, thymus, lymph nodes, and lymphatic vessels (a network of thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells). Lymphatic vessels branch, like blood vessels, into all the tissues of the body. Also called lymphatic system.
lymph vessel listen (limf ...)
A thin tube that carries lymph (lymphatic fluid) and white blood cells through the lymphatic system. Also called lymphatic vessel.
lymphadenectomy listen (LIM-fa-deh-NEK-toh-mee)
A surgical procedure in which the lymph nodes are removed and a sample of tissue is checked under a microscope for signs of cancer. For a regional lymphadenectomy, some of the lymph nodes in the tumor area are removed; for a radical lymphadenectomy, most or all of the lymph nodes in the tumor area are removed. Also called lymph node dissection.
lymphadenopathy listen (limf-A-deh-NAH-puh-thee)
Disease or swelling of the lymph nodes.
lymphangiogram listen (lim-FAN-jee-oh-gram)
An x-ray of the lymphatic system. A dye is injected into a lymphatic vessel and travels throughout the lymphatic system. The dye outlines the lymphatic vessels and organs on the x-ray.
lymphangiography listen (lim-FAN-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
An x-ray study of the lymphatic system. A dye is injected into a lymphatic vessel and travels throughout the lymphatic system. The dye outlines the lymphatic vessels and organs on the x-ray.
lymphangiosarcoma listen (lim-FAN-jee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in the cells that line lymph vessels.
lymphangitic carcinomatosis listen (LIM-fan-JIH-tik KAR-sih-NOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A condition in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor and invade lymph vessels (thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells through the body’s lymph system). The invaded lymph vessels then fill up with cancer cells and become blocked. Although lymphangitic carcinomatosis can occur anywhere in the body, it commonly happens in the lungs. It can happen in many types of cancer but is most common in breast, lung, colon, stomach, pancreatic, and prostate cancer. Also called carcinomatous lymphangitis.
lymphatic basin listen (lim-FA-tik BAY-sin)
A group of lymph nodes that receives and filters lymph that flows from a certain area of the body. Special dyes may be used to stain and identify the lymphatic basin in the tissues around a tumor, so that lymph nodes that may contain cancer can be removed and checked by a pathologist.
lymphatic fluid listen (lim-FA-tik FLOO-id)
The clear fluid that travels through the lymphatic system and carries cells that help fight infections and other diseases. Also called lymph.
lymphatic mapping listen (lim-FA-tik MA-ping)
The use of dyes and radioactive substances to identify lymph nodes that may contain tumor cells. Also called lymph node mapping.
lymphatic system listen (lim-FA-tik SIS-tem)
The tissues and organs that produce, store, and carry white blood cells that fight infections and other diseases. This system includes the bone marrow, spleen, thymus, lymph nodes, and lymphatic vessels (a network of thin tubes that carry lymph and white blood cells). Lymphatic vessels branch, like blood vessels, into all the tissues of the body. Also called lymph system.
lymphatic vessel listen (lim-FA-tik ...)
A thin tube that carries lymph (lymphatic fluid) and white blood cells through the lymphatic system. Also called lymph vessel.
lymphedema listen (LIM-fuh-DEE-muh)
A condition in which extra lymph fluid builds up in tissues and causes swelling. It may occur in an arm or leg if lymph vessels are blocked, damaged, or removed by surgery.
lymphoblast listen (LIM-foh-BLAST)
A lymphocyte that has gotten larger after being stimulated by an antigen. Lymphoblast also refers to an immature cell that can develop into a mature lymphocyte.
lymphoblastic listen (LIM-foh-BLAS-tik)
Refers to lymphoblasts (a type of immature white blood cell).
lymphoblastic lymphoma listen (LIM-foh-BLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma in which too many lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the lymph nodes and the thymus gland. These lymphoblasts may spread to other places in the body. It is most common in teenagers and young adults and affects more males than females. It may be a T or B cell type. Also called precursor lymphoblastic lymphoma.
lymphocyte listen (LIM-foh-site)
A type of immune cell that is made in the bone marrow and is found in the blood and in lymph tissue. The two main types of lymphocytes are B lymphocytes and T lymphocytes. B lymphocytes make antibodies, and T lymphocytes help kill tumor cells and help control immune responses. A lymphocyte is a type of white blood cell.
lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma listen (LIM-foh-site-preh-DAH-mih-nunt HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
A rare type of Hodgkin lymphoma (a cancer of the immune system). It is marked by the presence of lymphocyte-predominant cells, which used to be called popcorn cells. These cells are different from the typical Reed-Sternberg cells found in classic Hodgkin lymphoma. Lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma may change into diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called LPHL, NLPHL, and nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma.
lymphocytic listen (LIM-foh-SIH-tik)
Refers to lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell).
lymphocytic leukemia listen (LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of cancer in which the bone marrow makes too many lymphocytes (white blood cells).
lymphocytic leukopenia listen (LIM-foh-SIH-tik LOO-koh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) in the blood. Also called lymphocytopenia and lymphopenia.
lymphocytopenia listen (LIM-foh-SY-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) in the blood. Also called lymphocytic leukopenia and lymphopenia.
lymphoepithelioma listen (LIM-foh-EH-pih-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in the tissues covering the nasopharynx (the upper part of the throat behind the nose).
lymphography listen (lim-FAH-gruh-fee)
An x-ray study of lymph nodes and lymphatic vessels made visible by the injection of a special dye.
lymphoid listen (LIM-foyd)
Referring to lymphocytes, a type of white blood cell. Also refers to tissue in which lymphocytes develop.
lymphokine-activated killer cell listen (LIM-foh-kine-AK-tih-vay-ted KIH-ler sel)
A white blood cell that is stimulated in a laboratory to kill tumor cells. Also called LAK cell.
lymphoma listen (lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in cells of the immune system. There are two basic categories of lymphomas. One kind is Hodgkin lymphoma, which is marked by the presence of a type of cell called the Reed-Sternberg cell. The other category is non-Hodgkin lymphomas, which includes a large, diverse group of cancers of immune system cells. Non-Hodgkin lymphomas can be further divided into cancers that have an indolent (slow-growing) course and those that have an aggressive (fast-growing) course. These subtypes behave and respond to treatment differently. Both Hodgkin and non-Hodgkin lymphomas can occur in children and adults, and prognosis and treatment depend on the stage and the type of cancer.
lymphomatoid granulomatosis listen (lim-FOH-muh-toyd GRAN-yoo-loh-muh-TOH-sis)
Destructive growth of lymph cells, usually involving the lungs, skin, kidneys, and central nervous system. Grades I and II are not considered cancer, but grade III is considered a lymphoma.
lymphomatous leptomeningitis listen (lim-FOH-muh-tus LEP-toh-MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in lymphoma. In lymphomatous leptomeningitis, cancer cells have spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called lymphomatous meningitis.
lymphomatous meningitis listen (lim-FOH-muh-tus MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in lymphoma. In lymphomatous meningitis, cancer cells have spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called lymphomatous leptomeningitis.
lymphopenia listen (LIM-foh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) in the blood. Also called lymphocytic leukopenia and lymphocytopenia.
lymphoplasmacytic lymphoma listen (LIM-foh-plaz-muh-SIH-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by abnormal levels of IgM antibodies in the blood and an enlarged liver, spleen, or lymph nodes. Also called Waldenström macroglobulinemia.
lymphopoietin-1 listen (LIM-foh-POY-eh-tin...)
One of a group of related proteins made by leukocytes (white blood cells) and other cells in the body. Lymphopoietin-1 is made by cells that cover and support organs, glands, and other structures in the body. It causes the growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes. Lymphopoietin-1 made in the laboratory is used as a biological response modifier to boost the immune system in cancer therapy. Lymphopoietin-1 is a type of cytokine. Also called IL-7 and interleukin-7.
lymphoproliferative disorder listen (LIM-foh-proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv dis-OR-der)
A disease in which cells of the lymphatic system grow excessively. Lymphoproliferative disorders are often treated like cancer.
lymphosarcoma listen (LIM-foh-sar-KOH-muh)
An obsolete term for a malignant tumor of lymphatic tissue.
lymphoscintigraphy listen (LIM-foh-sin-TIH-gruh-fee)
A method used to check the lymph system for disease. A radioactive substance that flows through the lymph ducts and can be taken up by lymph nodes is injected into the body. A scanner or probe is used to follow the movement of this substance on a computer screen. Lymphoscintigraphy is used to find the sentinel lymph node (the first node to receive lymph from a tumor), which may be removed and checked for tumor cells. Lymphoscintigraphy is also used to diagnose certain diseases or conditions, such as lymphoma or lymphedema.
lymphostatic elephantiasis listen (lim-foh-STA-tik EH-luh-fun-TY-uh-sis)
A condition in which tissue or a limb becomes very swollen and thick, and changes color. It is caused by a block in the flow of lymph and a buildup of fluid in tissues. Also called stage III lymphedema.
Lynch syndrome listen (linch SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder in which affected individuals have a higher-than-normal chance of developing colorectal cancer and certain other types of cancer, often before the age of 50. Also called hereditary nonpolyposis colon cancer and HNPCC.
Lynparza listen (lin-PAR-zuh)
A drug used to treat certain types of HER2-negative breast cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Lynparza is also used to treat certain types of advanced ovarian, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer. It is used in patients with certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Lynparza blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Lynparza is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AZD2281, olaparib, and PARP inhibitor AZD2281.
Lyrica listen (LEER-ih-kuh)
A drug used to treat nerve pain caused by diabetes or herpes zoster infection and certain types of seizures. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of nerve pain in the hands and feet of cancer patients given chemotherapy. Lyrica is a type of anticonvulsant. Also called pregabalin.
lysis listen (LY-sis)
In biology, lysis refers to the breakdown of a cell caused by damage to its plasma (outer) membrane. It can be caused by chemical or physical means (for example, strong detergents or high-energy sound waves) or by infection with a strain virus that can lyse cells.
lysosome listen (LY-soh-some)
A sac-like compartment inside a cell that has enzymes that can break down cellular components that need to be destroyed.
lytic listen (LIH-tik)
Having to do with lysis. In biology, lysis refers to the disintegration of a cell by disruption of its plasma membrane. Lysis can be caused by chemical or physical means (e.g., high-energy sound waves) or by a virus infection.
lytic lesion listen (LIH-tik LEE-zhun)
Destruction of an area of bone due to a disease process, such as cancer.
M protein listen (... PROH-teen)
An antibody found in unusually large amounts in the blood or urine of people with multiple myeloma and other types of plasma cell tumors. Also called monoclonal protein.
M200
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. M200 binds to a protein that is found on cells that line some tumor blood vessels. It is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called volociximab.
ma huang listen (mah hwong)
A shrub native to China and India. The stems and roots are used in traditional medicine as a diuretic and for asthma, bronchitis, and cough. It has also been promoted as a decongestant, a weight loss aid, and as a supplement to increase energy. Ma huang may cause high blood pressure, increased heart rate, or death if used with certain drugs, and may reduce the effects of certain drugs used to treat cancer and other diseases. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration has banned the sale of dietary supplements that contain ma huang. The scientific name is Ephedra sinica. Also called ephedra.
macrocalcification listen (MA-kroh-KAL-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
A small deposit of calcium in the breast that cannot be felt but can be seen on a mammogram. It is usually caused by aging, an old injury, or inflamed tissue and is usually not related to cancer.
macroglobulinemia listen (MA-kroh-GLAH-byoo-lih-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which the blood contains high levels of large proteins and is too thick to flow through small blood vessels. One type is Waldenström macroglobulinemia, which is a type of cancer.
macrophage listen (MA-kroh-fayj)
A type of white blood cell that surrounds and kills microorganisms, removes dead cells, and stimulates the action of other immune system cells.
macular degeneration listen (MA-kyoo-ler dee-JEH-neh-RAY-shun)
A condition in which there is a slow breakdown of cells in the center of the retina (the light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). This blocks vision in the center of the eye and can cause problems with activities such as reading and driving. Macular degeneration is most often seen in people who are over the age of 50. Also called age-related macular degeneration, AMD, and ARMD.
Maffucci syndrome listen (muh-FOO-chee SIN-drome)
A very rare disorder that affects the skin and cartilage. It is marked by benign (not cancer) growths of cartilage in bones. These growths usually occur in the hands or feet, but may also occur in the skull, ribs, and spine. They may cause severely deformed bone, shortening of the arms or legs, broken bones, and other bone problems. Maffucci syndrome is also marked by hemangiomas (benign blood vessel tumors), most often in the skin. People with this syndrome have an increased risk of certain cancers, such as chondrosarcoma (cancer that forms in bone cartilage) or cancers of the ovary or liver. Maffucci syndrome is most common in young children.
mafosfamide listen (muh-FOS-fuh-mide)
A form of cyclophosphamide that can be administered as an intrathecal infusion. Mafosfamide is being studied as an anticancer drug. It belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
MAGE-3 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein found in many types of tumors but not in most normal tissues. Vaccines using pieces of the MAGE-3 protein are being studied for their ability to boost the immune response to cancer cells in patients with cancer.
magnesium listen (mag-NEE-zee-um)
In medicine, a mineral used by the body to help maintain muscles, nerves, and bones. It is also used in energy metabolism and protein synthesis.
magnesium sulfate listen (mag-NEE-zee-um SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat pre-eclampsia and eclampsia (serious complications of pregnancy). Magnesium sulfate is also being studied for its ability to prevent the toxic side effects of certain drugs used to treat colorectal cancer. It is a type of anticonvulsant agent.
magnetic resonance angiography listen (mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts an-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer to create detailed pictures of the blood vessels and blood flow inside the body. A dye may be injected into a vein to make the blood vessels and blood flow easier to see. Magnetic resonance angiography may be used to check for aneurysms (a bulge in the blood vessel wall), blockages in the arteries, blood clots, and other blood vessel problems. Also called MRA.
magnetic resonance imaging listen (mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts IH-muh-jing)
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to create detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and diseased tissue. Magnetic resonance imaging makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other scanning techniques, such as computed tomography (CT) or x-ray. Magnetic resonance imaging is especially useful for imaging the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones. Also called MRI, NMRI, and nuclear magnetic resonance imaging.
magnetic resonance perfusion imaging listen (mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts per-FYOO-zhun IH-muh-jing)
A special type of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) that uses an injected dye in order to see blood flow through tissues. Also called perfusion magnetic resonance imaging.
magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging listen (mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts SPEK-troh-SKAH-pik IH-muh-jing)
A noninvasive imaging method that provides information about cellular activity (metabolic information). It is used along with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) which provides information about the shape and size of the tumor (spatial information). Also called 1H-nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, MRSI, and proton magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging.
magnetic-targeted carrier listen (mag-NEH-tik-TAR-geh-ted KAYR-ee-er)
A tiny bead made from particles of iron and carbon that can be attached to an anticancer drug. A magnet applied from outside the body then can direct the drug to the tumor site. This can keep a larger dose of the drug at the tumor site for a longer period of time, and help protect healthy tissue from the side effects of chemotherapy.
Magnevist listen (MAG-neh-vist)
A substance used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to help make clear pictures of the brain, spine, heart, soft tissue of joints, and inside bones. Magnevist is being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. It is a type of contrast agent. Also called gadopentetate dimeglumine and Gd-DTPA.
maidenhair tree listen (MAY-din-HAYR...)
A tree native to China. Substances taken from the leaves and seeds have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Maidenhair tree has been studied in the prevention and treatment of Alzheimer disease, dementia, certain blood vessel diseases, and memory loss. It may cause bleeding or high blood pressure when used with certain drugs. Also called ginkgo and ginkgo biloba.
mainstream medicine listen (MAYN-streem MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called allopathic medicine, biomedicine, conventional medicine, orthodox medicine, and Western medicine.
mainstream smoke listen (MAYN-streem ...)
Tobacco smoke that is exhaled by smokers. Mainstream smoke can be a form of secondhand smoke. It contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Inhaling mainstream smoke increases the risk of lung cancer and may increase the risk of other types of cancer. Inhaling it also increases the risk of other health problems, such as heart disease and lung disease.
maintenance therapy listen (MAYN-teh-nunts THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given to help keep cancer from coming back after it has disappeared following the initial therapy. It may include treatment with drugs, vaccines, or antibodies that kill cancer cells, and it may be given for a long time.
malabsorption syndrome listen (MA-lub-SORP-shun SIN-drome)
A group of symptoms such as gas, bloating, abdominal pain, and diarrhea resulting from the body's inability to properly absorb nutrients.
male breast cancer listen (mayl brest KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the breast in men. Most male breast cancer begins in cells lining the ducts. It is very rare and usually affects older men.
malignancy listen (muh-LIG-nun-see)
A term for diseases in which abnormal cells divide without control and can invade nearby tissues. Malignant cells can also spread to other parts of the body through the blood and lymph systems. There are several main types of malignancy. Carcinoma is a malignancy that begins in the skin or in tissues that line or cover internal organs. Sarcoma is a malignancy that begins in bone, cartilage, fat, muscle, blood vessels, or other connective or supportive tissue. Leukemia is a malignancy that starts in blood-forming tissue, such as the bone marrow, and causes large numbers of abnormal blood cells to be produced and enter the blood. Lymphoma and multiple myeloma are malignancies that begin in the cells of the immune system. Central nervous system cancers are malignancies that begin in the tissues of the brain and spinal cord. Also called cancer.
malignant listen (muh-LIG-nunt)
Cancerous. Malignant cells can invade and destroy nearby tissue and spread to other parts of the body.
malignant ascites listen (muh-LIG-nunt uh-SY-teez)
A condition in which fluid containing cancer cells collects in the abdomen.
malignant ectomesenchymoma listen (muh-LIG-nunt EK-toh-MEH-zen-ky-MOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing tumor of the nervous system or soft tissue that occurs in children and young adults. Malignant ectomesenchymomas may form in the head and neck, abdomen, perineum, scrotum, or limbs. Also called ectomesenchymoma.
malignant fibrous cytoma listen (muh-LIG-nunt FY-brus sy-TOH-muh)
A type of cancer that usually forms in the soft tissue, but it may also form in bone. It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in the legs (especially the thighs), arms, or back of the abdomen. It may also occur in a part of the body where a patient received radiation therapy in the past. Malignant fibrous cytomas often grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body, including the lungs. They usually occur in older adults, and they may sometimes occur as a second cancer in patients who had retinoblastoma. Also called malignant fibrous histiocytoma and undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcoma.
malignant fibrous histiocytoma listen (muh-LIG-nunt FY-brus HIS-tee-oh-sy-TOH-muh)
A type of cancer that usually forms in the soft tissue, but it may also form in bone. It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in the legs (especially the thighs), arms, or back of the abdomen. It may also occur in a part of the body where a patient received radiation therapy in the past. Malignant fibrous histiocytomas often grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body, including the lungs. They usually occur in older adults, and they may sometimes occur as a second cancer in patients who had retinoblastoma. Also called malignant fibrous cytoma and undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcoma.
malignant meningioma listen (muh-LIG-nunt meh-NIN-jee-OH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing tumor that forms in one of the inner layers of the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). Malignant meningioma often spreads to other areas of the body.
malignant mesothelioma listen (muh-LIG-nunt MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A rare type of cancer in which malignant cells are found in the lining of the chest or abdomen. Exposure to airborne asbestos particles increases one's risk of developing malignant mesothelioma.
malignant mixed Müllerian tumor listen (muh-LIG-nunt mikst myoo-LAYR-ee-un TOO-mer)
A rare type of tumor that is a mixture of carcinoma and sarcoma cells. MMMT usually occurs in the uterus. Also called MMMT.
malignant pericardial effusion listen (muh-LIG-nunt PAYR-ih-KAR-dee-ul eh-FYOO-zhun)
A condition in which cancer causes extra fluid to collect inside the sac around the heart. The extra fluid causes pressure on the heart, which keeps it from pumping blood normally. Lymph vessels may be blocked, which can cause infection. Malignant pericardial effusions are most often caused by lung cancer, breast cancer, melanoma, lymphoma, and leukemia.
malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor listen (muh-LIG-nunt peh-RIH-feh-rul ... TOO-mer)
A type of soft tissue sarcoma that develops in cells that form a protective sheath (covering) around peripheral nerves, which are nerves that are outside of the central nervous system (brain and spinal cord). Also called MPNST.
malignant peritoneal effusion listen (muh-LIG-nunt PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul eh-FYOO-zhun)
A condition in which cancer causes extra fluid to collect between the thin layers of the peritoneum (tissue that lines the abdomen and covers most of the organs in the abdomen). Signs and symptoms may include pain or swelling in the abdomen, trouble breathing, chest pain, weight gain, nausea, loss of appetite, and fatigue. Malignant peritoneal effusions are most often caused by cancers of the ovary, uterus, breast, colon, lung, pancreas, and liver.
malignant pleural effusion listen (muh-LIG-nunt PLOOR-ul eh-FYOO-zhun)
A condition in which cancer causes an abnormal amount of fluid to collect between the thin layers of tissue (pleura) lining the outside of the lung and the wall of the chest cavity. Lung cancer, breast cancer, lymphoma, and leukemia cause most malignant pleural effusions.
malignant triton tumor listen (muh-LIG-nunt TRY-ton TOO-mer)
A very rare, fast-growing type of cancer that forms in the nerve sheath (a protective covering around nerves that are not part of the brain or spinal cord). The tumor is made up of Schwann cells (cells that hold nerve cells in place) and rhabdomyoblasts (a type of muscle cell). Malignant triton tumors occur most often in patients with neurofibromatosis type 1. A malignant triton tumor is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
malnourished listen (mal-NER-isht)
Describes a condition caused by not getting enough calories or the right amount of key nutrients needed for health. Key nutrients include vitamins and minerals.
malnutrition listen (mal-noo-TRIH-shun)
A condition caused by not getting enough calories or the right amount of key nutrients, such as vitamins and minerals, that are needed for health. Malnutrition may occur when there is a lack of nutrients in the diet or when the body cannot absorb nutrients from food. Cancer and cancer treatment may cause malnutrition.
malondialdehyde listen (MA-lon-dy-AL-deh-hide)
A byproduct of lipid (fat) metabolism in the body. It is also found in many foods and can be present in high amounts in rancid food.
MALT lymphoma listen (... lim-FOH-muh)
A type of cancer that arises in cells in mucosal tissue that are involved in antibody production. Also called mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue lymphoma.
mammalian target of rapamycin listen (muh-MA-lee-un TAR-get … RA-puh-MY-sin)
A protein that helps control several cell functions, including cell division and survival, and binds to rapamycin and other drugs. Mammalian target of rapamycin may be more active in some types of cancer cells than it is in normal cells. Blocking mammalian target of rapamycin may cause the cancer cells to die. It is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase. Also called mechanistic target of rapamycin and mTOR.
MammaPrint listen (MA-muh-print)
A test that is used to help predict whether breast cancer has spread to other parts of the body or come back. The test looks at the activity of 70 different genes in breast cancer tissue of women who have early-stage breast cancer that has not spread to the lymph nodes. If there is a high risk that the cancer will spread or come back, it may be used to help plan treatment with anticancer drugs. Also called 70-gene signature.
mammary listen (MA-muh-ree)
Having to do with the breast.
mammary duct ectasia (MA-muh-ree dukt ek-TAY-zhuh)
A benign (not cancer) condition in which a milk duct under the nipple widens and thickens. This can cause the milk duct to become blocked and fluid to build up inside it. There are usually no symptoms, but sometimes there may be a thick nipple discharge or redness or tenderness of the nipple and nearby breast tissue. Mammary duct ectasia is most common in women who are near menopause or have gone through it. Also called breast duct ectasia.
mammary dysplasia listen (MA-muh-ree dis-PLAY-zhuh)
A group of conditions marked by changes in breast tissue that are benign (not cancer). There are different types of mammary dysplasia, including some types caused by an increase in the number of cells or by the growth of abnormal cells in the breast ducts or lobes. Signs and symptoms of mammary dysplasia include irregular lumps or cysts, breast swelling or discomfort, skin redness or thickening, and nipple discharge. Most benign breast conditions do not increase the risk of breast cancer. Also called benign breast disease.
mammary gland listen (MA-muh-ree ...)
Glandular organ located on the chest. The mammary gland is made up of connective tissue, fat, and tissue that contains the glands that can make milk. Also called breast.
mammogram listen (MA-muh-gram)
An x-ray of the breast.
mammography listen (ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
The use of film or a computer to create a picture of the breast.
MammoSite listen (MA-moh-site)
A system used to deliver internal radiation therapy to breast cancer patients after surgery to remove their cancer. MammoSite targets only the part of the breast where the cancer was found. After a patient has had a lumpectomy to remove the cancer, a small balloon on the end of a catheter (thin tube) is inserted into the empty space left by the surgery. The balloon is then filled with liquid and left in place. Using the catheter, radioactive seeds are put into the balloon twice a day for five days and removed each time. Once treatment has ended, the catheter and balloon are removed. MammoSite is a type of intracavitary brachytherapy and partial breast irradiation therapy (PBRT). Also called balloon catheter radiation.
MAMMOTOME listen (MA-moh-tome)
A device that uses a computer-guided probe to perform breast biopsies. A biopsy procedure using the MAMMOTOME device can be done on an outpatient basis with a local anesthetic, removes only a small amount of healthy tissue, and doesn’t require sutures (stitches) because the incision is very small. MAMMOTOME is a registered trademark of Devicor Medical Products, Inc.
manipulative and body-based practice listen (muh-NIP-yoo-luh-tiv ... BAH-dee-bayst PRAK-tis)
A type of therapy in which the therapist moves or manipulates one or more parts of the patient’s body. It may be used to treat pain, stress, anxiety, and depression, and for general well-being. Examples include chiropractic treatments, physical therapy, and massage therapy. Also called manual healing and physical touch methods.
mannitol listen (MA-nih-TOL)
A drug used to decrease swelling of the brain and to treat kidney failure. Mannitol can also be used to open the blood-brain barrier, which allows anticancer medicines to enter the brain and treat brain tumors.
mantle cell lymphoma listen (MAN-tul sel lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that usually occurs in middle-aged or older adults. It is marked by small- to medium-size cancer cells that may be in the lymph nodes, spleen, bone marrow, blood, and gastrointestinal system.
mantle field listen (MAN-tul ...)
The area of the neck, chest, and lymph nodes in the armpit that are exposed to radiation.
manual healing listen (MAN-yoo-ul HEE-ling)
A type of therapy in which the therapist moves or manipulates one or more parts of the patient’s body. It may be used to treat pain, stress, anxiety, and depression, and for general well-being. Examples include chiropractic treatments, physical therapy, and massage therapy. Also called manipulative and body-based practice and physical touch methods.
MAO inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug used to treat depression. It stops the breakdown of certain chemicals in the brain that help improve a person’s mood. A MAO inhibitor is a type of antidepressant. Also called monoamine oxidase inhibitor.
mapatumumab listen (ma-puh-TOO-moo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It binds to a protein called TRAIL R1 on the surface of some tumor cells. This may kill the tumor cells. Mapatumumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-TRAIL R1-mAb and HGS-ETR1.
Marcaine listen (MAR-kane)
A drug used to relieve pain by blocking signals at nerve endings. It is being studied in the relief of pain following surgery for cancer. It is a type of local anesthetic. Also called bupivacaine hydrochloride and Sensorcaine.
Marfan syndrome listen (MAR-fan SIN-drome)
A genetic condition that affects the connective tissue in many organs and tissues in the body, especially the heart, eyes, bones, joints, and blood vessels, including the aorta. People with Marfan syndrome are often tall and thin, have very long arms, legs, fingers, and toes, and have heart and vision problems. Other common signs and symptoms include a long and narrow face, crowded teeth, curved spine, loose joints, stretch marks in the skin, and chest abnormalities. Marfan syndrome may be inherited (passed from parent to child) and is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called FBN1.
margin listen (MAR-jin)
The edge or border of the tissue removed in cancer surgery. The margin is described as negative or clean when the pathologist finds no cancer cells at the edge of the tissue, suggesting that all of the cancer has been removed. The margin is described as positive or involved when the pathologist finds cancer cells at the edge of the tissue, suggesting that all of the cancer has not been removed.
marginal zone B-cell lymphoma listen (MAR-jih-nul zone B-sel lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that begins forming in certain areas (the marginal zones) of lymph tissue. There are three types based on whether it forms in the spleen, lymph nodes, or other lymphoid tissue that contains a lot of B cells (a type of white blood cell). Also called marginal zone lymphoma and MZL.
marginal zone lymphoma listen (MAR-jih-nul zone lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that begins forming in certain areas (the marginal zones) of lymph tissue. There are three types based on whether it forms in the spleen, lymph nodes, or other lymphoid tissue that contains a lot of B cells (a type of white blood cell). Also called marginal zone B-cell lymphoma and MZL.
maribavir listen (mar-I-buh-veer)
A substance that blocks the ability of viruses to make new viruses and infect cells. It is being studied in the prevention of cytomegalovirus infection in cancer patients who have had a donor stem cell transplant. It is a type of antiviral agent.
marijuana listen (MAYR-ih-WAH-nuh)
The dried leaves and flowering tops of the Cannabis sativa or Cannabis indica plant. Marijuana contains active chemicals called cannabinoids that cause drug-like effects all through the body, including the central nervous system and the immune system. Marijuana may help treat the symptoms of cancer or the side effects of cancer treatment, such as nausea and vomiting, pain, and cachexia (loss of body weight and muscle mass). Also called Cannabis.
marimastat listen (muh-RIH-muh-stat)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors. Marimastat is a matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor.
marker listen (MAR-ker)
A diagnostic indication that disease may develop.
Marqibo listen (MAR-kee-boh)
A form of the anticancer drug vincristine sulfate that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than vincristine. Marqibo is used to treat adults with acute lymphoblastic leukemia that is Philadelphia chromosome negative and has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. Also called liposomal vincristine sulfate and vincristine sulfate liposome.
MART-1 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein found on normal melanocytes (cells that make the pigment melanin) in the skin and in the retina. It is also found on most melanomas (cancers that begin in melanocytes). Vaccines using pieces of the MART-1 antigen are being studied for their ability to boost the immune response to cancer cells in patients with melanoma. Also called Melan-A protein and Melanoma Antigen Recognized by T cells 1.
masoprocol listen (muh-SOH-proh-kol)
A drug put on the skin to treat growths caused by sun exposure. A form of masoprocol that is taken by mouth is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. Masoprocol is an antioxidant, and it may block certain enzymes needed for tumor growth. Also called Actinex, NDGA, and nordihydroguaiaretic acid.
mass listen (mas)
In medicine, a lump in the body. It may be caused by the abnormal growth of cells, a cyst, hormonal changes, or an immune reaction. A mass may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer).
massage therapy listen (muh-SAZH THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment in which the soft tissues of the body are kneaded, rubbed, tapped, and stroked. Massage therapy may help people relax, relieve stress and pain, lower blood pressure, and improve circulation. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer symptoms such as lack of energy, pain, swelling, and depression.
mast cell listen (mast sel)
A type of white blood cell that is found in connective tissues all through the body, especially under the skin, near blood vessels and lymph vessels, in nerves, and in the lungs and intestines. Mast cells play an important role in how the immune system responds to certain bacteria and parasites and they help control other types of immune responses. They contain chemicals such as histamine, heparin, cytokines, and growth factors. They release these chemicals during allergic reactions and certain immune responses. These chemicals have many effects, including the widening of blood vessels and angiogenesis. During an allergic response, they can cause flushing (a hot, red face) and itching. In large amounts, they can also cause abdominal cramps, muscle pain, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, low blood pressure, and shock. Mast cells are part of the body’s immune system.
mast cell leukemia listen (mast sel loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A very rare, aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia in which too many immature mast cells (a type of white blood cell) are found in the bone marrow and blood. It may develop in patients who have a buildup of mast cells caused by a condition called aggressive systemic mastocytosis. Mast cell leukemia is hard to treat and has a poor prognosis (outcome). It is a type of acute myeloid leukemia.
mast cell tumor listen (mast sel TOO-mer)
A growth or lump of mast cells (a type of white blood cell). Mast cell tumors can involve the skin, subcutaneous tissue, and muscle tissue. Also called mastocytoma.
mastectomy listen (ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the breast. There are different types of mastectomy that differ in the amount of tissue and lymph nodes removed.
mastitis listen (ma-STY-tis)
A condition in which breast tissue is inflamed. It is usually caused by an infection and is most often seen in nursing mothers.
mastocytoma listen (MAS-toh-sy-TOH-muh)
A growth or lump of mast cells (a type of white blood cell). Mast cell tumors can involve the skin, subcutaneous tissue, and muscle tissue. Also called mast cell tumor.
maternal listen (muh-TER-nul)
Having to do with the mother, coming from the mother, or related through the mother.
matrix metalloproteinase listen (MAY-trix meh-TA-loh-PROH-tee-nays)
A member of a group of enzymes that can break down proteins, such as collagen, that are normally found in the spaces between cells in tissues (i.e., extracellular matrix proteins). Because these enzymes need zinc or calcium atoms to work properly, they are called metalloproteinases. Matrix metalloproteinases are involved in wound healing, angiogenesis, and tumor cell metastasis.
matted lymph nodes listen (MA-ted limf nodes)
A group of fused lymph nodes. Matted lymph nodes may be a sign of certain conditions, such as infection, sarcoidosis, or lymphoma. They also may be a sign of cancer that has spread to the lymph nodes.
Matulane listen (MA-choo-layn)
A drug used with other drugs to treat advanced Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Matulane damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called procarbazine hydrochloride.
mature T-cell lymphoma listen (muh-CHOOR T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
One of a group of aggressive (fast-growing) non-Hodgkin lymphomas that begin in mature T lymphocytes (T cells that have matured in the thymus gland and gone to other lymphatic sites in the body, including lymph nodes, bone marrow, and spleen). Also called peripheral T-cell lymphoma.
mature teratoma listen (muh-CHOOR TAYR-uh-TOH-muh)
A type of germ cell tumor that is usually made up of several different types of tissue, such as hair, muscle, and bone. Mature teratomas have cells that look almost like normal cells under a microscope. Some mature teratomas make enzymes or hormones that may cause signs and symptoms of disease. They are benign (not cancer) but may come back after being removed by surgery. Mature teratomas usually occur in the sacrum or tailbone in newborns or in the testicles or ovaries at the start of puberty. They are often called dermoid cysts.
Maxamine listen (MAK-suh-meen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. When used together with interleukin-2, Maxamine may help some immune cells find and kill tumor cells. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called histamine dihydrochloride.
maxillary sinus listen (MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus)
A type of paranasal sinus (a hollow space in the bones around the nose). There are two large maxillary sinuses, one in each of the maxillary bones, which are in the cheek area next to the nose. The maxillary sinuses are lined with cells that make mucus to keep the nose from drying out.
maximum inspiratory pressure test listen (MAK-sih-mum in-SPY-ruh-TOR-ee PREH-sher…)
A test that measures the strength of the muscles used in breathing. A person inhales and exhales through a device called a manometer, and the pressures are recorded by a computer. Also called MIP test.
maximum tolerated dose listen (MAK-sih-mum TAH-leh-RAY-ted …)
The highest dose of a drug or treatment that does not cause unacceptable side effects. The maximum tolerated dose is determined in clinical trials by testing increasing doses on different groups of people until the highest dose with acceptable side effects is found. Also called MTD.
Mayo Clinic regimen listen (MAY-oh KLIH-nik REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer. It is also used with radiation therapy to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs fluorouracil and leucovorin calcium.
maytansinoid DM4-conjugated humanized monoclonal antibody huC242 listen (may-TAN-sih-noyd DM4-KON-juh-GAY-ted HYOO-muh-nized MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is made by linking the monoclonal antibody huC242 to a toxic substance called maytansinoid DM4. The monoclonal antibody binds to the surfaces of cancer cells and the maytansinoid DM4 enters the cells and blocks their growth. It is a type of immunotoxin. Also called huC242-DM4.
MBL
A condition in which a higher-than-normal number of identical B cells are found in the blood. People with MBL may develop other B-cell diseases, such as chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). Also called monoclonal B-cell lymphocytosis.
MC1R
A protein found in skin and eye cells that make melanin (a pigment that gives color to the skin and helps protect it from damage by ultraviolet light). People with certain changes in the gene for MC1R have a higher risk of developing melanoma (skin cancer that begins in melanocytes). Also called melanocortin 1 receptor and melanotropin receptor.
MC5-A scrambler therapy listen (… SKRAM-bler THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment for nerve pain that uses electrodes placed on the skin. Electricity is carried from the electrodes through the skin and blocks the pain. The pain may be caused by physical injury, infection, toxic substances, and certain diseases or drugs, including anticancer drugs.
MDL 101,731
A drug that belongs to a family of drugs called ribonucleotide reductase inhibitors.
MDR modulator CBT-1 listen (… MAH-juh-lay-ter …)
A substance taken from plants that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may help drugs kill tumor cells that have become resistant to drugs. It is a type of multidrug resistance inhibitor and a type of P-glycoprotein antagonist. Also called CBT-1.
MDS
A type of cancer in which the bone marrow does not make enough healthy blood cells (white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets) and there are abnormal cells in the blood and/or bone marrow. When there are fewer healthy blood cells, infection, anemia, or bleeding may occur. Sometimes, MDS becomes acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Also called myelodysplastic syndrome.
MDX-010
A drug used with nivolumab to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has mutations (changes) in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also used with nivolumab in some patients to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma that has not already been treated. MDX-010 is also used alone to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat melanoma in the skin and lymph nodes in patients who have already had surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. MDX-010 binds to a substance called CTLA-4, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). MDX-010 may block CTLA-4 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called ipilimumab and Yervoy.
MDX-060
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of some lymphomas. Monoclonal antibodies are produced in the laboratory and can locate and bind to cancer cells.
mean listen (meen)
A statistics term. The average value in a set of measurements. The mean is the sum of a set of numbers divided by how many numbers are in the set.
mean survival listen (meen ser-VY-vul)
The average length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, that patients diagnosed with the disease are still alive. In a clinical trial, measuring mean survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works.
measles virus listen (MEE-zulz VY-rus)
The virus that causes measles (a highly contagious disease marked by fever, cough, and raised red spots on the skin). The measles virus usually affects children, and is spread by coughing or contact with fluid from the nose or mouth of someone who has been infected.
measurable disease listen (MEH-zur-uh-bul dih-ZEEZ)
A tumor that can be accurately measured in size. This information can be used to judge response to treatment.
mechanistic target of rapamycin listen (meh-kuh-NIS-tik TAR-get … RA-puh-MY-sin)
A protein that helps control several cell functions, including cell division and survival, and binds to rapamycin and other drugs. Mecanic target of rapamycin may be more active in some types of cancer cells than it is in normal cells. Blocking mechanistic target of rapamycin may cause the cancer cells to die. It is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase. Also called mammalian target of rapamycin and mTOR.
mechlorethamine hydrochloride listen (meh-klor-EH-thuh-meen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma, advanced Hodgkin lymphoma, chronic leukemia, mycosis fungoides, and a type of lung cancer called bronchogenic carcinoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mechlorethamine hydrochloride damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Mustargen and mustine.
MEDI-507
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of T-cell lymphoma. It is also being studied in the prevention of organ or tissue rejection after a kidney and/or bone marrow transplant. MEDI-507 binds to a protein called CD2, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. MEDI-507 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called siplizumab.
MEDI-522
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. MEDI-522 binds to a protein on the surface of blood vessels and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It may also prevent the spread of cancer. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent, a type of metastasis inhibitor, and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Abegrin, etaracizumab, and humanized monoclonal antibody MEDI-522.
medial supraclavicular lymph node listen (MEE-dee-ul SOO-pruh-kla-VIH-kyuh-ler...)
A lymph node located above the collar bone and between the center of the body and a line drawn through the nipple to the shoulder.
median listen (MEE-dee-un)
A statistics term. The middle value in a set of measurements.
median overall survival listen (MEE-dee-un oh-ver-AWL ser-VY-vul)
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, that half of the patients in a group of patients diagnosed with the disease are still alive. In a clinical trial, measuring the median overall survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called median survival.
median survival listen (MEE-dee-un ser-VY-vul)
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, that half of the patients in a group of patients diagnosed with the disease are still alive. In a clinical trial, measuring the median survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called median overall survival.
median umbilical ligament listen (MEE-dee-un um-BIH-lih-kul LIH-guh-ment)
A fibrous cord that connects the urinary bladder to the umbilicus (navel). The median umbilical ligament is formed as the allantoic stalk during fetal development and lasts through life. Also called urachus.
mediastinal pleura listen (MEE-dee-uh-STY-nul PLOOR-uh)
The thin membrane that lines the chest cavity in the area between the lungs.
mediastinoscope listen (MEE-dee-uh-STY-noh-skope)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the tissues and lymph nodes in the area between the lungs. These tissues include the heart and its large blood vessels, trachea, esophagus, and bronchi. The mediastinoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may also have a tool to remove tissue. It is inserted into the chest through a cut above the breastbone.
mediastinoscopy listen (MEE-dee-uh-sty-NOS-koh-pee)
A procedure in which a mediastinoscope is used to examine the organs in the area between the lungs and nearby lymph nodes. A mediastinoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. The mediastinoscope is inserted into the chest through an incision above the breastbone. This procedure is usually done to get a tissue sample from the lymph nodes on the right side of the chest.
mediastinum listen (MEE-dee-uh-STY-num)
The area between the lungs. The organs in this area include the heart and its large blood vessels, the trachea, the esophagus, the thymus, and lymph nodes but not the lungs.
Medicaid listen (MEH-dih-kayd)
A health insurance program for people who cannot afford regular medical care. The program is run by U.S. federal, state, and local governments. People who receive Medicaid may have to pay a small amount for the services they get.
medical castration listen (MEH-dih-kul kas-TRAY-shun)
Refers to the use of drugs to suppress the function of the ovaries or testicles.
medical device listen (MEH-dih-kul dee-VISE)
An instrument, tool, machine, test kit, or implant that is used to prevent, diagnose, or treat disease or other conditions. Medical devices range from tongue depressors to heart pacemakers and medical imaging equipment.
medical history listen (MEH-dih-kul HIH-stuh-ree)
A record of information about a person’s health. A personal medical history may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams and tests. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. A family medical history includes health information about a person’s close family members (parents, grandparents, children, brothers, and sisters). This includes their current and past illnesses. A family medical history may show a pattern of certain diseases in a family. Also called health history.
medical nutrition therapy listen (MEH-dih-kul noo-TRIH-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment based on nutrition. It includes checking a person’s nutrition status, and giving the right foods or nutrients to treat conditions such as those caused by diabetes, heart disease, and cancer. It may involve simple changes in a person’s diet, or intravenous or tube feeding. Medical nutrition therapy may help patients recover more quickly and spend less time in the hospital. Also called nutrition therapy.
medical oncologist listen (MEH-dih-kul on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating cancer in adults using chemotherapy, hormonal therapy, biological therapy, and targeted therapy. A medical oncologist often is the main health care provider for someone who has cancer. A medical oncologist also gives supportive care and may coordinate treatment given by other specialists.
Medicare listen (MEH-dih-kayr)
A U.S. federal health insurance program for people aged 65 years or older and people with certain disabilities. Medicare pays for hospital stays, medical services, and some prescription drugs but people who receive Medicare must pay part of their healthcare costs.
Medicare Part D listen (MEH-dih-kayr …)
A type of insurance that helps people with Medicare pay for prescription drugs. People with Medicare Part D have to pay an additional premium and part of their prescription drug costs, including deductibles and copayments. Medicare Part D is offered by private insurance companies approved by Medicare. It is a type of supplemental health insurance. Also called Medicare Prescription Drug Coverage.
Medicare Prescription Drug Coverage listen (MEH-dih-kayr preh-SKRIP-shun … KUH-ver-ij)
A type of insurance that helps people with Medicare pay for prescription drugs. People with Medicare Prescription Drug Coverage have to pay an additional premium and part of their prescription drug costs, including deductibles and copayments. Medicare Prescription Drug Coverage is offered by private insurance companies approved by Medicare. It is a type of supplemental health insurance. Also called Medicare Part D.
medicated urethral system for erection listen (MEH-dih-KAY-ted yoo-REE-thrul SIS-tem … eh-REK-shun)
A method used to treat impotence (inability to have an erection). A suppository, in the form of a very small pellet, is inserted through the tip of the penis into the urethra. The suppository contains the drug alprostadil, which increases the flow of blood to the penis and causes an erection. Also called MUSE.
medication listen (MEH-dih-KAY-shun)
A legal drug that is used to prevent, treat, or relieve symptoms of a disease or abnormal condition.
medicine listen (MEH-dih-sin)
Refers to the practices and procedures used for the prevention, treatment, or relief of symptoms of diseases or abnormal conditions. This term may also refer to a legal drug used for the same purpose.
meditation listen (MEH-dih-TAY-shun)
A mind-body practice in which a person focuses his or her attention on something, such as an object, word, phrase, or breathing, in order to minimize distracting or stressful thoughts or feelings. Meditation may help relax the body and mind and improve overall health and well-being. It may be used to help relieve stress, pain, anxiety, and depression and to help with symptoms related to disease, such as cancer and AIDS. It is a type of complementary and alternative medicine (CAM).
medroxyprogesterone acetate listen (meh-DROK-see-proh-JES-teh-rone A-seh-tayt)
A drug used to prevent endometrial cancer. It is also used to treat menstrual disorders and as a form of birth control. It is a form of the female hormone progesterone and belongs to the family of drugs called progestins.
M-EDTA
A substance being studied in the prevention of bacterial infections that occur in catheters (thin tubes that carry fluids into or out of the body). It is a combination of minocycline, an antibiotic that blocks the growth of bacteria, and EDTA, a substance that keeps blood clots from forming. M-EDTA removes metals that bacteria use to form biofilms (thin layers stuck to surfaces). Also called minocycline-EDTA.
medullary breast carcinoma listen (MED-yoo-LAYR-ee brest KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of breast cancer that often can be treated successfully. It is marked by lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) in and around the tumor that can be seen when viewed under a microscope.
medullary thyroid cancer listen (MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
Cancer that develops in C cells of the thyroid. The C cells make a hormone (calcitonin) that helps maintain a healthy level of calcium in the blood.
medulloblastoma listen (MED-yoo-loh-blas-TOH-muh)
A fast-growing type of cancer that forms in the cerebellum (the lower, back part of the brain). Medulloblastomas tend to spread through the cerebrospinal fluid to the spinal cord or to other parts of the brain. They may also spread to other parts of the body, but this is rare. Medulloblastomas are most common in children and young adults. They are a type of central nervous system embryonal tumor.
mega-voltage linear accelerator listen (MEH-guh-VOLE-tij LIH-nee-er ak-SEH-leh-RAY-ter)
A machine that uses electricity to form a stream of fast-moving subatomic particles. This creates high-energy radiation that may be used to treat cancer. Also called linac, linear accelerator, and MeV linear accelerator.
megestrol acetate listen (meh-JES-trol A-seh-tayt)
A drug used in tablet form to treat advanced breast and endometrial cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of anorexia and cachexia in patients with cancer. Megestrol acetate blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in the body, which may help keep some cancer cells from growing. It may also improve appetite. Megestrol acetate is a type of progestin.
meiosis listen (my-OH-sis)
A special form of cell division in which each daughter cell receives half the amount of DNA as the parent cell. Meiosis occurs during formation of egg and sperm cells in mammals.
MEK inhibitor AZD6244 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. MEK inhibitor AZD6244 blocks proteins needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of protein kinase inhibitor. Also called AZD6244 and selumetinib.
Mekinist listen (MEH-kih-nist)
A drug used with dabrafenib to treat anaplastic thyroid cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also used alone or with dabrafenib to treat certain types of melanoma. Mekinist is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mekinist blocks proteins called MEK1 and MEK2. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Mekinist is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called trametinib dimethyl sulfoxide.
Mektovi listen (mek-TOH-vee)
A drug used with encorafenib to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mektovi blocks proteins called MEK1 and MEK2, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called binimetinib.
Melan-A protein listen (MEH-lun … PROH-teen)
A protein found on normal melanocytes (cells that make the pigment melanin) in the skin and in the retina. It is also found on most melanomas (cancers that begin in melanocytes). Vaccines using pieces of the Melan-A protein are being studied for their ability to boost the immune response to cancer cells in patients with melanoma. Also called MART-1 antigen and Melanoma Antigen Recognized by T cells 1.
melanin listen (MEH-luh-nin)
A pigment that gives color to skin and eyes and helps protect it from damage by ultraviolet light.
melanocortin 1 receptor listen (MEH-luh-noh-KOR-tin 1 reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found in skin and eye cells that make melanin (a pigment that gives color to the skin and helps protect it from damage by ultraviolet light). People with certain changes in the gene for melanocortin 1 receptor have a higher risk of developing melanoma (skin cancer that begins in melanocytes). Also called MC1R and melanotropin receptor.
melanocyte listen (meh-LAN-oh-site)
A cell in the skin and eyes that produces and contains the pigment called melanin.
melanoma listen (MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
A form of cancer that begins in melanocytes (cells that make the pigment melanin). It may begin in a mole (skin melanoma), but can also begin in other pigmented tissues, such as in the eye or in the intestines.
Melanoma Antigen Recognized by T cells 1 listen (MEH-luh-NOH-muh AN-tih-jen REH-kug-NIZED …)
A protein found on normal melanocytes (cells that make the pigment melanin) in the skin and in the retina. It is also found on most melanomas (cancers that begin in melanocytes). Vaccines using pieces of the Melanoma Antigen Recognized by T cells 1 are being studied for their ability to boost the immune response to cancer cells in patients with melanoma. Also called MART-1 antigen and Melan-A protein.
melanoma in situ listen (MEH-luh-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal melanocytes (cells that make melanin, the pigment that gives skin its natural color) are found in the epidermis (outer layer of the skin). These abnormal melanocytes may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called stage 0 melanoma.
melanoma vaccine listen (MEH-luh-NOH-muh vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine prepared from human melanoma cancer cells. It can be used alone or with other therapy in treating melanoma.
melanotropin receptor listen (MEH-luh-noh-TROH-pin reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found in skin and eye cells that make melanin (a pigment that gives color to the skin and helps protect it from damage by ultraviolet light). People with certain changes in the gene for melanotropin receptor have a higher risk of developing melanoma (skin cancer that begins in melanocytes). Also called MC1R and melanocortin 1 receptor.
melatonin listen (MEH-luh-TOH-nin)
A hormone made by the pineal gland (tiny organ near the center of the brain). Melatonin helps control the body’s sleep cycle, and is an antioxidant. It is also made in the laboratory and sold as a supplement.
melphalan listen (MEL-fuh-lan)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is also used to treat ovarian epithelial cancer that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Melphalan may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Alkeran.
melphalan hydrochloride listen (MEL-fuh-lan HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma in patients who cannot take melphalan by mouth. It is also used to help prepare patients for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Melphalan hydrochloride may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Evomela.
memantine hydrochloride listen (MEH-mun-teen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat dementia caused by Alzheimer disease. It is also being studied in the treatment of side effects from whole-brain radiation therapy for cancer and other conditions. Memantine hydrochloride blocks the uptake of calcium by certain brain cells and decreases their activity. It is a type of N-methyl-D-asparatate (NMDA) receptor antagonist. Also called Namenda.
membrane listen (MEM-brayn)
A very thin layer of tissue that covers a surface.
MEN syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
An inherited condition that may result in the development of cancers of the endocrine system. There are several types of MEN syndrome, and patients with each type may develop different types of cancer. The altered genes that cause each type can be detected with a blood test. Also called multiple endocrine neoplasia syndrome.
MEN1 syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the parathyroid and pituitary glands and the pancreas. These tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They cause the glands to secrete high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems, such as kidney stones, fertility problems, and severe ulcers. In some cases, tumors inside the pancreas can become malignant (cancer). Also called multiple endocrine adenomatosis, multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 syndrome, and Wermer syndrome.
MEN-10755
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antitumor antibiotics.
MEN2
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the thyroid gland, parathyroid glands, and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. MEN2 is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET, and is divided into three subtypes (MEN2A, MEN2B, and FMTC). People with all subtypes of MEN2 have an increased risk of medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. Also called MEN2 syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome.
MEN2 syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the thyroid gland, parathyroid glands, and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. MEN2 syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET, and is divided into three subtypes (MEN2A, MEN2B, and FMTC). People with all subtypes of MEN2 syndrome have an increased risk of medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. Also called MEN2, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome.
MEN2A
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the parathyroid glands and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. An itchy skin condition may also occur. MEN2A is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2A syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A, multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome, and Sipple syndrome.
MEN2A syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the parathyroid glands and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. An itchy skin condition may also occur. MEN2A syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2A, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A, multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome, and Sipple syndrome.
MEN2B
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the adrenal glands and growths around the nerves in the lips, tongue, lining of the mouth, and eyelids. Gastrointestinal symptoms and trouble with the spine or bones in the feet and thighs may also occur. MEN2B is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2B syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2B, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2B syndrome.
MEN2B syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the adrenal glands and growths around the nerves in the lips, tongue, lining of the mouth, and eyelids. Gastrointestinal symptoms and trouble with the spine or bones in the feet and thighs may also occur. MEN2B syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2B, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2B, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2B syndrome.
Ménétrier disease listen (MAY-nay-tree-AY dih-ZEEZ)
A condition marked by inflammation and ulcers (breaks on the skin or on the surface of an organ) of the mucosa (inner lining) of the stomach and by overgrowth of the cells that make up the mucosa. Symptoms include vomiting, diarrhea, and weight loss. Patients with Ménétrier disease may be at a higher risk of stomach cancer. Also called gastric mucosal hypertrophy and giant hypertrophic gastritis.
meningeal listen (meh-NIN-jee-ul)
Having to do with the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord).
meningeal carcinomatosis listen (meh-NIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal metastasis, and neoplastic meningitis.
meningeal leukemia listen (meh-NIN-jee-ul loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A serious problem that may occur in leukemia. In meningeal leukemia, cancer cells have spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called leukemic leptomeningitis and leukemic meningitis.
meningeal metastasis listen (meh-NIN-jee-ul meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal carcinomatosis, and neoplastic meningitis.
meningeal syndrome listen (meh-NIN-jee-ul SIN-drome)
A condition marked by headache, fever, and a stiff neck, which is caused when the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord) become irritated. Meningeal syndrome may be caused by blood, cancer cells, or substances from the breakdown of cancer cells that get into the cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). It may also be caused by infection with a bacterium, virus, or fungus.
meninges listen (meh-NIN-jeez)
The three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord.
meningioma listen (meh-NIN-jee-OH-muh)
A type of slow-growing tumor that forms in the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). Meningiomas usually occur in adults.
meningitis listen (MEH-nin-JY-tis)
Inflammation of the meninges (three thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). Meningitis is usually caused by a bacterial or viral infection, but sometimes is caused by cancer, drug allergies, or inflammatory diseases.
menopausal hormone therapy listen (MEH-nuh-PAW-zul HOR-mone THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with the hormones estrogen and progesterone or with estrogen alone to help relieve symptoms of menopause. Symptoms may include hot flashes, night sweats, vaginal dryness, sleep problems, mood swings, and thinning of the bones. Menopausal hormone therapy is given to replace the natural hormones that are no longer made by the body. It is given to women who have gone through menopause or who have early menopause caused by cancer treatment or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. Also called MHT.
menopause listen (MEH-nuh-pawz)
The time of life when a woman’s ovaries stop producing hormones and menstrual periods stop. Natural menopause usually occurs around age 50. A woman is said to be in menopause when she hasn’t had a period for 12 months in a row. Symptoms of menopause include hot flashes, mood swings, night sweats, vaginal dryness, trouble concentrating, and infertility.
menorrhagia listen (MEH-nuh-RAH-juh)
Abnormally heavy menstrual bleeding.
menstrual cycle listen (MEN-stroo-ul SY-kul)
The monthly cycle of hormonal changes from the beginning of one menstrual period to the beginning of the next.
menstrual period listen (MEN-stroo-ul PEER-ee-ud)
The periodic discharge of blood and tissue from the uterus. From puberty until menopause, menstruation occurs about every 28 days, but does not occur during pregnancy.
menstruation listen (MEN-stroo-WAY-shun)
Periodic discharge of blood and tissue from the uterus. From puberty until menopause, menstruation occurs about every 28 days when a woman is not pregnant.
mental health listen (MEN-tul helth)
A person’s overall psychological and emotional condition. Good mental health is a state of well-being in which a person is able to cope with everyday events, think clearly, be responsible, meet challenges, and have good relationships with others.
mental health counselor listen (MEN-tul helth KOWN-seh-ler)
A specialist who talks to patients and their families about emotional and personal matters, and can help them make decisions. Also called counselor.
menthol listen (MEN-thol)
A substance that comes from mint oils or is made in the laboratory. It is used to relieve itching and to treat problems in the upper respiratory tract. Menthol causes a cooling sensation when eaten or put on the skin and it acts as a mild pain killer. It is found in nasal sprays, cough drops, inhalers, creams, and lotions. It is also used as a flavor in many food and oral hygiene products.
MEPACT
A drug being studied in the treatment of young adults with bone cancer that has gotten worse or come back. MEPACT activates certain types of white blood cells and helps the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of immunostimulant. Also called L-MTP-PE, mifamurtide, and muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine.
meperidine hydrochloride listen (meh-PAYR-ih-deen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Meperidine hydrochloride is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid. Also called Demerol.
mercaptopurine listen (mer-KAP-toh-PYOOR-een)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mercaptopurine stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Purinethol and Purixan.
mercury listen (MER-kyoo-ree)
A silver-white, poisonous metal that is a liquid at ordinary temperatures. It is commonly used in thermometers and amalgams, and has been used as an ingredient in some homeopathic medicines and in very small amounts as a preservative in viral vaccines.
mercy killing listen (MER-see KIH-ling)
An easy or painless death, or the intentional ending of the life of a person suffering from an incurable or painful disease at his or her request. Also called euthanasia.
meridian listen (meh-RIH-dee-un)
In traditional Chinese medicine, one of 20 channels that form a network through which qi (the body's vital energy) flows and that connect the body’s acupuncture sites.
Merkel cell listen (MER-kul sel)
A special type of cell found right below the epidermis (top layer of skin). These cells are very close to the nerve endings that receive the sensation of touch and may be involved in touch. The cells also contain substances that may act as hormones.
Merkel cell cancer listen (MER-kul sel KAN-ser)
A rare type of cancer that forms on or just beneath the skin, usually in parts of the body that have been exposed to the sun. It is most common in older people and in people with weakened immune systems. Also called Merkel cell carcinoma, neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin, and trabecular cancer.
Merkel cell carcinoma listen (MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms on or just beneath the skin, usually in parts of the body that have been exposed to the sun. It is most common in older people and in people with weakened immune systems. Also called Merkel cell cancer, neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin, and trabecular cancer.
mesenchymal listen (meh-ZEN-kih-mul)
Refers to cells that develop into connective tissue, blood vessels, and lymphatic tissue.
mesenteric membrane listen (MEH-zen-TAYR-ik MEM-brayn)
The peritoneal membrane that attaches the intestines to the abdominal wall near the back.
mesna listen (MEZ-nuh)
A drug used to prevent hemorrhagic cystitis (bleeding in the bladder) caused by the anticancer drug ifosfamide. Mesna helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of chemoprotective agent. Also called Mesnex.
Mesnex listen (MES-nex)
A drug used to prevent hemorrhagic cystitis (bleeding in the bladder) caused by the anticancer drug ifosfamide. Mesnex helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of chemoprotective agent. Also called mesna.
mesonephroma listen (MEH-zoh-neh-FROH-muh)
A rare type of tumor, usually of the female genital tract, in which the insides of the cells look clear when viewed under a microscope. Also called clear cell adenocarcinoma and clear cell carcinoma.
mesothelin listen (MEH-zoh-THEE-lin)
A protein found on the surface of certain types of normal cells and cancer cells. Mesothelin may help these cells stick together and send signals. A higher-than-normal amount of mesothelin is found on some cancer cells, including mesothelioma, pancreatic cancer, and ovarian cancer.
mesothelioma listen (MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) tumor affecting the lining of the chest or abdomen. Exposure to asbestos particles in the air increases the risk of developing malignant mesothelioma.
messenger RNA listen (MEH-sen-jer …)
A type of RNA found in cells. Messenger RNA molecules carry the genetic information needed to make proteins. They carry the information from the DNA in the nucleus of the cell to the cytoplasm where the proteins are made. Also called mRNA.
MET gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called MET, which is involved in sending signals within cells and in cell growth and survival. Mutated (changed) forms of the MET gene may cause abnormal cells to grow and spread in the body. Mutations in the MET gene have been found in an inherited condition called hereditary papillary renal carcinoma. Patients with this syndrome have an increased risk of a type of kidney cancer called papillary renal carcinoma. MET gene mutations have also been found in liver cancer and head and neck cancer. The MET gene is a type of proto-oncogene and a type of receptor tyrosine kinase gene.
MET/VEGFR-2 inhibitor GSK1363089 listen (…. in-HIH-bih-ter ….)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. MET/VEGFR-2 inhibitor GSK1363089 blocks enzymes involved in the growth and spread of tumor cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called foretinib and XL880.
meta-analysis listen (meh-tuh-uh-NA-lih-sis)
A process that analyzes data from different studies done about the same subject. The results of a meta-analysis are usually stronger than the results of any study by itself.
metabolic listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik)
Having to do with metabolism (the total of all chemical changes that take place in a cell or an organism to produce energy and basic materials needed for important life processes).
metabolic acidosis listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik A-sih-DOH-sis)
A condition in which the blood is too acidic. It may be caused by severe illness or sepsis (bacteria in the bloodstream).
metabolic disorder listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik dis-OR-der)
A condition in which normal metabolic processes are disrupted, usually because of a missing enzyme.
metabolic syndrome listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik SIN-drome)
A condition marked by extra fat around the abdomen, high levels of blood glucose (sugar) when not eating, high levels of triglycerides (a type of fat) in the blood, low levels of high-density lipoproteins (a type of protein that carries fats) in the blood, and high blood pressure. People with metabolic syndrome are at increased risk of diabetes mellitus and diseases of the heart and blood vessels. Also called metabolic syndrome X.
metabolic syndrome X listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik SIN-drome ...)
A condition marked by extra fat around the abdomen, high levels of blood glucose (sugar) when not eating, high levels of triglycerides (a type of fat) in the blood, low levels of high-density lipoproteins (a type of protein that carries fats) in the blood, and high blood pressure. People with metabolic syndrome X are at increased risk of diabetes mellitus and diseases of the heart and blood vessels. Also called metabolic syndrome.
metabolic therapy listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment to correct changes in metabolism that can be caused by disease.
metabolic type listen (MEH-tuh-BAH-lik tipe)
In alternative medicine, a theory that people fall into one of three groups (protein, carbohydrate, or mixed type) based on the main type of food that their bodies need to stay healthy.
metabolism listen (meh-TA-buh-lih-zum)
The chemical changes that take place in a cell or an organism. These changes make energy and the materials cells and organisms need to grow, reproduce, and stay healthy. Metabolism also helps get rid of toxic substances.
metabolite listen (meh-TA-boh-lite)
A substance made or used when the body breaks down food, drugs or chemicals, or its own tissue (for example, fat or muscle tissue). This process, called metabolism, makes energy and the materials needed for growth, reproduction, and maintaining health. It also helps get rid of toxic substances.
metabolomics listen (meh-TA-buh-LOH-mix)
The study of substances called metabolites in cells and tissues. Metabolites are small molecules that are made when the body breaks down food, drugs, chemicals, or its own tissue. They can be measured in blood, urine, and other body fluids. Disease and environmental factors, such as diet, drugs, and chemicals, can affect how metabolites are made and used in the body. Metabolomics may help find new ways to diagnose and treat diseases, such as cancer.
metaiodobenzylguanidine scan listen (meh-tuh-I-oh-doh-BEN-zul-GWAH-nih-deen skan)
A procedure used to find neuroendocrine tumors, such as neuroblastomas and pheochromocytomas. A small amount of a substance called radioactive metaiodobenzylguanidine is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. Neuroendocrine tumor cells take up the radioactive metaiodobenzylguanidine and are detected by a scanner. Also called iobenguane scan and MIBG scan.
metallic listen (meh-TA-lik)
Having to do with metal. Some cancer treatments may change the sense of taste and cause foods to have a metallic taste.
metallic endoprosthesis listen (meh-TA-lik EN-doh-pros-THEE-sis)
A device made of metal that is placed inside the body to replace a body part removed by surgery. An example is a thigh bone replaced during surgery for cancer.
metaplasia listen (meh-tuh-PLAY-zhuh)
A change of cells to a form that does not normally occur in the tissue in which it is found.
metaplastic carcinoma listen (meh-tuh-PLAS-tik KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A general term used to describe cancer that begins in cells that have changed into another cell type (for example, a squamous cell of the esophagus changing to resemble a cell of the stomach). In some cases, metaplastic changes alone may mean there is an increased chance of cancer developing at the site.
metastasectomy listen (meh-TAS-tuh-SEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or more metastases (tumors formed from cells that have spread from the primary tumor). When all metastases are removed, it is called a complete metastasectomy.
metastasis listen (meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
The spread of cancer cells from the place where they first formed to another part of the body. In metastasis, cancer cells break away from the original (primary) tumor, travel through the blood or lymph system, and form a new tumor in other organs or tissues of the body. The new, metastatic tumor is the same type of cancer as the primary tumor. For example, if breast cancer spreads to the lung, the cancer cells in the lung are breast cancer cells, not lung cancer cells. The plural form of metastasis is metastases (meh-TAS-tuh-SEEZ).
metastasize listen (meh-TAS-tuh-size)
To spread from one part of the body to another. When cancer cells metastasize and form secondary tumors, the cells in the metastatic tumor are like those in the original (primary) tumor.
metastatic listen (meh-tuh-STA-tik)
Having to do with metastasis, which is the spread of cancer from the primary site (place where it started) to other places in the body.
metasynchronous listen (meh-tuh-SING-kruh-nus)
Occurring at nearly the same time.
meteorism listen (MEE-tee-oh-rih-zum)
Swelling of the abdomen caused by gas in the intestines or peritoneal cavity. Also called tympanites.
metformin hydrochloride listen (met-FOR-min HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat diabetes mellitus (a condition in which the body cannot control the level of sugar in the blood ). It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It decreases the amount of glucose (a type of sugar) released into the bloodstream from the liver and increases the body’s use of the glucose. Metformin hydrochloride is a type of antidiabetic agent. Also called Glucophage.
methadone hydrochloride listen (MEH-thuh-DONE HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain that does not respond to other types of pain medicine. It is also used to help people who are addicted to opioid drugs such as heroin. Methadone hydrochloride binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. It is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid.
methanol listen (MEH-thuh-nol)
A type of alcohol used to make antifreeze, pesticides, windshield wiper fluid, paint thinner, certain types of fuel, and other substances. Methanol catches fire easily and is very poisonous. It is one of many harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke. Also called methyl alcohol and wood alcohol.
methemoglobin listen (met-HEE-moh-GLOH-bin)
A form of hemoglobin found in the blood in small amounts. Unlike normal hemoglobin, methemoglobin cannot carry oxygen. Injury or certain drugs, chemicals, or foods may cause a higher-than-normal amount of methemoglobin to be made. This causes a condition called methemoglobinemia.
methemoglobinemia listen (MET-hee-moh-GLOH-bih-NEE-mee-uh)
A condition in which a higher-than-normal amount of methemoglobin is found in the blood. Methemoglobin is a form of hemoglobin that cannot carry oxygen. In methemoglobinemia, tissues cannot get enough oxygen. Symptoms may include headache, dizziness, fatigue, shortness of breath, nausea, vomiting, rapid heartbeat, loss of muscle coordination, and blue-colored skin. Methemoglobinemia can be caused by injury or being exposed to certain drugs, chemicals, or foods. It can also be an inherited condition.
methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus listen (MEH-thih-SIH-lin-reh-ZIH-stunt STA-fuh-loh-KAH-kus AW-ree-us)
A type of bacteria that causes an infection that does not respond to common antibiotics, including methicillin, amoxicillin, and penicillin. Most methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus infections occur on the skin and are mild. However, they can also be serious or life threatening and difficult to treat. Methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus infections usually occur in people with weakened immune systems who are in hospitals, nursing homes, or other healthcare centers. They can also occur in healthy people who have skin-to-skin contact with others, such as childcare workers, team athletes, and people who live in crowded conditions. Also called MRSA.
methodology listen (MEH-thuh-DAH-loh-jee)
In medicine, the rules and procedures for doing research and evaluating results.
methotrexate listen (meh-thuh-TREK-sayt)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and severe psoriasis (a type of skin condition). Methotrexate stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. Methotrexate is a type of antimetabolite and a type of antifolate. Also called amethopterin, MTX, Rheumatrex, and Trexall.
methoxsalen listen (meh-THOK-suh-len)
A drug used together with UV light to treat psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of graft-versus-host disease. It belongs to the family of drugs called psoralens and furocoumarins.
methoxyamine hydrochloride listen (meh-THOK-see-uh-meen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks the ability of a cell to repair damage to its DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also help some anticancer drugs work better. It is a type of antineoplastic agent.
methoxypolyethylene glycol epoetin beta listen (meh-THOK-see-PAH-lee-EH-thih-leen GLY-kol ee-POH-eh-tin BAY-tuh)
A substance being studied in the treatment of anemia in patients who are receiving chemotherapy. It is a form of erythropoietin (a substance produced in the kidneys that stimulates the production of red blood cells) that has been changed in the laboratory. Also called Ro 50-3821.
methyl alcohol listen (MEH-thul AL-kuh-hol)
A type of alcohol used to make antifreeze, pesticides, windshield wiper fluid, paint thinner, certain types of fuel, and other substances. Methyl alcohol catches fire easily and is very poisonous. It is one of many harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke. Also called methanol and wood alcohol.
methyl group listen (MEH-thul groop)
A small molecule made of one carbon and three hydrogen atoms. Methyl groups are added or removed from proteins or nucleic acids and may change the way these molecules act in the body.
methyl-5-aminolevulinate listen (MEH-thul-5-uh-MEE-noh-LEH-vyoo-LIH-nayt)
A drug used in photodynamic therapy; it is absorbed by tumor cells and, when exposed to light, becomes active and kills the cancer cells.
methylation listen (MEH-thuh-LAY-shun)
A chemical reaction in which a small molecule called a methyl group is added to other molecules. Methylation of proteins or nucleic acids may affect how they act in the body.
methylnaltrexone bromide listen (MEH-thul-nal-TREK-sone BROH-mide)
A drug used to relieve constipation caused by treatment with opioids (pain killers similar to morphine). It is used in patients with pain caused by cancer or treatment for cancer or by other advanced disease. Methylnaltrexone bromide binds to opioid receptors outside the brain and may block the side effects of opioid drugs without affecting their ability to relieve pain. Methylnaltrexone bromide is a type of peripheral opioid receptor antagonist. Also called Relistor.
methylphenidate hydrochloride listen (MEH-thul-feh-NIH-dayt HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat certain behavior disorders, such as attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). It is also being studied as a way to improve brain function in patients treated with anticancer drugs. Methylphenidate hydrochloride acts on certain parts of the brain. It is a type of central nervous system stimulant. Also called Concerta and Ritalin.
methylprednisolone listen (MEH-thul-pred-NIH-suh-lone)
A corticosteroid hormone replacement.
metoclopramide listen (meh-toh-KLOH-pruh-mide)
A drug that increases the motility (movements and contractions) of the stomach and upper intestine. It is used to treat certain stomach problems and nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of motility agent. Also called Reglan.
metronidazole listen (MEH-troh-NY-duh-zole)
A drug that is used to treat infection and is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of antibacterial, antiprotozoal, and anthelmintic. Also called Flagyl.
metronomic chemotherapy listen (MEH-truh-NAH-mik KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which low doses of anticancer drugs are given on a continuous or frequent, regular schedule (such as daily or weekly), usually over a long time. Metronomic chemotherapy causes less severe side effects than standard chemotherapy. Giving low doses of chemotherapy may stop the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Also called low-dose chemotherapy.
MeV linear accelerator listen (... LIH-nee-er ak-SEH-leh-RAY-ter)
A machine that uses electricity to form a stream of fast-moving subatomic particles. This creates high-energy radiation that may be used to treat cancer. Also called linac, linear accelerator, and mega-voltage linear accelerator.
Mevacor listen (MEH-vuh-kor)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Mevacor is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor (statin). Also called lovastatin.
mevalonate pathway listen (meh-VA-loh-nayt PATH-way)
Describes a series of reactions in which proteins work together to make molecules. These molecules are part of many processes, including making cholesterol. Changes in this pathway may lead to cancer cell growth. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are used to treat high cholesterol, and are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer and other diseases.
Mexican valerian listen (MEK-sih-kun vuh-LEER-ee-un)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Indian valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
MG98
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks the production of a protein called DNA methyltransferase, which helps control gene expression. This may kill cancer cells that need DNA methyltransferase to grow. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide.
MGCD0103
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor. Also called mocetinostat.
MGUS
A benign condition in which there is a higher-than-normal level of a protein called M protein in the blood. Patients with MGUS are at an increased risk of developing cancer. Also called monoclonal gammopathy of undetermined significance.
MHT
Treatment with the hormones estrogen and progesterone or with estrogen alone to help relieve symptoms of menopause. Symptoms may include hot flashes, night sweats, vaginal dryness, sleep problems, mood swings, and thinning of the bones. MHT is given to replace the natural hormones that are no longer made by the body. It is given to women who have gone through menopause or who have early menopause caused by cancer treatment or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. Also called menopausal hormone therapy.
MIBG scan listen (... skan)
A procedure used to find neuroendocrine tumors, such as neuroblastomas and pheochromocytomas. A small amount of a substance called radioactive MIBG is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. Neuroendocrine tumor cells take up the radioactive MIBG and are detected by a scanner. Also called iobenguane scan and metaiodobenzylguanidine scan.
micelle listen (MY-sel)
A tiny particle made of substances that are soluble in water and that come together to form a ball-like shape. These particles can carry other substances inside them. In medicine, micelles are made in the laboratory and are used to carry drugs to body tissues and cells.
microarray listen (MY-kroh-uh-RAY)
A laboratory tool used to analyze large numbers of genes or proteins at one time. In a microarray, biologic molecules such as DNA, RNA, or protein are placed in a pattern onto a surface such as a glass slide. Other substances are added to these slides to detect specific patterns of molecules. Microarrays are being used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer, and to develop treatments for them.
microbicide listen (my-KROH-bih-side)
Any substance or process that kills germs (bacteria, viruses, and other microorganisms that can cause infection and disease). Also called germicide.
microbiome listen (MY-kroh-BY-ome)
The collection of all the microorganisms and viruses that live in a given environment, including the human body or part of the body, such as the digestive system. The human microbiome may play a role in a person’s health. Studying the human microbiome may help prevent and treat disease in the future.
microcalcification listen (MY-kroh-KAL-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
A tiny deposit of calcium in the breast that cannot be felt but can be detected on a mammogram. A cluster of these very small specks of calcium may indicate that cancer is present.
microenvironment listen (MY-kroh-en-VY-run-ment)
In biology, the cells, molecules, and structures (such as blood vessels) that surround and support other cells and tissues. Abnormal cells, such as cancer cells, can change their microenvironment. Changes in the microenvironment can affect how cancer cells grow and spread. Studying the microenvironment may help researchers understand how cancer cells form and find new ways to treat cancer.
microflora listen (MY-kroh-FLOR-uh)
Bacteria and other organisms that live inside the intestines. They help digest food. Vitamins such as biotin and vitamin K are made by microflora. Also called gut flora, gut microflora, intestinal flora, and intestinal microflora.
microfluidic device listen (MY-kroh-floo-IH-dik dee-VISE)
An instrument that uses very small amounts of fluid on a microchip to do certain laboratory tests. A microfluidic device may use body fluids or solutions containing cells or cell parts to diagnose diseases. Also called lab-on-a-chip.
microgram listen (MY-kroh-gram)
One millionth of a gram.
microliter listen (MY-kroh-LEE-ter)
A measure of volume for a liquid, using the metric system. One microliter is equal to a millionth of a liter. Also called µL.
micrometastasis listen (MY-kroh-meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
Small numbers of cancer cells that have spread from the primary tumor to other parts of the body and are too few to be picked up in a screening or diagnostic test.
micromolar listen (MY-kroh-MOH-ler)
A concentration of 1/1,000,000 (one millionth) molecular weight per liter (mol/L).
micromole listen (MY-kroh-mole)
The amount of a substance equal to a millionth of a mole (a measure of the amount of a substance). Also called µM.
micronutrient listen (MY-kroh-NOO-tree-ent)
A substance the body needs in tiny amounts to grow and stay healthy. Examples are vitamins and minerals.
microorganism listen (MY-kroh-OR-guh-NIH-zum)
An organism that can be seen only through a microscope. Microorganisms include bacteria, protozoa, algae, and fungi. Although viruses are not considered living organisms, they are sometimes classified as microorganisms.
microRNA listen (MY-kroh …)
A type of RNA found in cells and in blood. MicroRNAs are smaller than many other types of RNA and can bind to messenger RNAs (mRNAs) to block them from making proteins. MicroRNAs are being studied in the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. Also called miRNA.
microsatellite listen (MY-kroh-SA-teh-lite)
A short sequence of DNA, usually 1 to 4 basepairs (a unit of DNA), that is repeated together in a row along the DNA molecule. There is variation from person to person in the number of repeats. There are hundreds of places in human DNA that contain microsatellites.
microsatellite instability listen (MY-kroh-SA-teh-lite in-stuh-BIH-lih-tee)
A change that occurs in the DNA of certain cells (such as tumor cells) in which the number of repeats of microsatellites (short, repeated sequences of DNA) is different than the number of repeats that was in the DNA when it was inherited. The cause of microsatellite instability may be a defect in the ability to repair mistakes made when DNA is copied in the cell. Also called MSI.
microsatellite instability-high cancer listen (MY-kroh-SA-teh-lite in-stuh-BIH-lih-tee-hy KAN-ser)
Describes cancer cells that have a greater than normal number of genetic markers called microsatellites. Microsatellites are short, repeated, sequences of DNA. Cancer cells that have large numbers of microsatellites may have defects in the ability to correct mistakes that occur when DNA is copied in the cell. Microsatellite instability is found most often in colorectal cancer, other types of gastrointestinal cancer, and endometrial cancer. It may also be found in cancers of the breast, prostate, bladder, and thyroid. Knowing whether cancer is microsatellite instability high may help plan the best treatment. Also called MSI-H cancer.
microsatellite tumor listen (MY-kroh-SA-teh-lite TOO-mer)
A small group of tumor cells in an area beside or below, but separate from, the primary (original) melanoma. Microsatellite tumors can only be seen with a microscope. Having a microsatellite tumor is a sign that the melanoma has spread from where it first formed.
microscope listen (MY-kroh-SKOPE)
An instrument that is used to look at cells and other small objects that cannot be seen with the eye alone.
microscopic listen (MY-kroh-SKAH-pik)
Too small to be seen without a microscope.
microsphere listen (MY-kroh-sfeer)
A very tiny, hollow, round particle made from glass, ceramic, plastic, or other materials. Microspheres injected into blood vessels that feed a tumor may kill the tumor by blocking its blood supply. They can also be filled with a substance that may help kill more tumor cells.
microstaging listen (MY-kroh-STAY-jing)
A technique used to help determine the stage (extent) of melanoma and certain squamous cell cancers. A sample of skin that contains tumor tissue is examined under a microscope to find out how thick the tumor is and/or how deeply the tumor has grown into the skin or connective tissues.
microtubule listen (MY-kroh-TOO-byool)
A narrow, hollow tube-like structure found in the cytoplasm (the fluid inside a cell) of plant and animal cells. Microtubules help support the shape of a cell. They also help chromosomes move during cell division and help small structures called cell organelles to move inside the cell. Certain anticancer drugs keep microtubules from working the way they should. This may help keep cancer cells from dividing.
microwave acupuncture listen (MY-kroh-WAYV AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
A type of acupuncture in which a microwave device is attached to an acupuncture needle to give microwave radiation at an acupuncture point.
microwave therapy listen (MY-kroh-WAYV THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment in which body tissue is exposed to high temperatures to damage and kill cancer cells or to make cancer cells more sensitive to the effects of radiation and certain anticancer drugs. Also called microwave thermotherapy.
microwave thermotherapy listen (MY-kroh-WAYV THER-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment in which body tissue is exposed to high temperatures to damage and kill cancer cells or to make cancer cells more sensitive to the effects of radiation and certain anticancer drugs. Also called microwave therapy.
midazolam hydrochloride listen (mih-DAY-zoh-lam HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat anxiety and tension and to relax muscles. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called Versed.
midostaurin listen (MY-doh-STAW-rin)
A drug used with cytarabine and daunorubicin to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also used to treat mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia) and systemic mastocytosis (a rare condition in which there are too many mast cells in the body). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Midostaurin blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Midostaurin is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called N-benzoyl-staurosporine, PKC412, and Rydapt.
mifamurtide listen (mih-FAM-yoor-tide)
A drug being studied in the treatment of young adults with bone cancer that has gotten worse or come back. Mifamurtide activates certain types of white blood cells and helps the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of immunostimulant. Also called L-MTP-PE, MEPACT, and muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine.
Mifeprex listen (MIH-feh-PREX)
A drug used to end early pregnancies. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Mifeprex blocks the action of progesterone, a hormone that helps some cancers grow. It is a type of antiprogesterone. Also called mifepristone and RU 486.
mifepristone listen (MIH-feh-PRIS-tone)
A drug used to end early pregnancies. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Mifepristone blocks the action of progesterone, a hormone that helps some cancers grow. It is a type of antiprogesterone. Also called Mifeprex and RU 486.
milatuzumab listen (MIH-luh-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma and several other types of cancer. It binds to CD74, a protein on the surface of myeloma cells and certain other types of cells. It may help kill cancer cells. Milatuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called hLL1 and IMMU-110.
milk duct listen (... dukt)
A thin tube in the breast that carries milk from the breast lobules to the nipple. Also called breast duct.
milk thistle listen (milk THIH-sul)
A plant that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including stomach, liver, and gallbladder disorders. The active extract of milk thistle seeds is called silymarin. It is being studied in the prevention of liver damage caused by some cancer treatments. Also called Silybum marianum.
milligram listen (MIH-lih-gram)
A measure of weight. A milligram is approximately 450,000 times smaller than a pound and 28,000 times smaller than an ounce.
milliliter listen (MIH-luh-LEE-ter)
A measure of volume in the metric system. One thousand milliliters equal one liter. Also called cc, cubic centimeter, and mL.
millimeter listen (MIH-luh-MEE-ter)
A measure of length in the metric system. A millimeter is one thousandth of a meter. There are 25 millimeters in an inch.
millimole listen (MIH-lih-mole)
The amount of a substance equal to a thousandth of a mole (a measure of the amount of a substance). Also called mmol.
mind-body exercise listen (mind-BAH-dee EK-ser-SIZE)
A form of exercise that combines body movement, mental focus, and controlled breathing to improve strength, balance, flexibility, and overall health. Examples of mind-body exercises are yoga, tai chi, and qigong.
mind-body modality listen (mind-BAH-dee moh-DA-lih-tee)
A health practice that combines mental focus, controlled breathing, and body movements to help relax the body and mind. It may be used to help control pain, stress, anxiety, and depression, and for overall health. Examples of mind-body modalities include meditation, hypnosis, guided imagery, yoga, and tai chi. A mind-body modality is a type of complementary and alternative medicine. Also called mind-body practice.
mind-body practice listen (mind-BAH-dee PRAK-tis)
A health practice that combines mental focus, controlled breathing, and body movements to help relax the body and mind. It may be used to help control pain, stress, anxiety, and depression, and for overall health. Examples of mind-body practices include meditation, hypnosis, guided imagery, yoga, and tai chi. A mind-body practice is a type of complementary and alternative medicine. Also called mind-body modality.
mindfulness relaxation listen (... ree-lak-SAY-shun)
A type of meditation based on the concept of being “mindful,” or having increased awareness, of the present. It uses breathing methods, guided imagery, and other practices to relax the body and mind and help reduce stress.
mineral listen (MIH-neh-rul)
In medicine, a mineral is a nutrient that is needed in small amounts to keep the body healthy. Mineral nutrients include the elements calcium, magnesium, and iron.
mineral oil listen (MIH-neh-rul oyl)
A type of oil that is made from petroleum (mixture of oily liquids found in the earth). Mineral oil is used in laxatives, lubricants, creams, and lotions.
minimal sedation listen (MIH-nih-mul seh-DAY-shun)
A level of sedation in which a person is very relaxed and may be awake. The person is able to answer questions and follow instructions. Minimal sedation is caused by special drugs and is used to help relieve anxiety during certain medical or surgical procedures. Also called anxiolysis.
minimally invasive surgery listen (MIH-nih-muh-lee in-VAY-siv SER-juh-ree)
Surgery that is done using small incisions (cuts) and few stitches. During minimally invasive surgery, one or more small incisions may be made in the body. A laparoscope (thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing) is inserted through one opening to guide the surgery. Tiny surgical instruments are inserted through other openings to do the surgery. Minimally invasive surgery may cause less pain, scarring, and damage to healthy tissue, and the patient may have a faster recovery than with traditional surgery.
minocycline-EDTA listen (mih-noh-SY-kleen ...)
A substance being studied in the prevention of bacterial infections that occur in catheters (thin tubes that carry fluids into or out of the body). It is a combination of minocycline, an antibiotic that blocks the growth of bacteria, and EDTA, a substance that keeps blood clots from forming. Minocycline-EDTA removes metals that bacteria use to form biofilms (thin layers stuck to surfaces). Also called M-EDTA.
MIP test listen (… test)
A test that measures the strength of the muscles used in breathing. A person inhales and exhales through a device called a manometer, and the pressures are recorded by a computer. Also called maximum inspiratory pressure test.
Miraluma test listen (meer-uh-LOO-muh ...)
A type of breast imaging test that is used to detect cancer cells in the breasts of some women who have had abnormal mammograms, or who have dense breast tissue. It is not used for screening or in place of a mammogram. In this test, a woman receives an injection of a small amount of a radioactive substance called technetium 99, which is taken up by cancer cells, and a gamma camera is used to take pictures of the breasts. Also called scintimammography and sestamibi breast imaging.
miRNA
A type of RNA found in cells and in blood. miRNA are smaller than many other types of RNA and can bind to messenger RNAs (mRNAs) to block them from making proteins. miRNA are being studied in the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. Also called microRNA.
mirtazapine listen (mir-TA-zuh-peen)
A drug used to treat depression. Mirtazapine increases the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant. Also called Remeron.
mismatch repair deficiency listen (MIS-match reh-PAYR deh-FIH-shun-see)
Describes cells that have mutations (changes) in certain genes that are involved in correcting mistakes made when DNA is copied in a cell. Mismatch repair (MMR) deficient cells usually have many DNA mutations, which may lead to cancer. MMR deficiency is most common in colorectal cancer, other types of gastrointestinal cancer, and endometrial cancer, but it may also be found in cancers of the breast, prostate, bladder, and thyroid. MMR deficiency may also be found in an inherited disorder called Lynch syndrome. Knowing if a tumor is MMR deficient may help plan treatment or predict how well the tumor will respond to treatment.
misoprostol listen (MY-soh-PROS-tole)
A radioprotective agent that belongs to the family of drugs called prostaglandins.
mistletoe listen (MIH-sul-toh)
A semiparasitic plant that grows on some types of trees. Mistletoe extracts are being studied as treatments for cancer.
mistletoe lectin listen (MIH-sul-toh LEK-tin)
A substance that comes from the mistletoe plant and that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. A lectin is a complex molecule that has both protein and sugars. Lectins are able to bind to the outside of a cell and cause biochemical changes in it. Lectins are made by both animals and plants.
Mithracin listen (MITH-ruh-sin)
A drug used to treat some types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat a higher-than-normal amounts of calcium in the blood or urine. Mithracin binds to DNA and prevents cells from making RNA and proteins. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic. Also called mithramycin and plicamycin.
mithramycin listen (MITH-ruh-MY-sin)
A drug used to treat some types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat a higher-than-normal amounts of calcium in the blood or urine. Mithramycin binds to DNA and prevents cells from making RNA and proteins. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic. Also called Mithracin and plicamycin.
mitigate listen (MIH-tih-gayt)
To make milder or less painful.
mitochondria listen (MY-toh-KON-dree-uh)
Small structures in a cell that are found in the cytoplasm (fluid that surrounds the cell nucleus). Mitochondria make most of the energy for the cell and have their own genetic material that is different from the genetic material found in the nucleus. Many diseases are caused by mutations (changes) in the DNA of mitochondria. Mitochondria are cell organelles.
mitoguazone dihydrochloride listen (MY-toh-gwah-ZONE dy-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some leukemias and lymphomas. It blocks the growth of cells and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of polyamine synthesis inhibitor.
mitolactol listen (MY-toh-LAK-tole)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
mitomycin C listen (MY-toh-MY-sin ...)
A drug used to treat cancers of the stomach and pancreas that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mitomycin C comes from bacteria. It damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anticancer antibiotic.
mitosis listen (my-TOH-sis)
The process by which a single parent cell divides to make two new daughter cells. Each daughter cell receives a complete set of chromosomes from the parent cell. This process allows the body to grow and replace cells.
mitotane listen (MY-toh-tane)
An anticancer drug used in treating adrenocortical cancer and ACTH-producing pituitary tumors (Cushing disease).
mitotic activity listen (my-TAH-tik ak-TIH-vih-tee)
Having to do with the presence of dividing (proliferating) cells. Cancer tissue generally has more mitotic activity than normal tissues.
mitotic cycle listen (my-TAH-tik SY-kul)
The process a cell goes through each time it divides. The mitotic cycle consists of a series of steps during which the chromosomes and other cell material double to make two copies. The cell then divides into two daughter cells, each receiving one copy of the doubled material. The mitotic cycle is complete when each daughter cell is surrounded by its own outer membrane. Also called cell cycle.
mitotic index listen (my-TAH-tik IN-dex)
In a population of cells, the ratio of the number of cells undergoing mitosis (cell division) to the number of cells not undergoing mitosis.
mitotic inhibitor listen (my-TAH-tik in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug that blocks cell growth by stopping mitosis (cell division). They are used to treat cancer. Also called antimitotic agent.
mitotic rate listen (my-TAH-tik rayt)
A measure of how fast cancer cells are dividing and growing. To find the mitotic rate, the number of cells dividing in a certain amount of cancer tissue is counted. Mitotic rate is used to help find the stage of melanoma (a type of skin cancer) and other types of cancer. Higher mitotic rates are linked with lower survival rates. Also called MR.
mitoxantrone hydrochloride listen (MY-toh-ZAN-trone HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and advanced prostate cancer that did not get better with hormone therapy. It is also used to treat certain forms of multiple sclerosis (MS). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mitoxantrone hydrochloride damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also stop certain immune cells from causing damage to the brain and spinal cord. Mitoxantrone hydrochloride is a type of antitumor antibiotic.
mivobulin isethionate listen (MY-voh-BYOO-lin I-seh-THY-oh-nayt)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called CI-980.
mixed germ cell tumor listen (mikst jerm sel TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that is made up of at least two different types of germ cell tumors (tumors that begin in cells that form sperm or eggs). These may include choriocarcinoma, embryonal carcinoma, yolk sac tumor, teratoma, and seminoma. Mixed germ cell tumors occur most often in the ovary or testicle, but they may also occur in the chest, abdomen, or brain.
mixed glioma listen (mikst glee-OH-muh)
A brain tumor that forms from more than one type of brain cell, usually astrocytes and oligodendrocytes.
MK-0646
A substance being studied in the treatment of many types of cancer. MK-0646 binds to a protein called insulin-like growth factor receptor (IGFR) on the surface of cells. This may prevent the cells from growing when IGF is present. It may also kill cancer cells. MK-0646 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-IGF1R recombinant monoclonal antibody MK-0646.
MK0752
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks signals between growing cells and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of signal transduction inhibitor.
mL listen
A measure of volume in the metric system. One thousand mLs equal one liter. Also called cc, cubic centimeter, and milliliter.
MLN1202
A substance being studied as a treatment for atherosclerosis (a build-up of fat in the arteries). It is also being studied in the treatment of cancers that spread to the bone. MLN1202 binds to a protein called CCR2, which is found on the surface of certain bone cells, white blood cells, and cancer cells. MLN1202 blocks the action of a substance that is involved in keeping healthy bone mass. It may help keep the cancer cells from spreading to and growing in the bone. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-CCR2 monoclonal antibody MLN1202.
MLN2704
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibody drug conjugates. Also called MLN591DM1.
MLN518
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may stop cancer cell growth by blocking certain enzymes. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called CT53518 and tandutinib.
MLN591DM1
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibody drug conjugates. Also called MLN2704.
MMMT
A rare type of tumor that is a mixture of carcinoma and sarcoma cells. MMMT usually occurs in the uterus. Also called malignant mixed Müllerian tumor.
mmol listen
The amount of a substance equal to a thousandth of a mole (a measure of the amount of a substance). Also called millimole.
MOAB Ch14.18
A drug used with granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), aldesleukin (IL-2), and 13-cis-retinoic acid to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It is used in children whose disease has improved with other anticancer treatment. MOAB Ch14.18 binds to a substance called GD2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. MOAB Ch14.18 may block GD2 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Ch14.18, dinutuximab, monoclonal antibody Ch14.18, and Unituxin.
MoAb HuM195
A substance being studied in the treatment of myelodysplastic syndromes and some types of leukemia. It binds to CD33, a protein on the surface of certain normal blood stem cells and some abnormal blood cells. It causes the immune system to kill these cells. MoAb HuM195 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called lintuzumab and monoclonal antibody HuM195.
mocetinostat listen (MOH-seh-TIH-noh-stat)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor. Also called MGCD0103.
modafinil listen (moh-DA-fih-nil)
A drug that is being studied as a treatment for fatigue in patients with cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called stimulants.
modality listen (moh-DA-lih-tee)
A method of treatment. For example, surgery and chemotherapy are treatment modalities.
moderate sedation listen (MAH-deh-rut seh-DAY-shun)
A level of sedation in which a person is asleep but wakes when spoken to or touched. Moderate sedation is caused by special drugs and is used to help relieve anxiety during certain medical or surgical procedures. Drugs that relieve pain may be given at the same time. Also called conscious sedation.
modified FOLFOX-6 listen (MAH-dih-FIDE ...)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called modified FOLFOX-6 regimen.
modified FOLFOX-6 regimen listen (MAH-dih-FIDE ... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a combination chemotherapy regimen that is used to treat colorectal cancer. It includes the drugs leucovorin calcium (folinic acid), fluorouracil, and oxaliplatin. There are several different FOLFOX regimens that differ in the doses and ways in which the three drugs are given. Also called modified FOLFOX-6.
modified radical hysterectomy listen (MAH-dih-FIDE RA-dih-kul HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the uterus, cervix, upper part of the vagina, and nearby ligaments and tissues. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed. In this type of surgery, not as many tissues and/or organs are removed as in a radical hysterectomy.
modified radical mastectomy listen (MAH-dih-FIDE RA-dih-kul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery for breast cancer in which the breast, most or all of the lymph nodes under the arm, and the lining over the chest muscles are removed. Sometimes the surgeon also removes part of the chest wall muscles.
modified radical vulvectomy listen (MAH-dih-FIDE RA-dih-kul vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove most, but not all, of the vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina). The clitoris may not be removed. Sometimes lymph nodes in the groin area are also removed. Also called partial radical vulvectomy.
modulate listen (MAH-juh-layt)
To adjust, or change.
mogamulizumab listen (moh-GAM-yoo-LIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used to treat mycosis fungoides or Sezary syndrome (types of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma) that came back or did not get better after treatment with at least one systemic therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mogamulizumab binds to a protein called CCR4, which is found on some T cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. Mogamulizumab may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Poteligeo.
Mohs micrographic surgery listen (moze MY-kroh-GRA-fik SER-juh-ree)
A surgical procedure used to treat skin cancer. Individual layers of cancer tissue are removed and examined under a microscope one at a time until all cancer tissue has been removed. Also called Mohs surgery.
Mohs surgery listen (moze SER-juh-ree)
A surgical procedure used to treat skin cancer. Individual layers of cancer tissue are removed and examined under a microscope one at a time until all cancer tissue has been removed. Also called Mohs micrographic surgery.
molar pregnancy listen (MOH-ler PREG-nun-see)
A slow-growing tumor that develops from trophoblastic cells (cells that help an embryo attach to the uterus and help form the placenta) after fertilization of an egg by a sperm. A molar pregnancy contains many cysts (sacs of fluid). It is usually benign (not cancer) but it may spread to nearby tissues (invasive mole). It may also become a malignant tumor called choriocarcinoma. Molar pregnancy is the most common type of gestational trophoblastic tumor. Also called hydatidiform mole.
mold listen (mold)
A form of fungus. Some molds can cause disease in humans.
mole listen (mole)
A benign (not cancer) growth on the skin that is formed by a cluster of melanocytes (cells that make a substance called melanin, which gives color to skin and eyes). A mole is usually dark and may be raised from the skin. Also called nevus.
molecular diagnosis listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler dy-ug-NOH-sis)
The process of identifying a disease by studying molecules, such as proteins, DNA, and RNA, in a tissue or fluid.
molecular marker listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler MAR-ker)
A biological molecule found in blood, other body fluids, or tissues that is a sign of a normal or abnormal process, or of a condition or disease. A molecular marker may be used to see how well the body responds to a treatment for a disease or condition. Also called biomarker and signature molecule.
molecular mass listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler mas)
The sum of the atomic masses of all atoms in a molecule, based on a scale in which the atomic masses of hydrogen, carbon, nitrogen, and oxygen are 1, 12, 14, and 16, respectively. For example, the molecular mass of water, which has two atoms of hydrogen and one atom of oxygen, is 18 (i.e., 2 + 16). Also called molecular weight.
molecular medicine listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler MEH-dih-sin)
A branch of medicine that develops ways to diagnose and treat disease by understanding the way genes, proteins, and other cellular molecules work. Molecular medicine is based on research that shows how certain genes, molecules, and cellular functions may become abnormal in diseases such as cancer.
molecular pathway listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler …)
A series of actions among molecules in a cell that leads to a certain end point or cell function.
molecular radiation therapy listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which a radionuclide (a radioactive chemical) is linked to a cell-targeting molecule, such as a monoclonal antibody, and injected into the body. The cell-targeting molecule binds to a specific target found on some cancer cells. This may help kill the targeted cancer cells while limiting the harm to normal cells. Molecular radiation therapy is used to treat prostate cancer and some other types of cancer. Also called targeted radionuclide therapy.
molecular risk assessment listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler risk uh-SES-ment)
A procedure in which biomarkers (for example, biological molecules or changes in tumor cell DNA) are used to estimate a person’s risk for developing cancer. Specific biomarkers may be linked to particular types of cancer.
molecular test listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler …)
In medicine, a laboratory test that checks for certain genes, proteins, or other molecules in a sample of tissue, blood, or other body fluid. Molecular tests also check for certain changes in a gene or chromosome that may cause or affect the chance of developing a specific disease or disorder, such as cancer. A molecular test may be done with other procedures, such as biopsies, to help diagnose some types of cancer. It may also be used to help plan treatment, find out how well treatment is working, or make a prognosis.
molecular weight listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler wayt)
The sum of the atomic masses of all atoms in a molecule, based on a scale in which the atomic masses of hydrogen, carbon, nitrogen, and oxygen are 1, 12, 14, and 16, respectively. For example, the molecular weight of water, which has two atoms of hydrogen and one atom of oxygen, is 18 (i.e., 2 + 16). Also called molecular mass.
molecularly targeted therapy listen (muh-LEH-kyoo-ler-lee TAR-geh-ted THAYR-uh-pee)
In cancer, a type of treatment that uses drugs or other substances to target specific molecules involved in the growth and spread of cancer cells. Blocking these molecules may kill cancer cells or may keep cancer cells from growing or spreading. Molecularly targeted therapy may cause less harm to normal cells and may have fewer side effects than other types of cancer treatment.
molecule listen (MAH-leh-kyool)
The smallest particle of a substance that has all of the physical and chemical properties of that substance. Molecules are made up of one or more atoms. If they contain more than one atom, the atoms can be the same (an oxygen molecule has two oxygen atoms) or different (a water molecule has two hydrogen atoms and one oxygen atom). Biological molecules, such as proteins and DNA, can be made up of many thousands of atoms.
mometasone furoate listen (moh-MEH-tuh-sone FYOOR-oh-ayt)
A drug that is used in a cream to treat certain skin conditions and in a nasal spray to treat sinus problems caused by allergies. It is being studied as a way to treat inflammation of the skin caused by radiation therapy. Mometasone furoate is a type of corticosteroid. Also called Elocon and Nasonex.
monitor listen (MAH-nih-ter)
In medicine, to regularly watch and check a person or condition to see if there is any change. Also refers to a device that records and/or displays patient data, such as for an electrocardiogram (EKG).
monk’s pepper listen (munks PEH-per)
An extract made from the fruit of the chaste tree (Vitex agnus-castus) found in parts of Asia and Europe. It is claimed to treat infertility and to lessen symptoms that may occur before or during a woman’s menstrual period, such as headaches and irregular bleeding. Monk’s pepper may affect levels of reproductive hormones in the blood. It is a type of phytomedicine. Also called chaste tree berry and Vitex.
monoamine oxidase inhibitor listen (MAH-noh-uh-MEEN OK-sih-days in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug used to treat depression. It stops the breakdown of certain chemicals in the brain that help improve a person’s mood. A monoamine oxidase inhibitor is a type of antidepressant. Also called MAO inhibitor.
monoclonal antibody listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee)
A type of protein made in the laboratory that can bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. There are many kinds of monoclonal antibodies. A monoclonal antibody is made so that it binds to only one substance. Monoclonal antibodies are being used to treat some types of cancer. They can be used alone or to carry drugs, toxins, or radioactive substances directly to cancer cells.
monoclonal antibody Ch14.18 listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee…)
A drug used with granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), aldesleukin (IL-2), and 13-cis-retinoic acid to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It is used in children whose disease has improved with other anticancer treatment. Monoclonal antibody Ch14.18 binds to a substance called GD2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Monoclonal antibody Ch14.18 may block GD2 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Ch14.18, dinutuximab, MOAB Ch14.18, and Unituxin.
monoclonal antibody HuM195 listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of myelodysplastic syndromes and some types of leukemia. It binds to CD33, a protein on the surface of certain normal blood stem cells and some abnormal blood cells. It causes the immune system to kill these cells. Monoclonal antibody HuM195 is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called lintuzumab and MoAb HuM195.
monoclonal B-cell lymphocytosis listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul B-sel LIM-foh-sy-TOH-sis)
A condition in which a higher-than-normal number of identical B cells are found in the blood. People with monoclonal B-cell lymphocytosis may develop other B-cell diseases, such as chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). Also called MBL.
monoclonal gammopathy of undetermined significance listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul ga-MAH-puh-thee ... UN-deh-TER-mind sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A benign condition in which there is a higher-than-normal level of a protein called M protein in the blood. Patients with monoclonal gammopathy of undetermined significance are at an increased risk of developing cancer. Also called MGUS.
monoclonal protein listen (MAH-noh-KLOH-nul PROH-teen)
An antibody found in unusually large amounts in the blood or urine of people with multiple myeloma and other types of plasma cell tumors. Also called M protein.
monocyte listen (MAH-noh-site)
A type of immune cell that is made in the bone marrow and travels through the blood to tissues in the body where it becomes a macrophage. Macrophages surround and kill microorganisms, ingest foreign material, remove dead cells, and boost immune responses. A monocyte is a type of white blood cell and a type of phagocyte.
monomer listen (MAH-noh-mer)
A molecule that can join with other identical monomers to form a larger structure called a polymer.
monotherapy listen (MAH-noh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Therapy that uses one type of treatment, such as radiation therapy or surgery alone, to treat a certain disease or condition. In drug therapy, monotherapy refers to the use of a single drug to treat a disease or condition.
Montanide ISA-51 listen (MON-tuh-nide ...)
A mixture of oil and water that is combined with a specific antigen to boost the immune response to that antigen. It is being studied in immunotherapy and as a way to increase the immune response to cancer vaccines. It is a type of immune modulator. Also called IFA and incomplete Freund's adjuvant.
montelukast sodium listen (mon-teh-LOO-kast SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat symptoms of asthma, such as trouble breathing, tight chest, wheezing, coughing, and runny nose. Montelukast sodium blocks the action of a substance that causes airways in the lungs to narrow and causes other symptoms of asthma. It is a type of leukotriene receptor antagonist and a type of antiasthmatic agent. Also called Singulair.
MOPP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or with radiation therapy to treat Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs mechlorethamine hydrochloride, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called MOPP regimen.
MOPP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used alone or with radiation therapy to treat Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs mechlorethamine hydrochloride, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), procarbazine hydrochloride, and prednisone. Also called MOPP.
MORAb-009
A substance being studied in the treatment of mesothelioma. MORAb-009 binds to a protein called mesothelin, which is found on some cancer cells. MORAb-009 may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called amatuximab and anti-mesothelin monoclonal antibody MORAb-009.
moral listen (MOR-ul)
Having to do with beliefs about what is right and wrong in terms of how people behave. Also called ethical.
morbidity listen (mor-BIH-dih-tee)
Refers to having a disease or a symptom of disease, or to the amount of disease within a population. Morbidity also refers to medical problems caused by a treatment.
Morinda citrifolia listen (moh-RIN-duh sih-trih-FOH-lee-uh)
A tropical shrub. An extract from the fruit is being studied as a treatment for cancer, and extracts from the fruit, leaves, or roots have been used in some cultures to treat other diseases. Also called noni.
morphine sulfate listen (MOR-feen SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system and some other tissues. Morphine sulfate is made from opium. It is a type of opiate and a type of analgesic agent.
morphology listen (mor-FAH-loh-jee)
The science of the form and structure of organisms (plants, animals, and other forms of life).
mortality listen (mor-TA-lih-tee)
Refers to the state of being mortal (destined to die). In medicine, a term also used for death rate, or the number of deaths in a certain group of people in a certain period of time. Mortality may be reported for people who have a certain disease, live in one area of the country, or who are of a certain gender, age, or ethnic group.
motexafin gadolinium listen (moh-TEK-suh-fin GA-doh-LIH-nee-um)
A substance being studied in the treatment and diagnosis of some types of cancer. It builds up in some cancer cells, which may make them easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. Motexafin gadolinium is also used in magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) to help find cancer cells in the body. It is a type of radiosensitizing agent, a type of chemosensitizing agent, and a type of contrast agent. Also called gadolinium texaphyrin.
motexafin lutetium listen (moh-TEK-suh-fin loo-TEE-shee-um)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer using photodynamic therapy. It belongs to the family of drugs called metallotexaphyrins. Also called lutetium texaphyrin.
motor listen (MOH-ter)
In medicine, having to do with the movement of body parts.
motor neuron disease listen (MOH-ter NOOR-on dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disease in which the nerve cells in the brain that act on muscle cells break down and stop working. This affects basic activities such as speaking, walking, breathing, and swallowing. Symptoms include muscle weakness, wasting, twitching, trouble swallowing, and slowly becoming paralyzed. Motor neuron diseases are sometimes inherited. Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS or Lou Gehrig’s disease) is the most common type of motor neuron disease.
Motrin listen (MOH-trin)
A drug used to treat fever, swelling, pain, and redness by preventing the body from making a substance that causes inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called Advil and ibuprofen.
mouse model listen (... MAH-dul)
The use of special strains of mice to study a human disease or condition, and how to prevent and treat it.
moxetumomab pasudotox listen (MOK-see-TOO-moh-mab pah-SOO-doh-tox)
A drug used to treat hairy cell leukemia that came back or did not get better with at least two other systemic therapies, including treatment with a purine nucleoside analog (a type of anticancer drug). Moxetumomab pasudotox contains a monoclonal antibody called moxetumomab that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia cells. It also contains a bacterial toxin called PE38, which may help kill cancer cells. Moxetumomab pasudotox is a type of immunotoxin. Also called anti-CD22 immunotoxin CAT-8015, CAT-8015, and Lumoxiti.
moxibustion listen (MOK-sih-BUS-chun)
In traditional Chinese medicine, a type of heat therapy in which an herb is burned on or above the skin to warm and stimulate an acupuncture point or affected area.
moxifloxacin hydrochloride listen (MOK-sih-FLOK-suh-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. It is a type of fluoroquinolone. Also called Avelox.
Mozobil listen (MOH-zoh-bil)
A drug used before autologous stem cell transplantation in patients with non-Hodgkin lymphoma or multiple myeloma. Mozobil is given together with granulocyte-colony stimulating factor (G-CSF) to help move stem cells from the bone marrow to the blood. The stem cells can then be collected, stored, and given back to the patient. Mozobil is a type of chemokine receptor antagonist. Also called AMD 3100 and plerixafor.
MP470
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may block certain proteins involved in cancer cell growth and DNA repair. Blocking these proteins may make cancer cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs and radiation therapy. MP470 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called amuvatinib.
MPL gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called the thrombopoietin receptor. This is a protein that helps control the number of blood cells that are made in the bone marrow, especially platelets. Mutated (changed) forms of the MPL gene may cause the body to make abnormal blood cells or too many platelets. Mutations in this gene have been found in some types of blood conditions, including essential thrombocythemia and primary myelofibrosis.
MPNST
A type of soft tissue sarcoma that develops in cells that form a protective sheath (covering) around peripheral nerves, which are nerves that are outside of the central nervous system (brain and spinal cord). Also called malignant peripheral nerve sheath tumor.
MR
A measure of how fast cancer cells are dividing and growing. To find the MR, the number of cells dividing in a certain amount of cancer tissue is counted. MR is used to help find the stage of melanoma (a type of skin cancer) and other types of cancer. Higher MRs are linked with lower survival rates. Also called mitotic rate.
MRA
A procedure that uses radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer to create detailed pictures of the blood vessels and blood flow inside the body. A dye may be injected into a vein to make the blood vessels and blood flow easier to see. MRA may be used to check for aneurysms (a bulge in the blood vessel wall), blockages in the arteries, blood clots, and other blood vessel problems. Also called magnetic resonance angiography.
MRI
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to create detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and diseased tissue. MRI makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other scanning techniques, such as computed tomography (CT) or x-ray. MRI is especially useful for imaging the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones. Also called magnetic resonance imaging, NMRI, and nuclear magnetic resonance imaging.
mRNA
A type of RNA found in cells. mRNA molecules carry the genetic information needed to make proteins. They carry the information from the DNA in the nucleus of the cell to the cytoplasm where the proteins are made. Also called messenger RNA.
MRSA
A type of bacteria that causes an infection that does not respond to common antibiotics, including methicillin, amoxicillin, and penicillin. Most MRSA infections occur on the skin and are mild. However, they can also be serious or life threatening and difficult to treat. MRSA infections usually occur in people with weakened immune systems who are in hospitals, nursing homes, or other healthcare centers. They can also occur in healthy people who have skin-to-skin contact with others, such as childcare workers, team athletes, and people who live in crowded conditions. Also called methicillin-resistant Staphylococcus aureus.
MRSI
A noninvasive imaging method that provides information about cellular activity (metabolic information). It is used along with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) which provides information about the shape and size of the tumor (spatial information). Also called 1H-nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, and proton magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging.
MS 209
A substance that is being studied for its ability to make cancer cells respond better to chemotherapy drugs to which they have become resistant. It is a type of quinolone antibiotic.
MS-275
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancers of the blood. It belongs to the family of drugs called histone deacetylase inhibitors.
MSI
A change that occurs in the DNA of certain cells (such as tumor cells) in which the number of repeats of microsatellites (short, repeated sequences of DNA) is different than the number of repeats that was in the DNA when it was inherited. The cause of MSI may be a defect in the ability to repair mistakes made when DNA is copied in the cell. Also called microsatellite instability.
MSI-H cancer listen (… KAN-ser)
Describes cancer cells that have a greater than normal number of genetic markers called microsatellites. Microsatellites are short, repeated, sequences of DNA. Cancer cells that have large numbers of microsatellites may have defects in the ability to correct mistakes that occur when DNA is copied in the cell. Microsatellite instability is found most often in colorectal cancer, other types of gastrointestinal cancer, and endometrial cancer. It may also be found in cancers of the breast, prostate, bladder, and thyroid. Knowing whether cancer is microsatellite instability high may help plan the best treatment. Also called microsatellite instability-high cancer.
MTD
The highest dose of a drug or treatment that does not cause unacceptable side effects. The MTD is determined in clinical trials by testing increasing doses on different groups of people until the highest dose with acceptable side effects is found. Also called maximum tolerated dose.
mTOR
A protein that helps control several cell functions, including cell division and survival, and binds to rapamycin and other drugs. mTOR may be more active in some types of cancer cells than it is in normal cells. Blocking mTOR may cause the cancer cells to die. It is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase. Also called mammalian target of rapamycin and mechanistic target of rapamycin.
mTOR inhibitor listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks a protein called mTOR, which helps control cell division. Blocking mTOR’s action may keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Some mTOR inhibitors are used to treat cancer.
MTX
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and severe psoriasis (a type of skin condition). MTX stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. MTX is a type of antimetabolite and a type of antifolate. Also called amethopterin, methotrexate, Rheumatrex, and Trexall.
MUC-1
A protein found on certain epithelial cells, which line the inside and outside surfaces of the body. It may be found in higher than normal amounts in patients with some types of cancer, including breast, ovarian, lung, and prostate cancers, or in other conditions. Measuring the amount of MUC-1 in the blood may help to find out how well cancer treatment is working or if cancer has come back. MUC-1 is a type of tumor marker.
mucin/peptide listen (MYOO-sin/PEP-tide)
A protein/sugar compound made by some cancer cells.
mucinous listen (MYOO-sin-us)
Containing or resembling mucin, the main compound in mucus.
mucinous carcinoma listen (MYOO-sin-us KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in cells that line certain internal organs and produce mucin (the main component of mucus).
mucosa listen (myoo-KOH-suh)
The moist, inner lining of some organs and body cavities (such as the nose, mouth, lungs, and stomach). Glands in the mucosa make mucus (a thick, slippery fluid). Also called mucous membrane.
mucosa-associated lymphoid tissue lymphoma listen (myoo-KOH-suh-uh-SOH-see-ay-ted LIM-foyd TIH-shoo lim-FOH-muh)
A type of cancer that arises in cells in mucosal tissue that are involved in antibody production. Also called MALT lymphoma.
mucositis listen (myoo-koh-SY-tis)
A complication of some cancer therapies in which the lining of the digestive system becomes inflamed. Often seen as sores in the mouth.
mucous membrane listen (MYOO-kus MEM-brayn)
The moist, inner lining of some organs and body cavities (such as the nose, mouth, lungs, and stomach). Glands in the mucous membrane make mucus (a thick, slippery fluid). Also called mucosa.
mucus listen (MYOO-kus)
A thick, slippery fluid made by the membranes that line certain organs of the body, including the nose, mouth, throat, and vagina.
mucus colitis listen (MYOO-kus koh-LY-tis)
A disorder of the intestines commonly marked by abdominal pain, bloating, and changes in a person’s bowel habits. This may include diarrhea or constipation, or both, with one occurring after the other. Also called IBS, irritable bowel syndrome, irritable colon, and spastic colon.
muJ591
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
Mullerian tumor listen (myoo-LAYR-ee-un TOO-mer)
A rare cancer of the uterus, ovary, or fallopian tubes.
multicenter study listen (MUL-tee-SEN-ter STUH-dee)
A clinical trial that is carried out at more than one medical institution.
multicentric breast cancer listen (MUL-tee-SEN-trik brest KAN-ser)
Breast cancer in which there is more than one tumor, all of which have formed separately from one another. The tumors are likely to be in different quadrants (sections) of the breast. Multicentric breast cancers are rare.
multidisciplinary listen (MUL-tee-DIH-sih-plih-NAYR-ee)
In medicine, a term used to describe a treatment planning approach or team that includes a number of doctors and other health care professionals who are experts in different specialties (disciplines). In cancer treatment, the primary disciplines are medical oncology (treatment with drugs), surgical oncology (treatment with surgery), and radiation oncology (treatment with radiation).
multidisciplinary opinion listen (MUL-tee-DIH-sih-plih-NAYR-ee uh-PIN-yun)
A treatment planning approach in which a number of doctors who are experts in different specialties (disciplines) review and discuss the medical condition and treatment options of a patient. In cancer treatment, a multidisciplinary opinion may include that of a medical oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with drugs), a surgical oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with surgery), and a radiation oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with radiation). Also called tumor board review.
multidrug resistance listen (MUL-tee-... reh-ZIH-stunts)
Adaptation of tumor cells to anticancer drugs in ways that make the drugs less effective.
multidrug resistance inhibition listen (MUL-tee-... reh-ZIH-stunts in-HIH-bih-shun)
Treatment used to make cancer cells less resistant to anticancer drugs.
multifocal breast cancer listen (mul-tee-FOH-kul brest KAN-ser)
Breast cancer in which there is more than one tumor, all of which have arisen from one original tumor. The tumors are likely to be in the same quadrant (section) of the breast.
multigene test listen (MUL-tee-jeen ...)
A laboratory test in which many genes are studied in a sample of tissue. Multigene tests may help find mutations (changes) in certain genes that may increase a person’s risk of a disease such as cancer. They may also look at the activity of certain genes in a sample of tissue. Multigene tests may be used to help plan treatment or make a prognosis, including helping to predict whether cancer will spread to other parts of the body or come back. Also called multiple-gene panel test and multiple-gene test.
MultiHance listen (MUL-tee-HANTS)
A drug used in MRI to help make clear pictures of blood vessels in the brain, spine, and nearby tissues. It is also being studied as a way to find abnormal areas in the liver and other organs and to help diagnose cancer. MultiHance is a type of contrast agent. Also called gadobenate dimeglumine.
multimodality therapy listen (MUL-tee-moh-DA-lih-tee THAYR-uh-pee)
Therapy that combines more than one method of treatment. Also called combination therapy and multimodality treatment.
multimodality treatment listen (MUL-tee-moh-DA-lih-tee TREET-ment)
Therapy that combines more than one method of treatment. Also called combination therapy and multimodality therapy.
multiple endocrine adenomatosis listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin A-deh-NOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A rare, inherited disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the parathyroid and pituitary glands and the pancreas. These tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They cause the glands to secrete high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems, such as kidney stones, fertility problems, and severe ulcers. In some cases, tumors inside the pancreas can become malignant (cancer). Also called MEN1 syndrome, multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 syndrome, and Wermer syndrome.
multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2 listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin A-deh-NOH-muh-TOH-sis ...)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the thyroid gland, parathyroid glands, and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. Multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2 is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET, and is divided into three subtypes (MEN2A, MEN2B, and FMTC). People with all subtypes of multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2 have an increased risk of medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. Also called MEN2, MEN2 syndrome, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome.
multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin A-deh-NOH-muh-TOH-sis ...)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the parathyroid glands and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. An itchy skin condition may also occur. Multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2A, MEN2A syndrome, multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome, and Sipple syndrome.
multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2B listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin A-deh-NOH-muh-TOH-sis ...)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the adrenal glands and growths around the nerves in the lips, tongue, lining of the mouth, and eyelids. Gastrointestinal symptoms and trouble with the spine or bones in the feet and thighs may also occur. Multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2B is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2B, MEN2B syndrome, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2B syndrome.
multiple endocrine neoplasia syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh SIN-drome)
An inherited condition that may result in the development of cancers of the endocrine system. There are several types of multiple endocrine neoplasia syndrome, and patients with each type may develop different types of cancer. The altered genes that cause each type can be detected with a blood test. Also called MEN syndrome.
multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ... SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the parathyroid and pituitary glands and the pancreas. These tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They cause the glands to secrete high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems, such as kidney stones, fertility problems, and severe ulcers. In some cases, tumors inside the pancreas can become malignant (cancer). Also called MEN1 syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis, and Wermer syndrome.
multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the thyroid gland, parathyroid glands, and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. Multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET, and is divided into three subtypes (MEN2A, MEN2B, and FMTC). People with all subtypes of multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2 syndrome have an increased risk of medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. Also called MEN2, MEN2 syndrome, and multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2.
multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the parathyroid glands and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. An itchy skin condition may also occur. Multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2A, MEN2A syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A, and Sipple syndrome.
multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2B syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul EN-doh-krin NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh ... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the adrenal glands and growths around the nerves in the lips, tongue, lining of the mouth, and eyelids. Gastrointestinal symptoms and trouble with the spine or bones in the feet and thighs may also occur. Multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2B syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2B, MEN2B syndrome, and multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2B.
multiple hamartoma syndrome listen (MUL-tih-pul HA-mar-TOH-muh SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder marked by the formation of many noncancerous growths called hamartomas. These growths occur in the skin, breast, thyroid, colon, intestines, and mouth. Patients with multiple hamartoma syndrome are at increased risk of certain types of cancer, including cancers of the breast and thyroid. Also called Cowden disease and Cowden syndrome.
multiple myeloma listen (MUL-tih-pul MY-eh-LOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). Also called Kahler disease, myelomatosis, and plasma cell myeloma.
multiple sclerosis listen (MUL-tih-pul skleh-ROH-sis)
A disorder of the central nervous system marked by weakness, numbness, a loss of muscle coordination, and problems with vision, speech, and bladder control. Multiple sclerosis is thought to be an autoimmune disease in which the body's immune system destroys myelin. Myelin is a substance that contains both protein and fat (lipid), serving as a nerve insulator and helping in the transmission of nerve signals.
multiple-gene panel test listen (MUL-tih-pul-jeen PA-nil ...)
A laboratory test in which many genes are studied in a sample of tissue. Multiple-gene panel tests may help find mutations (changes) in certain genes that may increase a person’s risk of a disease such as cancer. They may also look at the activity of certain genes in a sample of tissue. Multiple-gene panel tests may be used to help plan treatment or make a prognosis, including helping to predict whether cancer will spread to other parts of the body or come back. Also called multigene test and multiple-gene test.
multiple-gene test listen (MUL-tih-pul-jeen ...)
A laboratory test in which many genes are studied in a sample of tissue. Multiple-gene tests may help find mutations (changes) in certain genes that may increase a person’s risk of a disease such as cancer. They may also look at the activity of certain genes in a sample of tissue. Multiple-gene tests may be used to help plan treatment or make a prognosis, including helping to predict whether cancer will spread to other parts of the body or come back. Also called multigene test and multiple-gene panel test.
multiplicity listen (MUL-tih-PLIH-sih-tee)
A large number or variety.
multitargeted receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor ABT-869 listen (MUL-tee-TAR-geh-ted reh-SEP-ter TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Multitargeted receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor ABT-869 blocks the action of several growth factors. It may also block the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogensis inhibitor. Also called ABT-869.
mung bean listen (mung been)
A type of bean grown in warm climates, usually for its seed and for bean sprouts. Mung bean may have anticancer effects.
muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine listen (MYOOR-uh-mil try-PEP-tide FOS-fuh-TY-dul-EH-thuh-NOH-luh-meen)
A drug being studied in the treatment of young adults with bone cancer that has gotten worse or come back. Muramyl tripeptide phosphatidylethanolamine activates certain types of white blood cells and helps the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of immunostimulant. Also called L-MTP-PE, MEPACT, and mifamurtide.
muromonab-CD3 listen (MYOO-roh-MOH-nab …)
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
muscle wasting listen (MUH-sul WAY-sting)
A weakening, shrinking, and loss of muscle caused by disease or lack of use. Muscle wasting decreases strength and the ability to move.
musculoskeletal listen (MUS-kyoo-loh-SKEH-leh-tul)
Having to do with muscles, bones, tendons, ligaments, joints, and cartilage.
MUSE listen
A method used to treat impotence (inability to have an erection). A suppository, in the form of a very small pellet, is inserted through the tip of the penis into the urethra. The suppository contains the drug alprostadil, which increases the flow of blood to the penis and causes an erection. Also called medicated urethral system for erection.
music therapy listen (MYOO-sik THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses music to help improve a person’s overall health and well-being. It may include creating, singing, moving, listening, and/or relaxing to music. Music therapy may be used to help relieve stress, pain, anxiety, and depression caused by a disease, such as cancer, and its treatment. Music therapy is a type of complementary medicine.
Mustargen listen (MUS-ter-jen)
A drug used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma, advanced Hodgkin lymphoma, chronic leukemia, mycosis fungoides, and a type of lung cancer called bronchogenic carcinoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mustargen damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called mechlorethamine hydrochloride and mustine.
mustine listen (MUS-teen)
A drug used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma, advanced Hodgkin lymphoma, chronic leukemia, mycosis fungoides, and a type of lung cancer called bronchogenic carcinoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mustine damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called mechlorethamine hydrochloride and Mustargen.
mutagen listen (MYOO-tuh-jen)
Anything that causes a mutation (a change in the DNA of a cell). DNA changes caused by mutagens may harm cells and cause certain diseases, such as cancer. Examples of mutagens include radioactive substances, x-rays, ultraviolet radiation, and certain chemicals.
mutate listen (MYOO-tayt)
To change the genetic material of a cell. The changes (mutations) can be harmful, beneficial, or have no effect.
mutation listen (myoo-TAY-shun)
Any change in the DNA sequence of a cell. Mutations may be caused by mistakes during cell division, or they may be caused by exposure to DNA-damaging agents in the environment. Mutations can be harmful, beneficial, or have no effect. If they occur in cells that make eggs or sperm, they can be inherited; if mutations occur in other types of cells, they are not inherited. Certain mutations may lead to cancer or other diseases.
mutation carrier listen (myoo-TAY-shun KAYR-ee-er)
A person who has a mutated (changed) copy of a gene. This change may cause a disease in that person or in his or her children.
MVAC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced bladder cancer and urethral cancer. It includes the drugs methotrexate, vinblastine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cisplatin. Also called MVAC regimen.
MVAC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced bladder cancer and urethral cancer. It includes the drugs methotrexate, vinblastine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cisplatin. Also called MVAC.
Mvasi listen (em-VAH-see)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of cervical, colorectal, lung, and kidney cancer, and glioblastoma (a type of brain cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Mvasi binds to a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF). This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Mvasi contains the active ingredient bevacizumab. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody.
myalgia listen (my-AL-juh)
Pain in a muscle or group of muscles.
myasthenia gravis listen (MY-us-THEE-nee-uh GRA-vis)
A disease in which antibodies made by a person’s immune system prevent certain nerve-muscle interactions. It causes weakness in the arms and legs, vision problems, and drooping eyelids or head. It may also cause paralysis and problems with swallowing, talking, climbing stairs, lifting things, and getting up from a sitting position. The muscle weakness gets worse during activity, and improves after periods of rest.
MYCN amplification study listen (… AM-plih-fih-KAY-shun STUH-dee)
A laboratory test in which tumor or bone marrow cells are checked to see how many copies of the MYCN gene are in the DNA. MYCN is important for cell growth. Having more than 10 copies of the gene is called MYCN amplification. Neuroblastoma with MYCN amplification is more likely to spread in the body and less likely to respond to treatment.
Mycobutin listen (MY-koh-BYOO-tin)
A drug used to prevent the spread of a bacterium called in patients with advanced HIV (the virus that causes AIDS) infection. It blocks an enzyme that the bacteria need to grow. It is a type of antibiotic. Also called rifabutin.
mycophenolate mofetil listen (my-koh-FEH-noh-layt MOH-feh-til)
A drug used to prevent graft-versus-host disease (GVHD) after organ transplants. It is also being studied in the prevention of GVHD after stem cell transplants for cancer, and in the treatment of some autoimmune disorders. Mycophenolate mofetil is a type of immunosuppressive agent. Also called CellCept.
mycosis fungoides listen (my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez)
A type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma that first appears on the skin and can spread to the lymph nodes or other organs such as the spleen, liver, or lungs.
mycosis fungoides patch listen (my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez …)
A flat, red area on the skin of patients who have mycosis fungoides. The patches may look like a thin, red rash and may be itchy. They are most common on the chest, groin, hips, buttocks, and under the arms. They may look like eczema or psoriasis.
mycosis fungoides plaque listen (my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez plak)
In mycosis fungoides, an area of skin that is thickened, raised, red, scaly, and itchy.
Mycostatin listen (MY-koh-STA-tin)
A drug used to treat infections caused by fungi (a type of microorganism). It is made by certain strains of bacteria and kills fungi by binding to their membranes. Mycostatin is a type of antifungal agent.
myelin listen (MY-eh-lin)
The fatty substance that covers and protects nerves.
myeloablation listen (MY-eh-loh-a-BLAY-shun)
A severe form of myelosuppression. Myelosuppression is a condition in which bone marrow activity is decreased, resulting in fewer red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets. It is a side effect of some cancer treatments. Also called severe myelosuppression.
myeloablative chemotherapy listen (MY-eh-loh-a-BLAY-tiv KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
High-dose chemotherapy that kills cells in the bone marrow, including cancer cells. It lowers the number of normal blood-forming cells in the bone marrow, and can cause severe side effects. Myeloablative chemotherapy is usually followed by a bone marrow or stem cell transplant to rebuild the bone marrow.
myeloblast listen (MY-eh-loh-blast)
A type of immature white blood cell that forms in the bone marrow. Myeloblasts become mature white blood cells called granulocytes (neutrophils, basophils, and eosinophils).
myeloblastic listen (MY-eh-loh-BLAS-tik)
Refers to myeloblasts (a type of immature cell that forms in the bone marrow).
myelodysplasia listen (MY-eh-loh-dis-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal bone marrow cells that may lead to myelogenous leukemia.
myelodysplastic syndrome listen (MY-eh-loh-dis-PLAS-tik SIN-drome)
A type of cancer in which the bone marrow does not make enough healthy blood cells (white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets) and there are abnormal cells in the blood and/or bone marrow. When there are fewer healthy blood cells, infection, anemia, or bleeding may occur. Sometimes, myelodysplastic syndrome becomes acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Also called MDS.
myelofibrosis listen (MY-eh-loh-fy-BROH-sis)
A disorder in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue.
myelogenous listen (MY-eh-LAH-jeh-nus)
Having to do with, produced by, or resembling the bone marrow. Sometimes used as a synonym for myeloid; for example, acute myeloid leukemia and acute myelogenous leukemia are the same disease.
myelogram listen (MY-eh-loh-gram)
An x-ray of the spinal cord after an injection of dye into the space between the lining of the spinal cord and brain.
myeloid listen (MY-eh-loyd)
Having to do with or resembling the bone marrow. May also refer to certain types of hematopoietic (blood-forming) cells found in the bone marrow. Sometimes used as a synonym for myelogenous; for example, acute myeloid leukemia and acute myelogenous leukemia are the same disease.
myeloma listen (MY-eh-LOH-muh)
Cancer that arises in plasma cells, a type of white blood cell.
myelomatosis listen (MY-eh-loh-muh-TOH-sis)
A type of cancer that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). Also called Kahler disease, multiple myeloma, and plasma cell myeloma.
myelomonocyte listen (MY-eh-loh-MAH-noh-site)
An abnormal type of white blood cell that is found in chronic myelomonocytic leukemia. These cells are similar to both monocytes and myelocytes (immature cells that develop into different types of immune system cells).
myeloproliferative neoplasm listen (MY-eh-loh-proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
A type of disease in which the bone marrow makes too many red blood cells, platelets, or certain white blood cells. Myeloproliferative neoplasms usually get worse over time as the number of extra cells build up in the blood and/or bone marrow. This may cause bleeding problems, anemia, infection, fatigue, or other signs and symptoms. Certain myeloproliferative neoplasms may become acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Myeloproliferative neoplasms include chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML), polycythemia vera, primary myelofibrosis, essential thrombocythemia, chronic neutrophilic leukemia, and chronic eosinophilic leukemia. Also called chronic myeloproliferative neoplasm.
myelosclerosis with myeloid metaplasia listen (MY-eh-loh-skleh-ROH-sis ... MY-eh-loyd meh-tuh-PLAY-zhuh)
A progressive, chronic disease in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue and blood is made in organs such as the liver and the spleen, instead of in the bone marrow. This disease is marked by an enlarged spleen and progressive anemia. Also called agnogenic myeloid metaplasia, chronic idiopathic myelofibrosis, idiopathic myelofibrosis, and primary myelofibrosis.
myelosuppression listen (MY-eh-loh-suh-PREH-shun)
A condition in which bone marrow activity is decreased, resulting in fewer red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets. Myelosuppression is a side effect of some cancer treatments. When myelosuppression is severe, it is called myeloablation.
myelosuppressive therapy listen (MY-eh-loh-suh-PREH-siv THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that stops or slows the growth of blood-forming cells in the bone marrow. Myelosuppressive therapies, such as chemotherapy and radiation therapy, kill normal cells and cancer cells in the bone marrow. This lowers the number of normal red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets in the blood and bone marrow. Myelosuppressive therapy may be given before a bone marrow or stem cell transplant. It may also be used to treat some blood conditions, such as polycythemia vera (a disease in which there are too many red blood cells in the bone marrow and blood).
Myleran listen (MY-leh-ran)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML). It is also used with other drugs to prepare patients with CML for a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Myleran attaches to DNA in cells and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called busulfan and Busulfex.
Mylotarg listen (MY-loh-targ)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that is CD33 positive (expresses the protein CD33). It is used in patients whose disease is newly diagnosed. It is also used in patients aged 2 years or older whose disease has not gotten better with other treatment or has recurred (come back). Mylotarg contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to CD33, which is found on some leukemia cells. It also contains a toxic substance, which may help kill cancer cells. Mylotarg is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called gemtuzumab ozogamicin.
myoclonic jerk listen (MY-oh-KLAH-nik …)
A sudden, brief, strong contraction of a muscle or group of muscles that cannot be controlled.
myoinositol listen (my-oh-ih-NOH-sih-TOL)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Myoinositol helps cells make membranes and respond to messages from their environment. It has the same chemical formula as glucose (the chief source of energy for living organisms) but has a different arrangement of atoms. It is found in beans, peas, brown rice, wheat bran and nuts. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Myoinositol is being studied in the prevention of cancer. Also called inositol.
myometrium listen (my-oh-MEE-tree-um)
The muscular outer layer of the uterus.
myopericytoma listen (my-oh-PAYR-ih-sy-TOH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing soft tissue tumor that begins in cells that wrap around blood vessels. Most myopericytomas are benign (not cancer). They can occur anywhere in the body, but usually occur in the legs, trunk (chest and abdomen), or head and neck. They can occur in children, but are most common in middle-aged adults.
myristyl nicotinate cream listen (mih-RIS-til NIH-kuh-TIH-nayt kreem)
A substance being studied in the prevention of skin cancer. Myristyl nicotinate cream is also being studied as a way to help lessen the side effects of retinoic acid (a form of vitamin A) when it is used to treat skin that has been damaged by the sun. Myristyl nicotinate cream contains a form of niacin (a member of the vitamin B complex). It is a type of chemopreventive agent.
myxofibrosarcoma listen (MIK-soh-FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue, usually in or just under the skin of the arms and legs. There may be more than one tumor, and it sometimes spreads to nearby tissue or to other parts of the body. Myxofibrosarcoma may also recur (come back) after treatment. It may occur in children, but is most common in older adults. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
myxoid liposarcoma listen (MIK-soyd LIH-poh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that begins in fat cells. It usually occurs in the thigh, but it may also occur in the buttock, back of the abdomen, or trunk (chest and abdomen). Some myxoid liposarcoma cells have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome). Myxoid liposarcoma usually occurs in adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
MZL
An indolent (slow-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that begins forming in certain areas (the marginal zones) of lymph tissue. There are three types based on whether it forms in the spleen, lymph nodes, or other lymphoid tissue that contains a lot of B cells (a type of white blood cell). Also called marginal zone B-cell lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma.
nabilone listen (NA-bih-lone)
A synthetic pill form of an active chemical in marijuana called delta-9-tetrahydrocannabinol (THC). Nabilone is used to treat nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy in patients who have not been helped by other therapy. It is a type of cannabinoid. Also called Cesamet.
N-acetylcysteine listen (... A-seh-til-SIS-teh-een)
A drug usually used to reduce the thickness of mucus and ease its removal. It is also used to reverse the toxicity of high doses of acetaminophen. Also called acetylcysteine and N-acetyl-L-cysteine.
N-acetyldinaline listen (… A-seh-til-dih-nuh-leen)
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer drug in the treatment of non-small cell lung cancer. Also called CI-994.
N-acetyl-L-cysteine listen (… A-seh-til … SIS-teh-een)
A drug usually used to reduce the thickness of mucus and ease its removal. It is also used to reverse the toxicity of high doses of acetaminophen. Also called acetylcysteine and N-acetylcysteine.
NaCl
Chemical abbreviation for sodium chloride (table salt).
NADC
A type of cancer that is more likely to occur in people who are infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) than in people who are not infected. NADCs include Hodgkin lymphoma and cancers of the mouth, throat, liver, lung, and anus. In addition to HIV infection, other factors, such as older age, infection with other viruses (such as HPV or hepatitis B or C virus), and heavy alcohol or tobacco use, may increase the risk of developing a NADC. Also called non-AIDS-defining cancer.
NAE inhibitor listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme called NEDD8-activating enzyme (NAE). NAE is involved in important cell functions, such as cell division. Blocking NAE may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Some NAE inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called NEDD8-activating enzyme inhibitor.
naloxone listen (na-LOK-sone)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for constipation caused by narcotic medications. It belongs to the family of drugs called narcotic antagonists.
naltrexone hydrochloride listen (nal-TREK-sone HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug that blocks the action of opiates (drugs used to treat pain). It may be used in the treatment of intravenous opiate addiction or alcohol dependence. Naltrexone hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It may block the effects of the hormone estrogen, which causes some breast cancer cells to grow, or block the blood flow to tumors. It is a type of opiate antagonist. Also called ReVia and Vivitrol.
Namenda listen (nuh-MEN-duh)
A drug used to treat dementia caused by Alzheimer disease. It is also being studied in the treatment of side effects from whole-brain radiation therapy for cancer and other conditions. Namenda blocks the uptake of calcium by certain brain cells and decreases their activity. It is a type of N-methyl-D-asparatate (NMDA) receptor antagonist. Also called memantine hydrochloride.
nanogram listen (NA-noh-gram)
A measure of weight. One nanogram weighs a billion times less than one gram, and almost a trillion-times less than a pound.
nanometer listen (NA-noh-MEE-ter)
A measure of length in the metric system. A nanometer is one billionth of a meter. An average human hair is about 60,000 nanometers thick. Nanometers are used to measure wavelengths of light and distances between atoms in molecules.
nanomole listen (NA-noh-mole)
The amount of a substance equal to a billionth of a mole (a measure of the amount of a substance). Also called nM.
nanoparticle listen (NA-noh-PAR-tih-kul)
A particle of that is smaller than 100 nanometers (one-billionth of a meter). In medicine, nanoparticles can be used to carry antibodies, drugs, imaging agents, or other substances to certain parts of the body. Nanoparticles are being studied in the detection, diagnosis, and treatment of cancer.
nanoparticle paclitaxel listen (NA-noh-PAR-tih-kul PA-klih-TAK-sil)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has come back or spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with carboplatin to treat advanced non-small cell lung cancer in patients who are not able to have surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nanoparticle paclitaxel is a form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel and may cause fewer side effects than paclitaxel. It stops cancer cells from growing and dividing, and may kill them. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called ABI-007, Abraxane, paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation, and protein-bound paclitaxel.
nanoprobe listen (NA-noh-probe)
A device that uses x-rays instead of visible light to form images of very small structures, such as the insides of blood vessels and cells. It can be used to study processes such as angiogenesis (growth of blood vessels). The term nanoprobe is also used to describe very small particles that can be used in the detection, diagnosis, and treatment of cancer.
nanotechnology listen (NA-noh-tek-NAH-loh-jee)
The field of research that deals with the engineering and creation of things from materials that are less than 100 nanometers (one-billionth of a meter) in size, especially single atoms or molecules. Nanotechnology is being studied in the detection, diagnosis, and treatment of cancer.
Naprosyn listen (NA-proh-sin)
A drug used to treat mild pain and the symptoms of arthritis and several other conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of bone pain in patients with cancer. Naprosyn stops the body from making substances that cause pain and inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) and a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor. Also called naproxen.
naproxen listen (nuh-PROK-sen)
A drug used to treat mild pain and the symptoms of arthritis and several other conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of bone pain in patients with cancer. Naproxen stops the body from making substances that cause pain and inflammation. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) and a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor. Also called Naprosyn.
narcotic listen (nar-KAH-tik)
A substance used to treat moderate to severe pain. Narcotics are like opiates such as morphine and codeine, but are not made from opium. They bind to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Narcotics are now called opioids.
Naropin listen (NUH-roh-pin)
A drug used to control pain and to cause a temporary loss of feeling in one part of the body, during and after surgery. It is also being studied for pain control after cancer surgery. It is a type of local anesthetic. Also called ropivacaine hydrochloride.
nasal listen (NAY-zul)
By or having to do with the nose.
nasal cavity listen (NAY-zul KA-vuh-tee)
The space inside the nose. The nasal cavity lies above the bone that forms the roof of the mouth and curves down at the back to join the throat. It is divided into two sections called nasal passages. Air moves through these passages during breathing. The nasal passages filter and warm the air, and make it moist before it goes into the lungs. They also contain special cells that are involved in the sense of smell.
nasogastric listen (NAY-zoh-GAS-trik)
Describes the passage from the nose to the stomach. For example, a nasogastric tube is inserted through the nose, down the throat and esophagus, and into the stomach.
nasogastric tube listen (NAY-zoh-GAS-trik toob)
A tube that is inserted through the nose, down the throat and esophagus, and into the stomach. It can be used to give drugs, liquids, and liquid food, or used to remove substances from the stomach. Giving food through a nasogastric tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called gastric feeding tube and NG tube.
Nasonex listen (NAY-zoh-nex)
A drug that is used in a cream to treat certain skin conditions and in a nasal spray to treat sinus problems caused by allergies. It is being studied as a way to treat inflammation of the skin caused by radiation therapy. Nasonex is a type of corticosteroid. Also called Elocon and mometasone furoate.
nasopharyngeal cancer listen (NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the nasopharynx (upper part of the throat behind the nose). Most nasopharyngeal cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the nasopharynx).
nasopharynx listen (NAY-zoh-FAYR-inx)
The upper part of the throat behind the nose. An opening on each side of the nasopharynx leads into the ear.
nasoscope listen (NAY-zoh-skope)
A thin tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the nose. A nasoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue. Also called rhinoscope.
nasoscopy listen (nay-ZOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the nose using a nasoscope (or rhinoscope). A nasoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called rhinoscopy.
National Cancer Institute listen (NA-shuh-nul KAN-ser IN-stih-TOOT)
The National Cancer Institute, part of the National Institutes of Health of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, is the Federal Government's principal agency for cancer research. The National Cancer Institute conducts, coordinates, and funds cancer research, training, health information dissemination, and other programs with respect to the cause, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of cancer. Access the National Cancer Institute Web site at http://www.cancer.gov. Also called NCI.
National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health listen (NA-shuh-nul SEN-ter ... KOM-pleh-MEN-tuh-ree ... IN-teh-gray-tiv helth)
A federal agency that uses science to explore complementary and integrative health (CIH) practices, trains CIH researchers, and provides authoritative information about CIH to professionals and the public. The National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health awards grants for research projects, training, and career development in CIH; sponsors conferences, educational programs, and exhibits; studies ways to use proven CIH practices along with conventional medical practice; and supports adding CIH to medical, dental, and nursing school programs. The National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health is part of the National Institutes of Health. Also called NCCIH.
National Clinical Trials Network listen (NA-shuh-nul KLIH-nih-kul TRY-uls NET-wurk)
A National Cancer Institute (NCI) program that gives funds and other support to cancer research organizations to conduct cancer clinical trials. The National Clinical Trials Network (NCTN) helps these organizations develop new clinical trials and manage their regulatory, financial, membership, and scientific committees. It also helps with statistics and data management, Institutional Review Boards (IRBs), and patient tissue sample collection and storage. This support allows researchers to conduct trials that focus on specific cancers and patient populations and new treatment methods. The groups in the NCTN include the Alliance for Clinical Trials in Oncology, ECOG-ACRIN Cancer Research Group, NRG Oncology, SWOG, Children’s Oncology Group (COG), and the NCI of Canada-Clinical Trials Group (NCIC-CTG). The NCTN was previously known as the NCI Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program. Also called NCTN.
National Institutes of Health listen (NA-shuh-nul IN-stih-TOOTS … helth)
A federal agency in the U.S. that conducts biomedical research in its own laboratories; supports the research of non-Federal scientists in universities, medical schools, hospitals, and research institutions throughout the country and abroad; helps in the training of research investigators; and fosters communication of medical information. Access the National Institutes of Health Web site at http://www.nih.gov. Also called NIH.
National Lung Screening Trial listen (NA-shuh-nul … SKREE-ning TRY-ul)
A lung cancer screening trial sponsored by the National Cancer Institute (NCI). In the trial, low-dose spiral CT scans were compared with chest x-rays for their ability to detect lung cancer early. The trial included more than 50,000 participants who were aged 55 to 74 years, were current or former heavy smokers, and had no signs or symptoms of lung cancer. The results of the trial showed that participants who were screened with spiral CT scans had about a 20% lower risk of dying from lung cancer than those who were screened with chest x-rays. Also called NLST.
natural history study listen (NA-chuh-rul HIH-stuh-ree STUH-dee)
A study that follows a group of people over time who have, or are at risk of developing, a specific medical condition or disease. A natural history study collects health information in order to understand how the medical condition or disease develops and how to treat it.
natural killer cell listen (NA-chuh-rul KIH-ler sel)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that can kill tumor cells or cells infected with a virus. A natural killer cell is a type of white blood cell. Also called NK cell and NK-LGL.
natural killer-cell large granular lymphocyte leukemia listen (NA-chuh-rul KIH-ler-sel larj GRAN-yoo-lur LIM-foh-site loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia in which large natural killer (NK) cells (a type of white blood cell) that contain granules (small particles) are found in the blood. It is a chronic disease that may last for a long time and get worse. Also called NK-LGL leukemia and NK-LGLL.
naturopathy listen (NAY-cher-AH-puh-thee)
A system of disease prevention and treatment that avoids drugs and surgery. Naturopathy is based on the use of natural agents such as air, water, light, heat, and massage to help the body heal itself. It also uses herbal products, nutrition, acupuncture, and aromatherapy as forms of treatment.
nausea listen (NAW-zee-uh)
A feeling of sickness or discomfort in the stomach that may come with an urge to vomit. Nausea is a side effect of some types of cancer therapy.
Navelbine listen (nay-VEL-been)
A drug used alone or with cisplatin to treat non-small cell lung cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Navelbine blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. Also called vinorelbine tartrate.
navitoclax listen (na-VIH-toh-klax)
A substance being studied in the treatment of lymphomas and other types of cancer. It blocks some of the enzymes that keep cancer cells from dying. It is a type of Bcl-2 family inhibitor. Also called ABT-263.
NB1011
A substance that is being studied for its ability to make cancer cells respond to drugs to which they have become resistant. It is a type of nucleoside analog.
N-benzoyl-staurosporine listen (...BEN-zoyl-STAW-roh-SPOR-een)
A drug used with cytarabine and daunorubicin to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also used to treat mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia) and systemic mastocytosis (a rare condition in which there are too many mast cells in the body). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. N-benzoyl-staurosporine blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. N-benzoyl-staurosporine is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called midostaurin, PKC412, and Rydapt.
NBI-3001
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by combining interleukin-4 with a bacterial toxin. NBI-3001 is a type of recombinant chimeric protein. Also called interleukin-4 PE38KDEL cytotoxin and interleukin-4 PE38KDEL immunotoxin.
N-butyl-N-(4-hydroxybutyl) nitrosamine listen (... BYOO-tul ... (4-hy-DROK-see-BYOO-tul) ny-TROH-suh-meen)
A substance that is used in cancer research to cause bladder tumors in laboratory animals. This is done to test new diets, drugs, and procedures for use in cancer prevention and treatment.
NCCIH
A federal agency that uses science to explore complementary and integrative health (CIH) practices, trains CIH researchers, and provides authoritative information about CIH to professionals and the public. NCCIH awards grants for research projects, training, and career development in CIH; sponsors conferences, educational programs, and exhibits; studies ways to use proven CIH practices along with conventional medical practice; and supports adding CIH to medical, dental, and nursing school programs. NCCIH is part of the National Institutes of Health. Also called National Center for Complementary and Integrative Health.
NCI
NCI, part of the National Institutes of Health of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, is the Federal Government's principal agency for cancer research. It conducts, coordinates, and funds cancer research, training, health information dissemination, and other programs with respect to the cause, diagnosis, prevention, and treatment of cancer. Access the NCI Web site at http://www.cancer.gov. Also called National Cancer Institute.
NCI clinical trials cooperative group listen (... KLIH-nih-kul TRY-uls koh-AH-pruh-tiv groop)
A group of researchers, cancer centers, and community doctors who are involved in studies that test new ways to screen, prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. Clinical trials run by cooperative groups are funded and supported by the National Cancer Institute (NCI), and large numbers of patients take part in many locations. The current U.S. cooperative groups are the Alliance for Clinical Trials in Oncology, ECOG-ACRIN Cancer Research Group, SWOG, and Children’s Oncology Group (COG). The NCI clinical trials cooperative groups are part of the National Clinical Trials Network (NCTN).
NCI-supported clinical trial listen (… suh-POR-ted KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A research study conducted by researchers and institutions that receive funding or other resources from the National Cancer Institute (NCI). Resources from NCI include programs that provide scientific review and Institutional Review Board (IRB) support and management of patient tissue sample collection and storage. NCI also provides information about the clinical trials, such as regulatory requirements, patient enrollment, funding, and education materials to these researchers. This support allows the people who run the clinical trials more time for patient care and research. NCI-supported trials include trials that are part of NCI’s national networks, such as National Clinical Trials Network (NCTN), NCI Community Oncology Research Program (NCORP), and Experimental Therapeutics Clinical Trials Network (ETCTN). NCI also funds, in full or in part, trials taking place at NCI-designated cancer centers throughout the U.S. and trials taking place at the NIH Clinical Center in Bethesda, Maryland.
NCTN
A National Cancer Institute (NCI) program that gives funds and other support to cancer research organizations to conduct cancer clinical trials. The NCTN helps these organizations develop new clinical trials and manage their regulatory, financial, membership, and scientific committees. It also helps with statistics and data management, Institutional Review Boards (IRBs), and patient tissue sample collection and storage. This support allows researchers to conduct trials that focus on specific cancers and patient populations and new treatment methods. The groups in the NCTN include the Alliance for Clinical Trials in Oncology, ECOG-ACRIN Cancer Research Group, NRG Oncology, SWOG, Children’s Oncology Group (COG), and the NCI of Canada-Clinical Trials Group (NCIC-CTG). The NCTN was previously known as the NCI Clinical Trials Cooperative Group Program. Also called National Clinical Trials Network.
NCX 4016
A substance being studied in the prevention of colorectal cancer. It is a form of aspirin that gives off nitric oxide gas and is less irritating to the lining of the stomach than plain aspirin. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called nitric oxide-releasing acetylsalicylic acid derivative.
NDGA
A drug put on the skin to treat growths caused by sun exposure. A form of NDGA that is taken by mouth is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. NDGA is an antioxidant, and it may block certain enzymes needed for tumor growth. Also called Actinex, masoprocol, and nordihydroguaiaretic acid.
NDV
Newcastle disease virus. A bird virus that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may be used to kill cancer cells directly, or it may be given as a cancer vaccine to stimulate the body’s immune system. NDV is a type of biological response modifier and vaccine therapy. Also called Newcastle disease virus.
nebulizer listen (NEH-byoo-LY-zer)
A device used to turn liquid into a fine spray.
necitumumab listen (NEH-sih-TOO-moo-mab)
A drug used with gemcitabine and cisplatin to treat squamous non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not been treated with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Necitumumab binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Necitumumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Portrazza.
neck dissection listen (... dy-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove lymph nodes and other tissues in the neck.
necrosis listen (neh-KROH-sis)
Refers to the death of living tissues.
NEDD8-activating enzyme inhibitor listen (… AK-tih-vay-ting EN-zime in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme called NEDD8-activating enzyme (NAE). NAE is involved in important cell functions, such as cell division. Blocking NAE may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Some NEDD8-activating enzyme inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy. Also called NAE inhibitor.
needle biopsy listen (NEE-dul BY-op-see)
The removal of tissue or fluid with a needle for examination under a microscope. When a wide needle is used, the procedure is called a core biopsy. When a thin needle is used, the procedure is called a fine-needle aspiration biopsy.
needle localization listen (NEE-dul LOH-kuh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure used to mark a small area of abnormal tissue so it can be removed by surgery. An imaging device is used to guide a thin wire with a hook at the end through a hollow needle to place the wire in or around the abnormal area. Once the wire is in the right place, the needle is removed and the wire is left in place so the doctor will know where the abnormal tissue is. The wire is removed when a biopsy is done. Also called needle/wire localization and wire localization.
needle/wire localization listen (NEE-dul … LOH-kuh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure used to mark a small area of abnormal tissue so it can be removed by surgery. An imaging device is used to guide a thin wire with a hook at the end through a hollow needle to place the wire in or around the abnormal area. Once the wire is in the right place, the needle is removed and the wire is left in place so the doctor will know where the abnormal tissue is. The wire is removed when a biopsy is done. Also called needle localization and wire localization.
needle-localized biopsy listen (NEE-dul-LOH-kuh-lized BY-op-see)
A procedure to mark and remove abnormal tissue when the doctor cannot feel a lump. An imaging device is used to guide a thin wire with a hook on the end through a hollow needle to place the wire in or around the abnormal area. Once the wire is in the right place, the needle is removed and the wire is left in so the doctor will know where the abnormal tissue is. The wire is removed at the time the biopsy is done.
needling listen (NEE-duh-ling)
In acupuncture, the insertion of a thin needle into a specific place on the body to unlock qi (vital energy). The needle may be twirled, moved up and down at different speeds and depths, heated, or charged with a low electric current.
nefazodone listen (neh-FAY-zoh-done)
A drug used to treat depression. It belongs to the family of drugs called antidepressant agents. Also called Serzone.
negative axillary lymph node listen (NEH-guh-tiv AK-sih-LAYR-ee limf ...)
A lymph node in the armpit that is free of cancer.
negative test result listen (NEH-guh-tiv ... reh-ZULT)
A test result that shows the substance or condition the test is supposed to find is not present at all or is present, but in normal amounts. In genetics, a negative test result usually means that a person does not have a mutation (change) in the gene, chromosome, or protein that is being tested. More testing may be needed to make sure a negative test result is correct.
nelarabine listen (neh-LAR-uh-been)
A drug used to treat T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell lymphoblastic lymphoma. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better or has recurred (come back) after treatment with other anticancer drugs. Nelarabine stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 506U78 and Arranon.
nelfinavir mesylate listen (nel-FIH-nuh-veer MEH-zih-layt)
A drug that interferes with the ability of a virus to make copies of itself.
neoadjuvant therapy listen (NEE-oh-A-joo-vant THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment given as a first step to shrink a tumor before the main treatment, which is usually surgery, is given. Examples of neoadjuvant therapy include chemotherapy, radiation therapy, and hormone therapy. It is a type of induction therapy.
neoplasia listen (NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal and uncontrolled cell growth.
neoplasm listen (NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
An abnormal mass of tissue that results when cells divide more than they should or do not die when they should. Neoplasms may be benign (not cancer), or malignant (cancer). Also called tumor.
neoplastic meningitis listen (NEE-oh-PLAS-tik MEH-nin-JY-tis)
A serious problem that may occur in cancer in which cancer cells spread from the original (primary) tumor to the meninges (thin layers of tissue that cover and protect the brain and spinal cord). It can happen in many types of cancer, but is the most common in melanoma, breast, lung, and gastrointestinal cancer. The cancer may cause the meninges to be inflamed. Also called carcinomatous meningitis, leptomeningeal carcinoma, leptomeningeal carcinomatosis, leptomeningeal metastasis, meningeal carcinomatosis, and meningeal metastasis.
nephrectomy listen (neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a kidney or part of a kidney. In a partial nephrectomy, part of one kidney or a tumor is removed, but not an entire kidney. In a simple nephrectomy, one kidney is removed. In a radical nephrectomy, an entire kidney, nearby adrenal gland and lymph nodes, and other surrounding tissue are removed. In a bilateral nephrectomy, both kidneys are removed.
nephrologist listen (neh-FRAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating kidney disease.
nephrostomy listen (neh-FROS-toh-mee)
Surgery to make an opening from the outside of the body to the renal pelvis (part of the kidney that collects urine). This may be done to drain urine from a blocked kidney or blocked ureter into a bag outside the body. It may also be done to look at the kidney using an endoscope (thin, lighted tube attached to a camera), to place anticancer drugs directly into the kidney, or to remove kidney stones.
nephrotomogram listen (NEH-froh-TOH-moh-gram)
A series of x-rays of the kidneys. The x-rays are taken from different angles and show the kidneys clearly, without the shadows of the organs around them.
nephrotoxic listen (NEH-froh-TOK-sik)
Poisonous or damaging to the kidney.
nephroureterectomy listen (NEH-froh-YER-eh-ter-EK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a kidney and its ureter. Also called ureteronephrectomy.
neratinib maleate listen (neh-RA-tih-nib MAY-lee-AYT)
A drug used to treat early stage breast cancer that is HER2 positive. It is used as extended adjuvant treatment in patients who have already been treated with adjuvant trastuzumab. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Neratinib maleate blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Nerlynx.
Nerlynx listen (NAYR-links)
A drug used to treat early stage breast cancer that is HER2 positive. It is used as extended adjuvant treatment in patients who have already been treated with adjuvant trastuzumab. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nerlynx blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called neratinib maleate.
nerve listen (nerv)
A bundle of fibers that receives and sends messages between the body and the brain. The messages are sent by chemical and electrical changes in the cells that make up the nerves.
nerve block listen (nerv blok)
A procedure in which medicine is injected directly into or around a nerve or into the spine to block pain.
nerve cell listen (nerv sel)
A type of cell that receives and sends messages from the body to the brain and back to the body. The messages are sent by a weak electrical current. Also called neuron.
nerve grafting listen (nerv GRAF-ting)
Replacing a damaged nerve with a section of a healthy nerve that has been removed from another part of the body. This procedure is being studied in the prevention of erectile dysfunction in men having surgery for prostate cancer.
nerve growth factor listen (nerv grothe FAK-ter)
A protein made by the body that causes certain nerve cells to grow and helps keep them alive.
nerve-sparing radical prostatectomy listen (nerv-SPAYR-ing RA-dih-kul PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the prostate in which an attempt is made to save the nerves that help cause penile erections.
nerve-sparing surgery listen (nerv-SPAYR-ing SER-juh-ree)
A type of surgery that attempts to save the nerves near the tissues being removed.
nervous system listen (NER-vus SIS-tem)
The organized network of nerve tissue in the body. It includes the central nervous system (the brain and spinal cord), the peripheral nervous system (nerves that extend from the spinal cord to the rest of the body), and other nerve tissue.
NES
A procedure in which small electric impulses are used to stimulate muscles that are weak or paralyzed. It helps to increase muscle strength, blood circulation, and range of motion and to lessen muscle spasms. Also called neuromuscular electrical stimulation, NMES, and therapeutic (subthreshold) electrical stimulation.
netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride listen (neh-TOO-pih-tunt ... pa-loh-NOH-seh-tron HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A combination of two drugs used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is a combination of netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride. Netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride blocks the action of chemicals in the brain that may trigger nausea and vomiting. Netupitant and palonosetron hydrochloride is a type of antiemetic. Also called Akynzeo.
Neulasta listen (noo-LA-stuh)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Neulasta helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a form of filgrastim and is able to stay in the body longer. Neulasta is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called filgrastim-SD/01, Fulphila, and pegfilgrastim.
Neumega listen (noo-MEH-guh)
A drug used to increase the number of blood cells, especially platelets, in some cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. Neumega is a form of interleukin-11 (a cytokine normally made by support cells in the bone marrow) that is made in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called oprelvekin, recombinant human interleukin-11, and rhIL-11.
Neupogen listen (NOO-poh-jen)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Neupogen is also used to treat severe chronic neutropenia and to prepare the blood for the collection of certain types of blood cells. It helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. Neupogen contains the active ingredient filgrastim. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor.
neural listen (NOOR-ul)
Having to do with nerves or the nervous system, including the brain and the spinal cord.
neurobehavioral listen (NOOR-oh-beh-HAY-vyer-ul)
Having to do with the way the brain affects emotion, behavior, and learning. Some cancers or their treatment may cause neurobehavioral problems.
neuroblastoma listen (NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms from immature nerve cells. It usually begins in the adrenal glands but may also begin in the abdomen, chest, or in nerve tissue near the spine. Neuroblastoma most often occurs in children younger than 5 years of age. It is thought to begin before birth. It is usually found when the tumor begins to grow and cause signs or symptoms.
neurocognitive listen (NOOR-oh-KOG-nih-tiv)
Having to do with the ability to think and reason. This includes the ability to concentrate, remember things, process information, learn, speak, and understand.
neurodegenerative disorder listen (NOOR-oh-dee-JEH-neh-ruh-tiv dis-OR-der)
A type of disease in which cells of the central nervous system stop working or die. Neurodegenerative disorders usually get worse over time and have no cure. They may be genetic or be caused by a tumor or stroke. Neurodegenerative disorders also occur in people who drink large amounts of alcohol or are exposed to certain viruses or toxins. Examples of neurodegenerative disorders include Alzheimer's disease and Parkinson's disease.
neuroectodermal tumor listen (NOOR-oh-EK-toh-DER-mul TOO-mer)
A tumor of the central or peripheral nervous system.
neuroendocrine listen (NOOR-oh-EN-doh-krin)
Having to do with the interactions between the nervous system and the endocrine system. Neuroendocrine describes certain cells that release hormones into the blood in response to stimulation of the nervous system.
neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin listen (NOOR-oh-EN-doh-krin KAR-sih-NOH-muh …)
A rare type of cancer that forms on or just beneath the skin, usually in parts of the body that have been exposed to the sun. It is most common in older people and in people with weakened immune systems. Also called Merkel cell cancer, Merkel cell carcinoma, and trabecular cancer.
neuroendocrine tumor listen (NOOR-oh-EN-doh-krin TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms from cells that release hormones into the blood in response to a signal from the nervous system. Neuroendocrine tumors may make higher-than-normal amounts of hormones, which can cause many different symptoms. These tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Some examples of neuroendocrine tumors are carcinoid tumors, islet cell tumors, medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytomas, neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin (Merkel cell cancer), small cell lung cancer, and large cell neuroendocrine carcinoma (a rare type of lung cancer).
neuroepithelial listen (NOOR-oh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul)
Having to do with tissue made up of sensory cells, such as tissue found in the ear, nose, and tongue.
neurofeedback listen (NOOR-oh-FEED-bak)
A treatment being studied to improve brain function in certain brain disorders and in patients treated with chemotherapy for breast cancer. Sensors are placed on a person’s head, which allows brain activity to be shown as patterns on a computer screen. A beep or a tone may be used as a reward to a person for changing certain brain activities. Neurofeedback may help cancer patients deal with the stress and mental side effects of chemotherapy. Also called EEG biofeedback.
neurofibroma listen (NOOR-oh-fy-BROH-muh)
A benign tumor that develops from the cells and tissues that cover nerves.
neurofibromatosis type 1 listen (NOOR-oh-FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis ...)
A rare genetic condition that causes brown spots and tumors on the skin, freckling in skin areas not exposed to the sun, tumors on the nerves, and developmental changes in the nervous system, muscles, bone, and skin. Also called NF1.
neurofibromatosis type 2 listen (NOOR-oh-FY-broh-muh-TOH-sis ...)
A genetic condition in which tumors form on the nerves of the inner ear and cause loss of hearing and balance. Tumors may also occur in the brain and on nerves in the skull and spinal cord, and may cause loss of speech, eye movement, and the ability to swallow. Also called acoustic neurofibromatosis and NF2.
neuroglia listen (noor-OH-glee-uh)
Any of the cells that hold nerve cells in place and help them work the way they should. The types of neuroglia include oligodendrocytes, astrocytes, microglia, and ependymal cells. Also called glial cell.
neuroleptic agent listen (NOOR-oh-LEP-tik AY-jent)
A type of drug used to treat symptoms of psychosis. These include hallucinations (sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or touches that a person believes to be real but are not real), delusions (false beliefs), and dementia (loss of the ability to think, remember, learn, make decisions, and solve problems). Most neuroleptic agents block the action of certain chemicals in the nervous system. Also called antipsychotic and antipsychotic agent.
neuroleptic malignant syndrome listen (NOOR-oh-LEP-tik muh-LIG-nunt SIN-drome)
A life-threatening condition that may be caused by certain drugs used to treat mental illness, nausea, or vomiting. Symptoms include high fever, sweating, unstable blood pressure, confusion, and stiffness. Also called NMS.
neurologic listen (NOOR-oh-LAH-jik)
Having to do with nerves or the nervous system.
neurological exam listen (NOOR-oh-LAH-jih-kul eg-ZAM)
A series of questions and tests to check brain, spinal cord, and nerve function. The exam checks a person’s mental status, coordination, ability to walk, and how well the muscles, sensory systems, and deep tendon reflexes work.
neurologist listen (noor-AH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating disorders of the nervous system.
neuroma listen (noor-OH-muh)
A tumor that arises in nerve cells.
neuromuscular electrical stimulation listen (NOOR-oh-MUS-kyoo-ler ee-LEK-trih-kul STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
A procedure in which small electric impulses are used to stimulate muscles that are weak or paralyzed. It helps to increase muscle strength, blood circulation, and range of motion and to lessen muscle spasms. Also called NES, NMES, and therapeutic (subthreshold) electrical stimulation.
neuromyotonia listen (NOOR-oh-MY-oh-TOH-nee-uh)
A rare nerve disorder that causes constant muscle activity that cannot be controlled, even during sleep. It often affects the muscles in the arms and legs, but may affect the whole body. Symptoms include muscle twitching, weakness, stiffness, and cramping; increased skin temperature, sweating, and heart rate; and problems with chewing, swallowing, speech, and breathing. The disorder often gets worse over time. Neuromyotonia usually occurs in people aged 15 to 60 years. It may occur with certain types of cancer and is sometimes inherited. Also called Isaac syndrome.
neuron listen (NOOR-on)
A type of cell that receives and sends messages from the body to the brain and back to the body. The messages are sent by a weak electrical current. Also called nerve cell.
neuro-oncologist listen (NOOR-oh-on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating brain tumors and other tumors of the nervous system.
neuropathologist listen (NOOR-oh-puh-THAH-loh-jist)
A pathologist who has special training in diseases of the nervous system. A pathologist identifies disease by studying cells and tissues under a microscope.
neuropathy listen (noor-AH-puh-thee)
A nerve problem that causes pain, numbness, tingling, swelling, or muscle weakness in different parts of the body. It usually begins in the hands or feet and gets worse over time. Neuropathy may be caused by cancer or cancer treatment, such as chemotherapy. It may also be caused by physical injury, infection, toxic substances, or conditions such as diabetes, kidney failure, or malnutrition. Also called peripheral neuropathy.
neuropeptide listen (NOOR-oh-PEP-tide)
A member of a class of protein-like molecules made in the brain. Neuropeptides consist of short chains of amino acids, with some functioning as neurotransmitters and some functioning as hormones.
neuropsychologist listen (NOOR-oh-sy-KAH-loh-jist)
A psychologist who diagnoses and treats behavioral and other problems related to the way the brain works. These may include problems with social interactions, ability to control emotions and behaviors, and cognitive abilities (thinking, learning, remembering, and problem solving). These problems may be caused by brain disease, injury, or medical treatment, such as cancer treatment.
neuropsychology listen (NOOR-oh-sy-KAH-loh-jee)
The study of how the brain and central nervous system are related to behavior.
neuroradiologist listen (NOOR-oh-RAY-dee-AH-loh-jist)
A doctor trained in radiology who specializes in creating and interpreting pictures of the nervous system. The pictures are produced using forms of radiation, such as x-rays, sound waves, or other types of energy.
neurosurgeon listen (NOOR-oh-SER-jun)
A doctor who has special training in surgery on the brain, spine, and other parts of the nervous system.
neurotoxicity listen (NOOR-oh-tok-SIH-sih-tee)
The tendency of some treatments to cause damage to the nervous system.
neurotoxin listen (NOOR-oh-TOK-sin)
A substance that is poisonous to nerve tissue.
neurotransmitter listen (NOOR-oh-tranz-MIH-ter)
A chemical that is made by nerve cells and used to communicate with other cells, including other nerve cells and muscle cells.
neurotrophic tyrosine receptor kinase gene fusion listen (NOOR-oh-TROH-fik TY-ruh-seen reh-SEP-ter KY-nays jeen FYOO-zhun)
A mutation (change) that occurs when a piece of the chromosome containing a gene called NTRK breaks off and joins with a gene on another chromosome. Neurotrophic tyrosine receptor kinase gene fusions lead to abnormal proteins called TRK fusion proteins, which may cause cancer cells to grow. Neurotrophic tyrosine receptor kinase gene fusions may be found in some types of cancer, including cancers of the brain, head and neck, thyroid, soft tissue, lung, and colon. Also called NTRK gene fusion.
neurotropism listen (NOOR-oh-TROH-pih-zum)
An ability to invade and live in neural tissue. This term is usually used to describe the ability of viruses to infect nerve tissue.
neutropenia listen (noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell) in the blood.
neutrophil listen (NOO-troh-fil)
A type of immune cell that is one of the first cell types to travel to the site of an infection. Neutrophils help fight infection by ingesting microorganisms and releasing enzymes that kill the microorganisms. A neutrophil is a type of white blood cell, a type of granulocyte, and a type of phagocyte.
nevoid basal cell carcinoma syndrome listen (NEE-voyd BAY-sul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh SIN-drome)
A genetic condition that causes unusual facial features and disorders of the skin, bones, nervous system, eyes, and endocrine glands. People with this syndrome have a higher risk of basal cell carcinoma. Also called basal cell nevus syndrome and Gorlin syndrome.
nevus listen (NEE-vus)
A benign (not cancer) growth on the skin that is formed by a cluster of melanocytes (cells that make a substance called melanin, which gives color to skin and eyes). A nevus is usually dark and may be raised from the skin. Also called mole.
nevus of Ota listen (NEE-vus … OH-tah)
A condition marked by brown, blue, or gray patches, usually on the inside of the eye and on the skin near or around the eye. It may also affect the eyelid and mouth. It is caused by an increase in the number of cells called melanocytes in skin and eye tissue. Melanocytes make a substance called melanin, which gives color to skin and eyes. Having nevus of Ota may increase the risk of glaucoma and a type of eye cancer called intraocular melanoma. Also called oculodermal melanocytosis.
Newcastle disease virus listen (NOO-ka-sul dih-ZEEZ VY-rus)
A bird virus that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may be used to kill cancer cells directly, or it may be given as a cancer vaccine to stimulate the body’s immune system. Newcastle disease virus is a type of biological response modifier and vaccine therapy. Also called NDV.
Nexavar listen (NEK-suh-var)
A drug used to treat advanced kidney cancer and a type of liver cancer that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also used to treat a type of advanced thyroid cancer that did not get better with radioactive iodine treatment. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nexavar stops cancer cells from dividing and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called BAY 43-9006 and sorafenib tosylate.
Nexium listen (NEK-see-um)
A drug that blocks acid from being made in the stomach. It is used to treat acid reflux disease and to prevent certain types of gastrointestinal ulcers. Nexium is being studied in the prevention of esophageal cancer and in the treatment of other conditions, including side effects of chemotherapy. It is a type of anti-ulcer agent. Also called esomeprazole magnesium.
NF1
A rare genetic condition that causes brown spots and tumors on the skin, freckling in skin areas not exposed to the sun, tumors on the nerves, and developmental changes in the nervous system, muscles, bone, and skin. Also called neurofibromatosis type 1.
NF2
A genetic condition in which tumors form on the nerves of the inner ear and cause loss of hearing and balance. Tumors may also occur in the brain and on nerves in the skull and spinal cord, and may cause loss of speech, eye movement, and the ability to swallow. Also called acoustic neurofibromatosis and neurofibromatosis type 2.
NFE2L2
A protein that controls how certain genes are expressed. These genes help protect the cell from damage caused by free radicals (unstable molecules made during normal cell metabolism). Free radicals may play a part in cancer, heart disease, stroke, and other diseases of aging. Also called Nrf2 and nuclear factor (erythroid-derived 2)-like 2.
NF-kappa B listen (…-KA-puh …)
A group of proteins that help control many functions in a cell, including cell growth and survival. These proteins also control the body’s immune and inflammatory responses. NF-kappa B may be overactive or found in higher than normal amounts in some types of cancer cells. This may lead to cancer cell growth. High levels or overactivity of NF-kappa B may also lead to inflammatory disorders, such as asthma and ulcerative colitis, and autoimmune disorders, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called NF-kB and nuclear factor-kappa B.
NF-kB
A group of proteins that help control many functions in a cell, including cell growth and survival. These proteins also control the body’s immune and inflammatory responses. NF-kB may be overactive or found in higher than normal amounts in some types of cancer cells. This may lead to cancer cell growth. High levels or overactivity of NF-kB may also lead to inflammatory disorders, such as asthma and ulcerative colitis, and autoimmune disorders, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called NF-kappa B and nuclear factor-kappa B.
NG tube listen (…toob)
A tube that is inserted through the nose, down the throat and esophagus, and into the stomach. It can be used to give drugs, liquids, and liquid food, or used to remove substances from the stomach. Giving food through an NG tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called gastric feeding tube and nasogastric tube.
NG-monomethyl-L-arginine listen (… MAH-noh-MEH-thul … AR-jih-neen)
An amino acid derivative used to counteract high blood pressure caused by interleukin-2.
NG-nitro-L-arginine listen (… NY-troh … AR-jih-neen)
A form of the amino acid arginine. An amino acid is a protein building block. NG-nitro-L-arginine is being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. In cancer, it may stop the growth of tumor cells by blocking certain proteins needed for tumor cells to grow and by blocking blood flow to the tumor. It is a type of nitric oxide synthase inhibitor and an antiangiogenesis agent. Also called nitroarginine.
NGR-TNF
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by linking tumor necrosis factor (TNF) to a peptide. The peptide binds to tumor blood vessels, and TNF damages them. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called tumor vasculature–targeted tumor necrosis factor alpha.
NHL
Any of a large group of cancers of lymphocytes (white blood cells). NHLs can occur at any age and are often marked by lymph nodes that are larger than normal, fever, and weight loss. There are many different types of NHL. These types can be divided into aggressive (fast-growing) and indolent (slow-growing) types, and they can be formed from either B-cells or T-cells. B-cell NHLs include Burkitt lymphoma, chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma (CLL/SLL), diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, follicular lymphoma, immunoblastic large cell lymphoma, precursor B-lymphoblastic lymphoma, and mantle cell lymphoma. T-cell NHLs include mycosis fungoides, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and precursor T-lymphoblastic lymphoma. Lymphomas that occur after bone marrow or stem cell transplantation are usually B-cell NHLs. Prognosis and treatment depend on the stage and type of disease. Also called non-Hodgkin lymphoma.
niacin listen (NY-uh-sin)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Niacin helps some enzymes work properly and helps skin, nerves, and the digestive tract stay healthy. Niacin is found in many plant and animal products. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough niacin can cause a disease called pellagra (a condition marked by skin, nerve, and digestive disorders). A form of niacin is being studied in the prevention of skin and other types of cancer. Niacin may help to lower blood cholesterol. Also called nicotinic acid and vitamin B3.
niacinamide listen (NY-uh-SIH-nuh-MIDE)
A form of niacin (vitamin B3) that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Niacinamide is found in many plant and animal products and in dietary supplements. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Niacinamide may be used to treat diabetes and certain skin conditions and is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may increase blood flow to cancer cells and block certain enzymes they need to repair damage to their DNA. This may make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. Niacinamide is a type of radiosensitizing agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called nicotinamide.
nicotinamide listen (NIH-koh-TIH-nuh-MIDE)
A form of niacin (vitamin B3) that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Nicotinamide is found in many plant and animal products and in dietary supplements. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Nicotinamide may be used to treat diabetes and certain skin conditions and is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may increase blood flow to cancer cells and block certain enzymes they need to repair damage to their DNA. This may make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. Nicotinamide is a type of radiosensitizing agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called niacinamide.
nicotine listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN)
An addictive, poisonous chemical found in tobacco. It can also be made in the laboratory. When it enters the body, nicotine causes an increased heart rate and use of oxygen by the heart, and a sense of well-being and relaxation. It is also used as an insecticide.
nicotine gum listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN…)
A chewing gum that contains a small dose of nicotine, which enters the blood by being absorbed through the lining of the mouth. This helps stop nicotine cravings and relieves symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. A prescription is not needed for nicotine gum.
nicotine inhaler listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN in-HAY-ler)
A device used to inhale (breathe in) small doses of nicotine through the mouth. The nicotine is absorbed through the lining of the mouth and lungs and goes into the blood. This helps stop nicotine cravings and relieves symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. A prescription is needed for nicotine inhalers.
nicotine lozenge listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN LAH-zinj)
A hard candy-like tablet that contains a small dose of nicotine. The nicotine is absorbed through the lining of the mouth and goes into the blood. This helps stop nicotine cravings and relieves symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. A prescription is not needed for nicotine lozenges.
nicotine nasal spray listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN NAY-zul…)
A nose spray that contains a small dose of nicotine, which enters the blood by being absorbed through the lining of the nose. This helps stop nicotine cravings and relieves symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. A prescription is needed for nicotine nasal spray.
nicotine patch listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN...)
A patch that sticks on the skin and contains a small dose of nicotine, which enters the blood by being absorbed through the skin. This helps stop nicotine cravings and relieves symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. Nicotine patches are available with and without a prescription.
nicotine replacement therapy listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN reh-PLAYS-ment THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses special products to give small, steady doses of nicotine to help stop cravings and relieve symptoms that occur when a person is trying to quit smoking. These products include nicotine gum, nicotine inhaler, nicotine nasal spray, nicotine lozenges, and nicotine patch, and some are available without a prescription. They do not contain any of the other chemicals found in tobacco products.
nicotine vaccine listen (NIH-kuh-TEEN vak-SEEN)
A substance being studied to see if it can help people quit smoking or keep them from starting again. It may stimulate the body’s immune system to make antibodies against nicotine. These antibodies may help keep nicotine from reaching the brain, which can help reduce a person’s craving for nicotine.
nicotinic acid listen (NIH-kuh-TIH-nik A-sid)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Nicotinic acid helps some enzymes work properly and helps skin, nerves, and the digestive tract stay healthy. Nicotinic acid is found in many plant and animal products. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough nicotinic acid can cause a disease called pellagra (a condition marked by skin, nerve, and digestive disorders). A form of nicotinic acid is being studied in the prevention of skin and other types of cancer. Nicotinic acid may help to lower blood cholesterol. Also called niacin and vitamin B3.
NIH
A federal agency in the U.S. that conducts biomedical research in its own laboratories; supports the research of non-Federal scientists in universities, medical schools, hospitals, and research institutions throughout the country and abroad; helps in the training of research investigators; and fosters communication of medical information. Access the NIH Web site at http://www.nih.gov. Also called National Institutes of Health.
Nijmegen breakage syndrome listen (NY-may-gen BRAY-kij SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by a small head, height that is shorter than normal, unusual facial features, and other growth and developmental problems. People with Nijmegen breakage syndrome have a weakened immune system, which may cause them to have frequent sinus, lung, and other respiratory tract infections. They are also at an increased risk of developing certain types of cancer, especially non-Hodgkin lymphoma, rhabdomyosarcoma (a type of soft tissue tumor), and brain cancer. Nijmegen breakage syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called NBN, which is involved in DNA repair. It is a type of DNA repair deficiency syndrome and a type of autosomal recessive genetic disease.
Nilandron listen (nih-LAN-drun)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who have had surgery to remove the testicles (orchiectomy). Nilandron binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Nilandron blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called nilutamide.
nilotinib hydrochloride monohydrate listen (ny-LOH-tih-nib HY-droh-KLOR-ide MAH-noh-HY-drayt)
A drug used to treat certain types of chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that are Philadelphia chromosome positive. It is used in some newly diagnosed patients. It is also used in patients who are not able to take or who have not gotten better after treatment with imatinib mesylate or other tyrosine kinase inhibitor. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nilotinib hydrochloride monohydrate blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Tasigna.
nilutamide listen (ny-LOO-tuh-mide)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who have had surgery to remove the testicles (orchiectomy). Nilutamide binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Nilutamide blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called Nilandron.
nimodipine listen (ny-MOH-dih-peen)
Belongs to a family of drugs called calcium channel blockers. It is being investigated for use with anticancer drugs to prevent or overcome drug resistance and improve response to chemotherapy.
nimotuzumab listen (ny-moh-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Nimotuzumab binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some normal cells and some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Nimotuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Theraloc.
nimustine listen (NY-mus-teen)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Nimustine damages the cell's DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea.
Ninlaro listen (nin-LAR-oh)
A drug used with lenalidomide and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients who received at least one other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ninlaro blocks enzymes called proteasomes, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor. Also called ixazomib citrate.
Nipent listen (NY-pent)
The active ingredient in a drug that is used to treat hairy cell leukemia and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nipent blocks a protein needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is made by a bacterium. It is a type of adenosine deaminase inhibitor. Also called pentostatin.
nipple listen (NIH-pul)
In anatomy, the small raised area in the center of the breast through which milk can flow to the outside.
nipple discharge listen (NIH-pul DIS-charj)
Fluid that is not milk coming from the nipple.
niraparib tosylate monohydrate listen (nih-RA-puh-rib TOH-suh-layt MAH-noh-HY-drayt)
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancers that have gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Niraparib tosylate monohydrate is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Niraparib tosylate monohydrate blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Niraparib tosylate monohydrate is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called Zejula.
nitric acid listen (NY-trik A-sid)
A toxic, corrosive, colorless liquid used to make fertilizers, dyes, explosives, and other chemicals.
nitric oxide-releasing acetylsalicylic acid derivative listen (NY-trik OK-side-reh-LEE-sing A-seh-til-SA-lih-SIH-lik A-sid deh-RIH-vuh-tiv)
A substance being studied in the prevention of colorectal cancer. It is a form of aspirin that gives off nitric oxide gas and is less irritating to the lining of the stomach than plain aspirin. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called NCX 4016.
nitroarginine listen (NY-troh-AR-jih-neen)
A form of the amino acid arginine. An amino acid is a protein building block. Nitroarginine is being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. In cancer, it may stop the growth of tumor cells by blocking certain proteins needed for tumor cells to grow and by blocking blood flow to the tumor. It is a type of nitric oxide synthase inhibitor and an antiangiogenesis agent. Also called NG-nitro-L-arginine.
nitrocamptothecin listen (NY-troh-KAMP-toh-THEH-kin)
An alkaloid drug belonging to a class of anticancer agents called topoisomerase inhibitors.
nitroglycerin listen (NY-troh-GLIH-seh-rin)
In medicine, a substance used as a drug to treat certain heart conditions and to widen the openings in blood vessels. Nitroglycerin is being studied as a way to help chemotherapy work better by making tumor cells more sensitive to the drugs. It is a type of vasodilator.
nitrosamine listen (ny-TROH-suh-meen)
A type of chemical found in tobacco products and tobacco smoke. Nitrosamines are also found in many foods, including fish, beer, fried foods, and meats. Some nitrosamines cause cancer in laboratory animals and may increase the risk of certain types of cancer in humans.
nitrosourea listen (ny-TROH-soh-YOO-ree-uh)
An anticancer drug that can cross the blood-brain barrier. Carmustine and lomustine are nitrosoureas.
nivolumab listen (nih-VOL-yoo-mab)
A drug used alone or with ipilimumab to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has mutations (changes) in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also used with ipilimumab in some patients to treat renal cell carcinoma (RCC) and melanoma. Nivolumab is also used alone in some patients to treat small cell lung cancer, non-small cell lung cancer, cancer of the head and neck, Hodgkin lymphoma, melanoma, RCC, urothelial carcinoma, and hepatocellular carcinoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Nivolumab binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Nivolumab may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Opdivo.
NK cell listen (… sel)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that can kill tumor cells or cells infected with a virus. An NK cell is a type of white blood cell. Also called natural killer cell and NK-LGL.
NK-LGL
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that can kill tumor cells or cells infected with a virus. An NK-LGL is a type of white blood cell. Also called natural killer cell and NK cell.
NK-LGL leukemia listen (... loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia in which large natural killer (NK) cells (a type of white blood cell) that contain granules (small particles) are found in the blood. It is a chronic disease that may last for a long time and get worse. Also called natural killer-cell large granular lymphocyte leukemia and NK-LGLL.
NK-LGLL
A type of leukemia in which large natural killer (NK) cells (a type of white blood cell) that contain granules (small particles) are found in the blood. It is a chronic disease that may last for a long time and get worse. Also called natural killer-cell large granular lymphocyte leukemia and NK-LGL leukemia.
NLPHL
A rare type of Hodgkin lymphoma (a cancer of the immune system). It is marked by the presence of lymphocyte-predominant cells, which used to be called popcorn cells. These cells are different from the typical Reed-Sternberg cells found in classic Hodgkin lymphoma. NLPHL may change into diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called LPHL, lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma, and nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma.
NLST
A lung cancer screening trial sponsored by the National Cancer Institute (NCI). In the trial, low-dose spiral CT scans were compared with chest x-rays for their ability to detect lung cancer early. The trial included more than 50,000 participants who were aged 55 to 74 years, were current or former heavy smokers, and had no signs or symptoms of lung cancer. The results of the trial showed that participants who were screened with spiral CT scans had about a 20% lower risk of dying from lung cancer than those who were screened with chest x-rays. Also called National Lung Screening Trial.
nM listen
The amount of a substance equal to a billionth of a mole (a measure of the amount of a substance). Also called nanomole.
NMC
A rare type of cancer that forms in the respiratory tract and other places along the middle of the body, from the head to the abdomen. This includes the thymus, the area between the lungs, and the pancreas, liver, and bladder. NMC is caused when a piece of chromosome 15 containing the NUT gene breaks off and attaches to another chromosome. It is usually aggressive (fast-growing) and cannot be cured. NMC usually occurs in children and young adults. Also called NUT midline carcinoma.
NMES
A procedure in which small electric impulses are used to stimulate muscles that are weak or paralyzed. It helps to increase muscle strength, blood circulation, and range of motion and to lessen muscle spasms. Also called NES, neuromuscular electrical stimulation, and therapeutic (subthreshold) electrical stimulation.
NMP22
A protein found inside the nucleus of a cell. It is involved in making DNA, RNA, and proteins. It also helps control how certain genes are expressed (turned on) in a cell. NMP22 may be found in higher than normal amounts in the urine of patients with some types of cancer, including bladder cancer. Measuring the amount of NMP22 in the urine may help diagnose cancer or find out how well treatment is working. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called nuclear matrix protein 22.
NMRI
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to create detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and diseased tissue. NMRI makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other scanning techniques, such as computed tomography (CT) or x-ray. NMRI is especially useful for imaging the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones. Also called magnetic resonance imaging, MRI, and nuclear magnetic resonance imaging.
NMS
A life-threatening condition that may be caused by certain drugs used to treat mental illness, nausea, or vomiting. Symptoms include high fever, sweating, unstable blood pressure, confusion, and stiffness. Also called neuroleptic malignant syndrome.
nocebo listen (noh-SEE-boh)
A harmless substance or treatment that may cause harmful side effects or worsening of symptoms because the patient thinks or believes they may occur or expects them to occur. For example, in a clinical trial, patients who are not given an active treatment but are told what side effects the active treatment may cause may have the same side effects as the patients who are given the active treatment just because they expect them to occur.
nocebo effect listen (noh-SEE-boh eh-FEKT)
A situation in which a patient develops side effects or symptoms that can occur with a drug or other therapy just because the patient believes they may occur. For example, in a clinical trial, patients who are not given an active treatment, but are told what side effects the active treatment may cause, may have the same side effects as the patients who are given the active treatment, only because they expect them to occur.
node-negative listen (node-NEH-guh-tiv)
Cancer that has not spread to the lymph nodes.
node-positive listen (... PAH-zih-tiv)
Cancer that has spread to the lymph nodes.
nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma listen (NAH-juh-ler LIM-foh-site-preh-DAH-mih-nunt HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
A rare type of Hodgkin lymphoma (a cancer of the immune system). It is marked by the presence of lymphocyte-predominant cells, which used to be called popcorn cells. These cells are different from the typical Reed-Sternberg cells found in classic Hodgkin lymphoma. Nodular lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma may change into diffuse large B-cell lymphoma. Also called LPHL, lymphocyte-predominant Hodgkin lymphoma, and NLPHL.
nodular parenchyma listen (NAH-juh-ler puh-REN-kih-muh)
A small mass of tissue within a gland or organ that carries out the specialized functions of the gland or organ.
nodule listen (NAH-jool)
A growth or lump that may be malignant (cancer) or benign (not cancer).
nolatrexed listen (NOH-luh-TREK-sed)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors. Also called AG337 and Thymitaq.
nomogram listen (NAH-moh-gram)
A mathematical device or model that shows relationships between things. For example, a nomogram of height and weight measurements can be used to find the surface area of a person, without doing the math, to determine the right dose of chemotherapy. Nomograms of patient and disease characteristics can help predict the outcome of some kinds of cancer.
non-AIDS-defining cancer listen (… deh-FY-ning KAN-ser)
A type of cancer that is more likely to occur in people who are infected with human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) than in people who are not infected. Non-AIDS-defining cancers include Hodgkin lymphoma and cancers of the mouth, throat, liver, lung, and anus. In addition to HIV infection, other factors, such as older age, infection with other viruses (such as HPV or hepatitis B or C virus), and heavy alcohol or tobacco use, may increase the risk of developing a non-AIDS-defining cancer. Also called NADC.
nonavalent vaccine listen (NOH-nuh-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine that works by stimulating an immune response against nine different antigens, such as nine different viruses or other microorganisms. For example, Gardasil 9 is a nonavalent vaccine that helps protect the body against infection with nine different types of human papillomaviruses (HPV).
nonblinded listen (non-BLINE-ded)
Describes a clinical trial or other experiment in which the researchers know what treatments are being given to each study subject or experimental group. If human subjects are involved, they know what treatments they are receiving.
nonconsecutive case series listen (non-kun-SEH-kyoo-tiv kays SEER-eez)
A clinical study that includes some, but not all, of the eligible patients identified by the researchers during the study registration period. This type of study does not usually have a control group.
noncontiguous lymphoma listen (non-kun-TIG-yoo-us lim-FOH-muh)
Lymphoma in which the lymph nodes containing cancer are not next to each other, but are on the same side of the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs that helps breathing and separates the chest from the abdomen).
nonfunctioning tumor listen (non-FUNK-shuh-ning TOO-mer)
A tumor that is found in endocrine tissue but does not make extra hormones. Nonfunctioning tumors usually do not cause symptoms until they grow large or spread to other parts of the body. Also called endocrine-inactive tumor.
nonhematologic cancer listen (non-HEE-muh-tuh-LAH-jik KAN-ser)
Cancer that does not begin in the blood or bone marrow.
nonheritable listen (non-HAYR-ih-tuh-bul)
In medicine, describes a characteristic or trait that cannot be passed from a parent to a child through the genes. Nonheritable forms of cancer may occur when there is a mutation (change) in the DNA in any of the cells of the body, except the germ cells (sperm and egg). People who have a nonheritable form of cancer do not have a family history of that cancer or an inherited change in their DNA that would increase their risk for that cancer.
non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Any of a large group of cancers of lymphocytes (white blood cells). Non-Hodgkin lymphomas can occur at any age and are often marked by lymph nodes that are larger than normal, fever, and weight loss. There are many different types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. These types can be divided into aggressive (fast-growing) and indolent (slow-growing) types, and they can be formed from either B-cells or T-cells. B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas include Burkitt lymphoma, chronic lymphocytic leukemia/small lymphocytic lymphoma (CLL/SLL), diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, follicular lymphoma, immunoblastic large cell lymphoma, precursor B-lymphoblastic lymphoma, and mantle cell lymphoma. T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas include mycosis fungoides, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and precursor T-lymphoblastic lymphoma. Lymphomas that occur after bone marrow or stem cell transplantation are usually B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas. Prognosis and treatment depend on the stage and type of disease. Also called NHL.
noni listen (NOH-nee)
Morinda citrifolia. A tropical shrub. An extract from the fruit is being studied as a treatment for cancer, and extracts from the fruit, leaves, or roots have been used in some cultures to treat other diseases. Also called Morinda citrifolia.
non-inferiority trial listen (… in-FEER-ee-OR-ih-tee TRY-ul)
A study that tests whether a new treatment is not worse than an active treatment it is being compared to. Non-inferiority trials are sometimes done when a placebo (an inactive treatment) cannot be used. These trials may show that a new treatment (such as a drug) is not worse than the active treatment being compared, and it may be safer and easier to take or cause fewer side effects.
noninvasive listen (NON-in-VAY-siv)
In medicine, it describes a procedure that does not require inserting an instrument through the skin or into a body opening. In cancer, it describes disease that has not spread outside the tissue in which it began.
non-ionizing radiation listen (non-I-uh-NY-zing RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of low-energy radiation that does not have enough energy to remove an electron (negative particle) from an atom or molecule. Non-ionizing radiation includes visible, infrared, and ultraviolet light; microwaves; radio waves; and radiofrequency energy from cell phones. Most types of non-ionizing radiation have not been found to cause cancer.
nonlytic listen (non-LIH-tik)
In biology, refers to viruses that do not kill infected cells by disrupting their plasma membranes.
nonmalignant listen (non-muh-LIG-nunt)
Not cancerous. Nonmalignant tumors may grow larger but do not spread to other parts of the body. Also called benign.
nonmalignant hematologic disorder listen (non-muh-LIG-nunt HEE-muh-tuh-LAH-jik dis-OR-der)
A disorder of the blood. Some nonmalignant hematologic disorders may lead to leukemia.
nonmelanoma skin cancer listen (non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser)
Skin cancer that forms in the lower part of the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin) or in squamous cells, but not in melanocytes (skin cells that make pigment).
nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the eyelid listen (non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too ... I-lid)
Abnormal cells are found in the epidermis, usually in the basal cell layer. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called stage 0 nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the eyelid.
nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too ...)
Abnormal cells are found in the squamous cell or basal cell layer of the epidermis. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called stage 0 nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the head and neck (not on the eyelid).
nonmelanomatous listen (non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh-tus)
Having to do with skin cancer that forms in the lower part of the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin) or in squamous cells, but not in melanocytes (skin cells that make pigment).
nonmetastatic listen (non-meh-tuh-STA-tik)
Cancer that has not spread from the primary site (place where it started) to other places in the body.
nonopioid listen (non-OH-pee-OYD)
A drug that is not an opioid. Examples include acetaminophen and nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDS), such as aspirin and ibuprofen.
nonprescription listen (NON-preh-SKRIP-shun)
Refers to a medicine that can be bought without a prescription (doctor's order). Examples include analgesics (pain relievers), such as aspirin and acetaminophen. Also called OTC and over-the-counter.
nonrandomized clinical trial listen (non-RAN-duh-mized KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A clinical trial in which the participants are not assigned by chance to different treatment groups. Participants may choose which group they want to be in, or they may be assigned to the groups by the researchers.
nonseminoma listen (NON-seh-mih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in cells that form sperm or eggs. There are several types of nonseminoma tumors, including embryonal carcinoma, malignant teratoma, choriocarcinoma, and yolk sac tumor. These tumors are usually made up of more than one type of cancer cell. Although nonseminomas occur most often in the testicles or ovaries, they can occur in other tissues, such as the brain, chest, or abdomen. This happens when cells that have the ability to form sperm or eggs are found in other parts of the body.
non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
A group of lung cancers that are named for the kinds of cells found in the cancer and how the cells look under a microscope. The three main types of non-small cell lung cancer are squamous cell carcinoma, large cell carcinoma, and adenocarcinoma. Non-small cell lung cancer is the most common kind of lung cancer.
nonspecific immune cell listen (non-speh-SIH-fik ih-MYOON sel)
A cell (such as a phagocyte or a macrophage) that responds to many antigens, not just one antigen.
nonspecific immune stimulation listen (non-speh-SIH-fik ih-MYOON STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
A type of cancer therapy that works by stimulating the immune system in a general way rather than by targeting cancer cells specifically. It may also help the body fight infection and other diseases. Agents used for nonspecific immune stimulation include BCG, interferon alpha, and certain types of interleukin.
nonspecific immunomodulating agent listen (non-speh-SIH-fik IH-myoo-noh-MOD-yoo-lay-ting AY-jent)
A substance that stimulates or suppresses the immune system in a general way. A nonspecific immunomodulating agent may stimulate the immune system to help the body fight cancer, infection, or other conditions. Or it may suppress the immune system to help treat autoimmune diseases, such as lupus, or to help keep a person from rejecting a bone marrow or organ transplant.
nonstarchy vegetable listen (non-STAR-chee VEJ-tuh-bul)
A member of the family of vegetables that does not contain starch (sugar molecules joined chemically). Nonstarchy vegetables are usually lower in sugar and higher in fiber than starchy vegetables. Examples are broccoli, carrots, celery, peppers, tomatoes, and zucchini.
nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug listen (NON-steh-ROY-dul AN-tee-in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee ...)
A drug that decreases fever, swelling, pain, and redness. Also called NSAID.
nonsteroidal aromatase inhibitor listen (NON-steh-ROY-dul uh-ROH-muh-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that decreases the production of sex hormones (estrogen or testosterone) and slows the growth of tumors that need sex hormones to grow.
nontoxic listen (non-TOK-sik)
Not harmful or destructive.
Noonan syndrome listen (NOO-nun SIN-drome)
A genetic disorder marked by unusual facial features, being shorter than normal, learning problems, heart defects, bleeding problems, defects in the skeleton (bones of the body), and fertility problems in males. People with Noonan syndrome have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, such as rhabdomyosarcoma (a soft tissue tumor), neuroblastoma (cancer of immature nerve cells), and some types of leukemia.
noradrenaline listen (NOR-uh-dreh-nuh-lin)
A chemical made by some nerve cells and in the adrenal gland. It can act as both a neurotransmitter (a chemical messenger used by nerve cells) and a hormone (a chemical that travels in the blood and controls the actions of other cells or organs). Noradrenaline is released from the adrenal gland in response to stress and low blood pressure. Also called norepinephrine.
nordihydroguaiaretic acid listen (NOR-dy-HY-droh-GWY-uh-reh-tik A-sid)
A drug put on the skin to treat growths caused by sun exposure. A form of nordihydroguaiaretic acid that is taken by mouth is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. Nordihydroguaiaretic acid is an antioxidant, and it may block certain enzymes needed for tumor growth. Also called Actinex, masoprocol, and NDGA.
norepinephrine listen (NOR-eh-pih-NEH-frin)
A chemical made by some nerve cells and in the adrenal gland. It can act as both a neurotransmitter (a chemical messenger used by nerve cells) and a hormone (a chemical that travels in the blood and controls the actions of other cells or organs). Norepinephrine is released from the adrenal gland in response to stress and low blood pressure. Also called noradrenaline.
normal range listen (NOR-mul raynj)
In medicine, a set of values that a doctor uses to interpret a patient’s test results. The normal range for a given test is based on the results that are seen in 95% of the healthy population. Sometimes patients whose test results are outside of the normal range may be healthy, and some patients whose test results are within the normal range may have a health problem. The normal range for a test may be different for different groups of people (for example, men and women). Also called reference interval, reference range, and reference values.
nortriptyline listen (nor-TRIP-tih-leen)
A drug used to treat depression. It may also be used to treat panic or anxiety disorders and certain types of pain, and to help people quit smoking. Nortriptyline increases the levels of norepinephrine and other natural chemicals in the brain. This helps improve mood and may reduce a person’s craving for nicotine. It is a type of tricyclic antidepressant. Also called Aventyl and Pamelor.
Norvir listen (NOR-veer)
A drug used to treat infection with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS). It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Norvir blocks the ability of HIV to make copies of itself and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called ritonavir.
notary public listen (NOH-tuh-ree PUH-blik)
A person who has a license that gives them the legal power to witness the signing of documents, to certify that documents are real, and to take statements made under oath.
novobiocin listen (NOH-voh-BY-oh-sin)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection.
NP
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to diagnose and treat disease. NPs are licensed at the state level and certified by national nursing organizations. In cancer care, an NP may manage the primary care of patients and their families, based on a practice agreement with a doctor. Also called advanced practice nurse, APN, and nurse practitioner.
Nplate listen (EN-playt)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. Nplate binds to the thrombopoietin receptor, which causes the bone marrow to make more platelets. It is a type of thrombopoietin receptor agonist. Also called AMG 531 and romiplostim.
NPO
A Latin abbreviation for “nothing by mouth.”
Nrf2
A protein that controls how certain genes are expressed. These genes help protect the cell from damage caused by free radicals (unstable molecules made during normal cell metabolism). Free radicals may play a part in cancer, heart disease, stroke, and other diseases of aging. Also called NFE2L2 and nuclear factor (erythroid-derived 2)-like 2.
NR-LU-10 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein found on the surface of some cancers.
NSAID listen
A drug that decreases fever, swelling, pain, and redness. Also called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug.
NSC 655649
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called antitumor antibiotics and topoisomerase inhibitors. Also called rebeccamycin analog.
NTRK gene fusion listen (… jeen FYOO-zhun)
A mutation (change) that occurs when a piece of the chromosome containing a gene called NTRK breaks off and joins with a gene on another chromosome. NTRK gene fusions lead to abnormal proteins called TRK fusion proteins, which may cause cancer cells to grow. NTRK gene fusions may be found in some types of cancer, including cancers of the brain, head and neck, thyroid, soft tissue, lung, and colon. Also called neurotrophic tyrosine receptor kinase gene fusion.
NTX-010
A virus being studied in the treatment of neuroendocrine tumors and other types of cancer. Neuroendocrine tumors form from cells that release hormones in response to a signal from the nervous system. The virus infects and breaks down these tumor cells but not normal cells. It is a type of oncolytic virus. Also called Seneca Valley virus-001 and SVV-001.
nuclear factor (erythroid-derived 2)-like 2 listen (NOO-klee-er FAK-ter eh-RITH-royd-deh-RIVED …)
A protein that controls how certain genes are expressed. These genes help protect the cell from damage caused by free radicals (unstable molecules made during normal cell metabolism). Free radicals may play a part in cancer, heart disease, stroke, and other diseases of aging. Also called NFE2L2 and Nrf2.
nuclear factor-kappa B listen (NOO-klee-er FAK-ter-KA-puh …)
A group of proteins that help control many functions in a cell, including cell growth and survival. These proteins also control the body’s immune and inflammatory responses. Nuclear factor-kappa B may be overactive or found in higher than normal amounts in some types of cancer cells. This may lead to cancer cell growth. High levels or overactivity of nuclear factor-kappa B may also lead to inflammatory disorders, such as asthma and ulcerative colitis, and autoimmune disorders, such as rheumatoid arthritis. Also called NF-kappa B and NF-kB.
nuclear grade listen (NOO-klee-er grayd)
An evaluation of the size and shape of the nucleus in tumor cells and the percentage of tumor cells that are in the process of dividing or growing. Cancers with low nuclear grade grow and spread less quickly than cancers with high nuclear grade.
nuclear magnetic resonance imaging listen (NOO-klee-er mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts IH-muh-jing)
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to create detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and diseased tissue. Nuclear magnetic resonance imaging makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other scanning techniques, such as computed tomography (CT) or x-ray. Nuclear magnetic resonance imaging is especially useful for imaging the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones. Also called magnetic resonance imaging, MRI, and NMRI.
nuclear matrix protein 22 listen (NOO-klee-er MAY-trix PROH-teen …)
A protein found inside the nucleus of a cell. It is involved in making DNA, RNA, and proteins. It also helps control how certain genes are expressed (turned on) in a cell. Nuclear matrix protein 22 may be found in higher than normal amounts in the urine of patients with some types of cancer, including bladder cancer. Measuring the amount of nuclear matrix protein 22 in the urine may help diagnose cancer or find out how well treatment is working. It is a type of tumor marker. Also called NMP22.
nuclear medicine listen (NOO-klee-er MEH-dih-sin)
A branch of medicine that uses small amounts of radioactive substances to make pictures of areas inside the body and to treat disease. In cancer, the radioactive substance may be used with a special machine (such as a PET scanner) to find the cancer, to see how far it has spread, or to see how well a treatment is working. Radioactive substances may also be used to treat certain types of cancer, such as thyroid cancer and lymphoma.
nuclear medicine scan listen (NOO-klee-er MEH-dih-sin skan)
A method that uses radioactive substances to make pictures of areas inside the body. The radioactive substance is injected into the body, and locates and binds to specific cells or tissues, including cancer cells. Images are made using a special machine that detects the radioactive substance. Also called radioimaging.
nucleolus listen (noo-KLEE-uh-lus)
An area inside the nucleus of a cell that is made up of RNA and proteins and is where ribosomes are made. Ribosomes help link amino acids together to form proteins. The nucleolus is a cell organelle.
nucleotide listen (NOO-klee-oh-tide)
A building block for nucleic acids (the molecules inside cells that carry genetic information). Nucleotides are attached end-to-end to form the nucleic acids DNA and RNA.
nucleus listen (NOO-klee-us)
In biology, the structure in a cell that contains the chromosomes. The nucleus has a membrane around it, and is where RNA is made from the DNA in the chromosomes.
Nucynta listen (noo-SIN-tuh)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It binds to opioid receptors and other molecules in the central nervous system. Nucynta is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called tapentadol hydrochloride.
Numorphan listen (noo-MOR-fan)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It is also used as a sedative before surgery, to help with anesthesia during surgery, during labor, and to treat anxiety caused by some medical conditions. It is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Numorphan is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Opana and oxymorphone hydrochloride.
nurse listen (nurs)
A health professional trained to care for people who are ill or disabled.
nurse case manager listen (... MA-nih-jer)
A registered nurse who has special training in how to plan, manage, and evaluate all aspects of patient care, especially for patients who get treatment over a long time. Also called case management nurse.
nurse practitioner listen (… prak-TIH-shuh-ner)
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to diagnose and treat disease. Nurse practitioners are licensed at the state level and certified by national nursing organizations. In cancer care, a nurse practitioner may manage the primary care of patients and their families, based on a practice agreement with a doctor. Also called advanced practice nurse, APN, and NP.
nursing home listen (NUR-sing home)
A place that gives care to people who have physical or mental disabilities and need help with activities of daily living (such as taking a bath, getting dressed, and going to the bathroom) but do not need to be in the hospital.
NUT gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that causes a rare type of cancer called NUT midline carcinoma, when it is mutated (changed). The mutation occurs when a piece of the chromosome containing the NUT gene breaks off and attaches to another chromosome. In its natural, unchanged form, the NUT gene codes for a protein found in germ cells (reproductive cells) in the testicles and ovaries.
NUT midline carcinoma listen (… MID-line KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the respiratory tract and other places along the middle of the body, from the head to the abdomen. This includes the thymus, the area between the lungs, and the pancreas, liver, and bladder. NUT midline carcinoma is caused when a piece of chromosome 15 containing the NUT gene breaks off and attaches to another chromosome. It is usually aggressive (fast-growing) and cannot be cured. NUT midline carcinoma usually occurs in children and young adults. Also called NMC.
nutraceutical listen (noo-truh-SOO-tih-kul)
A food or dietary supplement that is believed to provide health benefits.
nutrient listen (NOO-tree-ent)
A chemical compound (such as protein, fat, carbohydrate, vitamin, or mineral) contained in foods. These compounds are used by the body to function and grow.
nutrient-dense food listen (NOO-tree-ent-dents …)
Food that is high in nutrients but relatively low in calories. Nutrient-dense foods contain vitamins, minerals, complex carbohydrates, lean protein, and healthy fats. Examples of nutrient-dense foods include fruits and vegetables, whole grains, low-fat or fat-free milk products, seafood, lean meats, eggs, peas, beans, and nuts.
nutrigenomics listen (NOO-trih-jeh-NOH-mix)
The study of how food affects a person’s genes and how a person’s genes affect the way the body responds to food. Nutrigenomics is used to learn more about how genes and diet together may affect a person’s health and risk of developing diseases, such as cancer. It may also help find new ways to prevent and treat disease.
nutrition listen (noo-TRIH-shun)
The taking in and use of food and other nourishing material by the body. Nutrition is a 3-part process. First, food or drink is consumed. Second, the body breaks down the food or drink into nutrients. Third, the nutrients travel through the bloodstream to different parts of the body where they are used as "fuel" and for many other purposes. To give the body proper nutrition, a person has to eat and drink enough of the foods that contain key nutrients.
nutrition therapy listen (noo-TRIH-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment based on nutrition. It includes checking a person’s nutrition status, and giving the right foods or nutrients to treat conditions such as those caused by diabetes, heart disease, and cancer. It may involve simple changes in a person’s diet, or intravenous or tube feeding. Nutrition therapy may help patients recover more quickly and spend less time in the hospital. Also called medical nutrition therapy.
nutritional counseling listen (noo-TRIH-shuh-nul KOWN-suh-ling)
A process by which a health professional with special training in nutrition helps people make healthy food choices and form healthy eating habits. In cancer treatment, the goal of nutritional counseling is to help patients stay healthy during and after treatment and to stay strong enough to fight infections and the recurrence of disease. Also called dietary counseling.
nutritional status listen (noo-TRIH-shuh-nul STA-tus)
The state of a person’s health in terms of the nutrients in his or her diet.
nutritional supplement listen (noo-TRIH-shuh-nul SUH-pleh-ment)
A product that is added to the diet. A nutritional supplement is taken by mouth, and usually contains one or more dietary ingredient (such as vitamin, mineral, herb, amino acid, and enzyme). Also called dietary supplement.
nutritionist listen (noo-TRIH-shuh-nist)
A person who helps people form healthy eating habits to improve health and prevent disease. They may provide nutritional counseling, meal planning, and nutrition education programs. Nutritionists may also look at how the environment affects the quality and safety of food and how it may affect health.
Nuvigil listen (NOO-vih-jil)
A drug that is used to treat certain sleep disorders, such as narcolepsy. It makes patients feel more alert and awake. It is also being studied in the treatment of insomnia and fatigue in patients treated for cancer. Nuvigil acts in a part of the brain that controls sleep and wakefulness. It is a type of wakefulness-promoting agent. Also called armodafinil.
nystatin listen (ny-STA-tin)
The active ingredient in a drug used to treat infections caused by fungi (a type of microorganism). Nystatin is made by certain strains of bacteria and kills fungi by binding to their membranes. It is a type of antifungal agent.
O(6)-benzylguanine listen (… BEN-zul-GWAH-neen)
A drug that may improve the response of cancer cells to chemotherapy.
ob/gyn listen
A branch of medicine that specializes in the care of women during pregnancy and childbirth and in the diagnosis and treatment of diseases of the female reproductive organs. It also specializes in other women’s health issues, such as menopause, hormone problems, contraception (birth control), and infertility. Also called obstetrics and gynecology.
obatoclax mesylate listen (oh-BA-toh-klax MEH-zih-layt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It is a form of obatoclax, which blocks the activity of certain proteins needed for cells to live and may cause tumor cells to die. It is a type of apoptosis inducer.
obese listen (oh-BEES)
Having an abnormally high, unhealthy amount of body fat.
obesity listen (oh-BEE-sih-tee)
A condition marked by an abnormally high, unhealthy amount of body fat.
obinutuzumab listen (OH-bin-yoo-TOO-zoo-mab)
A drug used with other drugs to treat certain types of follicular lymphoma that have not already been treated. It is also used with bendamustine to treat follicular lymphoma that came back or has not gotten better after treatment with rituximab. Obinutuzumab is also used with chlorambucil to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) that has not already been treated. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Obinutuzumab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Obinutuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Gazyva.
objective improvement listen (ub-JEK-tiv im-PROOV-ment)
An improvement that can be measured by the health care provider (for example, when a tumor shrinks or there are fewer cancer cells in the blood).
objective response listen (ub-JEK-tiv reh-SPONTS)
A measurable response.
oblimersen sodium listen (oh-blih-MER-sen SOH-dee-um)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may kill cancer cells by blocking the production of a protein that makes cancer cells live longer and by making them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligodeoxyribonucleotide. Also called augmerosen, bcl-2 antisense oligodeoxynucleotide G3139, and Genasense.
observation listen (OB-ser-VAY-shun)
In medicine, watching a patient’s condition but not giving treatment unless symptoms appear or change.
observational study listen (OB-ser-VAY-shuh-nul STUH-dee)
A type of study in which individuals are observed or certain outcomes are measured. No attempt is made to affect the outcome (for example, no treatment is given).
obsessive-compulsive disorder listen (ob-SEH-siv-kum-PUL-siv dis-OR-der)
An anxiety disorder in which a person has intrusive ideas, thoughts, or images that occur repeatedly, and in which he or she feels driven to perform certain behaviors over and over again. For example, a person may worry all the time about germs and so will wash his or her hands over and over again. Having an obsessive-compulsive disorder may cause a person to have trouble carrying out daily activities.
obstetrician listen (OB-steh-TRIH-shun)
A doctor who specializes in caring for women during pregnancy and childbirth. Obstetricians also care for the fetus (unborn baby), treat problems with pregnancy, and deliver babies.
obstetrics and gynecology listen (ob-STEH-trix ... GY-neh-KAH-loh-jee)
A branch of medicine that specializes in the care of women during pregnancy and childbirth and in the diagnosis and treatment of diseases of the female reproductive organs. It also specializes in other women’s health issues, such as menopause, hormone problems, contraception (birth control), and infertility. Also called ob/gyn.
obstruction listen (ub-STRUK-shun)
Blockage of a passageway.
obtundation listen (ob-tun-DAY-shun)
A dulled or reduced level of alertness or consciousness.
occult primary tumor listen (uh-KULT PRY-mayr-ee TOO-mer)
Cancer in which the site of the primary (original) tumor cannot be found. Most metastases from occult primary tumors are found in the head and neck.
occult stage non-small cell lung cancer listen (uh-KULT ... sel lung KAN-ser)
Cancer cannot be seen by imaging or bronchoscopy. Cancer cells are found in sputum or bronchial washings (a sample of cells taken from inside the airways that lead to the lungs). Cancer may have spread to other parts of the body.
occupational therapist listen (AH-kyoo-PAY-shuh-nul THAYR-uh-pist)
A health professional trained to help people who are ill or disabled learn to manage their daily activities.
OCT
A procedure that uses infrared light waves to give three-dimensional (3-D) pictures of structures inside tissues and organs. The pictures are made by a computer linked to the light source. Also called optical coherence tomography.
octreotide listen (ok-TREE-oh-tide)
A drug similar to the naturally occurring growth hormone inhibitor somatostatin. Octreotide is used to treat diarrhea and flushing associated with certain types of tumors.
octreotide scan listen (ok-TREE-oh-tide skan)
A type of radionuclide scan used to find carcinoid and other types of tumors. Radioactive octreotide, a drug similar to somatostatin, is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. The radioactive octreotide attaches to tumor cells that have receptors for somatostatin. A radiation-measuring device detects the radioactive octreotide, and makes pictures showing where the tumor cells are in the body. Also called somatostatin receptor scintigraphy and SRS.
ocular melanoma listen (AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
A rare cancer of melanocytes (cells that produce the pigment melanin) found in the eye. Also called intraocular melanoma.
oculodermal melanocytosis listen (AH-kyoo-loh-DER-mul meh-LAN-oh-sy-TOH-sis)
A condition marked by brown, blue, or gray patches, usually on the inside of the eye and on the skin near or around the eye. It may also affect the eyelid and mouth. It is caused by an increase in the number of cells called melanocytes in skin and eye tissue. Melanocytes make a substance called melanin, which gives color to skin and eyes. Having oculodermal melanocytosis may increase the risk of glaucoma and a type of eye cancer called intraocular melanoma. Also called nevus of Ota.
odds ratio listen (… RAY-shee-oh)
A measure of the odds of an event happening in one group compared to the odds of the same event happening in another group. In cancer research, odds ratios are most often used in case-control (backward looking) studies to find out if being exposed to a certain substance or other factor increases the risk of cancer. For example, researchers may study a group of individuals with cancer (cases) and another group without cancer (controls) to see how many people in each group were exposed to a certain substance or factor. They calculate the odds of exposure in both groups and then compare the odds. An odds ratio of one means that both groups had the same odds of exposure and, therefore, the exposure probably does not increase the risk of cancer. An odds ratio of greater than one means that the exposure may increase the risk of cancer, and an odds ratio of less than one means that the exposure may reduce the risk of cancer. Also called relative odds.
Odomzo listen (oh-DOM-zoh)
A drug used to treat locally advanced basal cell carcinoma (BCC) that has come back after surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. Odomzo is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Odomzo blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called erismodegib, LDE225, and sonidegib phosphate.
odor listen (OH-der)
A smell.
odorant listen (OH-deh-runt)
A substance that gives off a smell.
OEPA
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat a certain type of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in males. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), etoposide, prednisone, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin). Also called OEPA regimen.
OEPA regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat a certain type of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in males. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), etoposide, prednisone, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin). Also called OEPA.
ofatumumab listen (OH-fa-TOO-moo-mab)
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ofatumumab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of leukemia and lymphoma cells. Ofatumumab may block CD20 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Arzerra and HuMax-CD20.
OFF
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer. It includes the drugs oxaliplatin, fluorouracil, and leucovorin (folinic acid). Also called OFF regimen.
OFF regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat pancreatic cancer. It includes the drugs oxaliplatin, fluorouracil, and leucovorin (folinic acid). Also called OFF.
Office for Human Research Protections listen (AH-fis … HYOO-mun REE-serch proh-TEK-shuns)
The office within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) that protects the rights, welfare, and well-being of people involved in clinical trials. It also makes sure that the research follows the law 45 CFR 46 (Protection of Human Subjects). Also called OHRP.
off-label listen (... LAY-bel)
Describes the legal use of a prescription drug to treat a disease or condition for which the drug has not been approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration.
ofloxacin listen (oh-FLOK-suh-sin)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called quinolone antibiotics.
OGF
A substance that relieves pain and is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. OGFs bind to cells in the body, including tumor cells, which have OGF receptors on the surface. This may help stop the growth of the tumor cells. It may also prevent the growth of blood vessels that tumors need to grow. An OGF is a type of biological response modifier and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called opioid growth factor.
Ogivri listen (oh-GIV-ree)
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat HER2-positive stomach cancer or HER2-positive gastroesophageal junction cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ogivri binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Ogivri contains the active ingredient trastuzumab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of HER2 receptor antagonist.
OGX-011
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks the production of a protein called clusterin, which helps cells live longer. This may kill cancer cells that need clusterin to grow. It may also make cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide, and a type of chemosensitizing agent. Also called custirsen sodium.
OHRP
The office within the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) that protects the rights, welfare, and well-being of people involved in clinical trials. It also makes sure that the research follows the law 45 CFR 46 (Protection of Human Subjects). Also called Office for Human Research Protections.
ointment listen (OYNT-ment)
A substance used on the skin to soothe or heal wounds, burns, rashes, scrapes, or other skin problems. Also called unguent.
olanzapine listen (oh-LAN-zuh-peen)
A drug used to treat certain mental disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of antipsychotic and a type of monoamine antagonist. Also called Zyprexa and Zyprexa Zydis.
olaparib listen (oh-LA-puh-rib)
A drug used to treat certain types of HER2-negative breast cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Olaparib is also used to treat certain types of advanced ovarian, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer. It is used in patients with certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Olaparib blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Olaparib is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AZD2281, Lynparza, and PARP inhibitor AZD2281.
olaratumab listen (oh-LAYR-uh-TOO-mab)
A drug used with doxorubicin to treat soft tissue sarcoma that cannot be treated with radiation therapy or surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated with an anthracycline (a type of anticancer drug). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Olaratumab binds to a receptor for a protein called platelet-derived growth factor (PDGF), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein receptor may help keep cancer cells from growing and prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Olaratumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-PDGFR alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, anti-platelet-derived growth factor receptor alpha monoclonal antibody IMC-3G3, IMC-3G3, and Lartruvo.
Oleptro listen (oh-LEP-troh)
A drug used to treat depression. It may also be used to help relieve anxiety and insomnia (trouble sleeping) and to treat certain other disorders. Oleptro increases the level of the chemical serotonin in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant. Also called trazodone.
olfaction listen (ol-FAK-shun)
The sense of smell.
olfactory listen (ol-FAK-tuh-ree)
Having to do with the sense of smell.
olfactory bulb listen (ol-FAK-tuh-ree bulb)
A rounded mass of tissue that contains several types of nerve cells that are involved in the sense of smell. There are two olfactory bulbs on the bottom side of the brain, one above each nasal cavity. The olfactory bulbs receive information about smells from the nose and send it to the brain by way of the olfactory tracts.
olfactory neuroblastoma listen (ol-FAK-tuh-ree NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the tissues of the upper part of the nasal cavity (space inside the nose). This area is near the bone that separates the nasal cavity from the brain. These tissues are involved in the sense of smell. Olfactory neuroblastoma may spread from the nasal cavity to the bone around the eyes, the sinuses, the front part of the brain, or the lymph nodes in the neck. It is the most common type of nasal cavity tumor in children, especially in teens. Also called esthesioneuroblastoma.
olfactory system listen (ol-FAK-tuh-ree SIS-tem)
The parts of the body involved in sensing smell, including the nose and many parts of the brain. Smell may affect emotion, behavior, memory, and thought.
olfactory transduction listen (ol-FAK-tuh-ree tranz-DUK-shun)
A series of events in which cells in the nose bind to scent-bearing molecules and send electrical signals to the brain where they are perceived as smells.
oligoastrocytoma listen (AH-lih-goh-AS-troh-sy-TOH-muh)
A brain tumor that forms from both oligodendrocytes and astrocytes, which are types of glial cells (cells that cover and protect nerve cells in the brain and spinal cord and help them work the way they should). An oligoastrocytoma is a type of mixed glioma.
oligodendrocyte listen (AH-lih-goh-DEN-droh-site)
A cell that forms the myelin sheath (a layer that covers and protects nerve cells) in the brain and spinal cord. An oligodendrocyte is a type of glial cell.
oligodendroglial tumor listen (AH-lih-goh-den-DROH-glee-ul TOO-mer)
A rare, slow-growing tumor that begins in oligodendrocytes (cells that cover and protect nerve cells in the brain and spinal cord). Also called oligodendroglioma.
oligodendroglioma listen (AH-lih-goh-DEN-droh-glee-OH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing tumor that begins in oligodendrocytes (cells that cover and protect nerve cells in the brain and spinal cord). Also called oligodendroglial tumor.
oligofructose-enriched inulin listen (AH-lih-goh-FROOK-tose-en-RICHT IN-yoo-lin)
A substance that is used to improve the health of the digestive system and bones and is being studied in the prevention of colon cancer. Oligofructose-enriched inulin is made by combining two substances that occur naturally in many plants, including chicory root, wheat, bananas, onion, and garlic. Oligofructose-enriched inulin helps healthy bacteria grow in the intestines and helps the body absorb calcium and magnesium. Also called Raftilose Synergy 1.
oligometastasis listen (AH-lih-goh-meh-TAS-tuh-sis)
A type of metastasis in which cancer cells from the original (primary) tumor travel through the body and form a small number of new tumors (metastatic tumors) in one or two other parts of the body. For example, cancer cells may spread from the breast to form one or two new tumors in the brain or spread from the colon to form new tumors in the liver. These types of tumors may be treatable.
oltipraz listen (OL-tih-praz)
A drug used in cancer prevention.
omacetaxine mepesuccinate listen (OH-mah-seh-TAK-seen MEH-peh-SUK-sih-nayt)
A drug used to treat certain types of chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that have not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Omacetaxine mepesuccinate blocks certain proteins involved in cancer cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of plant alkaloid. Also called homoharringtonine and Synribo.
omega-3 fatty acid listen (oh-MAY-guh-3 ...)
A type of fat obtained in the diet and involved in immunity.
omentectomy listen (OH-men-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the omentum.
omentum listen (oh-MEN-tum)
A fold of the peritoneum (the thin tissue that lines the abdomen) that surrounds the stomach and other organs in the abdomen.
omeprazole listen (oh-MEH-pruh-zole)
A drug that inhibits gastric acid secretion.
Ommaya reservoir listen (oh-MY-uh REH-zer-vwahr)
A device surgically placed under the scalp and used to deliver anticancer drugs to the fluid surrounding the brain and spinal cord.
ON 01910.Na
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks certain proteins that are needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. ON 01910.Na is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of benzyl styryl sulfone analog.
onabotulinumtoxinA listen (ON-uh-BAH-choo-LY-num-TOK-sin-A)
A drug used to treat certain medical conditions. These include severe underarm sweating and severe muscle spasms in the neck and shoulders. OnabotulinumtoxinA is also used to smooth wrinkles on the face. It is being studied in the treatment of pain in patients with skin leiomyomas (benign smooth muscle tumors) and other conditions. It is a form of a toxin made by the bacterium Clostridium botulinum.
Oncaspar listen (ON-kah-spar)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or who cannot be treated with asparaginase. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Oncaspar is a form of the drug asparaginase that is linked to a substance called PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. Asparaginase is an enzyme that breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. It is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called PEG-asparaginase and pegaspargase.
oncogene listen (ON-koh-jeen)
A gene that is a mutated (changed) form of a gene involved in normal cell growth. Oncogenes may cause the growth of cancer cells. Mutations in genes that become oncogenes can be inherited or caused by being exposed to substances in the environment that cause cancer.
oncologist listen (on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating cancer. Some oncologists specialize in a particular type of cancer treatment. For example, a radiation oncologist specializes in treating cancer with radiation.
oncology listen (on-KAH-loh-jee)
A branch of medicine that specializes in the diagnosis and treatment of cancer. It includes medical oncology (the use of chemotherapy, hormone therapy, and other drugs to treat cancer), radiation oncology (the use of radiation therapy to treat cancer), and surgical oncology (the use of surgery and other procedures to treat cancer).
oncology nurse listen (on-KAH-loh-jee...)
A nurse who specializes in treating and caring for people who have cancer.
oncology pharmacy specialist listen (on-KAH-loh-jee FAR-muh-see SPEH-shuh-list)
A licensed pharmacist with special training in how to design, give, monitor, and change chemotherapy for cancer patients. Also called BCOP and board certified oncology pharmacy specialist.
oncolysate listen (on-KAH-lih-sayt)
An extract made from cancer cells.
oncolysis listen (on-KAH-lih-sis)
The lysis (breakdown) of cancer cells. This can be caused by chemical or physical means (for example, strong detergents or high-energy sound waves) or by infection with a strain of virus that can lyse cells.
oncolytic virotherapy listen (ON-koh-LIH-tik VY-roh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using an oncolytic virus (a virus that infects and breaks down cancer cells but not normal cells ). Oncolytic virotherapy may make it easier to kill tumor cells with chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called oncolytic virus therapy, viral therapy, and virotherapy.
oncolytic virus listen (ON-koh-LIH-tik VY-rus)
A type of virus that infects and lyses (breaks down) cancer cells but not normal cells. Oncolytic viruses can occur naturally or can be made in the laboratory by changing other viruses. Certain oncolytic viruses are being studied in the treatment of cancer. They may make it easier to kill tumor cells with chemotherapy and radiation therapy.
oncolytic virus therapy listen (ON-koh-LIH-tik VY-rus THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using an oncolytic virus (a virus that infects and breaks down cancer cells but not normal cells ). Oncolytic virus therapy may make it easier to kill tumor cells with chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called oncolytic virotherapy, viral therapy, and virotherapy.
Onconase listen (ON-koh-nays)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of ribonuclease enzyme. Also called ranpirnase.
Oncophage listen (ON-koh-fayj)
A vaccine made from a patient’s tumor cells that may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. This vaccine is used to treat kidney cancer, a type of brain cancer called glioma, and metastatic melanoma (a type of skin cancer that has spread). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called gp96 heat shock protein-peptide complex vaccine, gp96 HSP-peptide complex, and vitespen.
Oncotype DX breast cancer assay listen (ON-koh-tipe … brest KAN-ser A-say)
A test that is used to help predict whether breast cancer will spread to other parts of the body or come back. The test looks at the activity of 21 different genes in breast cancer tissue of women who have early-stage breast cancer that is estrogen receptor positive and has not spread to the lymph nodes. If there is a high risk that the cancer will spread or come back, it may be used to help plan treatment with anticancer drugs. Also called 21-gene signature.
Oncotype DX ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS) assay listen (ON-koh-tipe … DUK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too … A-say)
A test that is being studied as a way to help predict whether ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS) will come back or become invasive and spread to other tissues in the same breast. The test looks at the activity of 12 different genes in DCIS tissue, and it may be used to help plan treatment.
Oncovin listen (ON-koh-vin)
A brand name for vincristine sulfate, which is used to treat many types of cancer. Oncovin brand has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
ondansetron hydrochloride listen (on-DAN-seh-tron HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Ondansetron hydrochloride blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. It is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called Zofran.
Onivyde listen (AH-nih-vide)
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan hydrochloride that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. Onivyde is used together with fluorouracil and leucovorin to treat a certain type of pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse after treatment with gemcitabine anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. Onivyde may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan hydrochloride. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called irinotecan hydrochloride liposome, liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02, and PEP02.
Onrigin listen (ON-rih-jin)
A drug used to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of several other types of cancer. It blocks cell growth by damaging the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Cloretazine and laromustine.
onset of action listen (... AK-shun)
The length of time it takes for a medicine to start to work.
Ontak listen (ON-tak)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that has recurred (come back) or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is used in patients whose cancer has a receptor for the protein interleukin-2 (IL-2). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ontak is made by combining IL-2 with a bacterial toxin. The IL-2 part of the drug attaches to the cancer cells and the toxin kills them. Ontak is a type of immunotoxin and a type of fusion protein. Also called denileukin diftitox.
ONYX-015
A modified cold virus that selectively grows in and destroys certain types of cancer cells and leaves normal cells undamaged.
oocyte cryopreservation listen (OH-oh-site KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of freezing one or more unfertilized eggs (eggs that have not been combined with sperm) to save them for future use. The eggs are thawed and fertilized in the laboratory to make embryos that can be placed in a woman’s uterus. Oocyte cryopreservation is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women with cancer who want to have children after having radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or certain types of surgery, which can cause infertility. Also called egg banking, egg cryopreservation, and egg freezing.
oophorectomy listen (oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or both ovaries.
oophoropexy listen (oh-oh-FOR-oh-PEK-see)
A procedure used to help keep a woman fertile by preventing damage to the ovaries during radiation therapy. Before radiation therapy begins, one or both ovaries and fallopian tubes are separated from the uterus and attached to the wall of the abdomen away from where the radiation will be given. Oophoropexy may be useful for women who want to have children after having radiation therapy that can cause infertility. It is a type of fertility preservation. Also called ovarian transposition.
Opana listen (oh-PA-nuh)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It is also used as a sedative before surgery, to help with anesthesia during surgery, during labor, and to treat anxiety caused by some medical conditions. It is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Opana is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Numorphan and oxymorphone hydrochloride.
Opdivo listen (op-DEE-voh)
A drug used alone or with ipilimumab to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has mutations (changes) in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also used with ipilimumab in some patients to treat renal cell carcinoma (RCC) and melanoma. Opdivo is also used alone in some patients to treat small cell lung cancer, non-small cell lung cancer, cancer of the head and neck, Hodgkin lymphoma, melanoma, RCC, urothelial carcinoma, and hepatocellular carcinoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Opdivo binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Opdivo may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called nivolumab.
open biopsy listen (OH-pen BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a surgical incision (cut) is made through the skin to expose and remove tissues. The biopsy tissue is examined under a microscope by a pathologist. An open biopsy may be done in the doctor’s office or in the hospital, and may use local anesthesia or general anesthesia. A lumpectomy to remove a breast tumor is a type of open biopsy.
open colectomy listen (... koh-LEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove all or part of the colon through a long incision made in the wall of the abdomen. When only part of the colon is removed, it is called a partial colectomy.
open label study listen (OH-pen LAY-bel STUH-dee)
A type of study in which both the health providers and the patients are aware of the drug or treatment being given.
open prostatectomy listen (… PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the prostate gland through an incision in the lower abdomen or perineum (the area between the anus and scrotum). An open prostatectomy may be done to remove an enlarged prostate gland in benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH) or as a treatment for prostate cancer.
open resection listen (… ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove part or all of an organ or a tumor and nearby lymph nodes. The incision is large enough to let the surgeon see into the body.
operable listen (AH-peh-ruh-bul)
Describes a condition that can be treated by surgery.
ophthalmic listen (of-THAL-mik)
Having to do with the eye.
ophthalmic artery infusion listen (of-THAL-mik AR-tuh-ree in-FYOO-zhun)
A method of delivering anticancer drugs directly to a tumor in the eye. A catheter (a thin, flexible tube) is put into an artery that leads to the eye and the anticancer drug is given through the catheter. A small balloon may then be put into the artery to block it, which keeps the anticancer drug near the tumor. Ophthalmic artery infusion may be used to treat certain types of retinoblastoma.
ophthalmologist listen (OF-thul-MAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating eye problems, including injury and disease.
ophthalmoscope listen (of-THAL-moh-skope)
A lighted instrument used to examine the inside of the eye, including the retina and the optic nerve.
ophthalmoscopy listen (OF-thul-MOS-koh-pee)
An exam that uses a magnifying lens and a light to check the fundus of the eye (back of the inside of the eye, including the retina and optic nerve). The pupils may be dilated (enlarged) with medicated eye drops so the doctor can see through the pupil to the back of the eye. Ophthalmoscopy may be used to check for eye problems, such as glaucoma, macular degeneration, eye cancer, optic nerve problems, or eye injury. Also called fundoscopy and funduscopy.
opiate listen (OH-pee-ut)
A substance used to treat pain or cause sleep. Opiates are made from opium or have opium in them. Opiates bind to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Examples of opiates are codeine, heroin, and morphine. An opiate is a type of analgesic agent.
opioid listen (OH-pee-OYD)
A substance used to treat moderate to severe pain. Opioids are like opiates, such as morphine and codeine, but are not made from opium. Opioids bind to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Opioids used to be called narcotics. An opioid is a type of alkaloid.
opioid growth factor listen (OH-pee-OYD grothe FAK-ter)
A substance that relieves pain and is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Opioid growth factors bind to cells in the body, including tumor cells, which have opioid growth factor receptors on the surface. This may help stop the growth of the tumor cells. It may also prevent the growth of blood vessels that tumors need to grow. An opioid growth factor is a type of biological response modifier and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called OGF.
OPPA
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat a certain type of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in females. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, procarbazine hydrochloride, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin). Also called OPPA regimen.
OPPA regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is often used with radiation therapy to treat a certain type of childhood Hodgkin lymphoma in females. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), prednisone, procarbazine hydrochloride, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin). Also called OPPA.
opportunistic infection listen (AH-per-too-NIS-tik in-FEK-shun)
An infection caused by an organism that does not normally cause disease. Opportunistic infections occur in people with weakened immune systems.
oprelvekin listen (oh-PREL-veh-KIN)
A drug used to increase the number of blood cells, especially platelets, in some cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. Oprelvekin is a form of interleukin-11 (a cytokine normally made by support cells in the bone marrow) that is made in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Neumega, recombinant human interleukin-11, and rhIL-11.
OPT-80
A substance being studied in the treatment of diarrhea caused by infection with Clostridium difficile (a type of bacteria that can grow without oxygen) in cancer patients. OPT-80 is a type of antibiotic. Also called PAR-101 and tiacumicin B.
optic chiasm listen (OP-tik ky-A-zum)
The place in the brain where some of the optic nerve fibers coming from one eye cross optic nerve fibers from the other eye. Also called optic chiasma.
optic chiasma listen (OP-tik ky-AZ-muh)
The place in the brain where some of the optic nerve fibers coming from one eye cross optic nerve fibers from the other eye. Also called optic chiasm.
optic nerve listen (OP-tik nerv)
The nerve that carries messages from the retina to the brain.
optic neuritis listen (OP-tik noo-RY-tis)
Inflammation of the optic nerve (the nerve that carries messages from the back of the eye to the brain). It may be caused by infection, drugs, toxins, and diseases of the immune system, such as multiple sclerosis. Symptoms include sudden changes in vision in one eye, including loss of vision and pain with eye movement. The symptoms often disappear within a few weeks.
optic pathway glioma listen (OP-tik ... glee-OH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing tumor that usually forms in the optic nerve, optic chiasm, or optic tract. These are parts of the nervous system that carry messages from the eye to the brain. Also called visual pathway glioma.
optic tract listen (OP-tik trakt)
The nerves that travel from the optic chiasm (place in the brain where some of the optic nerve fibers cross) into certain parts of the brain involved in vision.
optical coherence tomography listen (OP-tih-kul koh-HEER-ents toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses infrared light waves to give three-dimensional (3-D) pictures of structures inside tissues and organs. The pictures are made by a computer linked to the light source. Also called OCT.
optical spectroscopy listen (OP-tih-kul spek-TROS-koh-pee)
In medicine, a technique that uses low power light, fiberoptic instruments, and detectors to examine tissue. It is being studied as a way to identify differences between normal cells and cells that may become cancer, and as a way to identify cancer cells that remain in the edges of tumor tissue removed from a patient.
optimism listen (OP-tih-MIH-zum)
The tendency to believe that there is good in everything and to have positive thoughts about most things that happen.
oral listen (OR-ul)
By or having to do with the mouth.
oral and maxillofacial surgeon listen (OR-ul ... MAK-sih-loh-FAY-shul SER-jun)
A dentist who has special training in surgery of the mouth, face, and jaw.
oral cancer listen (OR-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the oral cavity (the mouth) or the oropharynx (the part of the throat at the back of the mouth).
oral cavity listen (OR-ul KA-vih-tee)
Refers to the mouth. It includes the lips, the lining inside the cheeks and lips, the front two thirds of the tongue, the upper and lower gums, the floor of the mouth under the tongue, the bony roof of the mouth, and the small area behind the wisdom teeth.
oral cavity cancer listen (OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the oral cavity (the mouth). The tissues of the oral cavity include the lips, the lining inside the cheeks and lips, the front two thirds of the tongue, the upper and lower gums, the floor of the mouth under the tongue, the bony roof of the mouth, and the small area behind the wisdom teeth.
oral chemotherapy listen (OR-ul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs given by mouth to kill cancer cells or stop them from dividing.
oral contraceptive pill listen (OR-ul KON-truh-SEP-tiv ...)
A pill used to prevent pregnancy. It contains hormones that block the release of eggs from the ovaries. Most oral contraceptives include estrogen and progestin. Also called birth control pill.
oral surgeon listen (OR-ul SER-jun)
A dentist with special training in surgery of the mouth and jaw.
orantinib listen (oh-RAN-tih-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Orantinib blocks proteins involved in the growth and spread of cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called SU006668 and SU6668.
orchidectomy listen (or-kih-DEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or both testicles. Also called orchiectomy.
orchiectomy listen (or-kee-EK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or both testicles. Also called orchidectomy.
oregovomab listen (oh-reh-GOH-voh-mab)
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of ovarian cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. Oregovomab binds to the CA-125 antigen, which is found on most ovarian cancer cells. Also called OvaRex.
organ listen (OR-gun)
A part of the body that performs a specific function. For example, the heart is an organ.
organelle listen (OR-guh-NEL)
A small structure in a cell that is surrounded by a membrane and has a specific function. Examples of organelles are the nucleus (a structure that contains the cell’s chromosomes and is where RNA is made), mitochondria (structures that make energy for the cell), and lysosomes (sac-like containers filled with enzymes that digest and help recycle molecules in the cell).
organic food listen (or-GA-nik …)
Food produced without the use of man-made fertilizer, drugs that increase growth, or drugs that kill insects, bacteria, or other living things. In the United States, the Department of Agriculture sets standards for growing, harvesting, processing, and labeling organic foods.
organism listen (OR-guh-NIH-zum)
A living thing, such as an animal, a plant, a bacterium, or a fungus.
organoid (OR-guh-noyd)
A tiny, 3-dimensional mass of tissue that is made by growing stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) in the laboratory. Organoids that are similar to human tissues and organs, or to a specific type of tumor, can be grown. Organoids are used in the laboratory to study how normal tissues or cancers form and to test new drugs and other types of treatment before they are given to people.
orgasm listen (OR-ga-zum)
The final part of the sex act, which involves contraction of sexual organs and a sudden release of endorphins, leading to a feeling of pleasure. In males, orgasm usually occurs with release of semen.
Oriental medicine listen (OR-ee-EN-tul MEH-dih-sin)
A medical system that has been used for thousands of years to prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. It is based on the belief that qi (the body's vital energy) flows along meridians (channels) in the body and keeps a person’s spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical health in balance. Oriental medicine aims to restore the body’s balance and harmony between the natural opposing forces of yin and yang, which can block qi and cause disease. Oriental medicine includes acupuncture, diet, herbal therapy, meditation, physical exercise, and massage. Also called TCM and Traditional Chinese Medicine.
oropharyngeal cancer listen (OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the oropharynx (the part of the throat at the back of the mouth, including the soft palate, the base of the tongue, and the tonsils). Most oropharyngeal cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the oropharynx).
oropharynx listen (OR-oh-FAYR-inx)
The part of the throat at the back of the mouth behind the oral cavity. It includes the back third of the tongue, the soft palate, the side and back walls of the throat, and the tonsils.
orphan drug listen (OR-fun …)
A drug used to treat, prevent, or diagnose an orphan disease. An orphan disease is a rare disease or condition that affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States. Orphan diseases are often serious or life threatening. In 1983, the U.S. government passed a law, called the Orphan Drug Act, to give drug companies certain financial benefits for developing orphan drugs that are safe and effective.
orphan drug designation listen (OR-fun … DEH-zig-NAY-shun)
A status given to certain drugs called orphan drugs, which show promise in the treatment, prevention, or diagnosis of orphan diseases. An orphan disease is a rare disease or condition that affects fewer than 200,000 people in the United States. Orphan diseases are often serious or life threatening. In 1983, the U.S. government passed a law, called the Orphan Drug Act, to give drug companies certain financial benefits for developing orphan drugs. This law is meant to help bring more drugs to patients with rare diseases.
orthodontist listen (OR-thuh-DON-tist)
A dentist who has special training in preventing, diagnosing, and treating certain problems of the teeth and jaws, such as crooked or crowded teeth and bite problems. An orthodontist uses braces, aligners, retainers, headgear, and other devices to help straighten teeth, hold teeth in place, and improve bite. This can improve overall dental health, chewing, speech, and facial appearance.
orthodox medicine listen (OR-thuh-DOX MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called allopathic medicine, biomedicine, conventional medicine, mainstream medicine, and Western medicine.
orthopedic surgeon listen (OR-thuh-PEE-dik SER-jun)
A surgeon who has special training in diagnosing and treating injuries and diseases of the musculoskeletal system. This includes the bones, joints, tendons, ligaments, and muscles.
orthotopic listen (OR-thoh-TAH-pik)
In medicine, refers to something that occurs in the normal or usual place in the body. It is often used to describe tissue or an organ that is transplanted into its normal place in the body.
OS
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, that patients diagnosed with the disease are still alive. In a clinical trial, measuring the OS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called overall survival.
oseltamivir phosphate listen (oh-sel-TA-mih-veer FOS-fayt)
A drug used to prevent and to treat influenza virus infections. It blocks the release of the virus from infected cells. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called Tamiflu.
OSI-774
A drug used to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. OSI-774 blocks a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called CP-358,774, erlotinib hydrochloride, and Tarceva.
OSI-7904L
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors.
OSI-906
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks a protein called IGF-1R, which is found at high levels in some types of tumors. IGF-1R is needed for cell growth and blocking it may cause tumor cells to die. OSI-906 is a type of IGF-1R inhibitor. Also called IGF-1R inhibitor OSI-906.
osimertinib mesylate listen (OH-sih-MER-tih-nib MEH-zih-layt)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is used in patients whose cancer has not been treated or has gotten worse during or after treatment with another anticancer drug that blocks EGFR. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Osimertinib mesylate blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called Tagrisso.
osmolality listen (OZ-moh-LA-lih-tee)
The concentration of particles dissolved in a fluid. The osmolality of serum can help diagnose several medical conditions such as dehydration, diabetes, and shock.
osmotic listen (oz-MAH-tik)
Having to do with osmosis (the passage of a liquid through a membrane from a less concentrated solution to a more concentrated one). This causes the more concentrated solution to become diluted, and makes the concentrations in both solutions more equal. Osmotic also refers to a type of laxative that increases the amount of water in the large intestine, which softens the stool to help it pass more easily.
osteitis deformans listen (OS-tee-I-tis dih-FOR-manz)
A chronic condition in which both the breakdown and regrowth of bone are increased. Osteitis deformans occurs most frequently in the pelvic and leg bones, skull, and lower spine. It is most common in older individuals, and may lead to bone pain, deformities, and fractures. Also called Paget disease of bone.
osteochondroma listen (OS-tee-oh-kon-DROH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) tumor that has both bone and cartilage in it. This type of tumor usually occurs at the ends of the long bones of the arms and legs or in the pelvis or shoulder. It may cause abnormal growth of the arms, hands, and legs; problems moving the joints; and pain, numbness, and tingling. There may be one or more tumors, and having multiple tumors runs in families. Osteochondromas may also occur at some point in time after cancer treatment, such as stem cell transplant.
osteogenic sarcoma listen (OS-tee-oh-JEH-nik sar-KOH-muh)
A cancer of the bone that usually affects the large bones of the arm or leg. It occurs most commonly in young people and affects more males than females. Also called osteosarcoma.
osteolytic listen (OS-tee-oh-LIH-tik)
Causing the breakdown of bone.
osteomalacia listen (OS-tee-oh-muh-LAY-shuh)
A condition in adults in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is usually caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet, not getting enough sunlight, or a problem with the way the body uses vitamin D. Symptoms include bone pain and muscle weakness. When the condition occurs in children, it is called rickets. Also called adult rickets.
osteomyelitis listen (OS-tee-oh-MY-eh-LY-tis)
Inflammation of the bone caused by an infection, which may spread to the bone marrow and tissues near the bone. Osteomyelitis can cause severe pain in the infected bone. If it is not treated, it can kill bone tissue.
osteonecrosis listen (OS-tee-oh-neh-KROH-sis)
A condition in which there is a loss of blood flow to bone tissue, which causes the bone to die. It is most common in the hips, knees, shoulders, and ankles. It may be caused by long-term use of steroid medicines, alcohol abuse, joint injuries, and certain diseases, such as cancer and arthritis. It may also occur at some point in time after cancer treatment that included methotrexate, bisphosphonates, or corticosteroids. Also called aseptic necrosis, avascular necrosis, and ischemic necrosis.
osteopenia listen (OS-tee-oh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal bone mass or bone mineral density (the amount of bone mineral contained in a certain amount of bone). Osteopenia is a less severe form of bone loss than osteoporosis.
osteoporosis listen (OS-tee-oh-puh-ROH-sis)
A condition in which there is a decrease in the amount and thickness of bone tissue. This causes the bones to become weak and break more easily. Osteoporosis may be caused by older age, hormone changes, taking certain medicines, and not eating enough foods with calcium and vitamin D. It may also be caused by certain types of cancer and cancer treatment. It is most common in white and Asian women.
osteosarcoma listen (OS-tee-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
A cancer of the bone that usually affects the large bones of the arm or leg. It occurs most commonly in young people and affects more males than females. Also called osteogenic sarcoma.
ostomy listen (OS-toh-mee)
An operation to create an opening (a stoma) from an area inside the body to the outside. Colostomy and urostomy are types of ostomies.
OTC
Refers to a medicine that can be bought without a prescription (doctor's order). Examples include analgesics (pain relievers), such as aspirin and acetaminophen. Also called nonprescription and over-the-counter.
otolaryngologist listen (OH-toh-LAYR-in-GAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the ear, nose, and throat. Also called ENT doctor.
ounce listen (ownts)
A measure of weight (one-sixteenth pound) and volume (one-eighth cup).
outcome listen (OWT-kum)
A specific result or effect that can be measured. Examples of outcomes include decreased pain, reduced tumor size, and improvement of disease.
out-of-pocket cost listen (…PAH-kit …)
In medicine, the amount of money a patient pays for medical expenses that are not covered by a health insurance plan. Out-of-pocket costs include deductibles, coinsurance, copayments, and costs for non-covered healthcare services.
outpatient listen (OWT-pay-shunt)
A patient who visits a health care facility for diagnosis or treatment without spending the night. Sometimes called a day patient.
OvaRex listen (OH-vuh-REX)
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of ovarian cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. OvaRex binds to the CA-125 antigen, which is found on most ovarian cancer cells. Also called oregovomab.
ovarian listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un)
Having to do with the ovaries, the female reproductive glands in which the ova (eggs) are formed. The ovaries are located in the pelvis, one on each side of the uterus.
ovarian ablation listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un a-BLAY-shun)
Treatment that stops or lowers the amount of estrogen made by the ovaries. Types of ovarian ablation include surgery to remove both ovaries, radiation therapy, and the use of certain drugs. Ovarian ablation may be used to prevent and treat breast cancer. Also called ovarian suppression.
ovarian borderline malignant tumor listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un BOR-der-line muh-LIG-nunt TOO-mer)
A condition in which cells that may become cancer form in the thin layer of tissue that covers an ovary (female reproductive gland in which eggs are made). In this condition, tumor cells rarely spread outside of the ovary. Also called ovarian low malignant potential tumor.
ovarian cancer listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the ovary (one of a pair of female reproductive glands in which the ova, or eggs, are formed). Most ovarian cancers are either ovarian epithelial cancers (cancer that begins in the cells on the surface of the ovary) or malignant germ cell tumors (cancer that begins in egg cells). Fallopian tube cancer and primary peritoneal cancer are similar to ovarian epithelial cancer and are staged and treated the same way.
ovarian epithelial cancer listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissue covering the ovary (one of a pair of female reproductive glands in which eggs are made). Most ovarian cancers are ovarian epithelial cancers. Fallopian tube cancer and primary peritoneal cancer are similar to ovarian epithelial cancer and are staged and treated the same way. Also called epithelial ovarian cancer.
ovarian failure listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. There are two types of ovarian failure, primary and secondary. Primary ovarian failure means that the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. In secondary ovarian failure, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Some women with ovarian failure sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called early menopause, ovarian insufficiency, and premature menopause.
ovarian follicle listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un FAH-lih-kul)
A small, fluid-filled sac in the ovary that contains one immature egg. There are thousands of follicles in the ovaries. When an egg matures during a woman’s menstrual cycle, the follicle breaks open and releases the egg from the ovary for possible fertilization (the process by which an egg combines with sperm to form an embryo). Ovarian follicles may sometimes be checked to help diagnose and treat infertility.
ovarian germ cell tumor listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un jerm sel TOO-mer)
An abnormal mass of tissue that forms in germ (egg) cells in the ovary (female reproductive gland in which the eggs are formed). These tumors usually occur in teenage girls or young women, usually affect just one ovary, and can be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). The most common ovarian germ cell tumor is called dysgerminoma.
ovarian insufficiency listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un IN-suh-FIH-shen-see)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. There are two types of ovarian insufficiency, primary and secondary. Primary ovarian insufficiency means that the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. In secondary ovarian insufficiency, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Some women with ovarian insufficiency sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called early menopause, ovarian failure, and premature menopause.
ovarian low malignant potential tumor listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un...muh-LIG-nunt poh-TEN-shul TOO-mer)
A condition in which cells that may become cancer form in the thin layer of tissue that covers an ovary (female reproductive gland in which eggs are made). In this condition, tumor cells rarely spread outside of the ovary. Also called ovarian borderline malignant tumor.
ovarian reserve listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un reh-SERV)
The total number of healthy, immature eggs in the ovaries. The number of healthy eggs decreases as a woman ages, which can lower fertility (the ability to have children). Damage to the ovaries can also decrease ovarian reserve and fertility. This may be caused by smoking, certain anticancer treatments (such as chemotherapy or radiation therapy), surgery to the ovaries or other organs in the pelvis, and certain diseases or genetic conditions. Ovarian reserve is often checked in women who want to have children and are having problems getting pregnant.
ovarian shielding listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un SHEEL-ding)
A procedure done during radiation therapy in which a protective cover is placed on the outside of the body, over the area of the ovaries and other parts of the female reproductive system (ovaries, fallopian tubes, uterus, cervix, and vagina). This may prevent damage from radiation therapy. Ovarian shielding is a type of fertility preservation.
ovarian suppression listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un suh-PREH-shun)
Treatment that stops or lowers the amount of estrogen made by the ovaries. Types of ovarian suppression include surgery to remove both ovaries, radiation therapy, and the use of certain drugs. Ovarian suppression may be used to prevent and treat breast cancer. Also called ovarian ablation.
ovarian tissue banking listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un TIH-shoo BANK-ing)
The process of freezing ovarian tissue to save for future infertility treatment. Part or all of an ovary is removed, and the tissue that contains the eggs is cut into thin slices and frozen. The tissue may later be thawed and placed back into the woman’s body, usually on the remaining ovary. Ovarian tissue banking is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called ovarian tissue cryopreservation and ovarian tissue freezing.
ovarian tissue cryopreservation listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un TIH-shoo KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of freezing ovarian tissue to save for future infertility treatment. Part or all of an ovary is removed, and the tissue that contains the eggs is cut into thin slices and frozen. The tissue may later be thawed and placed back into the woman’s body, usually on the remaining ovary. Ovarian tissue cryopreservation is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called ovarian tissue banking and ovarian tissue freezing.
ovarian tissue freezing listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un TIH-shoo FREE-zing)
The process of freezing ovarian tissue to save for future infertility treatment. Part or all of an ovary is removed, and the tissue that contains the eggs is cut into thin slices and frozen. The tissue may later be thawed and placed back into the woman’s body, usually on the remaining ovary. Ovarian tissue freezing is a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for women who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called ovarian tissue banking and ovarian tissue cryopreservation.
ovarian transposition listen (oh-VAYR-ee-un tranz-poh-ZIH-shun)
A procedure used to help keep a woman fertile by preventing damage to the ovaries during radiation therapy. Before radiation therapy begins, one or both ovaries and fallopian tubes are separated from the uterus and attached to the wall of the abdomen away from where the radiation will be given. Ovarian transposition may be useful for women who want to have children after having radiation therapy that can cause infertility. It is a type of fertility preservation. Also called oophoropexy.
ovary listen (OH-vuh-ree)
One of a pair of female glands in which the eggs form and the female hormones estrogen and progesterone are made. These hormones play an important role in female traits, such as breast development, body shape, and body hair. They are also involved in the menstrual cycle, fertility, and pregnancy. There is one ovary on each side of the uterus.
overactive thyroid listen (... THY-royd)
Too much thyroid hormone. Symptoms include weight loss, chest pain, cramps, diarrhea, and nervousness. Also called hyperthyroidism.
overall survival listen (oh-ver-AWL ser-VY-vul)
The length of time from either the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease, such as cancer, that patients diagnosed with the disease are still alive. In a clinical trial, measuring the overall survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called OS.
overall survival rate listen (oh-ver-AWL ser-VY-vul rayt)
The percentage of people in a study or treatment group who are still alive for a certain period of time after they were diagnosed with or started treatment for a disease, such as cancer. The overall survival rate is often stated as a five-year survival rate, which is the percentage of people in a study or treatment group who are alive five years after their diagnosis or the start of treatment. Also called survival rate.
overdiagnosis listen (OH-ver-DY-ug-NOH-sis)
Finding cases of cancer with a screening test (such as a mammogram or PSA test) that will never cause any symptoms. These cancers may just stop growing or go away on their own. Some of the harms caused by overdiagnosis are anxiety and having treatments that are not needed.
overdose listen (OH-ver-dose)
An amount of drug that is more than what should be taken at one time.
overexpress listen (OH-ver-ek-SPRES)
In biology, to make too many copies of a protein or other substance. Overexpression of certain proteins or other substances may play a role in cancer development.
overgrowth syndrome listen (OH-ver-grothe SIN-drome)
A group of genetic disorders in which there is an abnormal increase in the size of the body or a body part that is often noted at birth. Examples of overgrowth syndromes include neurofibromatosis, Sotos syndrome, Beckwith-Wiedemann syndrome, Simpson-Golabi-Behmel syndrome, Weaver syndrome, Proteus syndrome, Sturge-Weber syndrome, and fragile X syndrome. Many of these syndromes increase the risk of cancer.
over-the-counter listen (OH-ver-the-KOWN-ter)
Refers to a medicine that can be bought without a prescription (doctor's order). Examples include analgesics (pain relievers), such as aspirin and acetaminophen. Also called nonprescription and OTC.
overtreatment listen (OH-ver-TREET-ment)
Treatment of a cancer that would have gone away on its own or never caused any symptoms. These cancers are usually found on a screening test. Overtreatment may lead to problems and harmful side effects from cancer therapies that are not needed.
overweight listen (OH-ver-WAYT)
Being too heavy for one’s height. Excess body weight can come from fat, muscle, bone, and/or water retention. Being overweight does not always mean being obese.
ovulation listen (ov-yoo-LAY-shun)
The release of an egg from an ovary during the menstrual cycle.
OX-40
A protein being studied in the treatment of cancer. Substances that attach to OX-40 on the surface of T cells (a type of white blood cell) may help the T cells grow and kill more cancer cells. OX-40 is a type of tumor necrosis factor (TNF) receptor. Also called CD134.
oxaliplatin listen (ok-SA-lih-pla-tin)
A drug used with other drugs to treat stage III colon cancer that was removed by surgery and colorectal cancer that is advanced. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Oxaliplatin damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of platinum compound. Also called Eloxatin.
oxandrolone listen (ok-SAN-droh-lone)
A drug used to help patients gain weight after injury, chronic infection, or severe illness. It belongs to the family of drugs called anabolic steroids.
oxidation listen (OK-sih-DAY-shun)
A chemical reaction that takes place when a substance comes into contact with oxygen or another oxidizing substance. Examples of oxidation are rust and the brown color on a cut apple.
oxidation-reduction listen (OK-sih-DAY-shun-ree-DUK-shun)
A chemical reaction that takes place between an oxidizing substance and a reducing substance. The oxidizing substance loses electrons in the reaction, and the reducing substance gains electrons. For example, rust forms when there is an oxidation-reduction reaction between oxygen contained in water or moist air (an oxidizing substance) and iron (a reducing substance). Oxidation-reduction reactions also occur when glucose (a type of sugar) and fat are broken down in the body to make energy. Also called redox.
oxidative metabolism listen (OK-sih-DAY-tiv meh-TA-buh-lih-zum)
A chemical process in which oxygen is used to make energy from carbohydrates (sugars). Also called aerobic metabolism, aerobic respiration, and cell respiration.
oxidative stress listen (OK-sih-DAY-tiv ...)
A condition in which antioxidant levels are lower than normal. Antioxidant levels are usually measured in blood plasma.
oxide listen (OK-side)
A type of chemical substance that is a combination of oxygen and another substance. Oxides are found in essential oils.
oxidize listen (OK-sih-dize)
To cause oxidation (a chemical reaction that takes place when a substance comes into contact with oxygen or another oxidizing substance).
oxycodone hydrochloride listen (OK-see-KOH-done HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Oxycodone hydrochloride is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opiate.
oxygen listen (OK-sih-jen)
A colorless, odorless gas. It is needed for animal and plant life. Oxygen that is breathed in enters the blood from the lungs and travels to the tissues.
oxygen radical listen (OK-sih-jen RA-dih-kul)
A type of unstable molecule that contains oxygen and that easily reacts with other molecules in a cell. A build up of oxygen radicals in cells may cause damage to DNA, RNA, and proteins, and may cause cell death. An oxygen radical is a free radical. Also called reactive oxygen species.
oxygen saturation test listen (OK-sih-jen SA-chuh-RAY-shun…)
A test that measures the amount of oxygen being carried by red blood cells. One method uses a device that shines light through a finger. The device measures the amount of oxygen in the blood based on the way red blood cells carrying oxygen absorb and reflect light. In another method blood is taken from an artery and the amount of oxygen is measured directly. An oxygen level that is lower than normal may be a sign of lung disease or other medical conditions.
oxygen therapy listen (OK-sih-jen THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which a storage tank of oxygen or a machine called a compressor is used to give oxygen to people with breathing problems. It may be given through a nose tube, a mask, or a tent. The extra oxygen is breathed in along with normal air. Also called supplemental oxygen therapy.
oxymorphone hydrochloride listen (OK-see-MOR-fone HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It is also used as a sedative before surgery, to help with anesthesia during surgery, during labor, and to treat anxiety caused by some medical conditions. It is made from morphine and binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Oxymorphone hydrochloride is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Numorphan and Opana.
P30 Cancer Center Support Grant listen (… KAN-ser SEN-ter suh-PORT …)
Funds awarded to certain U.S. institutions by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) for them to become cancer centers in the United States, based on scientific merit. The funds help the cancer centers improve the way they are run and develop new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. To receive the award, one goal of the cancer center must be to turn clinical and basic research into better health care. Also called CCSG.
P-32
A radioactive form of the element phosphorus used in the treatment of cancer.
p53 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called tumor protein p53. This protein is found inside the nucleus of cells and plays a key role in controlling cell division and cell death. It helps keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. Mutations (changes) in the p53 gene may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. These changes have been found in a genetic condition called Li-Fraumeni syndrome and in many types of cancer. The p53 gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called TP53 gene and tumor protein p53 gene.
PA
A health professional who is licensed to do certain medical procedures under the guidance of a doctor. A PA may take medical histories, do physical exams, take blood and urine samples, care for wounds, and give injections and immunizations. Also called physician assistant.
PABA listen
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Bacteria that live in the intestines need PABA to survive. PABA is found in grains and foods from animals. It is being studied as a radiosensitizer (a substance that makes tumor cells more sensitive to radiation therapy) and in the treatment of certain skin disorders. Also called aminobenzoic acid and para-aminobenzoic acid.
pacemaker listen (PAYS-may-ker)
An electronic device that is implanted in the body to monitor heart rate and rhythm. It gives the heart electrical stimulation when it does not beat normally. It runs on batteries and has long, thin wires that connect it to the heart. Also called artificial pacemaker and cardiac pacemaker.
Pacific valerian listen (puh-SIH-fik vuh-LEER-ee-un)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
pack year listen (pak yeer)
A way to measure the amount a person has smoked over a long period of time. It is calculated by multiplying the number of packs of cigarettes smoked per day by the number of years the person has smoked. For example, 1 pack year is equal to smoking 1 pack per day for 1 year, or 2 packs per day for half a year, and so on.
paclitaxel listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma, advanced ovarian cancer, and certain types of breast cancer. It is also used with cisplatin to treat non-small cell lung cancer in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Paclitaxel blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimitotic agent. Also called Taxol.
paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil al-BYOO-min-STAY-bih-lized NA-noh-PAR-tih-kul for-myoo-LAY-shun)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has come back or spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with carboplatin to treat advanced non-small cell lung cancer in patients who are not able to have surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation is a form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel and may cause fewer side effects than paclitaxel. It stops cancer cells from growing and dividing, and may kill them. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called ABI-007, Abraxane, nanoparticle paclitaxel, and protein-bound paclitaxel.
paclitaxel liposome listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Paclitaxel liposome blocks the ability of cells to divide and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called LEP-ETU, liposomal paclitaxel, LipoTaxen, and PNU-93914.
paclitaxel poliglumex listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil PAH-lee-GLOO-mex)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel combined with a protein called poliglumex that may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer, ovarian cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called CT-2103, paclitaxel polyglutamate, and Xyotax.
paclitaxel polyglutamate listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil PAH-lee-GLOO-tuh-mayt)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel combined with a protein called poliglumex that may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer, ovarian cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called CT-2103, paclitaxel poliglumex, and Xyotax.
paclitaxel-loaded polymeric micelle listen (PA-klih-TAK-sil-LOH-ded PAH-lih-MAYR-ik MY-sel)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel used to treat breast cancer, ovarian cancer, and AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma. It is also used with another drug to treat non-small cell lung cancer. Paclitaxel is mixed with very tiny particles of a substance that makes it easier to dissolve in water. This allows higher doses of paclitaxel to be given. It is a type of antimitotic agent.
PAD
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat multiple myeloma. It includes the drugs bortezomib, doxorubicin (Adriamycin), and dexamethasone. Also called PAD regimen.
PAD regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat multiple myeloma. It includes the drugs bortezomib, doxorubicin (Adriamycin), and dexamethasone. Also called PAD.
Paget disease of bone listen (PA-jet dih-ZEEZ ...)
A chronic condition in which both the breakdown and regrowth of bone are increased. Paget disease of bone occurs most frequently in the pelvic and leg bones, skull, and lower spine. It is most common in older individuals, and may lead to bone pain, deformities, and fractures. Also called osteitis deformans.
Paget disease of the nipple listen (PA-jet dih-ZEEZ ...)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the nipple. Symptoms commonly include itching and burning and an eczema-like condition around the nipple. There may also be oozing or bleeding from the nipple.
PAH
A type of chemical formed when coal, oil, gas, garbage, tobacco, meat, and other substances are burned. These chemicals are also made for use in many products, including coal tar, creosote, roofing tar, pesticides, mothballs, dandruff shampoos, and some medicines. Being exposed to one of these chemicals over a long time may cause cancer. Also called polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon.
pain flare listen (payn flayr)
A sudden increase in pain that may occur in patients who already have chronic pain from cancer, arthritis, fibromyalgia, or other conditions. A pain flare usually lasts for a short time. During a pain flare, the level of pain may be severe but the type of pain and where it is in the body are usually the same as the patient’s chronic pain. Pain flares may occur with stress, illness, and certain activities, such as exercising or coughing, or when the dose of pain medicine that the patient is taking wears off. Pain flares are usually not a symptom of a new condition or a condition that has gotten worse. Also called breakthrough pain.
pain threshold listen (payn THRESH-holde)
The point at which a person becomes aware of pain.
PALA
A substance that is being studied for its ability to increase the effectiveness of the anticancer drug fluorouracil.
palate listen (PAL-et)
The roof of the mouth. The front portion is bony (hard palate), and the back portion is muscular (soft palate).
palatine uvula listen (PA-luh-teen YOO-vyoo-luh)
The soft flap of tissue that hangs down at the back of the mouth (at the edge of the soft palate). Also called uvula.
palbociclib listen (PAL-boh-SY-klib)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2 negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with fulvestrant in women whose disease has gotten worse after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Palbociclib blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called Ibrance.
palifermin listen (pa-lee-FER-min)
A drug used to prevent and treat severe oral mucositis (mouth sores). It is used in patients with certain types of blood cancer who are being treated with high-dose chemotherapy and radiation therapy followed by a stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of common side effects in other types of cancer. Palifermin is form of keratinocyte growth factor (KGF) that is made in the laboratory. KGF stimulates the growth of cells in the lining of the mouth, stomach, and intestines. Palifermin is a type of recombinant human keratinocyte growth factor. Also called Kepivance.
palliation listen (PA-lee-AY-shun)
Relief of symptoms and suffering caused by cancer and other life-threatening diseases. Palliation helps a patient feel more comfortable and improves the quality of life, but does not cure the disease.
palliative care listen (PA-lee-uh-tiv kayr)
Care given to improve the quality of life of patients who have a serious or life-threatening disease. The goal of palliative care is to prevent or treat as early as possible the symptoms of a disease, side effects caused by treatment of a disease, and psychological, social, and spiritual problems related to a disease or its treatment. Also called comfort care, supportive care, and symptom management.
palliative sedation listen (PA-lee-uh-tiv seh-DAY-shun)
The use of special drugs called sedatives to relieve extreme suffering by making a patient calm, unaware, or unconscious. This may be done for patients who have symptoms that cannot be controlled with other treatment. Palliative sedation may be used in patients who are near the end of life to make them more comfortable. It is not meant to shorten life or cause death.
palliative therapy listen (PA-lee-uh-tiv THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment given to relieve the symptoms and reduce the suffering caused by cancer and other life-threatening diseases. Palliative cancer therapies are given together with other cancer treatments, from the time of diagnosis, through treatment, survivorship, recurrent or advanced disease, and at the end of life.
palmar-plantar erythrodysesthesia listen (PAL-mer-PLAN-ter eh-RITH-roh-DIS-es-THEE-zhuh)
A condition marked by pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet. It sometimes occurs as a side effect of certain anticancer drugs. Also called hand-foot syndrome.
palonosetron hydrochloride listen (pa-loh-NOH-seh-tron HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Palonosetron hydrochloride blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Palonosetron hydrochloride is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called Aloxi.
palpable disease listen (PAL-puh-bul dih-ZEEZ)
A term used to describe cancer that can be felt by touch, usually present in lymph nodes, skin, or other organs of the body such as the liver or colon.
palpation listen (pal-PAY-shun)
Examination by pressing on the surface of the body to feel the organs or tissues underneath.
palpitation listen (PAL-pih-TAY-shun)
A rapid or irregular heartbeat that a person can feel.
Pamelor listen (PA-meh-lor)
A drug used to treat depression. It may also be used to treat panic or anxiety disorders and certain types of pain, and to help people quit smoking. Pamelor increases the levels of norepinephrine and other natural chemicals in the brain. This helps improve mood and may reduce a person’s craving for nicotine. It is a type of tricyclic antidepressant. Also called Aventyl and nortriptyline.
pamidronate disodium listen (puh-MIH-droh-nayt dy-SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat hypercalcemia (high blood levels of calcium) caused by certain types of cancer. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat multiple myeloma and breast cancer that has spread to bone. It is also used to treat Paget disease of the bone. Pamidronate disodium may help keep bone from breaking down and prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called Aredia.
panacea listen (PA-nuh-SEE-uh)
A cure-all.
Pancoast tumor listen (PAN-koste TOO-mer)
A type of lung cancer that begins in the upper part of a lung and spreads to nearby tissues such as the ribs and vertebrae. Most Pancoast tumors are non-small cell cancers. Also called pulmonary sulcus tumor.
pancreas listen (PAN-kree-us)
A glandular organ located in the abdomen. It makes pancreatic juices, which contain enzymes that aid in digestion, and it produces several hormones, including insulin. The pancreas is surrounded by the stomach, intestines, and other organs.
pancreatectomy listen (PAN-kree-uh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all or part of the pancreas. In a total pancreatectomy, part of the stomach, part of the small intestine, the common bile duct, gallbladder, spleen, and nearby lymph nodes also are removed.
pancreatic listen (PAN-kree-A-tik)
Having to do with the pancreas.
pancreatic cancer listen (PAN-kree-A-tik KAN-ser)
A disease in which malignant (cancer) cells are found in the tissues of the pancreas. Also called exocrine cancer.
pancreatic duct listen (PAN-kree-A-tik dukt)
Part of a system of ducts in the pancreas. Pancreatic juices containing enzymes are released into these ducts and flow into the small intestine.
pancreatic endocrine cancer listen (PAN-kree-A-tik EN-doh-krin KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in islet cells (hormone-making cells) of the pancreas. Islet cells make several different hormones that affect body functions, including controlling the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and helping digest food in the stomach. Functional pancreatic endocrine cancers make extra amounts of these hormones, which can cause symptoms. Nonfunctional pancreatic endocrine cancers do not make extra amounts of hormones, but they may cause symptoms as they grow and spread. Also called islet cell carcinoma.
pancreatic endocrine tumor listen (PAN-kree-A-tik EN-doh-krin TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms in islet cells (hormone-making cells) of the pancreas. Pancreatic endocrine tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Islet cells make several different hormones that affect body functions, including controlling the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and helping digest food in the stomach. Functional pancreatic endocrine tumors make extra amounts of these hormones, which can cause symptoms. Nonfunctional pancreatic endocrine tumors do not make extra amounts of hormones, but they may cause symptoms as they grow and spread. Also called islet cell tumor and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor.
pancreatic enzyme listen (PAN-kree-A-tik EN-zime)
A protein secreted by the pancreas that aids in the digestion of food.
pancreatic function test listen (PAN-kree-A-tik FUNK-shun …)
A test used to measure the ability of the pancreas to respond to a hormone called secretin. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release substances that help digest food. During a pancreatic function test, a tube is inserted through the nose or throat into the stomach and small intestine. Secretin is given to the patient by injection into a vein. After a certain amount of time, samples of fluid are taken from the small intestine through the tube and sent to a lab to test for a response. A pancreatic function test may be used to help diagnose problems that affect the pancreas, such as pancreatitis, cystic fibrosis, and a type of pancreatic tumor called a gastrinoma. Also called secretin stimulation test.
pancreatic insulin-producing tumor listen (PAN-kree-A-tik IN-suh-lin-proh-DOO-sing TOO-mer)
An abnormal mass that grows in the beta cells of the pancreas that make insulin. Pancreatic insulin-producing tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They secrete insulin and are the most common cause of low blood sugar caused by having too much insulin in the body. Also called beta cell neoplasm, beta cell tumor of the pancreas, and insulinoma.
pancreatic juice listen (PAN-kree-A-tik joos)
Fluid made by the pancreas. Pancreatic juices contain proteins called enzymes that aid in digestion.
pancreatic neuroendocrine tumor listen (PAN-kree-A-tik NOOR-oh-EN-doh-krin TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms in islet cells (hormone-making cells) of the pancreas. Pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Islet cells make several different hormones that affect body functions, including controlling the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and helping digest food in the stomach. Functional pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors make extra amounts of these hormones, which can cause symptoms. Nonfunctional pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors do not make extra amounts of hormones, but they may cause symptoms as they grow and spread. Also called islet cell tumor and pancreatic endocrine tumor.
pancreatic polypeptide listen (PAN-kree-A-tik PAH-lee-PEP-tide)
A small protein made by the pancreas that helps control the release of other substances made by the pancreas. The amount of pancreatic polypeptide in the blood increases after a person eats. It may also increase with age, and in certain diseases, such as diabetes and pancreatic cancer. Also called PP.
pancreatic tumor listen (PAN-kree-A-tik TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms in the cells of the pancreas. The two main types of pancreatic tumors are pancreatic exocrine tumors and pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors. Most pancreatic cancers are exocrine tumors, which form in cells that make enzymes to help the body digest food. Pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors form in neuroendocrine pancreas cells (such as islet cells). These cells make hormones that help control sugar levels in the blood. Pancreatic neuroendocrine tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They are much less common than pancreatic exocrine tumors and have a better prognosis.
pancreatitis listen (PAN-kree-uh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the pancreas. Chronic pancreatitis may cause diabetes and problems with digestion. Pain is the primary symptom.
pancreatoduodenectomy listen (PAN-kree-uh-toh-DOO-ah-deh-NEK-toh-mee)
A type of surgery used to treat pancreatic cancer. The head of the pancreas, the duodenum, a portion of the stomach, and other nearby tissues are removed. Also called Whipple procedure.
panhypopituitarism listen (pan-HY-poh-pih-TOO-ih-tuh-rih-zum)
A rare condition in which the pituitary gland stops making most or all hormones. Pituitary hormones help control the way many parts of the body work. Symptoms of the condition depend on the hormones that are missing. They include growth problems (in children), obesity (in adults), hair loss, slow heart rate, low blood sugar, low blood pressure, fatigue, and problems with reproduction. This condition may be caused by a tumor on or near the pituitary gland, infection, stroke, injury, surgery, or radiation therapy. It may also be inherited. Also called PHP.
panic listen (PA-nik)
Sudden extreme anxiety or fear that may cause irrational thoughts or actions. Panic may include rapid heart rate, flushing (a hot, red face), sweating, and trouble breathing.
panic disorder (PA-nik dis-OR-der)
A type of anxiety disorder in which a person has repeated panic attacks when there is no actual danger. Panic attacks are sudden periods of intense anxiety or fear that may cause irrational thoughts or actions. During a panic attack, a person may experience chest pain, trouble breathing, a fast heartbeat, sweating, shaking, dizziness, and feelings of impending doom or being out of control. Panic attacks may last for several minutes or longer. People with a panic disorder often worry that the panic attacks will happen again and try to avoid places or situations in which they have occurred.
panitumumab listen (PAN-ih-TOO-myoo-mab)
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of colorectal cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or whose cancer got worse after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Panitumumab binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some normal cells and some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Panitumumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called ABX-EGF and Vectibix.
panobinostat listen (PA-noh-BIH-noh-stat)
A drug used with bortezomib and dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma. It is used in patients who have already been treated with bortezomib and an immunomodulating agent. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Panobinostat blocks certain enzymes needed for cells to grow and divide and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Farydak and LBH589.
pantothenic acid listen (PAN-toh-THEH-nik A-sid)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Pantothenic acid helps some enzymes use foods and make many substances used in the body and protects cells against damage from peroxides. It is found in almost all plant and animal foods. Pantothenic acid is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Also called vitamin B5.
PANVAC-V listen
A cancer vaccine made with a form of vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins, including the tumor markers called CEA and MUC-1, that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called inalimarev and recombinant vaccinia-CEA-MUC-1-TRICOM vaccine.
PAP
An enzyme produced by the prostate. It may be found in increased amounts in men who have prostate cancer. Also called prostatic acid phosphatase.
Pap smear listen (pap smeer)
A procedure in which a small brush or spatula is used to gently remove cells from the cervix so they can be checked under a microscope for cervical cancer or cell changes that may lead to cervical cancer. A Pap smear may also help find other conditions, such as infections or inflammation. It is sometimes done at the same time as a pelvic exam and may also be done at the same time as a test for certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). Also called Pap test and Papanicolaou test.
Pap test listen
A procedure in which a small brush or spatula is used to gently remove cells from the cervix so they can be checked under a microscope for cervical cancer or cell changes that may lead to cervical cancer. A Pap test may also help find other conditions, such as infections or inflammation. It is sometimes done at the same time as a pelvic exam and may also be done at the same time as a test for certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). Also called Pap smear and Papanicolaou test.
Pap/HPV cotest listen
A procedure in which a human papillomavirus (HPV) test and a Pap test are done at the same time to check for cervical cancer. The HPV test looks for DNA or RNA from certain high-risk types of HPV in samples of cells taken from the cervix. The Pap test checks for cervical cancer cells and cell changes that may lead to cervical cancer. The same cell sample may be used for both the HPV test and the Pap test. Women aged 30 to 65 years may have a Pap/HPV cotest every 5 years. Cotesting is more likely to find abnormal cells or cervical cancer than a Pap test alone is. Also called HPV/Pap cotest.
Papanicolaou test listen (PA-puh-NIH-koh-low...)
A procedure in which a small brush or spatula is used to gently remove cells from the cervix so they can be checked under a microscope for cervical cancer or cell changes that may lead to cervical cancer. A Papanicolaou test may also help find other conditions, such as infections or inflammation. It is sometimes done at the same time as a pelvic exam and may also be done at the same time as a test for certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). Also called Pap smear and Pap test.
papillary dermis listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee DER-mis)
The thin top layer of the dermis (the inner layer of the skin). The papillary dermis has connective tissue and blood vessels that give nutrients to the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin) and that help control the temperature of the skin.
papillary intralymphatic angioendothelioma listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee IN-truh-lim-FA-tik AN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-oh-muh)
A rare, slow-growing tumor of blood vessels that forms in or under the skin anywhere on the body. Papillary intralymphatic angioendotheliomas may appear as firm, raised, purplish bumps, which may be small or large. They usually do not spread to other parts of the body. Papillary intralymphatic angioendotheliomas can occur in children and adults. They are a type of vascular tumor. Also called Dabska tumor.
papillary kidney cancer listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee KID-nee KAN-ser)
A type of kidney cancer that forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. Most papillary tumors look like long, thin finger-like growths under a microscope. There are two types of papillary kidney cancer: type 1 and type 2. Type 1 tends to grow slowly and spread to other parts of the body less often than type 2. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary papillary renal cancer have an increased risk of type 1 papillary kidney cancer. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer have an increased risk of type 2 papillary kidney cancer. Also called papillary renal cell carcinoma and PRCC.
papillary renal cell carcinoma listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee REE-nul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of kidney cancer that forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. Most papillary tumors look like long, thin finger-like growths under a microscope. There are two types of papillary renal cell carcinoma: type 1 and type 2. Type 1 tends to grow slowly and spread to other parts of the body less often than type 2. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary papillary renal cancer have an increased risk of type 1 papillary renal cell carcinoma. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer have an increased risk of type 2 papillary renal cell carcinoma. Also called papillary kidney cancer and PRCC.
papillary serous carcinoma listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee SEER-us KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
An aggressive cancer that usually affects the uterus/endometrium, peritoneum, or ovary.
papillary thyroid cancer listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in follicular cells in the thyroid and grows in small finger-like shapes. It grows slowly, is more common in women than in men, and often occurs before age 45. It is the most common type of thyroid cancer.
papillary tumor listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee TOO-mer)
A tumor that looks like long, thin “finger-like” growths. These tumors grow from tissue that lines the inside of an organ. Papillary tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). Papillary tumors occur most often in the bladder, thyroid, and breast, but they may occur in other parts of the body as well.
papillary-reticular dermal interface listen (PA-pih-LAYR-ee-reh-TIH-kyoo-ler DER-mul IN-ter-fays)
The layer of the skin between the papillary dermis (the thin top layer of the dermis) and the reticular dermis (the thick bottom layer of the dermis). The dermis is the layer of skin below the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin).
papilledema listen (PA-pil-eh-DEE-muh)
Swelling around the optic disk, the area where the optic nerve (the nerve that carries messages from the eye to the brain) enters the eyeball. Papilledema occurs when increased brain pressure caused by tumors or other problems results in swelling of the optic nerve.
papule listen (PA-pyool)
A small, solid, raised bump on the skin that has a border with edges that are easy to see. Papules may be red, purple, brown, or pink.
PAR-101
A substance being studied in the treatment of diarrhea caused by infection with Clostridium difficile (a type of bacteria that can grow without oxygen) in cancer patients. PAR-101 is a type of antibiotic. Also called OPT-80 and tiacumicin B.
para-aminobenzoic acid listen (PAYR-uh-uh-MEE-noh-ben-ZOH-ik A-sid)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Bacteria that live in the intestines need para-aminobenzoic acid to survive. Para-aminobenzoic acid is found in grains and foods from animals. It is being studied as a radiosensitizer (a substance that makes tumor cells more sensitive to radiation therapy) and in the treatment of certain skin disorders. Also called aminobenzoic acid and PABA.
paracentesis listen (PAYR-uh-sen-TEE-sis)
A procedure in which a thin needle or tube is put into the abdomen to remove fluid from the peritoneal cavity (the space within the abdomen that contains the intestines, the stomach, and the liver).
paraganglia listen (PAYR-uh-GANG-glee-uh)
A collection of cells that came from embryonic nervous tissue, and are found near the adrenal glands and some blood vessels and nerves. Most paraganglia secrete epinephrine and norepinephrine.
paraganglioma listen (PAYR-uh-GANG-glee-OH-muh)
A rare, usually benign tumor that develops from cells of the paraganglia. Paraganglia are a collection of cells that came from embryonic nervous tissue, and are found near the adrenal glands and some blood vessels and nerves. Paragangliomas that develop in the adrenal gland are called pheochromocytomas. Those that develop outside of the adrenal glands near blood vessels or nerves are called glomus tumors or chemodectomas.
parageusia listen (PAYR-uh-GOO-see-uh)
A bad taste in the mouth. Also called dysgeusia.
paralysis listen (puh-RA-lih-sis)
Loss of ability to move all or part of the body.
paralytic ileus listen (PAYR-uh-LIH-tik IH-lee-us)
A condition in which the muscles of the intestines do not allow food to pass through, resulting in a blocked intestine. Paralytic ileus may be caused by surgery, inflammation, and certain drugs.
parametrium listen (payr-uh-MEE-tree-um)
The fat and connective tissue that surrounds the uterus. The parametrium helps connect the uterus to other tissues in the pelvis.
paramyxovirus listen (PAYR-uh-MIK-suh-VY-rus)
A type of virus that has hemagglutinin-neuraminidase proteins in the outer coat and RNA as the genetic material. Measles (rubeola) virus, mumps virus, and Newcastle disease virus are paramyxoviruses.
paranasal sinus listen (PAYR-uh-NAY-zul SY-nus)
One of many small hollow spaces in the bones around the nose. Paranasal sinuses are named after the bones that contain them: frontal (the lower forehead), maxillary (cheekbones), ethmoid (beside the upper nose), and sphenoid (behind the nose). The paranasal sinuses open into the nasal cavity (space inside the nose) and are lined with cells that make mucus to keep the nose from drying out during breathing.
paranasal sinus and nasal cavity cancer listen (PAYR-uh-NAY-zul SY-nus ... NAY-zul KA-vuh-tee KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the paranasal sinuses (small hollow spaces in the bones around the nose) or nasal cavity (the inside of the nose). The most common type of paranasal sinus and nasal cavity cancer is squamous cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in flat cells lining these tissues and cavities).
paraneoplastic syndrome listen (PAYR-uh-NEE-oh-PLAS-tik SIN-drome)
A group of symptoms that may develop when substances released by some cancer cells disrupt the normal function of surrounding cells and tissue.
paranoia listen (PAYR-uh-noy-uh)
A mental disorder in which a person has an extreme fear and distrust of others. A paranoid person may have delusions that people are trying to harm him or her.
parasite listen (PAYR-uh-SITE)
An animal or plant that gets nutrients by living on or in an organism of another species. A complete parasite gets all of its nutrients from the host organism, but a semi-parasite gets only some of its nutrients from the host.
parasitic listen (PAYR-uh-SIH-tik)
Having to do with or being a parasite (an animal or plant that gets nutrients by living on or in an organism of another species).
parasomnia listen (PAYR-uh-SOM-nee-uh)
An abnormal disruption of sleep, such as sleep walking, sleep talking, nightmares, bedwetting, sleep apnea (problems with breathing that cause loud snoring), or nighttime seizures.
parasympathetic nervous system listen (PAYR-uh-SIM-puh-THEH-tik NER-vus SIS-tem)
The part of the nervous system that slows the heart, dilates blood vessels, decreases pupil size, increases digestive juices, and relaxes muscles in the gastrointestinal tract.
parathormone listen (PAYR-uh-THOR-mone)
A substance made by the parathyroid gland that helps the body store and use calcium. A higher-than-normal amount of parathormone causes high levels of calcium in the blood and may be a sign of disease. Also called parathyrin, parathyroid hormone, and PTH.
parathyrin listen (PAYR-uh-THY-rin)
A substance made by the parathyroid gland that helps the body store and use calcium. A higher-than-normal amount of parathyrin causes high levels of calcium in the blood and may be a sign of disease. Also called parathormone, parathyroid hormone, and PTH.
parathyroid cancer listen (PAYR-uh-THY-royd KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in tissues of one or more of the parathyroid glands (four pea-sized glands in the neck that make parathyroid hormone, which helps the body store and use calcium).
parathyroid gland listen (PAYR-uh-THY-royd...)
One of four pea-sized glands found on the surface of the thyroid. The parathyroid hormone made by these glands increases the calcium level in the blood.
parathyroid hormone listen (PAYR-uh-THY-royd HOR-mone)
A substance made by the parathyroid gland that helps the body store and use calcium. A higher-than-normal amount of parathyroid hormone causes high levels of calcium in the blood and may be a sign of disease. Also called parathormone, parathyrin, and PTH.
parathyroidectomy listen (PAYR-uh-THY-roy-DEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one or more parathyroid glands (four pea-sized organs found on the thyroid).
parenchyma listen (puh-REN-kih-muh)
The essential or functional elements of an organ.
parenteral nutrition listen (puh-REN-teh-rul noo-TRIH-shun)
A form of nutrition that is delivered into a vein. Parenteral nutrition does not use the digestive system. It may be given to people who are unable to absorb nutrients through the intestinal tract because of vomiting that won't stop, severe diarrhea, or intestinal disease. It may also be given to those undergoing high-dose chemotherapy or radiation and bone marrow transplantation. It is possible to give all of the protein, calories, vitamins and minerals a person needs using parenteral nutrition. Also called hyperalimentation, total parenteral nutrition, and TPN.
paresthesia listen (payr-es-THEE-zhuh)
An abnormal touch sensation, such as burning or prickling, that occurs without an outside stimulus.
paricalcitol listen (PAYR-ih-KAL-sih-tol)
A substance that is being used to treat overactive parathyroid glands in patients with kidney failure. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. Paricalcitol belongs to the family of drugs called vitamin D analogs.
parietal cell vagotomy listen (puh-RY-uh-tul sel vay-GAH-toh-mee)
Surgery to cut the parts of the vagus nerve that cause gastric acid to be made in the stomach. It is done to treat stomach ulcers or other conditions in which the stomach makes too much acid.
parietal pericardium listen (puh-RY-uh-tul PAYR-ih-KAR-dee-um)
The outer layer of the pericardium, which is a thin sac of tissue that surrounds the heart.
parietal peritoneum listen (puh-RY-uh-tul PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The layers of tissue that line the abdominal wall and the pelvic cavity.
Parkinson disease listen (PAR-kin-sun dih-ZEEZ)
A progressive disorder of the nervous system marked by muscle tremors, muscle rigidity, decreased mobility, stooped posture, slow voluntary movements, and a mask-like facial expression.
parotid gland cancer listen (puh-RAH-tid gland KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in a parotid gland, the largest of the salivary glands, which make saliva and release it into the mouth. There are 2 parotid glands, one in front of and just below each ear. Most salivary gland tumors begin in parotid glands.
parotidectomy listen (puh-RAH-tih-DEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all or part of the parotid gland (a large salivary gland located in front of and just below the ear). In a radical parotidectomy, the entire gland is removed.
paroxetine hydrochloride listen (puh-ROK-suh-teen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat depression and anxiety disorders. It is a type of selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called Paxil.
paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria listen (PAYR-ok-SIZ-mul nok-TER-nul HEE-moh-GLOH-bih-NOO-ree-uh)
A rare disorder in which red blood cells are easily destroyed by certain immune system proteins. Symptoms include blood clots, and red or brownish urine in the morning. Aplastic anemia (decreased production of blood cells) may lead to PNH, and people with PNH are at increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia. Also called PNH.
PARP listen
A type of enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. Inhibitors of one enzyme, PARP-1, are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase.
PARP inhibitor listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme in cells called PARP. PARP helps repair DNA when it becomes damaged. DNA damage may be caused by many things, including exposure to UV light, radiation, certain anticancer drugs, or other substances in the environment. In cancer treatment, blocking PARP may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. PARP inhibitors are a type of targeted therapy. Also called poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor.
PARP inhibitor AZD2281 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A drug used to treat certain types of HER2-negative breast cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. PARP inhibitor AZD2281 is also used to treat certain types of advanced ovarian, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer. It is used in patients with certain mutations in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes who have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PARP inhibitor AZD2281 blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. PARP inhibitor AZD2281 is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AZD2281, Lynparza, and olaparib.
PARP-1 listen
An enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. Inhibitors of PARP-1 are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase-1.
PARP-1 inhibitor ABT-888 listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancers caused by mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. PARP-1 inhibitor ABT-888 may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called ABT-888 and veliparib.
PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699 listen (… in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699 is also used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes and who have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699 blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699 is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AG014699, Rubraca, and rucaparib camsylate.
partial cystectomy listen (PAR-shul sis-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of the bladder (the organ that holds urine). Also called segmental cystectomy.
partial hysterectomy listen (PAR-shul HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the uterus, but not the cervix. Also called subtotal hysterectomy.
partial laryngectomy listen (PAR-shul LAYR-in-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove part of the larynx (voice box).
partial mastectomy listen (PAR-shul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-conserving surgery, breast-sparing surgery, lumpectomy, quadrantectomy, and segmental mastectomy.
partial nephrectomy listen (PAR-shul neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of one kidney or a kidney tumor, but not an entire kidney.
partial oophorectomy listen (PAR-shul oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of one ovary or part of both ovaries.
partial radical vulvectomy listen (PAR-shul RA-dih-kul vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove most, but not all, of the vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina). The clitoris may not be removed. Sometimes lymph nodes in the groin area are also removed. Also called modified radical vulvectomy.
partial remission listen (PAR-shul reh-MIH-shun)
A decrease in the size of a tumor, or in the extent of cancer in the body, in response to treatment. Also called partial response.
partial response listen (PAR-shul reh-SPONTS)
A decrease in the size of a tumor, or in the extent of cancer in the body, in response to treatment. Also called partial remission.
partial vulvectomy listen (PAR-shul vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove an affected area of the vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina) along with a small amount of surrounding normal tissue.
partial-breast irradiation listen (PAR-shul-brest ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy given only to the part of the breast that has cancer in it. Partial-breast irradiation gives a higher dose over a shorter time than is given in standard whole-breast radiation therapy. Partial-breast irradiation may be given using internal or external sources of radiation. Also called accelerated partial-breast irradiation.
passive antibody therapy listen (...AN-tee-BAH-dee THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with injections of antibodies made in another animal or in the laboratory.
pastoral counselor listen (PAS-tuh-rul KOWN-seh-ler)
A person who is trained to give spiritual and mental health advice.
patchouli listen (puh-CHOO-lee)
A bushy herb that is a member of the mint family. A strong-smelling oil taken from the leaves is used in perfumes, incense, detergents, and hair conditioners. It has been used in some cultures to prevent disease. The scientific name is Pogostemon cablin
paternal listen (puh-TER-nul)
Having to do with the father, coming from the father, or related through the father.
Paterson-Kelly syndrome listen (PA-ter-sun-KEH-lee SIN-drome)
A disorder marked by anemia caused by iron deficiency, and a web-like growth of membranes in the throat that makes swallowing difficult. Having Paterson-Kelly syndrome may increase the risk of developing esophageal cancer. Also called Plummer-Vinson syndrome and sideropenic dysphagia.
pathognomonic listen (PA-thog-noh-MAH-nik)
Having to do with a sign or symptom that is specific to a certain disease.
pathologic complete remission listen (PA-thuh-LAH-jik kum-PLEET reh-MIH-shun)
The lack of all signs of cancer in tissue samples removed during surgery or biopsy after treatment with radiation or chemotherapy. To find out if there is a pathologic complete remission, a pathologist checks the tissue samples under a microscope to see if there are still cancer cells left after the anticancer treatment. Knowing if the cancer is in pathologic complete remission may help show how well treatment is working or if the cancer will come back. Also called pathologic complete response.
pathologic complete response listen (PA-thuh-LAH-jik kum-PLEET reh-SPONTS)
The lack of all signs of cancer in tissue samples removed during surgery or biopsy after treatment with radiation or chemotherapy. To find out if there is a pathologic complete response, a pathologist checks the tissue samples under a microscope to see if there are still cancer cells left after the anticancer treatment. Knowing if the cancer is in pathologic complete response may help show how well treatment is working or if the cancer will come back. Also called pathologic complete remission.
pathologic fracture listen (PA-thuh-LAH-jik FRAK-sher)
A broken bone caused by disease, often by the spread of cancer to the bone.
pathological stage listen (PA-thuh-LAH-jih-kul stayj)
The stage of cancer (amount or spread of cancer in the body) that is based on how different from normal the cells in samples of tissue look under a microscope.
pathological staging listen (PA-thuh-LAH-jih-kul STAY-jing)
A method used to find out the stage of cancer (amount or spread of cancer in the body) by removing tissue samples during surgery or a biopsy. The pathological stage is based on how different from normal the cells in the samples look under a microscope.
pathologist listen (puh-THAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in identifying diseases by studying cells and tissues under a microscope.
pathology report listen (puh-THAH-loh-jee ...)
The description of cells and tissues made by a pathologist based on microscopic evidence, and sometimes used to make a diagnosis of a disease.
patient advocate listen (PAY-shunt AD-vuh-kut)
A person who helps guide a patient through the healthcare system. This includes help going through the screening, diagnosis, treatment, and follow-up of a medical condition, such as cancer. A patient advocate helps patients communicate with their healthcare providers so they get the information they need to make decisions about their health care. Patient advocates may also help patients set up appointments for doctor visits and medical tests and get financial, legal, and social support. They may also work with insurance companies, employers, case managers, lawyers, and others who may have an effect on a patient’s healthcare needs. Also called patient navigator.
patient navigator listen (PAY-shunt NA-vih-GAY-ter)
A person who helps guide a patient through the healthcare system. This includes help going through the screening, diagnosis, treatment, and follow-up of a medical condition, such as cancer. A patient navigator helps patients communicate with their healthcare providers so they get the information they need to make decisions about their health care. Patient navigators may also help patients set up appointments for doctor visits and medical tests and get financial, legal, and social support. They may also work with insurance companies, employers, case managers, lawyers, and others who may have an effect on a patient’s healthcare needs. Also called patient advocate.
patient-controlled analgesia listen (PAY-shunt-kun-TROLD AN-ul-JEE-zee-uh)
A method of pain relief in which the patient controls the amount of pain medicine that is used. When pain relief is needed, the person can receive a preset dose of pain medicine by pressing a button on a computerized pump that is connected to a small tube in the body. Also called PCA.
patient-derived xenograft listen (PAY-shunt-deh-RIVED ZEE-noh-graft)
Tumor tissue that has been taken from a patient and implanted into mice for research purposes. Cancer drugs and other types of treatment may be tested on xenografts to see how well they work before they are given to the patient. Patient-derived xenografts may be used to help plan treatment and learn what the best treatment may be for a patient. They are also being used in the development of new cancer drugs. Also called PDX.
Paxil listen (PAK-sil)
A drug used to treat depression and anxiety disorders. It is a type of selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called paroxetine hydrochloride.
pazopanib hydrochloride listen (puh-ZOH-puh-nib HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma, which is the most common type of kidney cancer. It is also used to treat advanced soft tissue sarcoma that has been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pazopanib hydrochloride may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called GW786034 and Votrient.
PBSCT
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own stem cells that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the blood of the patient or a donor. A PBSCT may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin). Also called peripheral blood stem cell transplant and peripheral stem cell support.
PC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat endometrial, ovarian, and head and neck cancers, and non-small cell lung cancer that has spread. It includes the drugs carboplatin and paclitaxel (Taxol). Also called Carbo-Tax regimen, carboplatin-Taxol, and carboplatin-Taxol regimen.
PCA
A method of pain relief in which the patient controls the amount of pain medicine that is used. When pain relief is needed, the person can receive a preset dose of pain medicine by pressing a button on a computerized pump that is connected to a small tube in the body. Also called patient-controlled analgesia.
PCNSL
Primary CNS lymphoma. Cancer that forms in the lymph tissue of the brain, spinal cord, meninges (outer covering of the brain), or eye (called ocular lymphoma). Also called primary central nervous system lymphoma and primary CNS lymphoma.
PCOS
A condition marked by infertility, enlarged ovaries, menstrual problems, high levels of male hormones, excess hair on the face and body, acne, and obesity. Women with PCOS have an increased risk of diabetes, high blood pressure, heart disease, and endometrial cancer. Also called polycystic ovary syndrome.
PCR
A laboratory method used to make many copies of a specific piece of DNA from a sample that contains very tiny amounts of that DNA. PCR allows these pieces of DNA to be amplified so they can be detected. PCR may be used to look for certain changes in a gene or chromosome, which may help find and diagnose a genetic condition or a disease, such as cancer. It may also be used to look at pieces of the DNA of certain bacteria, viruses, or other microorganisms to help diagnose an infection. Also called polymerase chain reaction.
PC-SPES listen
A mixture of eight herbs that has been sold as a dietary supplement and promoted as a way to keep the prostate healthy and to treat prostate cancer. PC-SPES has been studied in the treatment of prostate cancer, but has been taken off the market in the U.S. because of safety concerns.
PCT
A rare disorder that affects the skin and causes painful blisters on parts of the body that are exposed to the sun, usually the hands, arms, and face. The affected skin may be fragile, and it may blister or peel after a minor injury. Other signs and symptoms of PCT include changes in skin color, increased hair growth (especially on the face), and redness, swelling, itching, scarring, and thickening of the affected skin. Liver problems may occur, and patients with PCT may have an increased risk of liver cancer. In PCT, the body does not make enough of an enzyme called uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase. PCT may be inherited, or it may be caused by too much iron in the body, certain infections (such as hepatitis C or HIV infection), smoking, drinking too much alcohol, taking the hormone estrogen, and certain genetic disorders. PCT is usually diagnosed after the age of 30 years. Also called porphyria cutanea tarda.
PCV
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is often used with radiation therapy. It includes the drugs procarbazine hydrochloride, lomustine (CCNU), and vincristine sulfate. Also called PCV regimen.
PCV regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is often used with radiation therapy. It includes the drugs procarbazine hydrochloride, lomustine (CCNU), and vincristine sulfate. Also called PCV.
PD-1
A protein found on T cells (a type of immune cell) that helps keep the body’s immune responses in check. When PD-1 is bound to another protein called PD-L1, it helps keep T cells from killing other cells, including cancer cells. Some anticancer drugs, called immune checkpoint inhibitors, are used to block PD-1. When this protein is blocked, the “brakes” on the immune system are released and the ability of T cells to kill cancer cells is increased.
PDGF
A family of molecules released from platelets (tiny pieces of cells that are found in the blood and that help the blood clot). Forms of PDGF help to heal wounds and to repair damage to blood vessel walls. They also help blood vessels grow. Also called platelet-derived growth factor.
PDQ
PDQ is an online source of cancer information that is developed and maintained by the National Cancer Institute (NCI). It makes current, credible, and accurate cancer information available to health professionals and the public. PDQ contains information about cancer treatment, supportive and palliative care, screening, prevention, genetics, and integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine. This information is updated with the most recent evidence from scientific research. PDQ also contains drug information summaries on many cancer-related drugs; dictionaries of cancer terms, drug terms, and genetics terms; and a directory of professionals who provide genetics services. Most of this information and more specific information about PDQ can be found on the NCI's website at http://www.cancer.gov/publications/pdq. Also called Physician Data Query.
PDX
Tumor tissue that has been taken from a patient and implanted into mice for research purposes. Cancer drugs and other types of treatment may be tested on xenografts to see how well they work before they are given to the patient. PDXs may be used to help plan treatment and learn what the best treatment may be for a patient. They are also being used in the development of new cancer drugs. Also called patient-derived xenograft.
peak exposure listen (peek ek-SPOH-zher)
The largest amount of a substance or radiation that a person is exposed to at one time. Peak exposure to a harmful substance or radiation may increase the risk of certain diseases or conditions.
peau d'orange listen (poh duh-RANJ)
A dimpled condition of the skin of the breast, resembling the skin of an orange, sometimes found in inflammatory breast cancer.
PEB
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used in children to treat certain types of malignant (cancer) germ cell tumors that are not in the brain. It includes the drugs cisplatin (Platinol), etoposide phosphate, and bleomycin sulfate. Also called PEB regimen.
PEB regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used in children to treat certain types of malignant (cancer) germ cell tumors that are not in the brain. It includes the drugs cisplatin (Platinol), etoposide phosphate, and bleomycin sulfate. Also called PEB.
PEComa
A family of rare tumors that form in the soft tissues of the stomach, intestines, lungs, female reproductive organs, and genitourinary organs. Most PEComas are benign (not cancer). They often occur in children with an inherited condition called tuberous sclerosis. Also called perivascular epithelioid cell tumor.
PediaSure listen (PEE-dee-uh-sher)
A nutritional drink that helps children who cannot get everything they need in their diet from foods and other drinks. It may be given through a small tube that is inserted through the nose into the stomach or the small intestine. It may also be given through a tube that is put into the stomach or the intestinal tract through an opening made on the outside of the abdomen. Also called pediatric polymeric enteral nutrition formula.
pediatric listen (pee-dee-A-trik)
Having to do with children.
pediatric cancer listen (pee-dee-A-trik KAN-ser)
A term used to describe cancers that occur between birth and 15 years of age. Pediatric cancers are very rare and may differ from adult cancers in the way they grow and spread, how they are treated, and how they respond to treatment. Common types of pediatric cancer include leukemia (begins in blood-forming tissue such as bone marrow), lymphoma (begins in the cells of the immune system), neuroblastoma (begins in certain nerve cells), retinoblastoma (begins in the tissues of the retina), Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer), and cancers of the brain, bone, and soft tissue. Also called childhood cancer.
pediatric hematologist listen (PEE-dee-A-trik HEE-muh-TAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating blood disorders in children.
pediatric nurse specialist listen (pee-dee-A-trik ... SPEH-shuh-list)
A registered nurse with an advanced degree in nursing who specializes in the care of children.
pediatric oncologist listen (pee-dee-A-trik on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating children with cancer.
pediatric polymeric enteral nutrition formula listen (pee-dee-A-trik PAH-lih-MAYR-ik EN-teh-rul noo-TRIH-shun FOR-myoo-luh)
A nutritional drink that helps children who cannot get everything they need in their diet from foods and other drinks. It may be given through a small tube that is inserted through the nose into the stomach or the small intestine. It may also be given through a tube that is put into the stomach or the intestinal tract through an opening made on the outside of the abdomen. Also called PediaSure.
pediatric surgeon listen (pee-dee-A-trik SER-jun)
A surgeon who has special training in treating children. A surgeon removes or repairs a part of the body by operating on the patient.
pediatrician listen (PEE-dee-uh-TRIH-shun)
A doctor who has special training in preventing, diagnosing, and treating diseases and injuries in children. Pediatricians also help manage other problems that affect children, such as developmental disorders and behavioral, emotional, and social problems.
pedicle flap listen (PEH-dih-kul …)
A type of surgery used to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy. Tissue, including skin, fat, and muscle, is moved from one area of the body, such as the back or abdomen, to the chest to form a new breast mound. The tissue flap, along with its blood vessels, stays connected to the body and is passed through a tunnel under the skin to the chest. A pedicle flap is a type of breast reconstruction.
pedigree listen (PEH-dih-gree)
A diagram that shows relationships among family members. In medicine, a pedigree may also show the pattern of certain genes or diseases within a family.
pedunculated listen (peh-DUN-kyoo-LAY-ted)
In the body, a structure that has a peduncle (a stalk or stem) or is attached to another structure by a peduncle.
peer review process listen (peer ree-VYOO PRAH-ses)
The process by which original articles and grants written by researchers are evaluated for technical and scientific quality and correctness by other experts in the same field.
peer-reviewed scientific journal listen (peer-ree-VYOOD SY-en-TIH-fik JER-nul)
A publication that contains original articles that have been written by scientists and evaluated for technical and scientific quality and correctness by other experts in the same field.
PEG
A polymer made by joining molecules of ethylene oxide and water together in a repeating pattern. PEG can be a liquid or a waxy solid. In medicine, forms of PEG can be used in ointments, in drugs or substances to make them stay in the body longer, or in laxatives. Also called polyethylene glycol.
PEG tube listen (…toob)
A tube inserted through the wall of the abdomen directly into the stomach. It allows air and fluid to leave the stomach and can be used to give drugs and liquids, including liquid food, to the patient. Giving food through a PEG tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called gastrostomy tube and percutaneous endoscopic tube.
PEG-asparaginase listen (... as-PAYR-uh-jih-NAYS)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or who cannot be treated with asparaginase. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PEG-asparaginase is a form of the drug asparaginase that is linked to a substance called PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. Asparaginase is an enzyme that breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. It is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called Oncaspar and pegaspargase.
pegaspargase listen (peg-A-spar-jays)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or who cannot be treated with asparaginase. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pegaspargase is a form of the drug asparaginase that is linked to a substance called PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. Asparaginase is an enzyme that breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. It is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called Oncaspar and PEG-asparaginase.
Pegasys listen (PEH-guh-sis)
A drug used to treat hepatitis C infections. It is also being studied in the treatment and prevention of cancer. It is a cytokine that is modified in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called peginterferon alfa-2a.
pegfilgrastim listen (peg-fil-GRAS-tim)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Pegfilgrastim helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. It is a form of filgrastim and is able to stay in the body longer. Pegfilgrastim is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called filgrastim-SD/01, Fulphila, and Neulasta.
peginterferon alfa-2a listen (peg-IN-ter-FEER-on AL-fuh ...)
A drug used to treat hepatitis C infections. It is also being studied in the treatment and prevention of cancer. It is a cytokine that is modified in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Pegasys.
peginterferon alfa-2b listen (peg-IN-ter-FEER-on AL-fuh ...)
A drug used to treat melanoma and chronic hepatitis C. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Peginterferon alfa-2b is used under the brand name Sylatron to treat melanoma in patients who have had surgery to remove cancer that has spread to the lymph nodes. It is also used under the brand name PEG-Intron to treat chronic hepatitis C. Peginterferon alfa-2b is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) linked to a substance called PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. Peginterferon alfa-2b is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called SCH 54031.
PEG-Intron listen (… IN-tron)
A drug used to treat chronic hepatitis C. PEG-Intron contains the active ingredient peginterferon alfa-2b. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier.
PEG-MGDF
A form of megakaryocyte growth and development factor (MGDF) that is made in the laboratory. MGDF comes from the protein thrombopoietin, which is normally made in the body to help make platelets. PEG-MGDF is being studied as a way to increase the number of platelets in patients receiving chemotherapy. Also called PEG-rhMGDF and polyethylene glycosylated recombinant human megakaryocyte growth and development factor.
PEG-rhMGDF
A form of megakaryocyte growth and development factor (MGDF) that is made in the laboratory. MGDF comes from the protein thrombopoietin, which is normally made in the body to help make platelets. PEG-rhMGDF is being studied as a way to increase the number of platelets in patients receiving chemotherapy. Also called PEG-MGDF and polyethylene glycosylated recombinant human megakaryocyte growth and development factor.
pegylated arginine deiminase listen (PEH-guh-LAY-ted AR-jih-neen DEE-IH-mih-nays)
A substance being studied in the treatment of melanoma, liver cancer, and other types of cancer. It breaks down the amino acid arginine and may block the growth of cancer cells that need arginine to grow. It is a type of iminohydrolase. Also called ADI-PEG 20.
PEI
An injection of ethanol (alcohol) through the skin directly into a tumor to kill cancer cells. Ultrasound or a CT scan is used to guide the needle into the tumor. Also called alcohol ablation, ethanol ablation, and percutaneous ethanol injection.
PEITC
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. It is a naturally occurring compound found in some cruciferous vegetables. Also called phenethyl isothiocyanate.
pelargonium listen (PEH-lar-GOH-nee-um)
A type of plant that is native to southern Africa and has white, pink, purple, or red flowers and 3- to 5-lobed leaves. An essential oil that smells like roses is taken from the leaves and used in perfume, in mosquito repellants, and in aromatherapy to treat skin problems and to reduce stress. The scientific name is Pelargonium graveolens. Also called geranium.
peldesine listen (PEL-deh-seen)
A substance that is being studied for the treatment of cancer.
pelitinib listen (peh-LIH-tih-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It blocks the action of certain proteins that are part of the epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) family of proteins. These proteins may be found in increased amounts on the surface of some types of cancer cells. Blocking the action of these proteins may stop cancer cells from growing and may kill cancer cells. Pelitinib is a type of EGFR inhibitor. Also called EKB-569.
pelvic listen (PEL-vik)
Having to do with the pelvis. The pelvis is the area of the body below the abdomen that is located between the hip bones and contains the bladder and rectum. In females, it also contains the vagina, cervix, uterus, fallopian tubes, and ovaries. In males, it also contains the prostate and seminal vesicles.
pelvic exam listen (PEL-vik eg-ZAM)
A physical exam of the vagina, cervix, uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and rectum. First, the area outside the vagina is checked for signs of disease. A speculum is then inserted into the vagina to widen it so the vagina and cervix can be checked for signs of disease. Cell samples may be taken for a Pap test, or to test for sexually transmitted diseases or other infections. The doctor or nurse then inserts one or two lubricated, gloved fingers of one hand into the vagina and presses on the lower abdomen with the other hand to feel for lumps and check the size, shape, and position of the uterus and ovaries. The rectum may also be checked for lumps or abnormal areas. Also called internal exam.
pelvic exenteration listen (PEL-vik eg-ZEN-teh-RAY-shun)
Surgery to remove the lower colon, rectum, and bladder, and create stomata (openings) through which urine and stool are passed out of the body. In women, the cervix, vagina, ovaries, and nearby lymph nodes are also removed.
pelvic inflammatory disease listen (PEL-vik in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee dih-ZEEZ)
A condition in which the female reproductive organs are inflamed. It may affect the uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and certain ligaments. Pelvic inflammatory disease is usually caused by a bacterial infection. It may cause infertility and an increased risk of an ectopic pregnancy (pregnancy in the fallopian tubes). Also called PID.
pelvic lymph node listen (PEL-vik limf node)
A lymph node in the pelvis. The pelvis is the area of the body below the abdomen that contains the hip bones, bladder, rectum, and male or female reproductive organs. Pelvic lymph nodes drain and filter lymph from the pelvis and nearby areas. In cancer, pelvic lymph nodes that are near a tumor may be removed by surgery to check for signs that cancer has spread.
pelvic lymphadenectomy listen (PEL-vik LIM-fa-deh-NEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove lymph nodes in the pelvis for examination under a microscope to see if they contain cancer.
pelvic wall listen (PEL-vik ...)
The muscles and ligaments that line the part of the body between the hips.
pelvis listen (PEL-vus)
The area of the body below the abdomen that contains the hip bones, bladder, and rectum. In females, it also contains the vagina, cervix, uterus, fallopian tubes, and ovaries. In males, it also contains the prostate and seminal vesicles.
pembrolizumab listen (pem-broh-LIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used with axitinib to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that has not already been treated. It is also used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of small cell lung cancer, Merkel cell carcinoma, hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer), cervical cancer, stomach cancer, gastroesophageal junction cancer, urothelial carcinoma (a type of bladder cancer), Hodgkin lymphoma, primary mediastinal large B-cell lymphoma, non-small cell lung cancer, head and neck cancer, and melanoma. Pembrolizumab is also used to treat some types of solid tumors, including colorectal cancer, that have certain mutations in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pembrolizumab binds to a protein called PD-1, which is found on T cells. Pembrolizumab may block PD-1 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called Keytruda.
pemetrexed disodium listen (peh-meh-TREK-sed dy-SOH-dee-um)
A drug used alone or with cisplatin to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with cisplatin to treat malignant pleural mesothelioma in patients whose cancer cannot be treated with surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pemetrexed disodium stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of folate antagonist. Also called Alimta and LY231514.
penclomedine listen (pen-KLOH-meh-deen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
penectomy listen (pee-NEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the penis (an external male reproductive organ).
penetrance listen (PEH-neh-trunts)
Describes how likely it is that a person who has a certain disease-causing mutation (change) in a gene will show signs and symptoms of the disease. Not everyone who has the mutation will develop the disease. For example, some people who have a BRCA1 or BRCA2 gene mutation will develop cancer during their lifetime, but others will not. Currently, there is no way to know which people who have a cancer-causing mutation will develop cancer. Complete penetrance means that every person who has the mutation will show signs and symptoms of the disease.
penicillamine listen (PEH-nih-SIH-luh-MEEN)
A drug that removes copper from the body and is used to treat diseases in which there is an excess of copper. It is also being studied as a possible angiogenesis inhibitor in the treatment of brain tumors.
penicillin listen (PEH-nih-SIH-lin)
A drug that is used to treat infection. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibiotics.
penile cancer listen (PEE-nile KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the penis (an external male reproductive organ). Most penile cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the penis).
penile implant listen (PEE-nile IM-plant)
A firm rod or inflatable device that is placed in the penis (an external male reproductive organ) during a surgical procedure. The implant makes it possible to have and keep an erection. Penile implants are used to treat erectile dysfunction or impotence.
penis listen (PEE-nis)
An external male reproductive organ. It contains a tube called the urethra, which carries semen and urine to the outside of the body.
Pentam listen (PEN-tam)
A drug used to treat infections caused by certain microorganisms. It is also being studied in the treatment of melanoma. It prevents DNA from being copied and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antifungal agent, a type of antiprotozoal agent, and a type of PRL phosphatase inhibitor. Also called pentamidine isethionate.
pentamidine isethionate listen (pen-TA-mih-deen I-seh-THY-oh-nayt)
A drug used to treat infections caused by certain microorganisms. It is also being studied in the treatment of melanoma. It prevents DNA from being copied and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antifungal agent, a type of antiprotozoal agent, and a type of PRL phosphatase inhibitor. Also called Pentam.
pentetic acid calcium listen (pen-TEH-tik A-sid KAL-see-um)
A drug that protects healthy tissues from the toxic effects of anticancer drugs.
pentosan polysulfate listen (PEN-tuh-SAN PAH-lee-SUL-fayt)
A drug used to relieve pain or discomfort associated with chronic inflammation of the bladder. It is also being evaluated for its protective effects on the gastrointestinal tract in people undergoing radiation therapy.
pentostatin listen (PEN-toh-STA-tin)
The active ingredient in a drug that is used to treat hairy cell leukemia and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pentostatin blocks a protein needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is made by a bacterium. It is a type of adenosine deaminase inhibitor. Also called Nipent.
pentoxifylline listen (PEN-tok-SIH-fuh-lin)
A drug used to prevent blood clotting and as a treatment that may help decrease weight loss in people with cancer.
PEP02
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan hydrochloride that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. PEP02 is used together with fluorouracil and leucovorin to treat a certain type of pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse after treatment with gemcitabine anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Irinotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. PEP02 may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan hydrochloride. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of camptothecin analog. Also called irinotecan hydrochloride liposome, liposome-encapsulated irinotecan hydrochloride PEP02, and Onivyde.
pepsin listen (PEP-sin)
An enzyme made in the stomach that breaks down proteins in food during digestion. Stomach acid changes a protein called pepsinogen into pepsin.
pepsinogen listen (pep-SIH-noh-jen)
A substance made by cells in the stomach. Acid in the stomach changes pepsinogen to pepsin, which breaks down proteins in food during digestion.
peptic ulcer listen (PEP-tik UL-ser)
A break in the lining of the lower part of the esophagus, the stomach, or the upper part of the small intestine. Peptic ulcers form when cells on the surface of the lining become inflamed and die. They are usually caused by Helicobacter pylori bacteria and by certain medicines, such as aspirin and other nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs). Peptic ulcers may be linked to cancer and other diseases.
peptide listen (PEP-tide)
A molecule that contains two or more amino acids (the molecules that join together to form proteins). Peptides that contain many amino acids are called polypeptides or proteins.
peptide 946 listen (PEP-tide …)
A piece of a protein found only on melanoma (a type of skin cancer) cells. It is being used in vaccines to help the immune system kill melanoma cells.
peptide receptor radionuclide therapy listen (PEP-tide reh-SEP-ter RAY-dee-oh-NOO-klide THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy used to treat certain types of neuroendocrine tumors. A radioactive chemical is linked to a peptide (small protein) that targets cancer cells. When this radioactive peptide is injected into the body, it binds to a specific receptor found on some cancer cells. The radioactive peptide builds up in these cells and helps kill the cancer cells without harming normal cells. Peptide receptor radionuclide therapy is a type of targeted therapy. Also called PRRT.
percutaneous listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us)
Passing through the skin, as an injection or a topical medicine.
percutaneous endoscopic tube listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us en-doh-SKAH-pik gas-TROS-toh-mee toob)
A tube inserted through the wall of the abdomen directly into the stomach. It allows air and fluid to leave the stomach and can be used to give drugs and liquids, including liquid food, to the patient. Giving food through a percutaneous endoscopic tube is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called gastrostomy tube and PEG tube.
percutaneous epididymal sperm aspiration listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us eh-pih-DIH-dih-mul … AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A procedure in which a sample of sperm cells is removed from the epididymis through a small needle attached to a syringe. The epididymis is a narrow, tightly-coiled tube that is attached to each of the testicles and is where sperm cells mature and are stored. The sperm is looked at under a microscope in a laboratory, where it may be used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. Percutaneous epididymal sperm aspiration may be useful for men who have fertility problems caused by a blockage that keeps sperm from being ejaculated. This could be caused by previous vasectomy, certain genetic conditions, infection, or other conditions. It may also be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Percutaneous epididymal sperm aspiration is a type of sperm retrieval method.
percutaneous ethanol injection listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us EH-thuh-nol in-JEK-shun)
An injection of ethanol (alcohol) through the skin directly into a tumor to kill cancer cells. Ultrasound or a CT scan is used to guide the needle into the tumor. Also called alcohol ablation, ethanol ablation, and PEI.
percutaneous transhepatic biliary drainage listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us TRANZ-heh-PA-tik BIH-lee-ayr-ee DRAY-nij)
A procedure to drain bile to relieve pressure in the bile ducts caused by a blockage. An x-ray of the liver and bile ducts locates the blockage of bile flow. Images made by ultrasound guide placement of a stent (tube), which remains in the liver. Bile drains through the stent into the small intestine or into a collection bag outside the body. This procedure may relieve jaundice before surgery. Also called percutaneous transhepatic cholangiodrainage and PTCD.
percutaneous transhepatic cholangiodrainage listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us TRANZ-heh-PA-tik koh-lan-jee-oh-DRAY-nij)
A procedure to drain bile to relieve pressure in the bile ducts caused by a blockage. An x-ray of the liver and bile ducts locates the blockage of bile flow. Images made by ultrasound guide placement of a stent (tube), which remains in the liver. Bile drains through the stent into the small intestine or into a collection bag outside the body. This procedure may relieve jaundice before surgery. Also called percutaneous transhepatic biliary drainage and PTCD.
percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography listen (per-kyoo-TAY-nee-us TRANZ-heh-PA-tik koh-lan-jee-AH-gruh-fee)
A procedure to x-ray the hepatic and common bile ducts. A contrasting agent is injected through the skin into the liver or bile duct, and the ducts are then x-rayed to find the point of obstruction. Also called PTC.
performance status listen (per-FOR-munts STA-tus)
A measure of how well a patient is able to perform ordinary tasks and carry out daily activities.
perfusion listen (per-FYOO-zhun)
Bathing an organ or tissue with a fluid. In regional perfusion, a specific area of the body (usually an arm or a leg) receives high doses of anticancer drugs through a blood vessel. Such a procedure is performed to treat cancer that has not spread.
perfusion magnetic resonance imaging listen (per-FYOO-zhun mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts IH-muh-jing)
A special type of magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) that uses an injected dye in order to see blood flow through tissues. Also called magnetic resonance perfusion imaging.
periampullary cancer listen (PAYR-ee-AM-puh-LAYR-ee KAN-ser)
A cancer that forms near the ampulla of Vater (an enlargement of the ducts from the liver and pancreas where they join and enter the small intestine).
pericardial effusion listen (PAYR-ih-KAR-dee-ul eh-FYOO-zhun)
A condition in which extra fluid collects between the heart and the pericardium (the sac around the heart). The extra fluid causes pressure on the heart. This keeps it from pumping blood normally. Lymph vessels may also be blocked, which can cause infection. Pericardial effusions may be caused by cancer or cancer treatment, infection, injury, autoimmune disorders, thyroid or kidney problems, or other conditions.
pericytic tumor listen (PAYR-ih-SIH-tik TOO-mer)
A type of soft tissue tumor that begins in cells that wrap around blood vessels. Pericytic tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They can occur anywhere in the body. Pericytic tumors may occur in adults or children. Also called perivascular tumor.
perifosine listen (PAYR-ih-FAH-seen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called alkylphospholipids.
perihilar bile duct listen (PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt)
A small part of a duct (tube) called the extrahepatic bile duct that is just outside the liver and carries bile from the liver and gallbladder to the small intestine. The perihilar bile duct starts where the right and left hepatic ducts join outside the liver and form the common hepatic duct. It ends where a duct from the gallbladder joins to form the common bile duct. The perihilar bile duct is part of the biliary system.
perillyl alcohol listen (PAYR-ih-lil AL-kuh-hol)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It belongs to the family of plant drugs called monoterpenes.
perimenopausal listen (PAYR-ee-MEH-nuh-PAW-zul)
Describes the time in a woman’s life when menstrual periods become irregular as she approaches menopause. This is usually three to five years before menopause and is often marked by many of the symptoms of menopause, including hot flashes, mood swings, night sweats, vaginal dryness, trouble concentrating, and infertility.
perineal colostomy listen (PAYR-ih-NEE-ul koh-LOS-toh-mee)
An opening made surgically to allow the colon to exit the body through the perineum (the area of the body between the anus and the vulva in females, and between the anus and the scrotum in males). A colostomy provides a new path for waste material to leave the body after part of the colon has been removed.
perineal prostatectomy listen (PAYR-ih-NEE-ul PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the prostate through an incision made between the scrotum and the anus.
perineum listen (PAYR-ih-NEE-um)
The area of the body between the anus and the vulva in females, and between the anus and the scrotum in males.
perineural listen (payr-ih-NOOR-ul)
Around a nerve or group of nerves.
periodic neutropenia listen (PEER-ee-AH-dik noo-troh-PEE-nee-uh)
A chronic condition that affects neutrophils (a type of white blood cell). In periodic neutropenia, the number of neutrophils in the blood goes in cycles from normal to low and back to normal again. Symptoms include fever, inflamed mucous membranes in the mouth, and infections. Also called cyclic neutropenia.
perioperative listen (PAYR-ee-AH-pruh-tiv)
Around the time of surgery. This usually lasts from the time the patient goes into the hospital or doctor's office for surgery until the time the patient goes home.
peripheral blood listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul blud)
Blood circulating throughout the body.
peripheral blood lymphocyte therapy listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul blud LIM-foh-site THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment for Epstein-Barr virus infection or overgrowth of white blood cells (lymphocytes) after an organ or bone marrow transplant. Specific lymphocytes from a sibling donor are infused into the patient to try and reverse these conditions.
peripheral blood smear listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul blud smeer)
A procedure in which a sample of blood is viewed under a microscope to count different circulating blood cells (red blood cells, white blood cells, platelets, etc.) and see whether the cells look normal.
peripheral blood stem cell transplant listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul ... stem sel TRANZ-plant)
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own stem cells that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the blood of the patient or a donor. A peripheral blood stem cell transplant may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin). Also called PBSCT and peripheral stem cell support.
peripheral neuropathy listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul noor-AH-puh-thee)
A nerve problem that causes pain, numbness, tingling, swelling, or muscle weakness in different parts of the body. It usually begins in the hands or feet and gets worse over time. Peripheral neuropathy may be caused by cancer or cancer treatment, such as chemotherapy. It may also be caused by physical injury, infection, toxic substances, or conditions such as diabetes, kidney failure, or malnutrition. Also called neuropathy.
peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumor listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul PRIH-muh-tiv NOOR-oh-EK-toh-DER-mul TOO-mer)
A type of cancer that forms in bone or soft tissue. Also called Ewing sarcoma and pPNET.
peripheral stem cell listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul stem sel)
An immature cell found circulating in the bloodstream. New blood cells develop from peripheral stem cells.
peripheral stem cell support listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul stem sel …)
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own stem cells that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the blood of the patient or a donor. A peripheral stem cell support may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin). Also called PBSCT and peripheral blood stem cell transplant.
peripheral T-cell lymphoma listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul ... lim-FOH-muh)
One of a group of aggressive (fast-growing) non-Hodgkin lymphomas that begin in mature T lymphocytes (T cells that have matured in the thymus gland and gone to other lymphatic sites in the body, including lymph nodes, bone marrow, and spleen). Also called mature T-cell lymphoma.
peripheral venous catheter listen (peh-RIH-feh-rul VEE-nus KA-theh-ter)
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. A thin, flexible tube is inserted into a vein, usually in the back of the hand, the lower part of the arm, or the foot. A needle is inserted into a port to draw blood or give fluids.
peripherally inserted central catheter listen (peh-RIH-feh-ruh-lee in-SER-ted SEN-trul KA-theh-ter)
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. A thin, flexible tube is inserted into a vein in the upper arm and guided (threaded) into a large vein above the right side of the heart called the superior vena cava. A needle is inserted into a port outside the body to draw blood or give fluids. A peripherally inserted central catheter may stay in place for weeks or months and helps avoid the need for repeated needle sticks. Also called PICC.
peristalsis listen (payr-ih-STAL-sis)
The rippling motion of muscles in the intestine or other tubular organs characterized by the alternate contraction and relaxation of the muscles that propel the contents onward.
peritoneal listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul)
Having to do with the parietal peritoneum (the tissue that lines the abdominal wall and pelvic cavity) and visceral peritoneum (the tissue that covers most of the organs in the abdomen, including the intestines).
peritoneal cavity listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KA-vuh-tee)
The space within the abdomen that contains the intestines, the stomach, and the liver. It is bound by thin membranes.
peritoneal fluid listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul FLOO-id)
A liquid that is made in the abdominal cavity to lubricate the surface of the tissue that lines the abdominal wall and pelvic cavity and covers most of the organs in the abdomen.
peritoneal infusion listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul in-FYOO-zhun)
A method of delivering fluids and drugs directly into the abdominal cavity through a thin tube. Also called intraperitoneal infusion.
peritoneal perfusion listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul per-FYOO-zhun)
A method of delivering fluids and drugs directly to tumors in the peritoneal cavity.
peritoneal washing listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul WAH-shing)
A procedure in which a salt-water solution is used to wash the peritoneal cavity and then is removed to check for cancer cells. The peritoneal cavity is the space in the abdomen that contains the intestines, stomach, and liver. Peritoneal washings are commonly done during surgery for cancer of the ovary and uterus, to see if cancer has spread to the peritoneal cavity.
peritoneum listen (PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen.
peritonitis listen (PAYR-ih-tuh-NY-tis)
Inflammation of the peritoneum (tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen). Peritonitis can result from infection, injury, or certain diseases. Symptoms may include swelling of the abdomen, severe pain, and weight loss.
perivascular epithelioid cell tumor listen (PAYR-ee-VAS-kyoo-ler eh-pih-THEE-lee-oyd sel TOO-mer)
A family of rare tumors that form in the soft tissues of the stomach, intestines, lungs, female reproductive organs, and genitourinary organs. Most perivascular epithelioid cell tumors are benign (not cancer). They often occur in children with an inherited condition called tuberous sclerosis. Also called PEComa.
perivascular tumor listen (PAYR-ee-VAS-kyoo-ler TOO-mer)
A type of soft tissue tumor that begins in cells that wrap around blood vessels. Perivascular tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They can occur anywhere in the body. Perivascular tumors may occur in adults or children. Also called pericytic tumor.
Perjeta listen (per-JEH-tuh)
A drug used with other drugs to treat breast cancer that is HER2 positive. It is used in patients whose cancer has spread to other parts of the body and has not been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used before surgery in certain patients and after surgery in some patients who are at high risk for their cancer to recur (come back). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Perjeta binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help kill cancer cells. Perjeta is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called pertuzumab.
pernicious anemia listen (per-NIH-shus uh-NEE-mee-uh)
A type of anemia (low red blood cell count) caused by the body's inability to absorb vitamin B12.
peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma pathway listen (peh-ROK-sih-some proh-LIH-feh-RAY-ter-AK-tih-vay-ted reh-SEP-ter GA-muh PATH-way)
Describes a group of proteins in a cell that work together to help control how certain genes are expressed and the use of lipids (fats) and glucose (sugar) in the body. Changes in the peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma pathway may lead to diseases such as heart disease, diabetes, and cancer. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer and other diseases. Also called PPAR gamma pathway.
personal health record listen (PER-suh-nul helth REH-kurd)
A collection of information about a person’s health that allows the person to manage and track his or her own health information. A personal health record may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams, tests, and screenings. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. Also called personal history, personal medical history, and PHR.
personal history listen (PER-suh-nul HIH-stuh-ree)
A collection of information about a person’s health that allows the person to manage and track his or her own health information. A personal history may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams, tests, and screenings. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. Also called personal health record, personal medical history, and PHR.
personal medical history listen (PER-suh-nul MEH-dih-kul HIH-stuh-ree)
A collection of information about a person’s health that allows the person to manage and track his or her own health information. A personal medical history may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams, tests, and screenings. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. Also called personal health record, personal history, and PHR.
personalized medicine listen (PER-suh-nuh-LIZED MEH-dih-sin)
A form of medicine that uses information about a person’s genes, proteins, and environment to prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. In cancer, personalized medicine uses specific information about a person’s tumor to help diagnose, plan treatment, find out how well treatment is working, or make a prognosis. Examples of personalized medicine include using targeted therapies to treat specific types of cancer cells, such as HER2-positive breast cancer cells, or using tumor marker testing to help diagnose cancer. Also called precision medicine.
perturbation listen (PER-ter-BAY-shun)
A disruption or disturbance.
pertussis listen (per-TUH-sis)
A serious bacterial infection of the lungs and breathing tubes that spreads easily. Pertussis begins like a cold, but develops into severe coughing and gasping for air. Long spells of coughing may cause vomiting, and broken blood vessels in the eyes and on the skin. Also called whooping cough.
pertuzumab listen (per-TOO-zoo-mab)
A drug used with other drugs to treat breast cancer that is HER2 positive. It is used in patients whose cancer has spread to other parts of the body and has not been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also used before surgery in certain patients and after surgery in some patients who are at high risk for their cancer to recur (come back). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pertuzumab binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help kill cancer cells. Pertuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Perjeta.
pesticide listen (PES-tih-side)
Any substance that is used to kill insects and other pests.
PET scan listen (… skan)
A procedure in which a small amount of radioactive glucose (sugar) is injected into a vein, and a scanner is used to make detailed, computerized pictures of areas inside the body where the glucose is taken up. Because cancer cells often take up more glucose than normal cells, the pictures can be used to find cancer cells in the body. Also called positron emission tomography scan.
PET-CT scan listen (… skan)
A procedure that combines the pictures from a positron emission tomography (PET) scan and a computed tomography (CT) scan. The PET and CT scans are done at the same time with the same machine. The combined scans give more detailed pictures of areas inside the body than either scan gives by itself. A PET-CT scan may be used to help diagnose disease, such as cancer, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan.
petechiae listen (peh-TEE-kee-ee)
Pinpoint, unraised, round red spots under the skin caused by bleeding.
pet-facilitated therapy listen (…fuh-SIH-lih-tay-ted THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses dogs or other pets to improve the physical and mental health of patients with certain acute or chronic diseases. It is being studied as a way to relieve distress in cancer patients undergoing treatment for pain. Also called animal-assisted therapy.
petrolatum listen (PEH-troh-LAY-tum)
A thick, greasy, substance with no odor or taste made from petroleum (mixture of oily liquids found in the earth). Petrolatum is used on the skin to prevent drying and to help heal scrapes and burns. It is also used as a base for some ointments. Also called petroleum jelly.
petroleum jelly listen (peh-TROH-lee-um …)
A thick, greasy, substance with no odor or taste made from petroleum (mixture of oily liquids found in the earth). Petroleum jelly is used on the skin to prevent drying and to help heal scrapes and burns. It is also used as a base for some ointments. Also called petrolatum.
Peutz-Jeghers syndrome listen (putz-JAY-gerz SIN-drome)
A genetic disorder in which polyps form in the intestine and dark spots appear on the mouth and fingers. Having Peutz-Jeghers syndrome increases the risk of developing gastrointestinal cancer and many other types of cancer. Also called PJS.
pevonedistat listen (PEH-voh-NEH-dih-stat)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Pevonedistat blocks an enzyme called NEDD8-activating enzyme (NAE), which is involved in cell division. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Pevonedistat is a type of NAE inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy.
PF-00299804
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PF-00299804 blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called dacomitinib and Vizimpro.
PF-3512676
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called biological response modifiers. Also called CpG 7909 and ProMune.
PFIC
A rare, inherited disorder marked by a buildup in the liver of bile (fluid that helps digest fat). This can lead to liver disease and liver failure. It may also increase the risk of liver cancer. PFIC is caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes that make proteins needed to help the liver work the way it should. It usually occurs in infants and children. Also called progressive familial intrahepatic cholestasis.
PFS
The length of time during and after the treatment of a disease, such as cancer, that a patient lives with the disease but it does not get worse. In a clinical trial, measuring the PFS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called progression-free survival.
PFT
A test used to measure how well the lungs work. It measures how much air the lungs can hold and how quickly air is moved into and out of the lungs. It also measures how much oxygen is used and how much carbon dioxide is given off during breathing. A PFT can be used to diagnose a lung disease and to see how well treatment for the disease is working. Also called lung function test and pulmonary function test.
PG
One of several hormone-like substances made by the body. Different PGs control blood pressure, contraction of smooth muscles, and other processes within tissues where they are made. Certain PGs are being studied as cancer biomarkers. Also called prostaglandin.
PGE1
A drug that is used to treat impotence (inability to have an erection) and is being studied in the treatment of sexual problems in men who have had surgery for prostate cancer. It is a type of vasodilator. Also called alprostadil and prostaglandin E1.
p-glycoprotein listen (… GLY-koh-PROH-teen)
A protein that pumps substances out of cells. Cancer cells that have too much p-glycoprotein may not be killed by anticancer drugs.
pH
A measure of how acidic or basic a substance or solution is. pH is measured on a scale of 0 to 14. On this scale, a pH value of 7 is neutral, which means it is neither acidic nor basic. A pH value of less than 7 means it is more acidic, and a pH value of more than 7 means it is more basic. In medicine, having the right pH in the blood and other body fluids is important for the body to work the way it should.
PHA-739358
A substance being studied in the treatment of chronic myelogenous leukemia. PHA-739358 may stop tumor growth by blocking certain enzymes needed for cancer cells to divide and causing them to die. It is a type of kinase inhibitor.
PHACE syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
A rare disorder marked by a hemangioma (a benign blood vessel tumor) that spreads across an area of the body, usually the face, head, or neck. Other health problems that affect the large blood vessels, heart, eyes, or brain may also occur. PHACE syndrome may also cause developmental delays, hearing problems, thyroid problems, and migraines. PHACE syndrome usually occurs in infants and is much more common in girls than boys.
phagocyte listen (FA-goh-site)
A type of immune cell that can surround and kill microorganisms, ingest foreign material, and remove dead cells. It can also boost immune responses. Monocytes, macrophages, and neutrophils are phagocytes. A phagocyte is a type of white blood cell.
phagocytosis listen (FA-goh-sy-TOH-sis)
The process by which a phagocyte (a type of white blood cell) surrounds and destroys foreign substances (such as bacteria) and removes dead cells.
phantom limb pain listen (FAN-tum lim payn)
The sensation of pain or other unpleasant feelings in the place of a missing (phantom) limb.
pharmacist listen (FAR-muh-sist)
A health professional who has special training in preparing and dispensing (giving out) prescription drugs. Pharmacists have been taught how drugs work, how to use them, and their side effects.
pharmacogenetics listen (FAR-muh-koh-jeh-NEH-tix)
The study of how a person’s genes affect the way he or she responds to drugs. Pharmacogenetics is being used to learn ahead of time what the best drug or the best dose of a drug will be for a person. Also called pharmacogenomics.
pharmacogenomics listen (FAR-muh-koh-jeh-NOH-mix)
The study of how a person’s genes affect the way he or she responds to drugs. Pharmacogenomics is being used to learn ahead of time what the best drug or the best dose of a drug will be for a person. Also called pharmacogenetics.
pharmacokinetics listen (FAR-muh-koh-kih-NEH-tix)
The activity of drugs in the body over a period of time, including the processes by which drugs are absorbed, distributed in the body, localized in the tissues, and excreted.
pharmacology listen (FAR-muh-KAH-loh-jee)
The study of the origin, chemistry, and uses of drugs and their effects on the body.
pharmacopoeia listen (FAR-muh-koh-PEE-uh)
A book describing chemicals, drugs, and other substances and how they are used as medicines. It is prepared by a recognized authority.
pharmacovigilance listen (FAR-muh-koh-VIH-juh-lunts)
The science and practice of continuously reviewing the safety of drugs as they are tested in clinical trials and marketed for use. As part of pharmacovigilance, data about the problems caused by treatment with a drug are collected and analyzed. This process helps find ways to prevent adverse events and improve the safety of drugs. Also called PV.
pharyngeal cancer listen (fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the pharynx (the hollow tube inside the neck that starts behind the nose and ends at the top of the windpipe and esophagus). Pharyngeal cancer includes cancer of the nasopharynx (the upper part of the throat behind the nose), the oropharynx (the middle part of the pharynx), and the hypopharynx (the bottom part of the pharynx). Cancer of the larynx (voice box) may also be included as a type of pharyngeal cancer. Most pharyngeal cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in thin, flat cells that look like fish scales). Also called throat cancer.
pharynx listen (FAYR-inx)
The hollow tube inside the neck that starts behind the nose and ends at the top of the trachea (windpipe) and esophagus (the tube that goes to the stomach). The pharynx is about 5 inches long, depending on body size. Also called throat.
phase I clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
The first step in testing a new treatment in humans. A phase I study tests the safety, side effects, best dose, and timing of a new treatment. It may also test the best way to give a new treatment (for example, by mouth, infusion into a vein, or injection) and how the treatment affects the body. The dose is usually increased a little at a time in order to find the highest dose that does not cause harmful side effects. Phase I clinical trials usually include only a small number of patients who have not been helped by other treatments. Sometimes they include healthy volunteers.
phase I detoxification listen (fayz ... dee-TOK-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
A process in which the liver uses one of two major enzyme pathways to change a toxic substance, such as an anticancer drug, into a less toxic substance that is easier for the body to excrete.
phase I/II clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A study that tests the safety, side effects, and best dose of a new treatment. Phase I/II clinical trials also test how well a certain type of cancer or other disease responds to a new treatment. In the phase II part of the clinical trial, patients usually receive the highest dose of treatment that did not cause harmful side effects in the phase I part of the clinical trial. Combining phases I and II may allow research questions to be answered more quickly or with fewer patients.
phase II clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A study that tests whether a new treatment works for a certain type of cancer or other disease (for example, whether it shrinks a tumor or improves blood test results). Phase II clinical trials may also provide more information about the safety of the new treatment and how the treatment affects the body.
phase II detoxification listen (fayz ... dee-TOK-sih-fih-KAY-shun)
A process in which the liver uses one of two major enzyme pathways to change a toxic substance, such as an anticancer drug, into a less toxic substance that is easier for the body to excrete. In phase II detoxification, liver cells add a substance (such as cysteine, glycine, or a sulfur molecule) to a toxic chemical or drug, to make it less harmful.
phase II/III clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A study that tests how well a new treatment works for a certain type of cancer or other disease and compares the new treatment with a standard treatment. Phase II/III clinical trials may also provide more information about the safety and side effects of the new treatment. Combining phases II and III may allow research questions to be answered more quickly or with fewer patients.
phase III clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A study that tests the safety and how well a new treatment works compared with a standard treatment. For example, phase III clinical trials may compare which group of patients has better survival rates or fewer side effects. In most cases, treatments move into phase III trials only after they meet the goals of phase I and II trials. Phase III clinical trials may include hundreds of people.
phase IV clinical trial listen (fayz … KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A type of clinical trial that studies the side effects caused over time by a new treatment after it has been approved and is on the market. These trials look for side effects that were not seen in earlier trials and may also study how well a new treatment works over a long period of time. Phase IV clinical trials may include thousands of people. Also called post-marketing surveillance trial.
phenethyl isothiocyanate listen (feh-NEH-thul I-soh-THY-oh-SY-uh-nayt)
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. It is a naturally occurring compound found in some cruciferous vegetables. Also called PEITC.
phenobarbital listen (FEE-noh-BAR-bih-tal)
A drug that is used to treat seizures and as a sedative. It is being studied in the treatment of diarrhea and for its ability to increase the antitumor effect of other therapies. It belongs to the family of drugs called barbiturates.
phenol listen (FEE-nol)
A very poisonous chemical substance made from tar and also found in some plants and essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants). Phenol is used to make plastics, nylon, epoxy, medicines, and to kill germs. Also called carbolic acid.
phenothiazine listen (FEE-noh-THY-uh-zeen)
A type of drug that is used to treat severe mental and emotional disorders, severe nausea and vomiting, and certain other conditions. It belongs to the families of drugs called antipsychotics and antiemetics.
phenoxodiol listen (fih-NOK-soh-DY-ol)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called signal transduction inhibitors.
phenylacetate listen (FEH-nil-A-seh-tayt)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
phenylbutyrate listen (FEH-nil-BYOO-tuh-rayt)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called differentiating agents.
phenylketonuria listen (FEH-nil-KEE-tone-yoor-ee-uh)
An inherited disorder that causes a build-up of phenylalanine (an amino acid) in the blood. This can cause mental retardation, behavioral and movement problems, seizures, and delayed development. Using a blood test, PKU can easily be found in newborns, and treatment is a diet low in phenylalanine. Also called PKU.
phenytoin sodium listen (FEH-nih-toh-in SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat or prevent seizures or convulsions that may be caused by epilepsy, brain surgery, or treatment for brain cancer. It is a type of anticonvulsant agent. Also called Dilantin.
pheochromocytoma listen (FEE-oh-KROH-moh-sy-TOH-muh)
Tumor that forms in the center of the adrenal gland (gland located above the kidney) that causes it to make too much adrenaline. Pheochromocytomas are usually benign (not cancer) but can cause high blood pressure, pounding headaches, heart palpitations, flushing of the face, nausea, and vomiting.
pheresis listen (feh-REE-sis)
A procedure in which blood is collected, part of the blood such as platelets or white blood cells is taken out, and the rest of the blood is returned to the donor. Also called apheresis.
Philadelphia chromosome listen (FIH-luh-DEL-fee-uh KROH-muh-some)
An abnormality of chromosome 22 in which part of chromosome 9 is transferred to it. Bone marrow cells that contain the Philadelphia chromosome are often found in chronic myelogenous leukemia and sometimes found in acute lymphocytic leukemia.
philosophical listen (FIH-luh-SAH-fih-kul)
Having to do with the deeper questions of life and with a person’s basic beliefs, ideas, and attitudes.
phlebitis listen (fleh-BY-tis)
Inflammation (redness, swelling, pain, and heat) of a vein, usually in the legs. Phlebitis may be caused by infection, injury, or irritation.
phlebotomy listen (fleh-BAH-toh-mee)
A procedure in which a needle is used to take blood from a vein, usually for laboratory testing. Phlebotomy may also be done to remove extra red blood cells from the blood, to treat certain blood disorders. Also called blood draw and venipuncture.
phlegm listen (flem)
A more than normal amount of thick mucus made by the cells lining the upper airways and lungs. A buildup of phlegm may be caused by infection, irritation, or chronic lung disease, and can cause discomfort in the chest and coughing.
phobia listen (FOH-bee-uh)
An extreme, irrational, fear of something that may cause a person to panic. Examples of common phobias include fear of spiders, flying in an airplane, elevators, heights, enclosed rooms, crowded public places, and embarrassing oneself in front of other people.
phosphate listen (FOS-fayt)
A form of phosphoric acid, which contains phosphorus. In the body, phosphates are found in the bones and teeth. Phosphates may be used to treat a high level of calcium in the blood. Adding or removing phosphate chemical groups may affect the way proteins act in the body.
phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase listen (FOS-fuh-TY-duh-lih-NOH-sih-TOL-3 KY-nays)
A type of enzyme that transmits signals in cells and that helps control cell growth. Some tumors have higher-than-normal levels of phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase. Also called PI3 kinase and PI3K.
phospholipid listen (FOS-foh-LIH-pid)
A lipid (fat) that contains phosphorus. Phospholipids are a major part of cell membranes.
phospholipid complex listen (FOS-foh-LIH-pid KOM-plex)
A chemical or drug that is attached to a lipid (fat) that contains phosphorus.
phosphonoformate trisodium listen (FOS-foh-noh-FOR-mayt try-SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat infections with herpesviruses in people whose immune systems are weakened by AIDS. It blocks the viruses from making copies of themselves. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called foscarnet sodium and Foscavir.
phosphoric listen (fos-FOR-ik)
Having to do with or containing the element phosphorus.
phosphoric acid listen (fos-FOR-ik A-sid)
An acid that contains phosphorus and is used in medicine and dentistry. It is also used to remove rust. A dilute form of phosphoric acid is used to flavor soft drinks.
phosphorus listen (FOS-for-us)
A nonmetallic element that is found in the blood, muscles, nerves, bones, and teeth and is a component of adenosine triphosphate (ATP; the primary energy source for the body's cells).
phosphorus P 32 listen (FOS-for-us ...)
A radioactive form of the element phosphorus. It is used in the laboratory to label DNA and proteins. It has also been used to treat a blood disorder called polycythemia vera and certain types of leukemia, but it is not commonly used anymore. Phosphorus P 32 gives off radiation that damages the DNA in a cell, which can cause the cell to die.
phosphorylation listen (fos-FOR-ih-LAY-shun)
A process in which a phosphate group is added to a molecule, such as a sugar or a protein.
photoactivity listen (FOH-toh-ak-TIH-vih-tee)
The effect produced when certain substances are exposed to light. In cancer treatment, some drugs become active when exposed to light and are then able to kill tumor cells.
photocoagulation listen (FOH-toh-koh-A-gyuh-LAY-shun)
The use of an intense beam of light, such as a laser, to seal off blood vessels or destroy tissue. It is used to treat certain eye conditions, and may be used to destroy blood vessels that a tumor needs to grow.
photodynamic therapy listen (FOH-toh-dy-NA-mik THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with drugs that become active when exposed to light. These activated drugs may kill cancer cells.
Photofrin listen (FOH-toh-frin)
A drug used to treat some types of cancer. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, Photofrin becomes active and kills the cancer cells. It is a type of photodynamic therapy agent. Also called porfimer sodium.
photon beam radiation therapy listen (FOH-ton beem RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses x-rays or gamma rays that come from a special machine called a linear accelerator (linac). The radiation dose is delivered at the surface of the body and goes into the tumor and through the body. Photon beam radiation therapy is different from proton beam therapy.
photopheresis listen (FOH-toh-feh-REE-sis)
A procedure in which blood is removed from the body and treated with ultraviolet light and drugs that become active when exposed to light. The blood is then returned to the body. It is being studied in the treatment of some blood and bone marrow diseases and graft-vs-host disease (GVHD). Also called extracorporeal photopheresis.
photophobia listen (FOH-toh-FOH-bee-uh)
A condition in which the eyes are more sensitive than normal to light.
photosensitizer listen (FOH-toh-SEN-sih-ty-zer)
A drug used in photodynamic therapy. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, the drug becomes active and kills the cancer cells. Also called photosensitizing agent.
photosensitizing agent listen (FOH-toh-SEN-sih-ty-zing AY-jent)
A drug used in photodynamic therapy. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, the drug becomes active and kills the cancer cells. Also called photosensitizer.
photosynthesis listen (FOH-toh-SIN-theh-sis)
A chemical process that occurs in plants, algae, and some types of bacteria, when they are exposed to sunlight. During photosynthesis, water and carbon dioxide combine to form carbohydrates (sugars) and give off oxygen. Photosynthesis is needed for animal and plant life.
phototesting listen (FOH-toh-TES-ting)
Special tests used to measure the reaction of the skin to ultraviolet radiation. Phototesting is being used to see if drugs taken by mouth to treat cancer make the skin more sensitive to ultraviolet radiation.
phototherapy listen (FOH-toh-THAYR-uh-pee)
The treatment of disease with certain types of light. Phototherapy can use lasers, LED, fluorescent lamps, and ultraviolet or infrared radiation. Also called light therapy.
phototoxicity listen (FOH-toh-tok-SIH-sih-tee)
A condition in which the skin or eyes become very sensitive to sunlight or other forms of light. It can be caused by taking certain drugs, or rubbing certain essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants) or other topical agents into the skin. Phototoxicity causes sunburn, blisters, and other skin problems.
PHP
A rare condition in which the pituitary gland stops making most or all hormones. Pituitary hormones help control the way many parts of the body work. Symptoms of the condition depend on the hormones that are missing. They include growth problems (in children), obesity (in adults), hair loss, slow heart rate, low blood sugar, low blood pressure, fatigue, and problems with reproduction. This condition may be caused by a tumor on or near the pituitary gland, infection, stroke, injury, surgery, or radiation therapy. It may also be inherited. Also called panhypopituitarism.
PHR
A collection of information about a person’s health that allows the person to manage and track his or her own health information. A PHR may include information about allergies, illnesses, surgeries, immunizations, and results of physical exams, tests, and screenings. It may also include information about medicines taken and health habits, such as diet and exercise. Also called personal health record, personal history, and personal medical history.
phrenic nerve listen (FREH-nik nerv)
A nerve that runs from the spinal cord to the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs and heart that separates the chest from the abdomen). It causes the diaphragm to contract and relax, which helps control breathing.
phyllodes tumor listen (fih-LOH-deez TOO-mer)
A type of tumor found in breast or prostate tissue. It is often large and bulky and grows quickly. It may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) and may spread to other parts of the body. Also called CSP and cystosarcoma phyllodes.
physiatrist listen (fih-ZY-uh-trist)
A doctor who has special training in physical medicine. Physical medicine is the prevention and treatment of disease or injury with physical methods, such as exercise and machines. Also called physical medicine specialist.
physical dependence listen (FIH-zih-kul dee-PEN-dents)
A condition in which a person takes a drug over time, and unpleasant physical symptoms occur if the drug is suddenly stopped or taken in smaller doses.
physical examination listen (FIH-zih-kul eg-ZA-mih-NAY-shun)
An exam of the body to check for general signs of disease.
physical medicine specialist listen (FIH-zih-kul MEH-dih-sin SPEH-shuh-list)
A doctor who has special training in physical medicine. Physical medicine is the prevention and treatment of disease or injury with physical methods, such as exercise and machines. Also called physiatrist.
physical therapist listen (FIH-zih-kul THAYR-uh-pist)
A health professional trained to evaluate and treat people who have conditions or injuries that limit their ability to move and do physical activities. Physical therapists use methods such as exercise, massage, hot packs, ice, and electrical stimulation to help strengthen muscles, relieve pain, and improve movement. They also teach exercises to help prevent injury and loss of motion.
physical therapy listen (FIH-zih-kul THAYR-uh-pee)
The use of exercises and physical activities to help condition muscles and restore strength and movement. For example, physical therapy can be used to restore arm and shoulder movement and build back strength after breast cancer surgery.
physical touch methods listen (FIH-zih-kul tuch MEH-thuds)
A type of therapy in which the therapist moves or manipulates one or more parts of the patient’s body. It may be used to treat pain, stress, anxiety, and depression, and for general well-being. Examples include chiropractic treatments, physical therapy, and massage therapy. Also called manipulative and body-based practice and manual healing.
physician listen (fih-ZIH-shun)
Medical doctor.
physician assistant listen (fih-ZIH-shun uh-SIS-tunt)
A health professional who is licensed to do certain medical procedures under the guidance of a doctor. A physician assistant may take medical histories, do physical exams, take blood and urine samples, care for wounds, and give injections and immunizations. Also called PA.
Physician Data Query listen (fih-ZIH-shun DAY-tuh KWEER-ee)
Physician Data Query is an online source of cancer information that is developed and maintained by the National Cancer Institute (NCI). It makes current, credible, and accurate cancer information available to health professionals and the public. Physician Data Query contains information about cancer treatment, supportive and palliative care, screening, prevention, genetics, and integrative, complementary, and alternative medicine. This information is updated with the most recent evidence from scientific research. Physician Data Query also contains drug information summaries on many cancer-related drugs; dictionaries of cancer terms, drug terms, and genetics terms; and a directory of professionals who provide genetics services. Most of this information and more specific information about Physician Data Query can be found on the NCI's website at http://www.cancer.gov/publications/pdq. Also called PDQ.
physiologic listen (FIH-zee-uh-LAH-jik)
Having to do with the functions of the body. When used in the phrase "physiologic age," it refers to an age assigned by general health, as opposed to calendar age.
phytic acid listen (FY-tik A-sid)
A substance found in many foods that come from plants, including corn, wheat, rice, and soybeans, and in large amounts in cereals and legumes. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer. Also called inositol hexaphosphate and IP6.
phytochemical listen (FY-toh-KEH-mih-kul)
A substance found in plants. Some phytochemicals may reduce the risk of cancer.
phytoestrogen listen (FY-toh-ES-truh-jin)
An estrogen-like substance found in some plants and plant products. Phytoestrogens may have anticancer effects.
phytohemagglutinin listen (FY-toh-HEE-muh-GLOO-tih-nin)
A substance found in plants that causes red blood cells to clump together and certain white blood cells to divide.
phytol listen (FY-tol)
A chemical substance that comes from plants and is used to make vitamins E and K. Phytol is also found in soaps, beauty care products, and household products.
phytosterol listen (FY-toh-STEER-ol)
A plant-based compound that can compete with dietary cholesterol to be absorbed by the intestines, resulting in lower blood cholesterol levels. Phytosterols may have some effect in cancer prevention. Also called plant sterol.
PI
The person(s) in charge of a clinical trial or a scientific research grant. The PI prepares and carries out the clinical trial protocol (plan for the study) or research paid for by the grant. The PI also analyzes the data and reports the results of the trial or grant research. Also called principal investigator.
PI3 kinase listen (... KY-nays)
A type of enzyme that transmits signals in cells and that helps control cell growth. Some tumors have higher-than-normal levels of PI3 kinase. Also called phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase and PI3K.
PI3K
A type of enzyme that transmits signals in cells and that helps control cell growth. Some tumors have higher-than-normal levels of PI3K. Also called phosphatidylinositol-3 kinase and PI3 kinase.
PI-88
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antiangiogenesis agents.
Picato listen (pih-KAY-toh)
A drug applied to the skin to treat actinic keratosis (thick, scaly growths on the skin that may become cancer). Picato may help kill abnormal cells. It is a type of cytotoxic agent. Also called ingenol mebutate gel.
PICC listen
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. A thin, flexible tube is inserted into a vein in the upper arm and guided (threaded) into a large vein above the right side of the heart called the superior vena cava. A needle is inserted into a port outside the body to draw blood or give fluids. A PICC may stay in place for weeks or months and helps avoid the need for repeated needle sticks. Also called peripherally inserted central catheter.
PID
A condition in which the female reproductive organs are inflamed. It may affect the uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and certain ligaments. PID is usually caused by a bacterial infection. It may cause infertility and an increased risk of an ectopic pregnancy (pregnancy in the fallopian tubes). Also called pelvic inflammatory disease.
pigment listen (PIG-ment)
A substance that gives color to tissue. Pigments are responsible for the color of skin, eyes, and hair.
pilocarpine listen (PY-loh-KAR-peen)
A drug used to increase salivation in people who have dry mouth caused by opioids or radiation therapy. Pilocarpine belongs to the family of drugs called alkaloids.
pilocytic listen (PY-loh-SIH-tik)
Made up of cells that look like fibers when viewed under a microscope.
pilot study listen (PY-lut STUH-dee)
The initial study examining a new method or treatment.
PIN listen
Noncancerous growth of cells lining the internal and external surfaces of the prostate gland. Having high-grade PIN may increase the risk of developing prostate cancer. Also called prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia.
pineal body listen (PIH-nee-ul BAH-dee)
A tiny organ in the cerebrum that produces melatonin. Also called pineal gland and pineal organ.
pineal germinoma listen (PIH-nee-ul JER-mih-NOH-muh)
A type of germ cell tumor that is found in the pineal gland in the brain. Symptoms of pineal germinomas include headaches, changes in vision, nausea, and vomiting.
pineal gland listen (PIH-nee-ul ...)
A tiny organ in the cerebrum that produces melatonin. Also called pineal body and pineal organ.
pineal organ listen (PIH-nee-ul OR-gun)
A tiny organ in the cerebrum that produces melatonin. Also called pineal body and pineal gland.
pineal region tumor listen (PIH-nee-ul REE-jun TOO-mer)
A type of brain tumor that forms in or around the pineal gland (a tiny organ near the center of the brain). Pineal region tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They include pineocytomas, pineoblastomas, and pineal germinomas. Also called pinealoma.
pinealoma listen (PIH-nee-uh-LOH-muh)
A type of brain tumor that forms in or around the pineal gland (a tiny organ near the center of the brain). Pinealomas may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer). They include pineocytomas, pineoblastomas, and pineal germinomas. Also called pineal region tumor.
pineoblastoma listen (PIH-nee-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
A fast growing type of brain tumor that occurs in or around the pineal gland, a tiny organ near the center of the brain.
pineocytoma listen (PIH-nee-oh-sy-TOH-muh)
A slow growing type of brain tumor that occurs in or around the pineal gland, a tiny organ near the center of the brain.
pinkeye listen (PINK-i)
A condition in which the conjunctiva (membranes lining the eyelids and covering the white part of the eye) become inflamed or infected. Also called conjunctivitis.
pioglitazone listen (py-oh-GLIH-tuh-zone)
A drug that is used to treat type 2 diabetes and is being studied in the prevention of head and neck cancer. It may be able to stop leukoplakia (a condition affecting the mouth ) from developing into cancer. It is a type of thiazolidinedione. Also called Actos.
pipe listen
As it relates to tobacco use, a device that has a mouthpiece at one end of a tube and a small bowl at the other end that is filled with tobacco, which is lit and smoked. The smoke from a pipe is usually not inhaled into the lungs. It contains nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Pipe smoking can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, larynx (voice box), esophagus, lung, pancreas, and bladder. It can also cause heart disease, lung disease, and other health problems.
piperacillin-tazobactam listen (py-PER-uh-SIH-lin-TA-zoh-BAK-tam)
A drug combination that is used to treat infection in people with cancer. Piperacillin is a synthetic penicillin; tazobactam enhances the effectiveness of piperacillin.
Piqray (PIK-ray)
A drug used with fulvestrant to treat breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and got worse during or after treatment with hormone therapy. It is used in postmenopausal women, and men, whose cancer is hormone receptor positive and HER2 negative and has a mutation in the PIK3CA gene. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Piqray blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called alpelisib.
pirfenidone listen (peer-FEH-nih-done)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention and treatment of scar tissue caused by radiation therapy. It belongs to the family of drugs called anti-inflammatory agents.
Piritrexim listen (peer-ee-TREK-sim)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called folate antagonists.
pituitary gland listen (pih-TOO-ih-TAYR-ee...)
A pea-sized organ attached to the part of the brain called the hypothalamus. It lies at the base of the brain above the back of the nose. The hypothalamus sends signals to the pituitary gland, which then makes hormones that control other glands and many of the body’s functions, including growth and fertility.
pituitary tumor listen (pih-TOO-ih-TAYR-ee TOO-mer)
A tumor that forms in the pituitary gland. The pituitary gland is a pea-sized organ at the base of the brain. It makes hormones that affect other glands and many of the body’s functions, including growth. Symptoms depend on the hormones affected by the tumor. Most pituitary tumors are benign (not cancer) and many do not cause any symptoms.
pixantrone listen (PIK-san-trone)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antitumor antibiotics. Also called BBR 2778.
PJS
A genetic disorder in which polyps form in the intestine and dark spots appear on the mouth and fingers. Having PJS increases the risk of developing gastrointestinal cancer and many other types of cancer. Also called Peutz-Jeghers syndrome.
PKC
An enzyme found throughout the body's tissues and organs. Several forms of PKC are involved in many cellular functions. PKC is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called protein kinase C.
PKC412
A drug used with cytarabine and daunorubicin to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also used to treat mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia) and systemic mastocytosis (a rare condition in which there are too many mast cells in the body). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PKC412 blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. PKC412 is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called midostaurin, N-benzoyl-staurosporine, and Rydapt.
PKU
An inherited disorder that causes a build-up of phenylalanine (an amino acid) in the blood. This can cause mental retardation, behavioral and movement problems, seizures, and delayed development. Using a blood test, PKU can easily be found in newborns, and treatment is a diet low in phenylalanine. Also called phenylketonuria.
placebo listen (pluh-SEE-boh)
An inactive substance or other intervention that looks the same as, and is given the same way as, an active drug or treatment being tested. The effects of the active drug or other intervention are compared to the effects of the placebo.
placebo therapy listen (pluh-SEE-boh THAYR-uh-pee)
An inactive treatment or procedure that is intended to mimic as closely as possible a therapy in a clinical trial. Also called sham therapy.
placebo-controlled listen (pluh-SEE-boh-kun-TROLD)
Refers to a clinical study in which the control patients receive a placebo.
placenta listen (pluh-SEN-tuh)
The organ that nourishes the developing fetus in the uterus.
placental blood transplantation listen (pluh-SEN-tul blud tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
The transfer of blood from a placenta to an individual whose own blood production system is suppressed. Placental blood contains high levels of stem cells needed to produce new blood cells. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer and severe blood disorders such as aplastic anemia.
Plan B listen (plan …)
A form of the hormone progesterone that is made in the laboratory and used to prevent pregnancy. It is being studied in the prevention of ovarian and endometrial cancer, and in the treatment of other conditions. Plan B is a type of oral contraceptive. Also called L-norgestrel and levonorgestrel.
plant sterol listen (... STEER-ol)
A plant-based compound that can compete with dietary cholesterol to be absorbed by the intestines, resulting in lower blood cholesterol levels. Plant sterols may have some effect in cancer prevention. Also called phytosterol.
plaque listen (plak)
In medicine, a small, abnormal patch of tissue on a body part or an organ. Plaques may also be a build-up of substances from a fluid, such as cholesterol in the blood vessels.
plaque radiotherapy listen (plak RAY-dee-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy used to treat eye tumors. A thin piece of metal (usually gold) with radioactive seeds placed on one side is sewn onto the outside wall of the eye with the seeds aimed at the tumor. It is removed at the end of treatment, which usually lasts for several days.
plasma listen (PLAZ-muh)
The clear, yellowish, fluid part of the blood that carries the blood cells. The proteins that form blood clots are in plasma.
plasma cell listen (PLAZ-muh sel)
A type of immune cell that makes large amounts of a specific antibody. Plasma cells develop from B cells that have been activated. A plasma cell is a type of white blood cell. Also called plasmacyte.
plasma cell myeloma listen (PLAZ-muh sel MY-eh-LOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). Also called Kahler disease, multiple myeloma, and myelomatosis.
plasma cell tumor listen (PLAZ-muh sel TOO-mer)
A tumor that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). Multiple myeloma, monoclonal gammopathy of undetermined significance (MGUS), and plasmacytoma are types of plasma cell tumors.
plasma exchange listen (PLAZ-muh EX-chaynj)
A procedure in which a machine is used to separate the plasma (the liquid part of the blood) from the blood cells. After the plasma is separated from the blood cells, the blood cells are mixed with a liquid to replace the plasma and are returned to the body. Plasma exchange is often done to remove extra antibodies, abnormal proteins, or other harmful substances from the blood. It may be used to treat certain types of blood disorders, autoimmune disorders, nervous system disorders, or other conditions. Also called plasmapheresis.
plasma membrane listen (PLAZ-muh MEM-brayn)
The outer membrane of a cell.
plasmablastic lymphoma listen (PLAZ-muh-BLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh)
A very aggressive (fast-growing) type of large B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer that begins in the cells of the immune system). It is most common in patients with HIV infection, but may also occur in patients whose immune system is suppressed for other reasons.
plasmacyte listen (PLAZ-muh-site)
A type of immune cell that makes large amounts of a specific antibody. Plasmacytes develop from B cells that have been activated. A plasmacyte is a type of white blood cell. Also called plasma cell.
plasmacytic listen (PLAZ-muh-SIH-tik)
Having to do with plasma cells (a type of white blood cells).
plasmacytoma listen (PLAZ-muh-sy-TOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in plasma cells (white blood cells that produce antibodies). A plasmacytoma may turn into multiple myeloma.
plasmapheresis listen (PLAZ-muh-feh-REE-sis)
A procedure in which a machine is used to separate the plasma (the liquid part of the blood) from the blood cells. After the plasma is separated from the blood cells, the blood cells are mixed with a liquid to replace the plasma and are returned to the body. Plasmapheresis is often done to remove extra antibodies, abnormal proteins, or other harmful substances from the blood. It may be used to treat certain types of blood disorders, autoimmune disorders, nervous system disorders, or other conditions. Also called plasma exchange.
plastic surgeon listen (PLAS-tik SER-jun)
A surgeon who has special training in reducing scarring or disfigurement that may occur as a result of accidents, birth defects, or treatment for diseases.
plastic surgery listen (PLAS-tik SER-juh-ree)
An operation that restores or improves the appearance of body structures.
platelet listen (PLAYT-let)
A tiny, disc-shaped piece of cell that is found in the blood and spleen. Platelets are pieces of very large cells in the bone marrow called megakaryocytes. They help form blood clots to slow or stop bleeding and to help wounds heal. Having too many or too few platelets or having platelets that don’t work as they should can cause problems. Checking the number of platelets in the blood may help diagnose certain diseases or conditions. Also called thrombocyte.
platelet-derived growth factor listen (PLAYT-let-deh-RIVED grothe FAK-ter)
A family of molecules released from platelets (tiny pieces of cells that are found in the blood and that help the blood clot). Forms of platelet-derived growth factor help to heal wounds and to repair damage to blood vessel walls. They also help blood vessels grow. Also called PDGF.
Platinol listen (PLA-tih-nol)
A brand name for cisplatin, which is used to treat certain types of bladder, ovarian, and testicular cancer. Platinol brand has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
platinum listen (PLA-tih-num)
A metal that is an important component of some anticancer drugs, such as cisplatin and carboplatin.
platinum refractory cancer listen (PLA-tih-num reh-FRAK-tor-ee KAN-ser)
Cancer that does not respond to treatment with anticancer drugs that contain the metal platinum, such as cisplatin and carboplatin.
platinum resistant cancer listen (PLA-tih-num reh-ZIH-stunt KAN-ser)
Cancer that responds at first to treatment with drugs that contain the metal platinum, such as cisplatin and carboplatin, but then comes back within a certain period. For example, ovarian cancer that comes back within 6 months after treatment is considered platinum resistant. Knowing whether cancer is platinum resistant may help plan further treatment.
platinum sensitive cancer listen (PLA-tih-num SEN-sih-tiv KAN-ser)
Cancer that responds to treatment with anticancer drugs that contain the metal platinum, such as cisplatin and carboplatin. Some cancers that respond to treatment but then come back after a certain period may also be considered platinum sensitive. For example, ovarian cancer that comes back 6 or more months after platinum-based treatment is considered platinum sensitive. Knowing whether cancer is platinum sensitive may help plan further treatment.
Plenaxis listen (pleh-NAK-sis)
A drug used to reduce the amount of testosterone made in patients with advanced symptomatic prostate cancer for which no other treatment options are available. It belongs to the family of drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) antagonists. Also called abarelix.
pleomorphic listen (PLEE-oh-MOR-fik)
Occurring in various distinct forms. In terms of cells, having variation in the size and shape of cells or their nuclei.
pleomorphic liposarcoma listen (PLEE-oh-MOR-fik LIH-poh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing type of cancer that begins in fat cells. It usually forms in the deep soft tissues of the arms or legs, but it may also form in the abdomen or chest. Pleomorphic liposarcoma often recurs (comes back) after treatment and spreads to other parts of the body, including the lungs. It usually occurs in older adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. Pleomorphic liposarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
plerixafor listen (pleh-RIK-suh-for)
A drug used before autologous stem cell transplantation in patients with non-Hodgkin lymphoma or multiple myeloma. Plerixafor is given together with granulocyte-colony stimulating factor (G-CSF) to help move stem cells from the bone marrow to the blood. The stem cells can then be collected, stored, and given back to the patient. Plerixafor is a type of chemokine receptor antagonist. Also called AMD 3100 and Mozobil.
pleura listen (PLOOR-uh)
A thin layer of tissue that covers the lungs and lines the interior wall of the chest cavity. It protects and cushions the lungs. This tissue secretes a small amount of fluid that acts as a lubricant, allowing the lungs to move smoothly in the chest cavity while breathing.
pleural cavity listen (PLOOR-ul KA-vuh-tee)
The space enclosed by the pleura, which is a thin layer of tissue that covers the lungs and lines the interior wall of the chest cavity.
pleural effusion listen (PLOOR-ul eh-FYOO-zhun)
An abnormal collection of fluid between the thin layers of tissue (pleura) lining the lung and the wall of the chest cavity.
pleurectomy listen (ploo-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of the pleura (a thin layer of tissue that covers the interior wall of the chest cavity).
pleurodesis listen (PLOOR-oh-DEE-sis)
A medical procedure that uses chemicals or drugs to cause inflammation and adhesion between the layers of the pleura (a thin layer of tissue that covers the lungs and lines the interior wall of the chest cavity). This prevents the buildup of fluid in the pleural cavity. It is used as a treatment for severe pleural effusion.
pleuropulmonary blastoma listen (PLOOR-oh-PUL-muh-NAYR-ee blas-TOH-muh)
A rare, fast-growing cancer that forms in the tissues of the lung and pleura (the thin layer of tissue that covers the lungs and lines the inside of the chest). It may also form in the organs between the lungs, including the heart, aorta, and pulmonary artery, or in the diaphragm. Pleuropulmonary blastoma may sometimes spread to other parts of the body, especially to the brain. It usually occurs in infants and young children. Some patients with pleuropulmonary blastoma have mutations (changes) in a gene called DICER1.
pleuropulmonary blastoma familial cancer syndrome listen (PLOOR-oh-PUL-muh-NAYR-ee blas-TOH-muh fuh-MIH-lee-ul KAN-ser SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that increases the risk of pleuropulmonary blastoma (a rare, fast-growing cancer that forms in the tissues of the lung and chest cavity). Pleuropulmonary blastoma familial cancer syndrome may cause cysts in the kidney and lung, thyroid problems, and cancers of the ovary, testicle, kidney, and soft tissue. It may also cause other cancers and benign (not cancer) conditions. This syndrome may be caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called DICER1.
plexiform fibrohistiocytic tumor listen (PLEK-sih-form FY-broh-HIS-tee-oh-SIH-tik TOO-mer)
A rare tumor found mainly in children and young adults. It usually forms in the skin on the arms and legs. It is slow-growing and usually does not spread to other parts of the body. It is a type of soft tissue tumor.
plexiform neurofibroma listen (PLEK-sih-form NOOR-oh-fy-BROH-muh)
A nerve that has become thick and misshapen due to the abnormal growth of cells and tissues that cover the nerve.
plexopathy listen (plek-SAH-puh-thee)
A disorder affecting a network of nerves, blood vessels, or lymph vessels.
plicamycin listen (PLY-kuh-MY-sin)
A drug used to treat some types of testicular cancer. It is also used to treat a higher-than-normal amounts of calcium in the blood or urine. Plicamycin binds to DNA and prevents cells from making RNA and proteins. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic. Also called Mithracin and mithramycin.
PLL
A type of chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) in which too many immature white blood cells (prolymphocytes) are found in the blood and bone marrow. PLL usually progresses more rapidly than classic CLL. Also called prolymphocytic leukemia.
ploidy listen (PLOY-dee)
The number of sets of chromosomes in a cell or an organism. For example, haploid means one set and diploid means two sets.
Plummer-Vinson syndrome listen (PLUH-mer-VIN-sun SIN-drome)
A disorder marked by anemia caused by iron deficiency, and a web-like growth of membranes in the throat that makes swallowing difficult. Having Plummer-Vinson syndrome may increase the risk of developing esophageal cancer. Also called Paterson-Kelly syndrome and sideropenic dysphagia.
pluripotent listen (ploo-RIH-puh-tent)
Able to mature or develop in any of several ways.
pluripotent stem cell listen (ploo-RIH-puh-tent ...)
A cell that is able to develop into many different types of cells or tissues in the body.
PLX4032
A drug used to treat Erdheim-Chester disease (a very rare type of histiocytosis) and advanced melanoma. It is used in patients whose disease has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PLX4032 blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426, RG7204, vemurafenib, and Zelboraf.
pM-81
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the detection and treatment of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are produced in the laboratory and can locate and bind to cancer cells.
PML gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes the promyelocytic leukemia (PML) protein, which helps control cell growth and cell division. Mutations (changes) in the PML gene can occur when a piece of the chromosome containing the PML gene breaks off and joins with a gene called RARA on another chromosome. These changes may cause too many immature white blood cells to build up in the blood and bone marrow. This can lead to an aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia called acute promyelocytic leukemia. The PML gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called promyelocytic leukemia gene.
PMN
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during infections, allergic reactions, and asthma. Neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils are PMNs. A PMN is a type of white blood cell. Also called granular leukocyte, granulocyte, and polymorphonuclear leukocyte.
PN401
A drug used in the emergency treatment of patients who receive too much fluorouracil or capecitabine (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used in the emergency treatment of heart or central nervous system (CNS) toxicity or other serious side effects that occur within 4 days of ending treatment with fluorouracil or capecitabine. PN401 may help protect healthy cells from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of cytoprotective agent. Also called triacetyluridine, uridine triacetate, and Vistogard.
PNA
A type of anticancer drug that is similar to a natural chemical compound called purine. Cells use purine to make the chemical building blocks of DNA and RNA. PNAs may kill cells, including cancer cells, by blocking important enzymes needed to make DNA and RNA and by damaging DNA. Some PNAs are used to treat certain types of leukemia and lymphoma. Also called purine nucleoside analog.
PNET listen
One of a group of cancers that develop from the same type of early cells, and share certain biochemical and genetic features. Some PNETs develop in the brain and central nervous system (CNS-PNET), and others develop in sites outside of the brain such as the limbs, pelvis, and chest wall (peripheral PNET). Also called primitive neuroectodermal tumor.
pneumatic larynx listen (noo-MA-tik LAYR-inx)
A device that is used to help a person talk after a laryngectomy. It uses air to produce a humming sound, which is converted to speech by movement of the lips, tongue, or glottis.
pneumonectomy listen (NOO-moh-NEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all of one lung. In a partial pneumonectomy, one or more lobes of a lung are removed.
pneumonia listen (noo-MOH-nyuh)
A severe inflammation of the lungs in which the alveoli (tiny air sacs) are filled with fluid. This may cause a decrease in the amount of oxygen that blood can absorb from air breathed into the lung. Pneumonia is usually caused by infection but may also be caused by radiation therapy, allergy, or irritation of lung tissue by inhaled substances. It may involve part or all of the lungs.
pneumonitis listen (NOO-moh-NY-tis)
Inflammation of the lungs. This may be caused by disease, infection, radiation therapy, allergy, or irritation of lung tissue by inhaled substances.
pneumothorax listen (NOO-moh-THOR-ax)
An abnormal collection of air in the space between the thin layer of tissue that covers the lungs and the chest cavity. This can cause all or part of the lung to collapse. A pneumothorax may be caused by a chest injury, certain medical procedures, lung disease, or other damage to lung tissue. Sometimes the cause of a pneumothorax is not known. The most common symptoms are sudden chest pain and trouble breathing. Some types of pneumothorax may go away on their own, but others may be life threatening.
PNH
Paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria. A rare disorder in which red blood cells are easily destroyed by certain immune system proteins. Symptoms include blood clots, and red or brownish urine in the morning. Aplastic anemia (decreased production of blood cells) may lead to PNH, and people with this disorder are at increased risk of acute myelogenous leukemia. Also called paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria.
PNU 166148
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
PNU-93914
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. PNU-93914 blocks the ability of cells to divide and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called LEP-ETU, liposomal paclitaxel, LipoTaxen, and paclitaxel liposome.
podiatrist listen (puh-DY-uh-trist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating foot and ankle problems.
polatuzumab vedotin (POH-lah-TOO-zoo-mab veh-DOH-tin)
A drug used with bendamustine hydrochloride and rituximab to treat adults with diffuse large B-cell lymphoma that came back or did not get better after treatment with at least two other anticancer therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Polatuzumab vedotin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD79B, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called MMAE, which may help kill cancer cells. Polatuzumab vedotin is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Polivy.
polifeprosan 20 carmustine implant listen (PAH-lee-FEH-proh-san … kar-MUS-teen IM-plant)
A drug used with surgery and radiation therapy to treat malignant glioma that is high grade and has not already been treated. It is also used with surgery to treat glioblastoma multiforme that has recurred (come back). Polifeprosan 20 carmustine implant is a form of carmustine contained in a wafer. The wafer has a coating that dissolves slowly and releases carmustine directly into the area where the brain tumor was removed. This form may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of carmustine. Polifeprosan 20 carmustine implant is a type of alkylating agent. Also called carmustine implant and Gliadel Wafer.
Polivy (POH-lih-vee)
A drug used with bendamustine hydrochloride and rituximab to treat adults with diffuse large B-cell lymphoma that came back or did not get better after treatment with at least two other anticancer therapies. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Polivy contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD79B, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called MMAE, which may help kill cancer cells. Polivy is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called polatuzumab vedotin.
poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase listen (PAH-lee (... RY-bose) puh-LIH-meh-rays)
A type of enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. Inhibitors of one enzyme, poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase-1, are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called PARP.
poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor listen (PAH-lee (... RY-bose) puh-LIH-meh-rays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme in cells called PARP. PARP helps repair DNA when it becomes damaged. DNA damage may be caused by many things, including exposure to UV light, radiation, certain anticancer drugs, or other substances in the environment. In cancer treatment, blocking PARP may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitors are a type of targeted therapy. Also called PARP inhibitor.
poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase-1 listen (PAH-lee (… RY-bose) puh-LIH-meh-rays-1)
An enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. Inhibitors of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase-1 are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called PARP-1.
polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon listen (pah-lee-SY-klik AYR-oh-MA-tik HY-droh-KAR-bun)
A type of chemical formed when coal, oil, gas, garbage, tobacco, meat, and other substances are burned. These chemicals are also made for use in many products, including coal tar, creosote, roofing tar, pesticides, mothballs, dandruff shampoos, and some medicines. Being exposed to one of these chemicals over a long time may cause cancer. Also called PAH.
polycystic ovary syndrome listen (PAH-lee-SIS-tik OH-vuh-ree SIN-drome)
A condition marked by infertility, enlarged ovaries, menstrual problems, high levels of male hormones, excess hair on the face and body, acne, and obesity. Women with polycystic ovary syndrome have an increased risk of diabetes, high blood pressure, heart disease, and endometrial cancer. Also called PCOS.
polycythemia vera listen (PAH-lee-sy-THEE-mee-uh VAYR-uh)
A disease in which there are too many red blood cells in the bone marrow and blood, causing the blood to thicken. The number of white blood cells and platelets may also increase. The extra blood cells may collect in the spleen and cause it to become enlarged. They may also cause bleeding problems and make clots form in blood vessels.
polyethylene glycol listen (PAH-lee-EH-thih-leen GLY-kol)
A polymer made by joining molecules of ethylene oxide and water together in a repeating pattern. Polyethylene glycol can be a liquid or a waxy solid. In medicine, forms of polyethylene glycol can be used in ointments, in drugs or substances to make them stay in the body longer, or in laxatives. Also called PEG.
polyethylene glycosylated recombinant human megakaryocyte growth and development factor listen (PAH-lee-EH-thih-leen gly-KAH-sih-lay-ted ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun MEH-guh-KAYR-ee-oh-site …)
A form of megakaryocyte growth and development factor (MGDF) that is made in the laboratory. MGDF comes from the protein thrombopoietin, which is normally made in the body to help make platelets. Polyethylene glycosylated recombinant human megakaryocyte growth and development factor is being studied as a way to increase the number of platelets in patients receiving chemotherapy. Also called PEG-MGDF and PEG-rhMGDF.
polyglutamate camptothecin listen (PAH-lee-GLOO-tuh-mayt KAMP-toh-THEK-in)
A form of the anticancer drug camptothecin that may have fewer side effects and work better than camptothecin. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of DNA topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called CT-2106.
poly-ICLC listen (PAH-lee ...)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer and for its ability to stimulate the immune system. It is made in the laboratory by combining the nucleic acid RNA with the chemicals poly-L-lysine and carboxymethyl cellulose.
polymer listen (PAH-lih-mer)
A molecule made up of small identical molecules called monomers. The monomers are joined together in a repeating pattern.
polymerase chain reaction listen (puh-LIH-meh-rays chayn ree-AK-shun)
A laboratory method used to make many copies of a specific piece of DNA from a sample that contains very tiny amounts of that DNA. Polymerase chain reaction allows these pieces of DNA to be amplified so they can be detected. Polymerase chain reaction may be used to look for certain changes in a gene or chromosome, which may help find and diagnose a genetic condition or a disease, such as cancer. It may also be used to look at pieces of the DNA of certain bacteria, viruses, or other microorganisms to help diagnose an infection. Also called PCR.
polymeric enteral nutrition formula listen (PAH-lih-MAYR-ik EN-teh-rul noo-TRIH-shun FOR-myoo-luh)
A nutritional drink that may help people who cannot get everything they need in their diet from foods and other drinks. It may be taken by mouth or given through a small tube inserted through the nose into the stomach or the small intestine. It may also be given through a small tube that is put into the stomach or intestinal tract through an opening made on the outside of the abdomen. One example of a polymeric enteral nutrition formula is Ensure. Polymeric enteral nutrition formula is a type of dietary supplement.
polymorphism listen (PAH-lee-MOR-fih-zum)
A common change in the genetic code in DNA. Polymorphisms can have a harmful effect, a good effect, or no effect. Some polymorphisms have been shown to increase the risk of certain types of cancer.
polymorphonuclear leukocyte listen (PAH-lee-MOR-foh-NOO-klee-er LOO-koh-site)
A type of immune cell that has granules (small particles) with enzymes that are released during infections, allergic reactions, and asthma. Neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils are polymorphonuclear leukocytes. A polymorphonuclear leukocyte is a type of white blood cell. Also called granular leukocyte, granulocyte, and PMN.
polymyositis listen (PAH-lee-MY-oh-SY-tis)
An inflammatory disease of the muscles closest to the center of the body. It causes weakness, inability to stand, climb stairs, lift, or reach. It may also cause muscle pain and difficulty swallowing, and may affect the lungs and heart. Having polymyositis increases the risk of certain types of cancer.
polyneuritis listen (PAH-lee-noo-RY-tis)
Inflammation of several peripheral nerves at the same time.
polyp listen (PAH-lip)
A growth that protrudes from a mucous membrane.
polypectomy listen (PAH-lee-PEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a polyp.
polypeptide listen (PAH-lee PEP-tide)
A substance that contains many amino acids (the molecules that join together to form proteins).
polyphenol listen (PAH-lee-FEE-nol)
A substance that is found in many plants and gives some flowers, fruits, and vegetables their color. Polyphenols have antioxidant activity.
Polyphenon E listen (PAH-lee-FEE-nun ...)
A mixture that is prepared from the leaves of the Camellia sinensis plant. It contains substances called catechins, which are antioxidants. Antioxidants help protect cells from damage caused by certain chemicals that may increase the risk of cancer and other diseases. Polyphenon E is being studied in the prevention of cancer and other diseases. It is a trademarked product of Mitsui Norin Co., Ltd.
polyposis listen (PAH-lee-POH-sis)
The development of numerous polyps (growths that protrude from a mucous membrane).
polysaccharide listen (PAH-lee-SA-kuh-ride)
A large carbohydrate molecule. It contains many small sugar molecules that are joined chemically. Also called glycan.
polysomnogram listen (PAH-lee-SOM-noh-gram)
A group of recordings taken during sleep that shows brain wave changes, eye movements, breathing rate, blood pressure, heart rate, and the electrical activity of the heart and other muscles. A polysomnogram may be used to help diagnose sleep disorders.
polyvinylpyrrolidone-sodium hyaluronate gel listen (PAH-lee-VY-nil-py-RAH-lih-done-SOH-dee-um HY-uh-LOO-roh-nayt …)
A gel used to lessen pain from mouth sores caused by chemotherapy or radiation therapy, oral surgery, braces, or disease. Polyvinylpyrrolidone-sodium hyaluronate gel is being studied in the treatment of pain caused by mouth sores in children receiving cancer treatment. It forms a thin layer over the surface of the mouth and throat to prevent irritation while eating, drinking, and talking. Also called Gelclair.
pomalidomide listen (PAH-muh-LIH-doh-mide)
A drug that is a form of thalidomide, and is used to treat multiple myeloma that has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pomalidomide may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of immunomodulating agent and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called CC-4047 and Pomalyst.
Pomalyst listen (PAH-muh-list)
A drug that is a form of thalidomide, and is used to treat multiple myeloma that has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pomalyst may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of immunomodulating agent and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called CC-4047 and pomalidomide.
pomegranate listen (PAH-meh-GRA-nut)
A subtropical shrub or tree. Juice from the fruit may contain substances that decrease or slow the rise of prostate-specific antigen (PSA) levels. It is being studied for its ability to delay or prevent recurrent prostate cancer. The scientific name is Punica granatum.
ponatinib hydrochloride listen (poh-NA-tih-nib HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) and Philadelphia chromosome-positive acute lymphoblastic leukemia. It is used in patients whose cancer has the T315I mutation or whose cancer cannot be treated with other tyrosine kinase inhibitors. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ponatinib hydrochloride blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Ponatinib hydrochloride is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called Iclusig.
pons listen (ponz)
Part of the central nervous system, located at the base of the brain, between the medulla oblongata and the midbrain. It is part of the brainstem.
pontine listen (PON-teen)
Having to do with the pons (part of the central nervous system, located at the base of the brain, between the medulla oblongata and the midbrain).
population study listen (PAH-pyoo-LAY-shun STUH-dee)
A study of a group of individuals taken from the general population who share a common characteristic, such as age, sex, or health condition. This group may be studied for different reasons, such as their response to a drug or risk of getting a disease.
porcine listen (POR-sine)
Having to do with or coming from pigs.
porfimer sodium listen (POR-fih-mer SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat some types of cancer. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, porfimer sodium becomes active and kills the cancer cells. It is a type of photodynamic therapy agent. Also called Photofrin.
porfiromycin listen (POR-fih-roh-MY-sin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called anticancer antibiotics.
porphyria cutanea tarda (por-FEER-ee-uh kyoo-TAY-nee-uh TAR-duh)
A rare disorder that affects the skin and causes painful blisters on parts of the body that are exposed to the sun, usually the hands, arms, and face. The affected skin may be fragile, and it may blister or peel after a minor injury. Other signs and symptoms of porphyria cutanea tarda include changes in skin color, increased hair growth (especially on the face), and redness, swelling, itching, scarring, and thickening of the affected skin. Liver problems may occur, and patients with porphyria cutanea tarda may have an increased risk of liver cancer. In porphyria cutanea tarda, the body does not make enough of an enzyme called uroporphyrinogen decarboxylase. Porphyria cutanea tarda may be inherited, or it may be caused by too much iron in the body, certain infections (such as hepatitis C or HIV infection), smoking, drinking too much alcohol, taking the hormone estrogen, and certain genetic disorders. Porphyria cutanea tarda is usually diagnosed after the age of 30 years. Also called PCT.
port listen (port)
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. The port is placed under the skin, usually in the chest. It is attached to a catheter (a thin, flexible tube) that is guided (threaded) into a large vein above the right side of the heart called the superior vena cava. A port may stay in place for many weeks or months. A needle is inserted through the skin into the port to draw blood or give fluids. Also called port-a-cath.
port-a-cath listen (port-uh-cath)
A device used to draw blood and give treatments, including intravenous fluids, drugs, or blood transfusions. The port is placed under the skin, usually in the chest. It is attached to a catheter (a thin, flexible tube) that is guided (threaded) into a large vein above the right side of the heart called the superior vena cava. A port-a-cath may stay in place for many weeks or months. A needle is inserted through the skin into the port to draw blood or give fluids. Also called port.
portal hypertension listen (POR-tul HY-per-TEN-shun)
High blood pressure in the vein that carries blood to the liver from the stomach, small and large intestines, spleen, pancreas, and gallbladder. It is usually caused by a block in the blood flow through the liver due to cirrhosis (scarring) of the liver.
portal vein listen (POR-tul vayn)
A blood vessel that carries blood to the liver from the intestines, spleen, pancreas, and gallbladder. Also called hepatic portal vein.
Portrazza listen (por-TRA-zuh)
A drug used with gemcitabine and cisplatin to treat squamous non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not been treated with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Portrazza binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Portrazza is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called necitumumab.
positive axillary lymph node listen (PAH-zih-tiv AK-suh-LAYR-ee limf ...)
A lymph node in the area of the armpit (axilla) to which cancer has spread. This spread is determined by surgically removing some of the lymph nodes and examining them under a microscope to see whether cancer cells are present.
positive test result listen (PAH-zih-tiv ... reh-ZULT)
A test result that shows that a person has the disease, condition, or biomarker for which the test is being done. In genetics, a positive test result usually means that a person has a mutation (change) in the gene, chromosome, or protein that is being tested. More testing may be needed to make a diagnosis or to make sure a positive test result is correct.
positron emission tomography scan listen (PAH-zih-tron ee-MIH-shun toh-MAH-gruh-fee skan)
A procedure in which a small amount of radioactive glucose (sugar) is injected into a vein, and a scanner is used to make detailed, computerized pictures of areas inside the body where the glucose is taken up. Because cancer cells often take up more glucose than normal cells, the pictures can be used to find cancer cells in the body. Also called PET scan.
positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan listen (PAH-zih-tron ee-MIH-shun toh-MAH-gruh-fee-kum-PYOO-ted-toh-MAH-gruh-fee skan)
A procedure that combines the pictures from a positron emission tomography (PET) scan and a computed tomography (CT) scan. The PET and CT scans are done at the same time with the same machine. The combined scans give more detailed pictures of areas inside the body than either scan gives by itself. A positron emission tomography-computed tomography scan may be used to help diagnose disease, such as cancer, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called PET-CT scan.
posterior listen (pos-TEER-ee-er)
In human anatomy, has to do with the back of a structure, or a structure found toward the back of the body.
posterior pelvic exenteration listen (pos-TEER-ee-er PEL-vik eg-ZEN-teh-RAY-shun)
Surgery to remove the lower part of the bowel, rectum, uterus, cervix, ovaries, fallopian tubes, and vagina. Pelvic lymph nodes may also be removed.
posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome listen (pos-TEER-ee-er ree-VER-sih-bul en-SEH-fuh-LAH-puh-thee SIN-drome)
A rare condition marked by headaches, vision problems, mental changes, seizures, and swelling in the brain. The symptoms of posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome usually come on quickly and can be serious and life threatening. When treated, symptoms often go away within days or weeks. Posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome may occur in patients with certain conditions, such as high blood pressure, eclampsia, severe infection, kidney disease, and certain autoimmune diseases. It may also occur in patients treated with certain anticancer drugs and immunosuppressive drugs. Also called PRES, reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome, and RPLS.
posterior urethral cancer listen (pos-TEER-ee-er yoo-REE-thrul KAN-ser)
A disease in which malignant (cancer) cells are found in the part of the urethra (the tube through which urine leaves the body) that connects to the bladder (the organ that stores urine).
post-marketing surveillance trial listen (post-MAR-keh-ting ser-VAY-lents TRY-ul)
A type of clinical trial that studies the side effects caused over time by a new treatment after it has been approved and is on the market. These trials look for side effects that were not seen in earlier trials and may also study how well a new treatment works over a long period of time. Post-marketing surveillance trials may include thousands of people. Also called phase IV clinical trial.
postmenopausal listen (post-MEH-nuh-PAW-zul)
Having to do with the time after menopause. Menopause (“change of life”) is the time in a woman's life when menstrual periods stop permanently.
postmortem listen (post-MOR-tem)
After death. Often used to describe an autopsy.
postoperative listen (post-AH-pruh-tiv)
After surgery.
postprandial listen (post-PRAN-dee-ul)
After a meal.
postremission therapy listen (post-reh-MIH-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given after cancer has disappeared following the initial therapy. Postremission therapy is used to kill any cancer cells that may be left in the body. It may include radiation therapy, a stem cell transplant, or treatment with drugs that kill cancer cells. Also called consolidation therapy and intensification therapy.
post-transplant lymphoproliferative disorder listen (post-TRANZ-plant LIM-foh-proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv dis-OR-der)
A condition in which a group of B-cells grow out of control after an organ transplant in patients with weakened immune systems. This usually happens if the patient has also been infected with Epstein-Barr virus. Post-transplant lymphoproliferative disorder may progress to non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called PTLD.
post-traumatic stress disorder listen (post-traw-MA-tik stres dis-OR-der)
An anxiety disorder that develops in reaction to physical injury or severe mental or emotional distress, such as military combat, violent assault, natural disaster, or other life-threatening events. Having cancer may also lead to post-traumatic stress disorder. Symptoms interfere with day-to-day living and include reliving the event in nightmares or flashbacks; avoiding people, places, and things connected to the event; feeling alone and losing interest in daily activities; and having trouble concentrating and sleeping. Also called PTSD.
potassium listen (puh-TA-see-um)
A metallic element that is important in body functions such as regulation of blood pressure and of water content in cells, transmission of nerve impulses, digestion, muscle contraction, and heartbeat.
potassium hydroxide listen (puh-TA-see-um hy-DROK-side)
A toxic and highly corrosive chemical used to make soap, in bleaching, and as a paint remover. It is used in small amounts as a food additive and in the preparation of some drugs.
Poteligeo listen (poh-teh-LIH-gee-oh)
A drug used to treat mycosis fungoides or Sezary syndrome (types of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma) that came back or did not get better after treatment with at least one systemic therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Poteligeo binds to a protein called CCR4, which is found on some T cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. Poteligeo may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called mogamulizumab.
potentiation listen (poh-TEN-shee-AY-shun)
In medicine, the effect of increasing the potency or effectiveness of a drug or other treatment.
power of attorney listen (POW-er ... uh-TER-nee)
A power of attorney is a legal document that gives one person (such as a relative, lawyer, or friend) the authority to make legal, medical, or financial decisions for another person. It may go into effect right away, or when that person is no longer able to make decisions for himself or herself.
PP
A small protein made by the pancreas that helps control the release of other substances made by the pancreas. The amount of PP in the blood increases after a person eats. It may also increase with age, and in certain diseases, such as diabetes and pancreatic cancer. Also called pancreatic polypeptide.
PPAR gamma pathway listen (… GA-muh PATH-way)
Describes a group of proteins in a cell that work together to help control how certain genes are expressed and the use of lipids (fats) and glucose (sugar) in the body. Changes in the PPAR gamma pathway may lead to diseases such as heart disease, diabetes, and cancer. Drugs or substances that affect this pathway are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer and other diseases. Also called peroxisome proliferator-activated receptor gamma pathway.
PPI
A substance used to treat certain disorders of the stomach and intestines, such as heartburn and ulcers. PPIs block the actions of an enzyme in the stomach and reduce the amount of acid made in the stomach. Also called proton pump inhibitor.
pPNET
A type of cancer that forms in bone or soft tissue. Also called Ewing sarcoma and peripheral primitive neuroectodermal tumor.
PR
A protein found inside the cells of the female reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. The hormone progesterone will bind to the receptors inside the cells and may cause the cells to grow. Also called progesterone receptor.
PR- listen
Describes cells that do not have a protein to which the hormone progesterone will bind. Cancer cells that are PR- do not need progesterone to grow, and usually do not stop growing when treated with hormones that block progesterone from binding. Also called progesterone receptor negative.
PR+ listen
Describes cells that have a protein to which the hormone progesterone will bind. Cancer cells that are PR+ need progesterone to grow and will usually stop growing when treated with hormones that block progesterone from binding. Also called progesterone receptor positive.
PR-104
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. PR-104 becomes active when cancer cells don’t receive enough oxygen. It may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA.
practitioner listen (prak-TIH-shuh-ner)
A person who works in a specific profession. For example, a doctor or nurse is a healthcare practitioner.
pralatrexate listen (PRA-luh-TREK-sayt)
A drug used to treat peripheral T-cell lymphoma (a fast-growing form of non-Hodgkin lymphoma) that recurred (came back) or did not get better with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Pralatrexate stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Pralatrexate is a type of dihydrofolate reductase (DHFR) inhibitor. Also called Folotyn.
Pravachol listen (PRA-vuh-KOL)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood and to prevent stroke and heart attack. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. Pravachol blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It may also make tumor cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor, a type of statin, and a type of chemosensitizer. Also called pravastatin sodium.
pravastatin sodium listen (PRA-vuh-sta-tin SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol in the blood and to prevent stroke and heart attack. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. Pravastatin sodium blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It may also make tumor cells more sensitive to anticancer drugs. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor, a type of statin, and a type of chemosensitizer. Also called Pravachol.
PRCC
A type of kidney cancer that forms in cells that line the small tubes in the kidney that filter waste from the blood and make urine. Most papillary tumors look like long, thin finger-like growths under a microscope. There are two types of PRCC: type 1 and type 2. Type 1 tends to grow slowly and spread to other parts of the body less often than type 2. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary papillary renal cancer have an increased risk of type 1 PRCC. Patients with a genetic disorder called hereditary leiomyomatosis and renal cell cancer have an increased risk of type 2 PRCC. Also called papillary kidney cancer and papillary renal cell carcinoma.
precancerous listen (pree-KAN-seh-rus)
A term used to describe a condition that may (or is likely to) become cancer. Also called premalignant.
precancerous dermatitis listen (pree-KAN-seh-rus DER-muh-TY-tis)
A skin disease marked by scaly or thickened patches on the skin and often caused by prolonged exposure to arsenic. The patches often occur on sun-exposed areas of the skin and in older white men. These patches may become malignant (cancer). Also called Bowen disease and precancerous dermatosis.
precancerous dermatosis listen (pree-KAN-seh-rus DER-muh-TOH-sis)
A skin disease marked by scaly or thickened patches on the skin and often caused by prolonged exposure to arsenic. The patches often occur on sun-exposed areas of the skin and in older white men. These patches may become malignant (cancer). Also called Bowen disease and precancerous dermatitis.
precancerous polyps listen (pree-KAN-seh-rus PAH-lips)
Growths that may become cancer that protrude from a mucous membrane.
precision medicine listen (pree-SIH-zhun MEH-dih-sin)
A form of medicine that uses information about a person’s genes, proteins, and environment to prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. In cancer, precision medicine uses specific information about a person’s tumor to help diagnose, plan treatment, find out how well treatment is working, or make a prognosis. Examples of precision medicine include using targeted therapies to treat specific types of cancer cells, such as HER2-positive breast cancer cells, or using tumor marker testing to help diagnose cancer. Also called personalized medicine.
preclinical study listen (pree-KLIH-nih-kul STUH-dee)
Research using animals to find out if a drug, procedure, or treatment is likely to be useful. Preclinical studies take place before any testing in humans is done.
precursor B-lymphoblastic leukemia listen (pree-KER-ser B-LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many B-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. It is the most common type of acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL). Also called B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and B-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia.
precursor lymphoblastic lymphoma listen (pree-KER-ser LIM-foh-BLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma in which too many lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the lymph nodes and the thymus gland. These lymphoblasts may spread to other places in the body. It is most common in teenagers and young adults and affects more males than females. It may be a T or B cell type. Also called lymphoblastic lymphoma.
precursor T-lymphoblastic leukemia listen (pree-KER-ser T-LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many T-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia.
precursor T-lymphoblastic lymphoma listen (pree-KER-ser T-LIM-foh-BLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh)
A type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma in which too many T-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the lymph nodes and spleen. It is most common in young men. Also called T-lymphoblastic lymphoma.
predictive factor listen (preh-DIK-tiv FAK-ter)
A condition or finding that can be used to help predict whether a person’s cancer will respond to a specific treatment. Predictive factor may also describe something that increases a person’s risk of developing a condition or disease.
prednisolone listen (pred-NIH-suh-lone)
A drug that lessens inflammation and suppresses the body’s immune response. It may also kill cancer cells. Prednisolone is used to treat disorders in many organ systems and to treat the symptoms of several types of leukemia and lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Prednisolone is a type of therapeutic glucocorticoid.
prednisone listen (PRED-nih-sone)
A drug used to lessen inflammation and lower the body’s immune response. It is used with other drugs to treat leukemia and lymphoma and other types of cancer. It is also used alone or with other drugs to prevent or treat many other conditions. These include conditions related to cancer, such as anemia (a low level of red blood cells), allergic reactions, and loss of appetite. Prednisone is a type of therapeutic glucocorticoid.
pregabalin listen (pree-GA-buh-lin)
A drug used to treat nerve pain caused by diabetes or herpes zoster infection and certain types of seizures. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of nerve pain in the hands and feet of cancer patients given chemotherapy. Pregabalin is a type of anticonvulsant. Also called Lyrica.
pregnancy listen (PREG-nun-see)
The condition between conception (fertilization of an egg by a sperm) and birth, during which the fertilized egg develops in the uterus. In humans, pregnancy lasts about 288 days.
premalignant listen (pree-muh-LIG-nunt)
A term used to describe a condition that may (or is likely to) become cancer. Also called precancerous.
premature birth listen (PREE-muh-CHOOR berth)
The birth of a baby before 37 weeks of pregnancy. In humans, a normal pregnancy lasts about 40 weeks. The risk of premature birth may be increased by certain health problems in the mother, such as diabetes, heart disease, and kidney disease, or problems during pregnancy. Smoking cigarettes, being exposed to secondhand tobacco smoke, drinking alcohol, and taking certain drugs during pregnancy may also increase the risk of a premature birth. Also called preterm birth.
premature death listen (PREE-muh-CHOOR deth)
Death that occurs before the average age of death in a certain population. In the United States, the average age of death is about 75 years. Smoking cigarettes and being exposed to secondhand tobacco smoke are leading causes of premature death in the United States. They can increase the risk of cancer, heart disease, stroke, lung disease, and many other health problems. Other causes of premature death are injuries and suicide.
premature menopause listen (PREE-muh-CHOOR MEH-nuh-pawz)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. There are two types of premature menopause, primary and secondary. Primary premature menopause means that the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. In secondary premature menopause, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Some women with premature menopause sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called early menopause, ovarian failure, and ovarian insufficiency.
premature ovarian failure listen (PREE-muh-CHOOR oh-VAYR-ee-un FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. Premature ovarian failure means the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. Some women with premature ovarian failure sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called primary ovarian insufficiency.
premenopausal listen (pree-MEH-nuh-PAW-zul)
Having to do with the time before menopause. Menopause ("change of life") is the time of life when a woman's menstrual periods stop permanently.
premycotic phase listen (PREE-my-KAH-tik fayz)
A phase of mycosis fungoides in which a patient has areas of red, scaly, itchy skin on areas of the body that are usually not exposed to sun. This is early-phase mycosis fungoides, but it is hard to diagnose the rash as mycosis fungoides during this phase. The premycotic phase may last from months to decades.
prenatal listen (pree-NAY-tul)
Having to do with the time a female is pregnant, before birth occurs. Also called antenatal.
PRES
A rare condition marked by headaches, vision problems, mental changes, seizures, and swelling in the brain. The symptoms of PRES usually come on quickly and can be serious and life threatening. When treated, symptoms often go away within days or weeks. PRES may occur in patients with certain conditions, such as high blood pressure, eclampsia, severe infection, kidney disease, and certain autoimmune diseases. It may also occur in patients treated with certain anticancer drugs and immunosuppressive drugs. Also called posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome, reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome, and RPLS.
prescription listen (prih-SKRIP-shun)
A doctor's order for medicine or another intervention.
preterm birth listen (PREE-term berth)
The birth of a baby before 37 weeks of pregnancy. In humans, a normal pregnancy lasts about 40 weeks. The risk of preterm birth may be increased by certain health problems in the mother, such as diabetes, heart disease, and kidney disease, or problems during pregnancy. Smoking cigarettes, being exposed to secondhand tobacco smoke, drinking alcohol, and taking certain drugs during pregnancy may also increase the risk of a preterm birth. Also called premature birth.
pretracheal space listen (pree-TRAY-kee-ul spays)
The area in front of the trachea (windpipe).
Prevacid listen (PREH-vuh-sid)
A drug that reduces the amount of acid made in the stomach. It is used to treat stomach ulcers, gastroesophageal reflux disease (a condition in which acid from the stomach causes heartburn), and conditions in which the stomach makes too much acid. Prevacid is a type of proton pump inhibitor (PPI). Also called lansoprazole.
prevalence listen (PREH-vih-lents)
In medicine, a measure of the total number of people in a specific group who have (or had) a certain disease, condition, or risk factor (such as smoking or obesity) at a specific point in time or during a given period of time. For example, the prevalence of breast cancer may show how many women in the U.S. were diagnosed with breast cancer within the past 10 years, including those who are receiving treatment and those who are considered cured, and are still alive on a certain date.
prevascular space listen (pree-VAS-kyoo-ler ...)
The area in the front part of the chest between the lungs. Also called anterior mediastinum.
prevention listen (pree-VEN-shun)
In medicine, action taken to decrease the chance of getting a disease or condition. For example, cancer prevention includes avoiding risk factors (such as smoking, obesity, lack of exercise, and radiation exposure) and increasing protective factors (such as getting regular physical activity, staying at a healthy weight, and having a healthy diet).
preventive listen (pree-VEN-tiv)
Used to prevent disease.
preventive mastectomy listen (pree-VEN-tiv ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to reduce the risk of developing breast cancer by removing one or both breasts before disease develops. Also called prophylactic mastectomy.
Prialt listen (PREE-ult)
A drug used in the treatment of chronic pain. Also called SNX 111 and ziconotide.
primary cancer listen (PRY-mayr-ee KAN-ser)
A term used to describe the original, or first, tumor in the body. Cancer cells from a primary cancer may spread to other parts of the body and form new, or secondary, tumors. This is called metastasis. These secondary tumors are the same type of cancer as the primary cancer. Also called primary tumor.
primary care listen (PRY-mayr-ee kayr)
Health services that meet most basic health care needs over time. Primary care includes physical exams, treatment of common medical conditions, and preventive care such as immunizations and screenings. Primary care doctors are usually the first health professionals patients see for basic medical care. They may refer a patient to a specialist if needed.
primary care doctor listen (PRY-mayr-ee kayr DOK-ter)
A doctor who manages a person's health care over time. A primary care doctor is able to give a wide range of care, including prevention and treatment, can discuss cancer treatment choices, and can refer a patient to a specialist.
primary central nervous system lymphoma listen (PRY-mayr-ee SEN-trul NER-vus SIS-tem lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer that forms in the lymph tissue of the brain, spinal cord, meninges (outer covering of the brain), or eye (called ocular lymphoma). Also called PCNSL and primary CNS lymphoma.
primary CNS lymphoma listen (PRY-mayr-ee…lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer that forms in the lymph tissue of the brain, spinal cord, meninges (outer covering of the brain), or eye (called ocular lymphoma). Also called PCNSL and primary central nervous system lymphoma.
primary effusion lymphoma listen (PRY-mayr-ee eh-FYOO-zhun lim-FOH-muh)
A rare, aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by an abnormal build-up of fluids in a body cavity. It usually occurs together with a human herpesvirus or Epstein-Barr virus in people who have weakened immune systems, such as in patients with HIV disease.
primary endpoint listen (PRY-mayr-ee END-poynt)
The main result that is measured at the end of a study to see if a given treatment worked (e.g., the number of deaths or the difference in survival between the treatment group and the control group). What the primary endpoint will be is decided before the study begins.
primary mediastinal large B-cell lymphoma listen (PRY-mayr-ee MEE-dee-uh-STY-nul larj ... sel lim-FOH-muh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer of the immune system). Primary mediastinal large B-cell lymphoma develops from B cells in the mediastinum (the area behind the breastbone). It may spread to organs and tissues such as the lungs, pericardium (sac around the heart), liver, gastrointestinal tract, ovaries, adrenal glands, and central nervous system. Most patients with primary mediastinal large B-cell lymphoma are women who are age 30 to 40 years but it may also occur in older children. Also known as primary mediastinal B-cell lymphoma.
primary myelofibrosis listen (PRY-mayr-ee MY-eh-loh-fy-BROH-sis)
A progressive, chronic disease in which the bone marrow is replaced by fibrous tissue and blood is made in organs such as the liver and the spleen, instead of in the bone marrow. This disease is marked by an enlarged spleen and progressive anemia. Also called agnogenic myeloid metaplasia, chronic idiopathic myelofibrosis, idiopathic myelofibrosis, and myelosclerosis with myeloid metaplasia.
primary ovarian insufficiency listen (PRY-mayr-ee oh-VAYR-ee-un IN-suh-FIH-shen-see)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. Primary ovarian insufficiency means the ovaries do not function normally. This may be because they have been removed by surgery, or it may be caused by some cancer treatments and certain diseases or genetic conditions. Some women with primary ovarian insufficiency sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called premature ovarian failure.
primary peritoneal cancer listen (PRY-mayr-ee PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the peritoneum (the tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers organs in the abdomen), and has not spread there from another part of the body. Primary peritoneal cancer sometimes spreads to the ovary. It is similar to ovarian epithelial cancer and is staged and treated the same way.
primary renal myoepithelial carcinoma listen (PRY-mayr-ee REE-nul MY-oh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the kidney. Primary renal myoepithelial carcinoma often grows quickly and spreads to other parts of the body, especially in children. The cancer cells may have a certain genetic change called a translocation (part of one chromosome switches places with part of another chromosome).
primary therapy listen (PRY-mayr-ee THAYR-uh-pee)
The first treatment given for a disease. It is often part of a standard set of treatments, such as surgery followed by chemotherapy and radiation. When used by itself, primary therapy is the one accepted as the best treatment. If it doesn’t cure the disease or it causes severe side effects, other treatment may be added or used instead. Also called first-line therapy, induction therapy, and primary treatment.
primary treatment listen (PRY-mayr-ee TREET-ment)
The first treatment given for a disease. It is often part of a standard set of treatments, such as surgery followed by chemotherapy and radiation. When used by itself, primary treatment is the one accepted as the best treatment. If it doesn’t cure the disease or it causes severe side effects, other treatment may be added or used instead. Also called first-line therapy, induction therapy, and primary therapy.
primary tumor listen (PRY-mayr-ee TOO-mer)
A term used to describe the original, or first, tumor in the body. Cancer cells from a primary tumor may spread to other parts of the body and form new, or secondary, tumors. This is called metastasis. These secondary tumors are the same type of cancer as the primary tumor. Also called primary cancer.
primitive neuroectodermal tumor listen (PRIH-muh-tiv NOOR-oh-EK-toh-DER-mul TOO-mer)
One of a group of cancers that develop from the same type of early cells, and share certain biochemical and genetic features. Some primitive neuroectodermal tumors develop in the brain and central nervous system (CNS-PNET), and others develop in sites outside of the brain such as the limbs, pelvis, and chest wall (peripheral PNET). Also called PNET.
principal investigator listen (PRIN-sih-pul in-VES-tih-GAY-ter)
The person(s) in charge of a clinical trial or a scientific research grant. The principal investigator prepares and carries out the clinical trial protocol (plan for the study) or research paid for by the grant. The principal investigator also analyzes the data and reports the results of the trial or grant research. Also called PI.
Prinivil listen (PRIH-nih-vil)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and certain heart conditions. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of side effects caused by some anticancer drugs. It blocks certain enzymes that cause blood vessels to constrict (narrow). It is a type of angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitor. Also called lisinopril and Zestril.
prinomastat listen (prih-NOH-muh-stat)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a matrix metalloproteinase inhibitor and belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors. Also called AG3340.
probenecid listen (proh-BEH-neh-sid)
A drug that is used to treat gout and is used together with some antibiotics to make them work better. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibiotic therapy adjuncts.
probiotic listen (PROH-by-AH-tik)
A live microorganism used as a dietary supplement to help with digestion and normal bowel function. It may also help keep the gastrointestinal (GI) tract healthy. A bacterium found in yogurt called Lactobacillus acidophilus, is the most common probiotic.
procarbazine listen (proh-KAR-buh-zeen)
The active ingredient in a drug used with other drugs to treat advanced Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Procarbazine damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent.
procarbazine hydrochloride listen (proh-KAR-buh-zeen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to treat advanced Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Procarbazine hydrochloride damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Matulane.
prochlorperazine listen (PROH-klor-PAYR-uh-zeen)
A drug used to prevent or reduce nausea and vomiting. It belongs to the family of drugs called antiemetics.
Procrit listen (PROH-krit)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease, some types of chemotherapy, and an antiviral drug for HIV infection called zidovudine. It is also used to lower the number of donor blood transfusions needed during and after certain types of surgery. Procrit is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Procrit is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called epoetin alfa, Epogen, and Retacrit.
proctitis listen (prok-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the mucous membrane that lines the rectum (the last several inches of the large intestine closest to the anus). Also called rectitis.
proctoscope listen (PROK-toh-skope)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to look inside the anus and rectum. A proctoscope has a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
proctoscopy listen (prok-TOS-koh-pee)
A procedure that uses a proctoscope to look inside the anus and rectum. A proctoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
proctosigmoidoscopy listen (PROK-toh-sig-moy-DOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the lower colon using a sigmoidoscope, inserted into the rectum. A sigmoidoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called sigmoidoscopy.
progeny listen (PRAH-jeh-nee)
Offspring; the product of reproduction or replication.
progesterone listen (proh-JES-teh-rone)
A type of hormone made by the body that plays a role in the menstrual cycle and pregnancy. Progesterone can also be made in the laboratory. It may be used as a type of birth control and to treat menstrual disorders, infertility, symptoms of menopause, and other conditions.
progesterone receptor listen (proh-JES-teh-rone reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found inside the cells of the female reproductive tissue, some other types of tissue, and some cancer cells. The hormone progesterone will bind to the receptors inside the cells and may cause the cells to grow. Also called PR.
progesterone receptor negative listen (proh-JES-teh-rone reh-SEP-ter NEH-guh-tiv)
Describes cells that do not have a protein to which the hormone progesterone will bind. Cancer cells that are progesterone receptor negative do not need progesterone to grow, and usually do not stop growing when treated with hormones that block progesterone from binding. Also called PR-.
progesterone receptor positive listen (proh-JES-teh-rone reh-SEP-ter PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cells that have a protein to which the hormone progesterone will bind. Cancer cells that are progesterone receptor positive need progesterone to grow and will usually stop growing when treated with hormones that block progesterone from binding. Also called PR+.
progesterone receptor test listen (proh-JES-teh-rone reh-SEP-ter test)
A lab test to find out if cancer cells have progesterone receptors (proteins to which the hormone progesterone will bind). If the cells have progesterone receptors, they may need progesterone to grow, and this can affect how the cancer is treated.
progestin listen (proh-JES-tin)
Any natural or laboratory-made substance that has some or all of the biologic effects of progesterone, a female hormone.
prognosis listen (prog-NO-sis)
The likely outcome or course of a disease; the chance of recovery or recurrence.
prognostic factor listen (prog-NOS-tik FAK-ter)
A situation or condition, or a characteristic of a patient, that can be used to estimate the chance of recovery from a disease or the chance of the disease recurring (coming back).
programmed cell death listen (PROH-gramd sel deth)
A type of cell death in which a series of molecular steps in a cell lead to its death. This is one method the body uses to get rid of unneeded or abnormal cells. The process of programmed cell death may be blocked in cancer cells. Also called apoptosis.
progression listen (pruh-GREH-shun)
In medicine, the course of a disease, such as cancer, as it becomes worse or spreads in the body.
progression-free survival listen (pruh-GREH-shun ... ser-VY-vul)
The length of time during and after the treatment of a disease, such as cancer, that a patient lives with the disease but it does not get worse. In a clinical trial, measuring the progression-free survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called PFS.
progressive disease listen (pruh-GREH-siv dih-ZEEZ)
Cancer that is growing, spreading, or getting worse.
progressive familial intrahepatic cholestasis listen (pruh-GREH-siv fuh-MIH-lee-ul IN-truh-heh-PA-tik koh-leh-STAY-sis)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by a buildup in the liver of bile (fluid that helps digest fat). This can lead to liver disease and liver failure. It may also increase the risk of liver cancer. Progressive familial intrahepatic cholestasis is caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes that make proteins needed to help the liver work the way it should. It usually occurs in infants and children. Also called PFIC.
prolactin listen (proh-LAK-tin)
A hormone that is made by the pituitary gland (a pea-sized organ in the center of the brain). Prolactin causes a woman’s breasts to make milk during and after pregnancy, and has many other effects in the body.
Proleukin listen (proh-LOO-kin)
A drug used to treat melanoma and renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Proleukin is a form of interleukin-2 that is made in the laboratory. Proleukin increases the activity and growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes (types of white blood cells). This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Proleukin is a type of biological response modifier. Also called aldesleukin and recombinant human interleukin-2.
Prolia listen (PROH-lee-uh)
A drug used to increase bone mass in certain patients with breast cancer or prostate cancer who have a high risk of breaking bones. It is also used to treat osteoporosis in men and postmenopausal women who have a high risk of breaking bones. Prolia binds to a protein called RANKL, which keeps RANKL from binding to another protein called RANK on the surface of certain bone cells, including bone cancer cells. This may help keep bone from breaking down and cancer cells from growing. Prolia contains the active ingredient denosumab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
proliferating listen (proh-LIH-feh-RAY-ting)
Multiplying or increasing in number. In biology, cell proliferation occurs by a process known as cell division.
proliferative index listen (proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv ...)
A measure of the number of cells in a tumor that are dividing (proliferating). May be used with the S-phase fraction to give a more complete understanding of how fast a tumor is growing.
prolymphocytic leukemia listen (proh-LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL), in which too many immature white blood cells (prolymphocytes) are found in the blood and bone marrow. Prolymphocytic leukemia usually progresses more rapidly than classic CLL. Also called PLL.
Promacta listen (proh-MAK-tuh)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (a lower-than-normal number of platelets in the blood) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system). It is used in patients who did not get better with corticosteroids, immunoglobulins, or surgery to remove the spleen. Promacta is also used to treat severe aplastic anemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Promacta causes more platelets to be made in the bone marrow. It is a type of thrombopoietin receptor agonist. Also called eltrombopag olamine.
promegapoietin listen (proh-MEH-guh-POY-eh-tin)
A drug given during chemotherapy to increase blood cell regeneration. Promegapoietin is a colony-stimulating factor that stimulates the production of blood cells, especially platelets. It is a cytokine and belongs to the family of drugs called hematopoietic (blood-forming) agents.
ProMune listen (PROH-myoon)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called biological response modifiers. Also called CpG 7909 and PF-3512676.
promyelocytic leukemia listen (proh-MY-eh-loh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow. It is usually marked by an exchange of parts of chromosomes 15 and 17. Also called acute promyelocytic leukemia and APL.
promyelocytic leukemia gene listen (proh-MY-eh-loh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh jeen)
A gene that makes the promyelocytic leukemia (PML) protein, which helps control cell growth and cell division. Mutations (changes) in the promyelocytic leukemia gene can occur when a piece of the chromosome containing the promyelocytic leukemia gene breaks off and joins with a gene called RARA on another chromosome. These changes may cause too many immature white blood cells to build up in the blood and bone marrow. This can lead to an aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia called acute promyelocytic leukemia. The promyelocytic leukemia gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called PML gene.
pro-oxidant listen (proh-OK-sih-dunt)
A substance that can produce oxygen byproducts of metabolism that can cause damage to cells.
prophylactic listen (PROH-fih-LAK-tik)
In medicine, something that prevents or protects.
prophylactic cranial irradiation listen (PROH-fih-LAK-tik KRAY-nee-ul ir-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Radiation therapy to the head to reduce the risk that cancer will spread to the brain.
prophylactic mastectomy listen (PROH-fih-LAK-tik ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to reduce the risk of developing breast cancer by removing one or both breasts before disease develops. Also called preventive mastectomy.
prophylactic oophorectomy listen (PROH-fih-LAK-tik oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery intended to reduce the risk of ovarian cancer by removing the ovaries before disease develops.
prophylactic surgery listen (PROH-fih-LAK-tik SER-juh-ree)
Surgery to remove an organ or gland that shows no signs of cancer, in an attempt to prevent development of cancer of that organ or gland. Prophylactic surgery is sometimes chosen by people who know they are at high risk for developing cancer.
prophylaxis listen (PROH-fih-LAK-sis)
An attempt to prevent disease.
propranolol hydrochloride listen (proh-PRAN-uh-lol HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used under the brand name Hemangeol to treat infantile hemangioma (a benign blood vessel tumor). Propranolol hydrochloride is also used under other brand names to treat high blood pressure, including before surgery for pheochromocytoma, and to treat chest pain (angina), abnormal heartbeat (arrhythmia), and several other conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Propranolol hydrochloride blocks certain receptors on nerve cells and causes blood vessels to relax and dilate (widen). This allows blood to flow more easily and lowers blood pressure and heart rate. Propranolol hydrochloride may also help shrink certain types of vascular tumors. It is a type of beta blocker.
prospective listen (pruh-SPEK-tiv)
In medicine, a study or clinical trial in which participants are identified and then followed forward in time.
prospective cohort study listen (pruh-SPEK-tiv KOH-hort STUH-dee)
A research study that follows over time groups of individuals who are alike in many ways but differ by a certain characteristic (for example, female nurses who smoke and those who do not smoke) and compares them for a particular outcome (such as lung cancer).
Prost 30 listen (prost ...)
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the detection and treatment of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are produced in the laboratory and can locate and bind to cancer cells.
prostaglandin listen (PROS-tuh-GLAN-din)
One of several hormone-like substances made by the body. Different prostaglandins control blood pressure, contraction of smooth muscles, and other processes within tissues where they are made. Certain prostaglandins are being studied as cancer biomarkers. Also called PG.
prostaglandin E1 listen (PROS-tuh-GLAN-din …)
A drug that is used to treat impotence (inability to have an erection) and is being studied in the treatment of sexual problems in men who have had surgery for prostate cancer. It is a type of vasodilator. Also called alprostadil and PGE1.
prostaglandin-endoperoxide synthase 2 listen (PROS-tuh-GLAN-din-EN-doh-peh-ROK-side SIN-thays 2)
An enzyme that speeds up the formation of substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also cause tumor cells to grow. Some tumors have high levels of prostaglandin-endoperoxide synthase 2 and blocking its activity may reduce tumor growth. Also called COX-2 and cyclooxygenase-2.
ProstaScint listen (PROS-tuh-sint)
A substance used to detect prostate cancer. It contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to prostate cells, linked to a substance that can bind radioisotopes. ProstaScint is combined with indium 111 and injected into the body. A gamma camera (a special camera that detects radioactivity) is used to find prostate cancer cells in the body. ProstaScint is a type of immunoconjugate. Also called capromab pendetide.
ProstaScint scan listen (PROS-tuh-sint skan)
An imaging test used to detect prostate cancer. The patient receives an injection of an indium 111-labeled form of ProstaScint, which contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to prostate cells. A gamma camera (a special camera that detects radioactivity) is used to find prostate cancer cells in the body.
prostate listen (PROS-tayt)
A gland in the male reproductive system. The prostate surrounds the part of the urethra (the tube that empties the bladder) just below the bladder, and produces a fluid that forms part of the semen.
prostate cancer listen (PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the prostate (a gland in the male reproductive system found below the bladder and in front of the rectum). Prostate cancer usually occurs in older men.
prostatectomy listen (PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the prostate and some of the tissue around it. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed. It may be done through an open prostatectomy, in which an incision (cut) is made in the wall of the lower abdomen or the perineum, or by using a laparoscope (a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and lens for viewing).
prostate-specific antigen listen (PROS-tayt-speh-SIH-fik AN-tih-jen)
A protein made by the prostate gland and found in the blood. Prostate-specific antigen blood levels may be higher than normal in men who have prostate cancer, benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), or infection or inflammation of the prostate gland. Also called PSA.
prostate-specific antigen test listen (PROS-tayt-speh-SIH-fik AN-tih-jen ...)
A laboratory test that measures the amount of prostate-specific antigen (PSA) found in the blood. PSA is a protein made by the prostate gland. The amount of PSA may be higher in men who have prostate cancer, benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), or infection or inflammation of the prostate. Also called PSA test.
prostatic acid phosphatase listen (prah-STA-tik A-sid FOS-fuh-tays)
An enzyme produced by the prostate. It may be found in increased amounts in men who have prostate cancer. Also called PAP.
prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia listen (prah-STA-tik IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Noncancerous growth of the cells lining the internal and external surfaces of the prostate gland. Having high-grade prostatic intraepithelial neoplasia may increase the risk of developing prostate cancer. Also called PIN.
prostatitis listen (PROS-tuh-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the prostate gland.
prostatocystectomy listen (PROS-tuh-toh-sis-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the bladder (the organ that holds urine) and the prostate. In a radical prostatocystectomy, the seminal vesicles are also removed. The prostate and seminal vesicles are glands in the male reproductive system that help make semen. Also called cystoprostatectomy.
prosthesis listen (pros-THEE-sis)
A device, such as an artificial leg, that replaces a part of the body.
prosthetist listen (PROS-theh-tist)
A person who has special training in making and fitting artificial body parts, such as arms or legs.
prosthodontist listen (pros-thoh-DON-tist)
A dentist who has special training in replacing missing teeth or other structures of the mouth to restore an individual’s appearance, comfort, or health.
prostration listen (prah-STRAY-shun)
A condition in which a person is so tired or weak that he or she is unable to do anything.
protease inhibitor listen (PROH-tee-ays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A compound that interferes with the ability of certain enzymes to break down proteins. Some protease inhibitors can keep a virus from making copies of itself (for example, AIDS virus protease inhibitors), and some can prevent cancer cells from spreading.
proteasome inhibitor listen (PROH-tee-uh-some in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that blocks the action of proteasomes. A proteasome is a large protein complex that helps destroy other cellular proteins when they are no longer needed. Proteasome inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
Protection of Human Subjects listen (proh-TEK-shun ... HYOO-mun SUB-jekts)
Laws set by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) to protect a person from risks in research studies that any federal agency or department has a part in. Also called 45 CFR 46, 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 46, and human participant protection regulations.
protective factor listen (proh-TEK-tiv FAK-ter)
Something that may decrease the chance of getting a certain disease. Some examples of protective factors for cancer are getting regular physical activity, staying at a healthy weight, and having a healthy diet.
protegrin listen (proh-TEH-grin)
One of a family of small proteins found in white blood cells in pigs. Protegrins kill certain bacteria, fungi, and viruses by making holes in their outer membranes and causing them to burst. A protegrin is a type of antimicrobial peptide.
protein listen (PROH-teen)
A molecule made up of amino acids. Proteins are needed for the body to function properly. They are the basis of body structures, such as skin and hair, and of other substances such as enzymes, cytokines, and antibodies.
protein expression listen (PROH-teen ek-SPREH-shun)
Refers to the production of proteins by cells. The study of protein expression in cancer cells may give information about a specific type of cancer, the best treatment to use, and how well a treatment works.
protein expression profile listen (PROH-teen ek-SPREH-shun PROH-file)
Information about all proteins that are made in blood, other body fluids, or tissues, at certain times. A protein expression profile may be used to find and diagnose a disease or condition and to see how well the body responds to treatment. Also called protein signature and proteomic profile.
protein kinase B listen (PROH-teen KY-nays …)
A group of enzymes involved in several processes related to cell growth and survival. Protein kinase B enzymes help to transfer signals inside cells. A protein kinase B enzyme is a type of serine/threonine protein kinase. Also called Akt.
protein kinase C listen (PROH-teen KY-nays ...)
An enzyme found throughout the body's tissues and organs. Several forms of protein kinase C are involved in many cellular functions. Protein kinase C is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called PKC.
protein kinase inhibitor listen (PROH-teen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the action of enzymes called protein kinases. There are many different types of protein kinases and they take part in many cell functions. These include cell signaling, growth, and division. Blocking certain protein kinases may help keep cancer cells from growing. Some protein kinase inhibitors, such as imatinib, vemurafenib, and gefitinib, are used to treat cancer.
protein signature listen (PROH-teen SIG-nuh-cher)
Information about all proteins that are made in blood, other body fluids, or tissues, at certain times. A protein signature may be used to find and diagnose a disease or condition and to see how well the body responds to treatment. Also called protein expression profile and proteomic profile.
protein-bound paclitaxel listen (PROH-teen-bownd PA-klih-TAK-sil)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has come back or spread to other parts of the body. It is also used with carboplatin to treat advanced non-small cell lung cancer in patients who are not able to have surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Protein-bound paclitaxel is a form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel and may cause fewer side effects than paclitaxel. It stops cancer cells from growing and dividing, and may kill them. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent. Also called ABI-007, Abraxane, nanoparticle paclitaxel, and paclitaxel albumin-stabilized nanoparticle formulation.
proteinuria listen (PROH-teen-YOOR-ee-uh)
Higher-than-normal amount of protein in the urine.
proteogenomics listen (PROH-tee-oh-jeh-NOH-mix)
The study of how information about the DNA in a cell or organism relates to the proteins made by that cell or organism. This includes understanding how genes control when proteins get made and what changes occur to proteins after they are made that may switch them on and off. Proteogenomics may help researchers learn more about which proteins are involved in certain diseases, such as cancer, and may also be used to help develop new drugs that block these proteins.
proteoglycan listen (PROH-tee-oh-GLY-kan)
A molecule that contains both protein and glycosaminoglycans, which are a type of polysaccharide. Proteoglycans are found in cartilage and other connective tissues.
proteome listen (PROH-tee-ome)
The complete set of proteins made by an organism. Proteins are made in different amounts and at different times, depending on how they work, when they are needed, and how they interact with other proteins inside cells. Information about a proteome may be used to help find which proteins are involved in diseases, such as cancer. It may also be used to help develop drugs that block these proteins.
proteomic profile listen (PROH-tee-OH-mik PROH-file)
Information about all proteins that are made in blood, other body fluids, or tissues, at certain times. A proteomic profile may be used to find and diagnose a disease or condition and to see how well the body responds to treatment. Also called protein expression profile and protein signature.
proteomics listen (proh-tee-OH-mix)
The study of the structure and function of proteins, including the way they work and interact with each other inside cells.
Protocel listen (PROH-toh-sel)
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in Protocel have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. Protocel is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, JS–114, and Sheridan’s Formula.
protocol listen (PROH-tuh-KOL)
A detailed plan of a scientific or medical experiment, treatment, or procedure. In clinical trials, it states what the study will do, how it will be done, and why it is being done. It explains how many people will be in the study, who is eligible to take part in it, what study drugs or other interventions will be given, what tests will be done and how often, and what information will be collected.
proton listen (PROH-ton)
A small, positively charged particle of matter found in the atoms of all elements. Streams of protons generated by special equipment can be used for radiation treatment.
proton beam radiation therapy listen (PROH-ton beem RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses streams of protons (tiny particles with a positive charge) to kill tumor cells. This type of treatment can reduce the amount of radiation damage to healthy tissue near a tumor. It is used to treat cancers of the head and neck and organs such as the brain, eye, lung, spine, and prostate. Proton beam radiation is different from x-ray radiation.
proton magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging listen (PROH-ton mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts SPEK-troh-SKAH-pik IH-muh-jing)
A noninvasive imaging method that provides information about cellular activity (metabolic information). It is used along with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) which provides information about the shape and size of the tumor (spatial information). Also called 1H-nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, and MRSI.
proton pump inhibitor listen (PROH-ton … in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance used to treat certain disorders of the stomach and intestines, such as heartburn and ulcers. Proton pump inhibitors block the actions of an enzyme in the stomach and reduce the amount of acid made in the stomach. Also called PPI.
proto-oncogene listen (PROH-toh-ON-koh-jeen)
A gene involved in normal cell growth. Mutations (changes) in a proto-oncogene may cause it to become an oncogene, which can cause the growth of cancer cells.
protozoal listen (PROH-tuh-ZOH-ul)
Having to do with the simplest organisms in the animal kingdom. Protozoa are single-cell organisms, such as ameba, and are different from bacteria, which are not members of the animal kingdom. Some protozoa can be seen without a microscope.
Provenge listen (PROH-venj)
A vaccine used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who have few or no symptoms and whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Provenge is made from a patient’s immune cells that have been treated in the laboratory with GM-CSF (a type of growth factor) and a protein found on prostate cancer cells. Provenge may help the immune system kill prostate cancer cells. It is a type of cellular adoptive immunotherapy. Also called APC8015 and sipuleucel-T.
proximal listen (PROK-sih-mul)
In medicine, refers to a part of the body that is closer to the center of the body than another part. For example, the knee is proximal to the toes. The opposite is distal.
proximal colon listen (PROK-sih-mul KOH-lun)
The first and middle parts of the colon. The proximal colon includes the cecum (a pouch that connects the small intestine to the colon), the ascending colon (the right side of the colon), and the transverse colon (the part of the colon that goes across the body between the right and left sides of the colon).
proximal urethra listen (PROK-sih-mul yoo-REE-thruh)
The part of the urethra closest to the inside of the body. The urethra is the tube through which urine leaves the body. In women, the proximal urethra is the part near the bladder and in men it is the part that goes through the prostate gland.
proximal urethral cancer listen (PROK-sih-mul yoo-REE-thrul KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in the part of the urethra closest to the inside of the body. The cancer often has spread deeply into the tissue.
Proxinium listen (prok-SIH-nee-um)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of head and neck cancer. Proxinium is made by linking a monoclonal antibody fragment to a toxic protein that may kill cancer cells. It binds to EpCAM (a protein on the surface of epithelial cells and some types of cancer cells). Also called anti-EpCAM-Pseudomonas-exotoxin fusion protein and VB4-845.
PRRT
A type of radiation therapy used to treat certain types of neuroendocrine tumors. A radioactive chemical is linked to a peptide (small protein) that targets cancer cells. When this radioactive peptide is injected into the body, it binds to a specific receptor found on some cancer cells. The radioactive peptide builds up in these cells and helps kill the cancer cells without harming normal cells. PRRT is a type of targeted therapy. Also called peptide receptor radionuclide therapy.
pruritus listen (proo-RY-tus)
Itching. Severe itching may be a side effect of some cancer treatments and a symptom of some types of cancers.
PS-341
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is also used to treat mantle cell lymphoma in patients who have already received at least one other type of treatment and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PS-341 blocks several molecular pathways in a cell and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor and a type of dipeptidyl boronic acid. Also called bortezomib and Velcade.
PSA
A protein made by the prostate gland and found in the blood. PSA blood levels may be higher than normal in men who have prostate cancer, benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), or infection or inflammation of the prostate gland. Also called prostate-specific antigen.
PSA bounce listen (… bownts)
A brief rise and then fall in the blood level of PSA (prostate-specific antigen) that occurs in some patients 1-3 years after receiving radiation treatment for prostate cancer. PSA bounce does not mean that the cancer has come back. It may be caused by the release of PSA from destroyed cancer cells or from normal prostate tissue exposed to the radiation treatment.
PSA failure listen (...FAYL-yer)
A rise in the blood level of PSA (prostate-specific antigen) in prostate cancer patients after treatment with surgery or radiation. PSA failure may occur in patients who do not have symptoms. It may mean that the cancer has come back. Also called biochemical recurrence and biochemical relapse.
PSA test listen (… test)
A laboratory test that measures the amount of prostate-specific antigen (PSA) found in the blood. PSA is a protein made by the prostate gland. The amount of PSA may be higher in men who have prostate cancer, benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH), or infection or inflammation of the prostate. Also called prostate-specific antigen test.
PSA velocity listen (… veh-LAH-sih-tee)
A measurement of how fast PSA levels in the blood increase over time. A high PSA velocity may be a sign of prostate cancer and may help find fast-growing prostate cancers.
psammoma body listen (sam-OH-muh BAH-dee)
A structure found in some benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) tumor cells. Psammoma bodies look like hardened concentric rings when viewed under a microscope. They can be a sign of chronic inflammation.
PSC 833
A substance that is being studied for its ability to prevent or overcome the resistance of tumor cells to some anticancer drugs. It belongs to the family of drugs called cyclosporine analogs.
pseudomyogenic hemangioendothelioma listen (SOO-doh-MY-oh-JEH-nik hee-MAN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A very rare blood vessel tumor that usually forms on or under the skin of the arms or legs, but it may also form in deeper tissues, such as muscle and bone. These tumors may spread to nearby tissue, but usually do not spread to other parts of the body. There is often more than one tumor, and the tumor may cause pain in the affected area. Pseudomyogenic hemangioendotheliomas may come back after treatment. They are most common in young adult males. Pseudomyogenic hemangioendotheliomas are a type of vascular tumor.
pseudomyxoma peritonei listen (SOO-doh-mik-SOH-muh PAYR-ih-TOH-ny)
A build-up of mucus in the peritoneal cavity. The mucus may come from ruptured ovarian cysts, from the appendix, or from other abdominal tissues. Mucus-secreting cells may attach to the peritoneal lining and continue to secrete mucus.
psilocybin listen (SY-loh-SY-bin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of anxiety or depression in patients with advanced cancer. It is taken from the mushroom Psilocybe mexicana. Psilocybin acts on the brain to cause hallucinations (sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or touches that a person believes to be real but are not real). Also called psilocybine.
psilocybine listen (SY-loh-SY-bin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of anxiety or depression in patients with advanced cancer. It is taken from the mushroom Psilocybe mexicana. Psilocybine acts on the brain to cause hallucinations (sights, sounds, smells, tastes, or touches that a person believes to be real but are not real). Also called psilocybin.
psoralen listen (SOR-uh-len)
A substance from plants that is sensitive to light (or can be activated by light). Psoralens are used together with UV light to treat psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. They are also being studied in the treatment of graft-versus-host disease. Psoralen is a type of furocoumarin. An example of a psoralen is methoxsalen.
psoralen and ultraviolet A therapy listen (SOR-uh-len…UL-truh-VY-oh-let A THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of photodynamic therapy used to treat skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. The patient receives psoralen (a drug that becomes active when it is exposed to light) by mouth or applied to the skin, followed by ultraviolet A radiation. Psoralen and ultraviolet A therapy may increase the risk of getting skin cancer. Also called PUVA therapy.
psoriasis listen (suh-RY-uh-sis)
A chronic disease of the skin marked by red patches covered with white scales.
psychiatrist listen (sy-KY-uh-trist)
A medical doctor who has special training in preventing, diagnosing, and treating mental, emotional, and behavioral disorders.
psychoactive substance listen (SY-koh-AK-tiv SUB-stunts)
A drug or other substance that affects how the brain works and causes changes in mood, awareness, thoughts, feelings, or behavior. Examples of psychoactive substances include alcohol, caffeine, nicotine, marijuana, and certain pain medicines. Many illegal drugs, such as heroin, LSD, cocaine, and amphetamines are also psychoactive substances. Also called psychotropic substance.
psychological listen (SY-koh-LAH-jih-kul)
Having to do with how the mind works and how thoughts and feelings affect behavior.
psychologist listen (sy-KAH-loh-jist)
A specialist who can talk with patients and their families about emotional and personal matters, and can help them make decisions.
psychology listen (sy-KAH-loh-jee)
The study of how the mind works and how thoughts and feelings affect behavior.
psychosis listen (sy-KOH-sis)
A severe mental disorder in which a person loses the ability to recognize reality or relate to others. The person is not able to cope with the demands of everyday life. Symptoms include being paranoid, having false ideas about what is taking place or who one is, and seeing, hearing, or feeling things that are not there.
psychosocial listen (SY-koh-SOH-shul)
In medicine, having to do with the mental, emotional, social, and spiritual effects of a disease, such as cancer. Some of the psychosocial effects of cancer are changes in how a patient thinks, their feelings, moods, beliefs, ways of coping, and relationships with family, friends, and co-workers. There are different kinds of psychosocial support that can help cancer patients, including counseling, education, group support, and spiritual support.
psychosocial support listen (SY-koh-SOH-shul suh-PORT)
In medicine, support given to help meet the mental, emotional, social, and spiritual needs of patients and their families. Diseases, such as cancer, can affect a patient’s thoughts, feelings, moods, beliefs, ways of coping, and relationships with family, friends, and co-workers. There are different kinds of psychosocial support that can help cancer patients. These include counseling, education, group support, and spiritual support.
psychostimulant listen (SY-koh-STIM-yoo-lunt)
A drug that causes a sense of well-being, decreases fatigue and depression, and increases the desire to eat. These drugs can also cause mood changes and trouble with sleeping.
psychotherapy listen (SY-koh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment of mental, emotional, personality, and behavioral disorders using methods such as discussion, listening, and counseling. Also called talk therapy.
psychotropic substance listen (SY-koh-TROH-pik SUB-stunts)
A drug or other substance that affects how the brain works and causes changes in mood, awareness, thoughts, feelings, or behavior. Examples of psychotropic substances include alcohol, caffeine, nicotine, marijuana, and certain pain medicines. Many illegal drugs, such as heroin, LSD, cocaine, and amphetamines are also psychotropic substances. Also called psychoactive substance.
psyllium listen (SIH-lee-um)
A plant with seeds that are used as a mild laxative. The outer layer of the seeds swells when wet. This increases the size of stool and helps it pass more easily through the intestines (lower part of the digestive tract). Psyllium is a type of bulk laxative.
PT-100
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer, including certain types of lung, pancreas, and brain cancer. PT-100 may help the immune system block the growth of cancer cells. It may also increase the growth of new blood cells. It is a type of enzyme inhibitor. Also called talabostat mesylate.
PTC
A procedure to x-ray the hepatic and common bile ducts. A contrasting agent is injected into the liver or bile duct, and the ducts are then x-rayed to find the point of obstruction. Also called percutaneous transhepatic cholangiography.
PTCD
A procedure to drain bile to relieve pressure in the bile ducts caused by a blockage. An x-ray of the liver and bile ducts locates the blockage of bile flow. Images made by ultrasound guide placement of a stent (tube), which remains in the liver. Bile drains through the stent into the small intestine or into a collection bag outside the body. This procedure may relieve jaundice before surgery. Also called percutaneous transhepatic biliary drainage and percutaneous transhepatic cholangiodrainage.
PTEN
A protein that helps control many cell functions, including cell division and cell death. Mutations (changes) in the gene that makes PTEN are found in many types of cancer and other diseases. It is a type of tumor suppressor protein. Also called PTEN tyrosine phosphatase.
PTEN tyrosine phosphatase listen (…TY-ruh-seen FOS-fuh-tays)
A protein that helps control many cell functions, including cell division and cell death. Mutations (changes) in the gene that makes PTEN tyrosine phosphatase are found in many types of cancer and other diseases. It is a type of tumor suppressor protein. Also called PTEN.
PTH
A substance made by the parathyroid gland that helps the body store and use calcium. A higher-than-normal amount of PTH causes high levels of calcium in the blood and may be a sign of disease. Also called parathormone, parathyrin, and parathyroid hormone.
PTK787/ZK 222584
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called protein tyrosine kinase inhibitors and VEGF receptor kinase inhibitors. Also called vatalanib.
PTLD
A condition in which a group of B-cells grow out of control after an organ transplant in patients with weakened immune systems. This usually happens if the patient has also been infected with Epstein-Barr virus. PTLD may progress to non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Also called post-transplant lymphoproliferative disorder.
ptosis listen (TOH-sis)
Drooping of the upper eyelid.
PTSD
An anxiety disorder that develops in reaction to physical injury or severe mental or emotional distress, such as military combat, violent assault, natural disaster, or other life-threatening events. Having cancer may also lead to PTSD. Symptoms interfere with day-to-day living and include reliving the event in nightmares or flashbacks; avoiding people, places, and things connected to the event; feeling alone and losing interest in daily activities; and having trouble concentrating and sleeping. Also called post-traumatic stress disorder.
puberty listen (PYOO-ber-tee)
The time of life when a child experiences physical and hormonal changes that mark a transition into adulthood. The child develops secondary sexual characteristics and becomes able to have children. Secondary sexual characteristics include growth of pubic, armpit, and leg hair; breast enlargement; and increased hip width in girls. In boys, they include growth of pubic, face, chest and armpit hair; voice changes; penis and testicle growth, and increased shoulder width.
public health insurance listen (PUH-blik helth in-SHOOR-ents)
A program run by U.S. federal, state, or local governments in which people have some or all of their healthcare costs paid for by the government. The two main types of public health insurance are Medicare and Medicaid. Medicare is a federal health insurance program for people aged 65 years or older and people with certain disabilities. Medicaid is a public health insurance program for some individuals and families with a low income or disabilities.
pulmonary listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee)
Having to do with the lungs.
pulmonary disease listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disease that affects the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. Pulmonary diseases may be caused by infection, by smoking tobacco, or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, radon, asbestos, or other forms of air pollution. Pulmonary diseases include asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, pneumonia, and lung cancer. Also called lung disorder and respiratory disease.
pulmonary edema listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee eh-DEE-muh)
A buildup of fluid in the alveoli (air spaces) in the lungs. This keeps oxygen from getting into the blood. Pulmonary edema is usually caused by heart problems, but it can also be caused by high blood pressure, pneumonia, certain toxins and medicines, or living at a high altitude. Symptoms include coughing, shortness of breath, and trouble exercising.
pulmonary function listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee FUNK-shun)
A term used to describe how well the lungs work in helping a person breathe. During breathing, oxygen is taken into the lungs, where it passes into the blood and travels to the body’s tissues. Carbon dioxide, a waste product made by the body’s tissues, is carried to the lungs, where it is breathed out. There are different tests to measure pulmonary function. Also called lung function.
pulmonary function test listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee FUNK-shun …)
A test used to measure how well the lungs work. It measures how much air the lungs can hold and how quickly air is moved into and out of the lungs. It also measures how much oxygen is used and how much carbon dioxide is given off during breathing. A pulmonary function test can be used to diagnose a lung disease and to see how well treatment for the disease is working. Also called lung function test and PFT.
pulmonary rehabilitation education listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee REE-huh-BIH-lih-TAY-shun EH-juh-KAY-shun)
Education about behavior and lifestyle changes to help patients with chronic lung disease decrease breathing problems, return to daily activities, and improve quality of life. Education may include instruction about breathing exercises, nutrition, use of medicines, and ways for the patient to reduce stress and save energy.
pulmonary specialist listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee SPEH-shuh-list)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the lungs. Also called pulmonologist.
pulmonary sulcus tumor listen (PUL-muh-NAYR-ee SUL-kus TOO-mer)
A type of lung cancer that begins in the upper part of a lung and spreads to nearby tissues such as the ribs and vertebrae. Most pulmonary sulcus tumors are non-small cell cancers. Also called Pancoast tumor.
pulmonologist listen (PUL-muh-NAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the lungs. Also called pulmonary specialist.
pulmonology listen (PUL-muh-NAH-loh-jee)
A branch of medicine that specializes in diagnosing and treating diseases of the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. These diseases include asthma, emphysema, tuberculosis, and pneumonia.
Pulmozyme listen (PUL-moh-zime)
A drug given in an aerosol mist to decrease the thickness of mucus in the lungs of patients with cystic fibrosis. It is also being studied as a treatment to reduce the thickness of saliva in patients being treated for head and neck cancer. Pulmozyme contains an enzyme that breaks the DNA in mucus into small pieces and makes the mucus thinner. Also called dornase alfa inhalation solution.
pulse listen (puls)
In medicine, the number of times the heart beats within a certain time period, usually a minute. The pulse can be felt at the wrist, side of the neck, back of the knees, top of the foot, groin, and other places in the body where an artery is close to the skin. The resting pulse is normally between 60 and 100 beats a minute in a healthy adult who is at rest. Measuring the pulse gives important information about a person’s health. Also called heart rate.
pump listen (pump)
A device that is used to give a controlled amount of a liquid at a specific rate. For example, pumps are used to give drugs (such as chemotherapy or pain medicine) or nutrients.
punch biopsy listen (... BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a small round piece of tissue about the size of a pencil eraser is removed using a sharp, hollow, circular instrument. The tissue is then checked under a microscope for signs of disease. A punch biopsy may be used to check for certain types of cancer, including skin, vulvar, and cervical cancer. It may also be used to check for certain skin conditions and changes that may lead to cancer.
pupil listen (PYOO-pul)
The round opening in the center of the iris (the colored tissue that makes the "eye color" at the front of the eye). The pupil changes size to let light into the eye. It gets smaller in bright light and larger as the amount of light decreases.
purine listen (PYOOR-een)
One of two chemical compounds that cells use to make the building blocks of DNA and RNA. Examples of purines are adenine and guanine. Purines are also found in meat and meat products. They are broken down by the body to form uric acid, which is passed in the urine. High levels of uric acid in the body may cause gout.
purine nucleoside analog listen (PYOOR-een NOO-klee-oh-side A-nuh-log)
A type of anticancer drug that is similar to a natural chemical compound called purine. Cells use purine to make the chemical building blocks of DNA and RNA. Purine nucleoside analogs may kill cells, including cancer cells, by blocking important enzymes needed to make DNA and RNA and by damaging DNA. Some purine nucleoside analogs are used to treat certain types of leukemia and lymphoma. Also called PNA.
Purinethol listen (pyoor-IN-eh-thol)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Purinethol stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called mercaptopurine and Purixan.
Purixan listen (PYOOR-ee-zan)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic leukemia. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Purixan stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called mercaptopurine and Purinethol.
purple clover listen (PER-pul KLOH-ver)
Trifolium pratense. A plant with flowers that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It is being studied in the relief of menopausal symptoms and may have anticancer effects. Also called red clover, Trifolium pratense, and wild clover.
purple coneflower listen (PER-pul KONE-flow-er)
An herb native to North America that has been used to prevent and treat the common cold and other respiratory infections. Purple coneflower may interfere with treatment that uses the immune system to fight cancer. The scientific names are Echinacea purpurea and Echinacea angustifolia. Also called echinacea.
PUVA therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of photodynamic therapy used to treat skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. The patient receives psoralen (a drug that becomes active when it is exposed to light) by mouth or applied to the skin, followed by ultraviolet A radiation. PUVA therapy may increase the risk of getting skin cancer. Also called psoralen and ultraviolet A therapy.
PV
The science and practice of continuously reviewing the safety of drugs as they are tested in clinical trials and marketed for use. As part of PV, data about the problems caused by treatment with a drug are collected and analyzed. This process helps find ways to prevent adverse events and improve the safety of drugs. Also called pharmacovigilance.
PV701
A virus that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of viruses that cause Newcastle disease in birds.
p-value listen (... VAL-yoo)
A term in statistics. It helps show whether a difference found between groups that are being compared is due to chance. A small p-value usually means that the difference between groups is not due to chance alone, but is due to some other factor, such as a treatment one of the groups received. A large p-value usually means that the difference between groups is probably due to chance alone.
PXD101
A drug used to treat peripheral T-cell lymphoma that has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. PXD101 blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may help make cancer cells easier to kill with other anticancer drugs. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, a type of angiogenesis inhibitor, and a type of chemosensitizer. Also called Beleodaq and belinostat.
pylorus listen (py-LOR-us)
The part of the stomach that connects to the duodenum (first part of the small intestine). The pylorus is a valve that opens and closes during digestion. This allows partly digested food and other stomach contents to pass from the stomach to the small intestine.
pyogenic granuloma listen (PY-oh-JEH-nik GRAN-yoo-LOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that usually forms on the skin. It may also form on mucous membranes and inside capillaries (small blood vessels) or other places on the body. Pyogenic granulomas usually appear as raised, bright red lesions that may grow quickly and bleed a lot. The lesions are sometimes caused by injury or use of certain medicines and often come back after treatment. They usually occur in older children and young adults but may occur at any age. Pyogenic granulomas are a type of vascular tumor. Also called lobular capillary hemangioma.
pyrazine diazohydroxide listen (PEER-uh-zeen dy-A-zoh-hy-DROK-side)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
pyrazoloacridine listen (PEER-uh-ZOH-loh-A-krih-deen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called acridines.
pyridoxine listen (PEER-ih-DOK-seen)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Pyridoxine helps keep nerves and skin healthy, fight infections, keep blood sugar levels normal, produce red blood cells, and some enzymes work properly. Pyridoxine is a group of related compounds (pyridoxine, pyridoxal, and pyridoxamine) found in cereals, beans, peas, nuts, meat, poultry, fish, eggs, and bananas. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water). Not enough pyridoxine can cause mouth and tongue sores and nervous disorders. Pyridoxine is being studied in the prevention of hand-foot syndrome (a disorder caused by certain anticancer drugs and marked by pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet). Also called vitamin B6.
pyrimidine listen (py-RIH-mih-deen)
One of two chemical compounds that cells use to make the building blocks of DNA and RNA. Examples of pyrimidines are cytosine, thymine, and uracil. Cytosine and thymine are used to make DNA and cytosine and uracil are used to make RNA.
pyroxamide listen (py-ROK-suh-mide)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called histone deacetylase inhibitors.
Q10
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Q10 helps mitochondria (small structures in the cell) make energy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Q10 is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, beef, soybeans, peanuts, and spinach. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and heart disease and in the relief of side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Also called coenzyme Q10, CoQ10, ubiquinone, and vitamin Q10.
QA
A process that looks at activities or products on a regular basis to make sure they are being done at the required level of excellence. In clinical trials, QA makes sure that all parts of the trial follow the law and the Good Clinical Practice guidelines. Also called quality assurance.
qi listen (chee)
In traditional Chinese medicine, vital energy or life force that keeps a person’s spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical health in balance.
qigong listen (chee-gong)
A form of traditional Chinese mind/body exercise and meditation that uses slow and precise body movements with controlled breathing and mental focusing to improve balance, flexibility, muscle strength, and overall health.
QS21
A substance from plants that is being studied together with vaccine therapy for its ability to improve the way the immune system responds to disease. It belongs to the family of drugs called saponin adjuvants.
Quadramet listen (KWAH-druh-met)
A drug used to treat bone pain caused by bone cancer and other cancers that have spread to the bone. It contains a radioactive substance called samarium Sm 153. Quadramet collects in bone and gives off radiation that may kill cancer cells. Also called samarium Sm 153-lexidronam pentasodium.
quadrantectomy listen (KWAD-ran-TEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-conserving surgery, breast-sparing surgery, lumpectomy, partial mastectomy, and segmental mastectomy.
quadrivalent vaccine listen (KWAH-drih-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine that works by stimulating an immune response against four different antigens, such as four different viruses or other microorganisms. For example, Gardasil is a quadrivalent vaccine that helps protect the body against infection with four different types of human papillomaviruses (HPV).
quality assurance listen (KWAH-lih-tee uh-SHOOR-ents)
A process that looks at activities or products on a regular basis to make sure they are being done at the required level of excellence. In clinical trials, quality assurance makes sure that all parts of the trial follow the law and the Good Clinical Practice guidelines. Also called QA.
quality of life listen (KWAH-lih-tee ... life)
The overall enjoyment of life. Many clinical trials assess the effects of cancer and its treatment on the quality of life. These studies measure aspects of an individual’s sense of well-being and ability to carry out activities of daily living.
quinone oxidoreductase 1 listen (KWIH-none OK-sih-doh-ree-DUK-tays ...)
An enzyme inside cells that makes certain molecules less toxic. Also called quinone reductase.
quinone reductase listen (KWIH-none ree-DUK-tays)
An enzyme inside cells that makes certain molecules less toxic. Also called quinone oxidoreductase 1.
R101933
A substance that is being studied for its ability to make cancer cells respond to drugs to which they have become resistant. It belongs to the family of drugs called multidrug resistance inhibitors.
R115777
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called farnesyltransferase inhibitors. Also called tipifarnib and Zarnestra.
R1507
A human monoclonal antibody being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. R1507 blocks the action of a protein needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of insulin-like growth factor-1 receptor (IGF-1R) inhibitor.
R788 sodium listen (… SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. R788 sodium is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme called Syk, which may help keep the immune system from destroying platelets. R788 sodium is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called fostamatinib disodium, Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788, and Tavalisse.
rabies listen (RAY-beez)
A disease of the nervous system caused by the rabies virus. Rabies is marked by an increase in saliva production, abnormal behavior, and eventual paralysis and death.
race listen
In biology, a term used to describe a group of people who share similar physical characteristics or genetic traits. These may include skin, hair, and eye color, facial features, and body type. Examples of races include Blacks and Caucasians. Some diseases or genetic conditions may be more common in certain races than in others.
rachitis listen (ray-KY-tis)
A condition in children in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet or by not getting enough sunlight. In adults, this condition is called osteomalacia. Also called infantile rickets, juvenile rickets, and rickets.
rAd/p53
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. rAd/p53 is a weakened adenovirus that carries the p53 gene into tumor cells, causing them to die. It is a type of gene therapy. Also called ACN53, recombinant adenovirus-p53, and SCH-58500.
RAD001
A drug used with exemestane to treat some postmenopausal women with advanced breast cancer that is hormone receptor positive and HER2 negative. It is also used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) and certain types of pancreatic, lung, and gastrointestinal neuroendocrine tumors. It is used under the brand name Afinitor to treat these cancers and to treat renal angiomyolipoma (a type of benign kidney tumor) and subependymal giant cell astrocytoma (SEGA, a type of benign brain tumor) in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. RAD001 is also used under the brand name Afinitor Disperz to treat SEGA and certain types of seizures in patients who have tuberous sclerosis. It is also used under the brand name Zortress to keep the body from rejecting a kidney or liver transplant. RAD001 is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks a protein involved in cell division, which may help keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. RAD001 also lowers the body’s immune response. It is a type of kinase inhibitor, a type of angiogenesis inhibitor, and a type of immunosuppressant. Also called everolimus.
radiation listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Energy released in the form of particle or electromagnetic waves. Common sources of radiation include radon gas, cosmic rays from outer space, medical x-rays, and energy given off by a radioisotope (unstable form of a chemical element that releases radiation as it breaks down and becomes more stable). Radiation can damage cells. It is used to diagnose and treat some types of cancer.
radiation brachytherapy listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun BRAY-kee-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which radioactive material sealed in needles, seeds, wires, or catheters is placed directly into or near a tumor. Also called brachytherapy, implant radiation therapy, and internal radiation therapy.
radiation cystitis listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun sis-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the lining of the bladder caused by radiation therapy to the pelvis, including the bladder. Symptoms include pain and a burning feeling while urinating, blood in the urine, feeling a need to urinate often or right away, being unable to control the flow of urine, bladder spasms, and pain in the pelvis. Some symptoms of radiation cystitis may go away after radiation therapy has ended, but others may continue over time.
radiation dermatitis listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun DER-muh-TY-tis)
A skin condition that is a common side effect of radiation therapy. The affected skin becomes painful, red, itchy, and blistered.
radiation enteritis listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun EN-teh-RY-tis)
Inflammation of the small intestine caused by radiation therapy to the abdomen, pelvis, or rectum. Symptoms include nausea, vomiting, abdominal pain and cramping, frequent bowel movements, watery or bloody diarrhea, fatty stools, and weight loss. Some of these symptoms may continue for a long time.
radiation fibrosis listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun fy-BROH-sis)
The formation of scar tissue as a result of radiation therapy.
radiation necrosis listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun neh-KROH-sis)
The death of healthy tissue caused by radiation therapy. Radiation necrosis is a side effect of radiation therapy given to kill cancer cells, and can occur after cancer treatment has ended.
radiation nurse listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun nurs)
A health professional who specializes in caring for people who are receiving radiation therapy.
radiation oncologist listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in using radiation to treat cancer.
radiation physicist listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun FIH-zih-sist)
A person who makes sure that the radiation machine delivers the right amount of radiation to the correct site in the body. The physicist works with the radiation oncologist to choose the treatment schedule and dose that has the best chance of killing the most cancer cells.
radiation poisoning listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun POY-zuh-ning)
Serious illness caused by being exposed to high doses of certain types of radiation, usually over a short period of time. Symptoms of radiation poisoning usually occur right after exposure but they may happen over time, and they may come and go. Symptoms include nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, dizziness, weakness, fatigue, bleeding, hair loss, swelling, itching, and redness of the skin, and other skin problems. Very large doses of radiation may cause death. Also called acute radiation sickness, acute radiation syndrome, radiation sickness, and radiation sickness syndrome.
radiation sickness listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun SIK-nes)
Serious illness caused by being exposed to high doses of certain types of radiation, usually over a short period of time. Symptoms of radiation sickness usually occur right after exposure but they may happen over time, and they may come and go. Symptoms include nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, dizziness, weakness, fatigue, bleeding, hair loss, swelling, itching, and redness of the skin, and other skin problems. Very large doses of radiation may cause death. Also called acute radiation sickness, acute radiation syndrome, radiation poisoning, and radiation sickness syndrome.
radiation sickness syndrome listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun SIK-nes SIN-drome)
Serious illness caused by being exposed to high doses of certain types of radiation, usually over a short period of time. Symptoms of radiation sickness syndrome usually occur right after exposure but they may happen over time, and they may come and go. Symptoms include nausea and vomiting, diarrhea, headache, dizziness, weakness, fatigue, bleeding, hair loss, swelling, itching, and redness of the skin, and other skin problems. Very large doses of radiation may cause death. Also called acute radiation sickness, acute radiation syndrome, radiation poisoning, and radiation sickness.
radiation surgery listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun SER-juh-ree)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely give a single large dose of radiation to a tumor. It is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders that cannot be treated by regular surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called radiosurgery, stereotactic radiosurgery, and stereotaxic radiosurgery.
radiation therapist listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pist)
A health professional who gives radiation treatment.
radiation therapy listen (RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
The use of high-energy radiation from x-rays, gamma rays, neutrons, protons, and other sources to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors. Radiation may come from a machine outside the body (external-beam radiation therapy), or it may come from radioactive material placed in the body near cancer cells (internal radiation therapy or brachytherapy). Systemic radiation therapy uses a radioactive substance, such as a radiolabeled monoclonal antibody, that travels in the blood to tissues throughout the body. Also called irradiation and radiotherapy.
radical cervicectomy listen (RA-dih-kul SER-vih-SEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the cervix, nearby tissue and lymph nodes, and the upper part of the vagina. It may be used to treat women with early-stage cervical cancer who want to have children. After the cervix is removed, the uterus is attached to the remaining part of the vagina. A special stitch or band is used to act as the cervix and create an opening to the uterus. The stitch or band may be opened or closed as needed. Also called radical trachelectomy.
radical cystectomy listen (RA-dih-kul sis-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all of the bladder (the organ that holds urine) as well as nearby tissues and organs.
radical hysterectomy listen (RA-dih-kul HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the uterus, cervix, and part of the vagina. The ovaries, fallopian tubes, and nearby lymph nodes may also be removed.
radical local excision listen (RA-dih-kul LOH-kul ek-SIH-zhun)
Surgery to remove a tumor and a large amount of normal tissue surrounding it. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed.
radical lymph node dissection listen (RA-dih-kul limf node dy-SEK-shun)
A surgical procedure to remove most or all of the lymph nodes that drain lymph from the area around a tumor. The lymph nodes are then examined under a microscope to see if cancer cells have spread to them.
radical mastectomy listen (RA-dih-kul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery for breast cancer in which the breast, chest muscles, and all of the lymph nodes under the arm are removed. For many years, this was the breast cancer operation used most often, but it is used rarely now. Doctors consider radical mastectomy only when the tumor has spread to the chest muscles. Also called Halsted radical mastectomy.
radical nephrectomy listen (RA-dih-kul neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove an entire kidney, nearby adrenal gland and lymph nodes, and other surrounding tissue.
radical perineal prostatectomy listen (RA-dih-kul PAYR-ih-NEE-ul PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all of the prostate through an incision between the scrotum and the anus. Nearby lymph nodes are sometimes removed through a separate incision in the wall of the abdomen.
radical prostatectomy listen (RA-dih-kul PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire prostate and some of the tissue around it. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed. In a radical retropubic prostatectomy, an incision (cut) is made in the wall of the lower abdomen. In a radical perineal prostatectomy, an incision (cut) is made in the perineum (the area between the anus and scrotum). In a laparoscopic radical prostatectomy, several small incisions (cuts) are made in the wall of the abdomen. A laparoscope (a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and lens for viewing) is inserted through one opening to guide the surgery. Surgical instruments are inserted through the other openings to do the surgery.
radical retropubic prostatectomy listen (RA-dih-kul reh-troh-PYOO-bik PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove all of the prostate and nearby lymph nodes through an incision in the wall of the abdomen.
radical trachelectomy listen (RA-dih-kul TRAY-kee-LEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the cervix, nearby tissue and lymph nodes, and the upper part of the vagina. It may be used to treat women with early-stage cervical cancer who want to have children. After the cervix is removed, the uterus is attached to the remaining part of the vagina. A special stitch or band is used to act as the cervix and create an opening to the uterus. The stitch or band may be opened or closed as needed. Also called radical cervicectomy.
radical vulvectomy listen (RA-dih-kul vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina) and nearby lymph nodes.
radio wave listen (RAY-dee-oh…)
A type of wave made when an electric field and a magnetic field are combined. Radio waves are being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer and other conditions. The radio waves are sent through needles inserted into tumor tissue and may kill cancer cells. Radio waves are also used in MRI to create detailed images of areas inside the body.
radioactive listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv)
Giving off radiation.
radioactive drug listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv...)
A drug that contains a radioactive substance and is used to diagnose or treat disease, including cancer. Also called radiopharmaceutical.
radioactive fallout listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv...)
Airborne radioactive particles that fall to the ground during and after an atomic bombing, nuclear weapons test, or nuclear plant accident.
radioactive glucose listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv GLOO-kose)
A radioactive form of glucose (sugar) often used during a positive emission tomography (PET) scan, a type of imaging test. In PET, a small amount of radioactive glucose is injected into a vein, and a scanner makes a picture of where the glucose is being used in the body. Cancer cells show up brighter in the picture because they are more active and take up more glucose than normal cells do. When used with PET, radioactive glucose helps find cancer cells in the body.
radioactive iodine listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv I-oh-dine)
A radioactive form of iodine, often used for imaging tests or to treat an overactive thyroid, thyroid cancer, and certain other cancers. For imaging tests, the patient takes a small dose of radioactive iodine that collects in thyroid cells and certain kinds of tumors and can be detected by a scanner. To treat thyroid cancer, the patient takes a large dose of radioactive iodine, which kills thyroid cells. Radioactive iodine is also used in internal radiation therapy for prostate cancer, intraocular (eye) melanoma, and carcinoid tumors. Radioactive iodine is given by mouth as a liquid or in capsules, by infusion, or sealed in seeds, which are placed in or near the tumor to kill cancer cells.
radioactive palladium listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv puh-LAY-dee-um)
A radioactive form of palladium (a metallic element that resembles platinum). When used to treat prostate cancer, radioactive seeds (small pellets that contain radioactive palladium) are placed in the prostate. Cancer cells are killed by the energy given off as the radioactive material breaks down and becomes more stable.
radioactive seed listen (RAY-dee-oh-AK-tiv...)
A small, radioactive pellet that is placed in or near a tumor. Cancer cells are killed by the energy given off as the radioactive material breaks down and becomes more stable.
radioembolization listen (RAY-dee-oh-EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy used to treat liver cancer or cancer that has spread to the liver. A thin, flexible tube is used to inject tiny beads that hold the radioactive substance yttrium Y 90 into the main blood vessel that carries blood to the liver. The beads collect in the tumor and in blood vessels near the tumor, and the yttrium Y 90 gives off radiation. This destroys the blood vessels that the tumor needs to grow and kills the cancer cells. Radioembolization is a type of internal radiation therapy. Also called intra-arterial brachytherapy.
radiofrequency ablation listen (RAY-dee-oh-FREE-kwen-see a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure that uses radio waves to heat and destroy abnormal cells. The radio waves travel through electrodes (small devices that carry electricity). Radiofrequency ablation may be used to treat cancer and other conditions.
radiofrequency radiation listen (RAY-dee-oh-FREE-kwen-see RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of low-energy radiation. The most common sources of radiofrequency radiation are wireless and cellular telephones, radios, televisions, radar, satellites, microwave ovens, computers, and wireless networks (Wi-Fi). Although there have been health concerns, most types of radiofrequency radiation have not been found to cause harmful health effects, including cancer. Radiofrequency radiation is a type of non-ionizing electromagnetic radiation.
radioimaging listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-muh-jing)
A method that uses radioactive substances to make pictures of areas inside the body. The radioactive substance is injected into the body, and locates and binds to specific cells or tissues, including cancer cells. Images are made using a special machine that detects the radioactive substance. Also called nuclear medicine scan.
radioimmunoconjugate listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-KON-jih-gut)
A radioactive substance that carries radiation directly to cancer cells. A radioimmunoconjugate is made by attaching a radioactive molecule to an immune substance, such as a monoclonal antibody, that can bind to cancer cells. This may help kill cancer cells without harming normal cells. Radioimmunoconjugates may also be used with imaging to help find cancer cells in the body.
radioimmunodiagnostics listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-DY-ug-NOS-tix)
The use of radiolabeled monoclonal antibodies to help diagnose diseases, including cancer. The radiolabeled monoclonal antibody locates and binds to substances in the body, including cancer cells. Images are made using a special machine that detects the radioactive monoclonal antibody.
radioimmunoguided surgery listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-GY-ded SER-juh-ree)
A procedure that uses radioactive substances to locate tumors so that they can be removed by surgery.
radioimmunotherapeutics listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-THAYR-uh-PYOO-tix)
The use of radiolabeled monoclonal antibodies to treat diseases, including cancer. The radiolabeled monoclonal antibody locates and binds to substances in the body, including cancer cells. Radiation given off by the radioisotope may help kill the cancer cells.
radioimmunotherapy listen (RAY-dee-oh-IH-myoo-noh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which a radioactive substance is linked to a monoclonal antibody and injected into the body. The monoclonal antibody can bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. The radioactive substance gives off radiation, which may help kill cancer cells. Radioimmunotherapy is being used to treat some types of cancer, such as lymphoma.
radioisotope listen (RAY-dee-oh-I-suh-tope)
An unstable form of a chemical element that releases radiation as it breaks down and becomes more stable. Radioisotopes may occur in nature or be made in a laboratory. In medicine, they are used in imaging tests and in treatment. Also called radionuclide.
radiolabeled listen (RAY-dee-oh-LAY-buld)
Any compound that has been joined with a radioactive substance.
radiologic exam listen (RAY-dee-oh-LAH-jik eg-ZAM)
A test that uses radiation or other imaging procedures to find signs of cancer or other abnormalities.
radiologist listen (RAY-dee-AH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in creating and interpreting pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are made with x-rays, sound waves, or other types of energy.
radiology listen (RAY-dee-AH-loh-jee)
The use of radiation (such as x-rays) or other imaging technologies (such as ultrasound and magnetic resonance imaging) to diagnose or treat disease.
radionuclide listen (RAY-dee-oh-NOO-klide)
An unstable form of a chemical element that releases radiation as it breaks down and becomes more stable. Radionuclides may occur in nature or be made in a laboratory. In medicine, they are used in imaging tests and in treatment. Also called radioisotope.
radionuclide scanning listen (RAY-dee-oh-NOO-klide SKAN-ing)
A procedure that produces pictures (scans) of structures inside the body, including areas where there are cancer cells. Radionuclide scanning is used to diagnose, stage, and monitor disease. A small amount of a radioactive chemical (radionuclide) is injected into a vein or swallowed. Different radionuclides travel through the blood to different organs. A machine with a special camera moves over the person lying on a table and detects the type of radiation given off by the radionuclides. A computer forms an image of the areas where the radionuclide builds up. These areas may contain cancer cells. Also called scintigraphy.
radiopharmaceutical listen (RAY-dee-oh-FAR-muh-SOO-tih-kul)
A drug that contains a radioactive substance and is used to diagnose or treat disease, including cancer. Also called radioactive drug.
radioprotective agent listen (RAY-dee-oh-proh-TEK-tiv AY-jent)
A type of drug that helps protect healthy tissue from some of the side effects caused by radiation therapy. For example, a drug called amifostine helps reduce dry mouth in patients receiving radiation therapy for head and neck cancer.
radiosensitization listen (RAY-dee-oh-SEN-sih-tih-ZAY-shun)
The use of a drug that makes tumor cells more sensitive to radiation therapy.
radiosensitizer listen (RAY-dee-oh-SEN-sih-TY-zer)
Any substance that makes tumor cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Some radiosensitizers are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called radiosensitizing agent.
radiosensitizing agent listen (RAY-dee-oh-SEN-sih-TY-zing AY-jent)
Any substance that makes tumor cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Some radiosensitizing agents are being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called radiosensitizer.
radiosurgery listen (RAY-dee-oh-SER-juh-ree)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely give a single large dose of radiation to a tumor. It is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders that cannot be treated by regular surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called radiation surgery, stereotactic radiosurgery, and stereotaxic radiosurgery.
radiotherapy listen (RAY-dee-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
The use of high-energy radiation from x-rays, gamma rays, neutrons, protons, and other sources to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors. Radiation may come from a machine outside the body (external-beam radiation therapy), or it may come from radioactive material placed in the body near cancer cells (internal radiation therapy or brachytherapy). Systemic radiotherapy uses a radioactive substance, such as a radiolabeled monoclonal antibody, that travels in the blood to tissues throughout the body. Also called irradiation and radiation therapy.
radium Ra 223-dichloride listen (RAY-dee-um … dy-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to the bone and is causing symptoms but has not spread to other organs. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Radium Ra 223-dichloride contains a radioactive substance called radium Ra 223. It collects in bone and gives off radiation that may kill cancer cells. Also called Xofigo.
radon listen (RAY-don)
A radioactive gas that is released by uranium, a substance found in soil and rock. Breathing in too much radon can damage lung cells and may lead to lung cancer.
Raftilose Synergy 1 listen (RAF-tih-lose SIH-ner-jee ...)
A substance that is used to improve the health of the digestive system and bones and is being studied in the prevention of colon cancer. Raftilose Synergy 1 is made by combining two substances that occur naturally in many plants, including chicory root, wheat, bananas, onion, and garlic. Raftilose Synergy 1 helps healthy bacteria grow in the intestines and helps the body absorb calcium and magnesium. Also called oligofructose-enriched inulin.
raloxifene hydrochloride listen (ra-LOK-sih-feen HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to reduce the risk of invasive breast cancer in postmenopausal women who are at high risk of the disease or who have osteoporosis. It is also used to prevent and treat osteoporosis in postmenopausal women. Raloxifene hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. It may also help keep bone from breaking down. Raloxifene hydrochloride is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called Evista.
raltitrexed listen (RAL-tih-TREK-sed)
An anticancer drug that stops tumor cells from growing by blocking the ability of cells to make DNA. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors. Also called ICI D1694.
ramucirumab listen (RA-myoo-SIR-yoo-mab)
A drug used alone to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) in certain patients who have already been treated with sorafenib. It is also used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also used alone or with another drug to treat cancer of the stomach or gastroesophageal junction (the area where the esophagus connects to the stomach) that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body and has gotten worse during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ramucirumab binds to receptors for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor, which may be found on some types of cancer cells. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Ramucirumab is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-VEGFR-2 fully human monoclonal antibody IMC-1121B, Cyramza, and IMC-1121B.
randomization listen (RAN-duh-mih-ZAY-shun)
In research, the process by which participants in clinical trials are assigned by chance to separate groups that are given different treatments or other interventions. Neither the researcher nor the participant chooses which treatment or intervention the participant will receive. Using chance to assign people to groups means that the effects of the treatment or intervention that participants receive can be compared more fairly.
randomized clinical trial listen (RAN-duh-mized KLIH-nih-kul TRY-ul)
A study in which the participants are divided by chance into separate groups that compare different treatments or other interventions. Using chance to divide people into groups means that the groups will be similar and that the effects of the treatments they receive can be compared more fairly. At the time of the trial, it is not known which treatment is best.
ranpirnase listen (RAN-per-nays)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of ribonuclease enzyme. Also called Onconase.
Rapamune listen (RA-puh-MYOON)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting organ and bone marrow transplants. Rapamune blocks certain white blood cells that can reject foreign tissues and organs. It also blocks a protein that is involved in cell division. It is a type of antibiotic, a type of immunosuppressant, and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Rapamune was previously called rapamycin. Also called sirolimus.
rapamycin listen (RA-puh-MY-sin)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting organ and bone marrow transplants. Rapamycin blocks certain white blood cells that can reject foreign tissues and organs. It also blocks a protein that is involved in cell division. It is a type of antibiotic, a type of immunosuppressant, and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Rapamycin is now called sirolimus.
rapid eye movement sleep listen (RA-pid I MOOV-ment sleep)
One of the five stages of sleep. During rapid eye movement sleep, the eyes move rapidly while closed and dreams occur. Rapid eye movement sleep is the lightest stage of sleep, during which a person may wake easily. During several hours of normal sleep, a person will go through several sleep cycles that include rapid eye movement sleep and the 4 stages of non-rapid eye movement (light to deep sleep). Also called REM sleep.
rapid hormone cycling listen (RA-pid HOR-mone SY-kuh-ling)
A procedure in which drugs that block the production of male hormones are alternated with male hormones and/or drugs that promote the production of male hormones. This procedure is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer.
rapid-onset opioid listen (… OH-pee-OYD)
A substance that acts quickly to treat moderate to severe pain. Opioids are like opiates, such as morphine and codeine, but are not made from opium. Opioids bind to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. A rapid-onset opioid is a type of alkaloid.
RARA gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called retinoic acid receptor alpha (RARA), which controls the activity of certain genes that help white blood cells mature. Mutations (changes) in the RARA gene can occur when a piece of the chromosome containing the RARA gene breaks off and joins with a gene called PML on another chromosome. These changes may cause too many immature white blood cells to build up in the blood and bone marrow. This can lead to an aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia called acute promyelocytic leukemia. The protein made by the RARA gene is a type of transcription factor. Also called retinoic acid receptor alpha gene.
rare cancer listen (rayr KAN-ser)
As defined by the National Cancer Institute, cancer that occurs in fewer than 15 out of 100,000 people each year. Most types of cancer are considered rare, and they are often more difficult to prevent, diagnose, and treat than the more common cancers. Because there are fewer cases, research is difficult. Examples of rare cancers are anal, stomach, and laryngeal cancer.
RAS gene family listen (... jeen FA-mih-lee)
A family of genes that make proteins involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth and cell death. Mutated (changed) forms of the RAS gene may be found in some types of cancer. These changes may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. Members of the RAS gene family include KRAS, HRAS, and NRAS.
ras peptide listen (ras PEP-tide)
A short piece of the ras protein, which is made by the ras gene. The ras gene has been found to cause cancer when it is mutated (changed).
rasburicase listen (ras-BUR-ih-kays)
A drug used to treat high blood levels of uric acid in patients with leukemia, lymphoma, and other types of cancer who are receiving certain types of cancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other medical conditions. Rasburicase is a type of recombinant enzyme and a type of urate-lowering drug. Also called Elitek and recombinant urate oxidase.
rattlesnake root listen (RA-til-SNAYK root)
An eastern North American perennial herb. A substance obtained from the root of the plant has been used in some cultures to treat a number of medical problems. It is being studied in the treatment of hot flashes and other symptoms of menopause. The scientific name is Cimicifuga racemosa. Also called black cohosh, black snakeroot, bugbane, and bugwort.
rauschpfeffer listen (ROWSH-feh-fer)
An herb native to islands in the South Pacific. Substances taken from the root have been used in some cultures to relieve stress, anxiety, tension, sleeplessness, and problems of menopause. Rauschpfeffer may increase the effect of alcohol and of certain drugs used to treat anxiety and depression. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration advises users that rauschpfeffer may cause severe liver damage. The scientific name is Piper methysticum. Also called intoxicating pepper, kava kava, tonga, and yangona.
RAV12
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to cancer cells. It binds to a carbohydrate (sugar) molecule that is found on gastric, colon, pancreatic, prostate, ovarian, breast, and kidney cancer cells.
ravuconazole listen (RA-vuh-KAH-nuh-zole)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of infections caused by fungi. It belongs to the family of drugs called antifungal agents.
ravulizumab listen (RAV-yoo-LIZ-yoo-mab)
A drug used to treat a rare red blood cell disorder called paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH). It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Ravulizumab binds to an immune system protein called C5. This may help keep red blood cells from breaking down. Ravulizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Ultomiris.
RBC
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood. RBCs contain a protein called hemoglobin, which carries oxygen from the lungs to all parts of the body. Checking the number of RBCs in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as anemia, dehydration, malnutrition, and leukemia. Also called erythrocyte and red blood cell.
R-CHOP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma and mantle cell lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs rituximab, cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), and prednisone. Also called R-CHOP regimen.
R-CHOP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat non-Hodgkin lymphoma and mantle cell lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs rituximab, cyclophosphamide, doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin), vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), and prednisone. Also called R-CHOP.
R-CVP
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat indolent (slow-growing) non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, and prednisone. Also called R-CVP regimen.
R-CVP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat indolent (slow-growing) non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, cyclophosphamide, vincristine sulfate, and prednisone. Also called R-CVP.
reactivate listen (ree-AK-tih-VAYT)
To make active again or make something work again. In medicine, an infection or a disease is described as reactivated when it comes back after a period with no signs of disease.
reactive oxygen species listen (ree-AK-tive OK-sih-jen SPEE-sees)
A type of unstable molecule that contains oxygen and that easily reacts with other molecules in a cell. A build up of reactive oxygen species in cells may cause damage to DNA, RNA, and proteins, and may cause cell death. Reactive oxygen species are free radicals. Also called oxygen radical.
reagent listen (ree-AY-jent)
A substance used to carry out a laboratory test. Reagents may be used in a chemical reaction to detect, measure, or make other substances.
rebeccamycin listen (reh-BEH-kuh-MY-sin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antineoplastic antibiotics.
rebeccamycin analog listen (reh-BEH-kuh-MY-sin A-nuh-log)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called antitumor antibiotics and topoisomerase inhibitors. Also called NSC 655649.
Recentin listen (reh-SEN-tin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Recentin may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called AZD2171 and cediranib maleate.
receptor listen (reh-SEP-ter)
A molecule inside or on the surface of a cell that binds to a specific substance and causes a specific effect in the cell.
recipient listen (reh-SIH-pee-ent)
In medicine, a person who receives blood, cells, tissue, or an organ from another person, such as in a blood transfusion or an organ transplant.
RECIST listen
A standard way to measure how well a cancer patient responds to treatment. It is based on whether tumors shrink, stay the same, or get bigger. To use RECIST, there must be at least one tumor that can be measured on x-rays, CT scans, or MRI scans. The types of response a patient can have are a complete response (CR), a partial response (PR), progressive disease (PD), and stable disease (SD). Also called Response Evaluation Criteria In Solid Tumors.
recombinant listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt)
In genetics, describes DNA, proteins, cells, or organisms that are made by combining genetic material from two different sources. Recombinant substances are made in the laboratory and are being studied in the treatment of cancer and for many other uses.
recombinant adenovirus-p53 listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt A-den-oh-VY-rus ...)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Recombinant adenovirus-p53 is a weakened adenovirus that carries the p53 gene into tumor cells, causing them to die. It is a type of gene therapy. Also called ACN53, rAd/p53, and SCH-58500.
recombinant fowlpox-CEA-MUC-1-TRICOM vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt … vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a chicken virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called falimarev.
recombinant fowlpox-TRICOM vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt … vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a chicken virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called rF-TRICOM.
recombinant human interleukin-11 listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun in-ter-LOO-kin...)
A drug used to increase the number of blood cells, especially platelets, in some cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. Recombinant human interleukin-11 is a form of interleukin-11 (a cytokine normally made by support cells in the bone marrow) that is made in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Neumega, oprelvekin, and rhIL-11.
recombinant human interleukin-2 listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun in-ter-LOO-kin...)
A drug used to treat melanoma and renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer) that have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Recombinant human interleukin-2 is a form of interleukin-2 that is made in the laboratory. Recombinant human interleukin-2 increases the activity and growth of T lymphocytes and B lymphocytes (types of white blood cells). This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Recombinant human interleukin-2 is a type of biological response modifier. Also called aldesleukin and Proleukin.
recombinant human methionyl stem cell factor listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun meh-THY-oh-nil stem sel FAK-ter)
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplasia. Recombinant human methionyl stem cell factor is a type of recombinant stem cell growth factor. Also called ancestim, r-metHuSCF, and Stemgen.
recombinant human papillomavirus bivalent vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus by-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent cervical cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16 and 18. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to cervical cancer. Recombinant human papillomavirus bivalent vaccine is approved for use in females aged 9 to 25 years. It is a type of bivalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against two different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called Cervarix.
recombinant human papillomavirus nonavalent vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus NOH-nuh-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent anal, cervical, vaginal, and vulvar cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16, 18, 31, 33, 45, 52, and 58 and genital warts caused by HPV types 6 and 11. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to anal, cervical, vaginal, or vulvar cancer. Recombinant human papillomavirus nonavalent vaccine is approved for use in females and males aged 9 to 26 years. It is a type of nonavalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against nine different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called Gardasil 9.
recombinant human papillomavirus quadrivalent vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt HYOO-mun PA-pih-LOH-muh-VY-rus KWAH-drih-VAY-lent vak-SEEN)
A vaccine used to prevent anal, cervical, vaginal, and vulvar cancer caused by human papillomavirus (HPV) types 16 and 18 and genital warts caused by HPV types 6 and 11. It is also used to prevent lesions that may lead to anal, cervical, vaginal, or vulvar cancer. Recombinant human papillomavirus quadrivalent vaccine is approved for use in males and females aged 9 to 26 years. It is a type of quadrivalent vaccine (a vaccine that works against four different viruses or other microorganisms). Also called Gardasil.
recombinant interferon alfa-2b listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt in-ter-FEER-on AL-fuh …)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma in certain patients, hairy cell leukemia, and melanoma that has been removed by surgery. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat a certain type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. Recombinant interferon alfa-2b is also used to treat some infections caused by viruses, such as the hepatitis C virus. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. Recombinant interferon alfa-2b is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) and is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called IFN alpha-2B, interferon alfa-2b, and Intron A.
recombinant tissue plasminogen activator listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt TIH-shoo plaz-MIN-oh-jen AK-tih-vay-ter)
A form of tissue plasminogen activator that is made in the laboratory. It helps dissolve blood clots and is used to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called Activase, Alteplase, and r-tPA.
recombinant urate oxidase listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt YOOR-ayt OK-sih-days)
A drug used to treat high blood levels of uric acid in patients with leukemia, lymphoma, and other types of cancer who are receiving certain types of cancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other medical conditions. Recombinant urate oxidase is a type of recombinant enzyme and a type of urate-lowering drug. Also called Elitek and rasburicase.
recombinant vaccinia-CEA-MUC-1-TRICOM vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt vak-SIH-nee-uh … vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins, including the tumor markers called CEA and MUC-1, that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called inalimarev and PANVAC-V.
recombinant vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine listen (ree-KOM-bih-nunt vak-SIH-nee-uh … vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called rV-TRICOM and vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine.
reconstructive surgeon listen (REE-kun-STRUK-tiv SER-jun)
A doctor who can surgically reshape or rebuild (reconstruct) a part of the body, such as a woman's breast after surgery for breast cancer.
reconstructive surgery listen (REE-kun-STRUK-tiv SER-juh-ree)
Surgery that is done to reshape or rebuild (reconstruct) a part of the body changed by previous surgery.
recover listen (ree-KUH-ver)
To become well and healthy again.
recreational therapy listen (REH-kree-AY-shuh-nul THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses activities to help meet the physical and emotional needs of patients with an illness or disability and help them develop skills for daily living. These activities include arts and crafts, music, spending time with animals, sports, and drama. Recreational therapy is being studied as a way to relieve distress in cancer patients who are being treated for pain.
rectal listen (REK-tul)
By or having to do with the rectum. The rectum is the last several inches of the large intestine closest to the anus.
rectal cancer listen (REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the rectum (the last several inches of the large intestine closest to the anus).
rectal reconstruction listen (REK-tul REE-kun-STRUK-shun)
Surgery to rebuild the rectum (the last several inches of the large intestine before the anus) using a section of the colon. This may be done when the rectum has been removed to treat cancer or other diseases.
rectitis listen (rek-TY-tis)
Inflammation of the mucous membrane that lines the rectum (the last several inches of the large intestine closest to the anus). Also called proctitis.
rectum listen (REK-tum)
The last several inches of the large intestine closest to the anus.
recur listen (ree-KER)
To come back or to return.
recurrence listen (ree-KER-ents)
Cancer that has recurred (come back), usually after a period of time during which the cancer could not be detected. The cancer may come back to the same place as the original (primary) tumor or to another place in the body. Also called recurrent cancer.
recurrent cancer listen (ree-KER-ent KAN-ser)
Cancer that has recurred (come back), usually after a period of time during which the cancer could not be detected. The cancer may come back to the same place as the original (primary) tumor or to another place in the body. Also called recurrence.
recurrent respiratory papillomatosis listen (ree-KER-ent RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee PA-pih-LOH-muh-TOH-sis)
A rare condition in which wart-like growths called papillomas grow in the respiratory tract (air passages leading from the nose and mouth into the lungs). The papillomas most often grow in the larynx (voice box) and vocal cords. They can grow quickly, and they often grow back after they have been removed by surgery. Signs and symptoms of recurrent respiratory papillomatosis include hoarseness, chronic cough, swallowing problems, and breathing problems, which may sometimes be life-threatening. Recurrent respiratory papillomatosis is caused by infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It can occur in both children and adults. Also called RRP.
red blood cell listen (red blud sel)
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood. Red blood cells contain a protein called hemoglobin, which carries oxygen from the lungs to all parts of the body. Checking the number of red blood cells in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as anemia, dehydration, malnutrition, and leukemia. Also called erythrocyte and RBC.
red cedar listen (red SEE-der)
A type of evergreen tree with hard fragrant wood that is a member of the cypress family. The oil from the wood is used in soaps, shampoos, bath salts, perfumes, aromatherapy, and to keep insects away. The scientific name is Juniperus virginiana. Also called cedarwood and Eastern red cedar.
red clover listen (red KLOH-ver)
Trifolium pratense. A plant with flowers that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It is being studied in the relief of menopausal symptoms and may have anticancer effects. Also called purple clover, Trifolium pratense, and wild clover.
red date listen (red dayt)
The fruit of the jujube plant. It has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems.
red elm listen (red elm)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, Indian elm, slippery elm, sweet elm, Ulmus fulva, and Ulmus rubra.
redox listen (REE-dox)
A chemical reaction that takes place between an oxidizing substance and a reducing substance. The oxidizing substance loses electrons in the reaction, and the reducing substance gains electrons. For example, rust forms when there is a redox reaction between oxygen contained in water or moist air (an oxidizing substance) and iron (a reducing substance). Redox reactions also occur when glucose (a type of sugar) and fat are broken down in the body to make energy. Also called oxidation-reduction.
reduction listen (ree-DUK-shun)
A chemical reaction that takes place when a substance comes into contact with hydrogen or another reducing substance.
Reed-Sternberg cell listen (reed-STERN-berg sel)
A type of cell that appears in people with Hodgkin disease. The number of these cells increases as the disease advances.
reference interval listen (REH-frents IN-ter-vul)
In medicine, a set of values that a doctor uses to interpret a patient’s test results. The reference interval for a given test is based on the results that are seen in 95% of the healthy population. Sometimes patients whose test results are outside of the reference interval may be healthy, and some patients whose test results are within the reference interval may have a health problem. The reference interval for a test may be different for different groups of people (for example, men and women). Also called normal range, reference range, and reference values.
reference range listen (REH-frents raynj)
In medicine, a set of values that a doctor uses to interpret a patient’s test results. The reference range for a given test is based on the results that are seen in 95% of the healthy population. Sometimes patients whose test results are outside of the reference range may be healthy, and some patients whose test results are within the reference range may have a health problem. The reference range for a test may be different for different groups of people (for example, men and women). Also called normal range, reference interval, and reference values.
reference values listen (REH-frents VAL-yooz)
In medicine, a set of values that a doctor uses to interpret a patient’s test results. The reference values for a given test are based on the results that are seen in 95% of the healthy population. Sometimes patients whose test results are outside of the reference values may be healthy, and some patients whose test results are within the reference values may have a health problem. The reference values for a test may be different for different groups of people (for example, men and women). Also called normal range, reference interval, and reference range.
referral listen (reh-FER-ul)
In medicine, the act of a doctor in which a patient is sent to another doctor for additional healthcare services.
reflexology listen (ree-flek-SAH-loh-jee)
A type of massage in which different amounts of pressure are applied to specific points on the feet or hands. These points are believed to match up with certain other parts of the body. Reflexology is claimed to cause relaxation and healing in those parts of the body, but this has not been proven.
reflux listen (REE-fluks)
The backward flow of liquid from the stomach into the esophagus.
refractory listen (reh-FRAK-tor-ee)
In medicine, describes a disease or condition that does not respond to treatment.
refractory cancer listen (reh-FRAK-tor-ee KAN-ser)
Cancer that does not respond to treatment. The cancer may be resistant at the beginning of treatment or it may become resistant during treatment. Also called resistant cancer.
Regenecare listen (reh-JEH-neh-KAYR)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of skin rash and skin pain in cancer patients. The ingredients of Regenecare are collagen, aloe vera, vitamin E, and lidocaine. It may help stop bleeding, form new blood vessels, keep the skin moist, and relieve pain and itching. It is a type of topical anesthetic and a type of wound repair agent.
regeneration listen (ree-JEH-neh-RAY-shun)
In biology, regrowth of damaged or destroyed tissue or body part.
regimen listen (REH-jih-men)
A treatment plan that specifies the dosage, the schedule, and the duration of treatment.
regional listen (REE-juh-nul)
In oncology, describes the body area right around a tumor.
regional anesthesia listen (REE-juh-nul A-nes-THEE-zhuh)
A temporary loss of feeling or awareness in a part of the body, such as an arm or a leg, caused by special drugs or other substances called anesthetics. The patient stays awake but has no feeling in the part of the body treated with the anesthetic.
regional cancer listen (REE-juh-nul KAN-ser)
Refers to cancer that has grown beyond the original (primary) tumor to nearby lymph nodes or organs and tissues.
regional chemotherapy listen (REE-juh-nul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with anticancer drugs directed to a specific area of the body.
regional enteritis listen (REE-juh-nul EN-teh-RY-tis)
A condition in which the gastrointestinal tract is inflamed over a long period of time. Regional enteritis usually affects the small intestine and colon. Symptoms include fever, diarrhea, stomach cramps, vomiting, and weight loss. Regional enteritis increases the risk of colorectal cancer and small intestine cancer. It is a type of inflammatory bowel disease (IBD). Also called Crohn disease.
regional lymph node listen (REE-juh-nul limf node)
In oncology, a lymph node that drains lymph from the region around a tumor.
regional lymph node dissection listen (REE-juh-nul limf node dy-SEK-shun)
A surgical procedure to remove some of the lymph nodes that drain lymph from the area around a tumor. The lymph nodes are then examined under a microscope to see if cancer cells have spread to them.
registered dietitian listen (...dy-eh-TIH-shun)
A health professional with special training in the use of diet and nutrition to keep the body healthy. A registered dietitian may help the medical team improve the nutritional health of a patient.
Reglan listen (REG-lun)
A drug that increases the motility (movements and contractions) of the stomach and upper intestine. It is used to treat certain stomach problems and nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. It is a type of antiemetic and a type of motility agent. Also called metoclopramide.
regorafenib listen (REH-goh-RA-feh-nib)
A drug used to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that was already treated with sorafenib (a type of anticancer drug). It is also used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with other treatment. Regorafenib is also used to treat gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body and have not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Regorafenib blocks the action of certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Regorafenib is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Stivarga.
regression listen (reh-GREH-shun)
A decrease in the size of a tumor or in the extent of cancer in the body.
regulatory T cell listen (REH-gyoo-luh-TOR-ee T sel)
A type of immune cell that blocks the actions of some other types of lymphocytes, to keep the immune system from becoming over-active. Regulatory T cells are being studied in the treatment of cancer. A regulatory T cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called suppressor T cell, T reg, and T-regulatory cell.
rehabilitation listen (REE-huh-BIH-lih-TAY-shun)
In medicine, a process to restore mental and/or physical abilities lost to injury or disease, in order to function in a normal or near-normal way.
rehabilitation services listen (REE-huh-BIH-lih-TAY-shun SER-vih-ses)
Special healthcare services that help a person regain physical, mental, and/or cognitive (thinking and learning) abilities that have been lost or impaired as a result of disease, injury, or treatment. Rehabilitation services help people return to daily life and live in a normal or near-normal way. These services may include physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech and language therapy, cognitive therapy, and mental health rehabilitation services.
rehabilitation specialist listen (REE-huh-BIH-lih-TAY-shun SPEH-shuh-list)
A healthcare professional who helps people recover from an illness or injury and return to daily life. Examples of rehabilitation specialists are physical therapists and occupational therapists.
relapse listen (REE-laps)
The return of a disease or the signs and symptoms of a disease after a period of improvement. Relapse also refers to returning to the use of an addictive substance or behavior, such as cigarette smoking.
relapse-free survival listen (REE-laps … ser-VY-vul)
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient survives without any signs or symptoms of that cancer. In a clinical trial, measuring the relapse-free survival is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called DFS, disease-free survival, and RFS.
relative odds listen (REH-luh-tiv …)
A measure of the odds of an event happening in one group compared to the odds of the same event happening in another group. In cancer research, relative odds are most often used in case-control (backward looking) studies to find out if being exposed to a certain substance or other factor increases the risk of cancer. For example, researchers may study a group of individuals with cancer (cases) and another group without cancer (controls) to see how many people in each group were exposed to a certain substance or factor. They calculate the odds of exposure in both groups and then compare the odds. A relative odds of one means that both groups had the same odds of exposure and, therefore, the exposure probably does not increase the risk of cancer. A relative odds of greater than one means that the exposure may increase the risk of cancer, and a relative odds of less than one means that the exposure may reduce the risk of cancer. Also called odds ratio.
relative risk listen (REH-luh-tiv …)
A measure of the risk of a certain event happening in one group compared to the risk of the same event happening in another group. In cancer research, relative risk is used in prospective (forward looking) studies, such as cohort studies and clinical trials. A relative risk of one means there is no difference between two groups in terms of their risk of cancer, based on whether or not they were exposed to a certain substance or factor, or how they responded to two treatments being compared. A relative risk of greater than one or of less than one usually means that being exposed to a certain substance or factor either increases (relative risk greater than one) or decreases (relative risk less than one) the risk of cancer, or that the treatments being compared do not have the same effects. Also called risk ratio.
relative survival rate listen (REH-luh-tiv ser-VY-vul …)
A way of comparing the survival of people who have a specific disease with those who don’t, over a certain period of time. This is usually five years from the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for those with the disease. It is calculated by dividing the percentage of patients with the disease who are still alive at the end of the period of time by the percentage of people in the general population of the same sex and age who are alive at the end of the same time period. The relative survival rate shows whether the disease shortens life.
relaxation technique listen (ree-lak-SAY-shun tek-NEEK)
A method used to help reduce muscle tension and stress, lower blood pressure, and control pain. Examples of relaxation techniques include tensing and relaxing muscles throughout the body, guided imagery (focusing the mind on positive images), meditation (focusing thoughts), and deep breathing exercises.
relaxation therapy listen (ree-lak-SAY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that helps reduce muscle tension and stress, lowers blood pressure, and controls pain. It may involve tensing and relaxing muscles throughout the body. It may be used with guided imagery (focusing the mind on positive images) and meditation (focusing thoughts).
Relenza listen (reh-LEN-zuh)
A drug used to prevent and to treat influenza virus infections. It blocks the release of the virus from infected cells. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called zanamivir.
religion listen (reh-LIH-jun)
A set of beliefs and practices that center on questions about the meaning of life and may involve the worship of a supreme being.
Relistor listen (REH-lih-stor)
A drug used to relieve constipation caused by treatment with opioids (pain killers similar to morphine). It is used in patients with pain caused by cancer or treatment for cancer or by other advanced disease. Relistor binds to opioid receptors outside the brain and may block the side effects of opioid drugs without affecting their ability to relieve pain. Relistor is a type of peripheral opioid receptor antagonist. Also called methylnaltrexone bromide.
REM sleep listen (… sleep)
One of the five stages of sleep. During REM sleep, the eyes move rapidly while closed and dreams occur. REM sleep is the lightest stage of sleep, during which a person may wake easily. During several hours of normal sleep, a person will go through several sleep cycles that include REM sleep and the 4 stages of non-REM (light to deep sleep). Also called rapid eye movement sleep.
Remeron listen (REH-meh-ron)
A drug used to treat depression. Remeron increases the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant. Also called mirtazapine.
remission listen (reh-MIH-shun)
A decrease in or disappearance of signs and symptoms of cancer. In partial remission, some, but not all, signs and symptoms of cancer have disappeared. In complete remission, all signs and symptoms of cancer have disappeared, although cancer still may be in the body.
remission induction therapy listen (reh-MIH-shun in-DUK-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Initial treatment with anticancer drugs to decrease the signs or symptoms of cancer or make them disappear.
remote brachytherapy listen (ree-MOTE BRAY-kee-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of internal radiation treatment in which the radioactive source is removed between treatments. Also called high-dose-rate remote brachytherapy and high-dose-rate remote radiation therapy.
renal artery listen (REE-nul AR-tuh-ree)
The main blood vessel that supplies blood to a kidney and its nearby adrenal gland and ureter. There is a renal artery for each kidney.
renal capsule listen (REE-nul KAP-sul)
The fibrous connective tissue that surrounds each kidney.
renal cell adenocarcinoma listen (REE-nul sel A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The most common type of kidney cancer. It begins in the lining of the renal tubules in the kidney. The renal tubules filter the blood and produce urine. Also called hypernephroma, renal cell cancer, and renal cell carcinoma.
renal cell cancer listen (REE-nul sel KAN-ser)
The most common type of kidney cancer. It begins in the lining of the renal tubules in the kidney. The renal tubules filter the blood and produce urine. Also called hypernephroma, renal cell adenocarcinoma, and renal cell carcinoma.
renal cell carcinoma listen (REE-nul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The most common type of kidney cancer. It begins in the lining of the renal tubules in the kidney. The renal tubules filter the blood and produce urine. Also called hypernephroma, renal cell adenocarcinoma, and renal cell cancer.
renal collecting tubule listen (REE-nul kuh-LEK-ting TOO-byool)
The last part of a long, twisting tube that collects urine from the nephrons (cellular structures in the kidney that filter blood and form urine) and moves it into the renal pelvis and ureters. Also called collecting duct.
renal failure listen (REE-nul FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the kidneys stop working and are not able to remove waste and extra water from the blood or keep body chemicals in balance. Acute or severe renal failure happens suddenly (for example, after an injury) and may be treated and cured. Chronic renal failure develops over many years, may be caused by conditions like high blood pressure or diabetes, and cannot be cured. Chronic renal failure may lead to total and long-lasting renal failure, called end-stage renal disease (ESRD). A person in ESRD needs dialysis (the process of cleaning the blood by passing it through a membrane or filter) or a kidney transplant. Also called kidney failure.
renal fascia listen (REE-nul FA-shuh)
A fibrous envelope of tissue that surrounds the kidney. Also called Gerota's capsule and Gerota's fascia.
renal function listen (REE-nul FUNK-shun)
A term used to describe how well the kidneys work. The kidneys remove waste and extra water from the blood (as urine) and help keep chemicals (such as sodium, potassium, and calcium) balanced in the body. They also make hormones that help control blood pressure and stimulate bone marrow to make red blood cells. Also called kidney function.
renal function test listen (REE-nul FUNK-shun...)
A test in which blood or urine samples are checked for the amounts of certain substances released by the kidneys. A higher- or lower-than-normal amount of a substance can be a sign that the kidneys are not working the way they should. Also called kidney function test.
renal glomerulus listen (REE-nul gloh-MAYR-yoo-lus)
A tiny, round cluster of blood vessels within the kidneys. It filters the blood to reabsorb useful materials and remove waste as urine.
renal pelvis listen (REE-nul PEL-vus)
The area at the center of the kidney. Urine collects here and is funneled into the ureter, the tube that connects the kidney to the bladder.
renal tubular acidosis listen (REE-nul TOO-byoo-ler A-sih-DOH-sis)
A rare disorder in which structures in the kidney that filter the blood are impaired, producing urine that is more acid than normal.
renal tubule listen (REE-nul TOO-byool)
A small tube in the kidney that contains cells that filter and clean the blood. There are about 1 million renal tubules in each kidney. The renal tubules make urine by removing waste, extra fluid, and other substances from the blood. Urine moves through the renal tubules into the tubes that carry urine from the kidney to the bladder.
renal vein listen (REE-nul vayn)
The main blood vessel that carries blood from the kidney and ureter to the inferior vena cava (a large vein that carries blood to the heart from the lower part of the body). There is a renal vein for each kidney.
Renova listen (ree-NOH-vuh)
A topical preparation of tretinoin that is used to treat acne. Tretinoin is a form of vitamin A.
replicate listen (REH-plih-kayt)
To make a copy or duplicate of something.
replication cycle listen (reh-plih-KAY-shun...)
In biology, refers to the reproduction cycle of viruses. A repliction cycle begins with the infection of a host cell and ends with the release of mature progeny virus particles.
R-EPOCH listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH-R, EPOCH-R regimen, and R-EPOCH regimen.
R-EPOCH regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, etoposide phosphate, prednisone, vincristine sulfate (Oncovin), cyclophosphamide, and doxorubicin hydrochloride (hydroxydaunorubicin). Also called EPOCH-R, EPOCH-R regimen, and R-EPOCH.
reproductive cell listen (REE-proh-DUK-tiv sel)
An egg or sperm cell. Each mature reproductive cell carries a single set of 23 chromosomes.
reproductive endocrinologist listen (REE-proh-DUK-tiv EN-doh-krih-NAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in the diagnosis and treatment of infertility. A reproductive endocrinologist may use surgery, medicine, or procedures, such as in vitro fertilization (IVF), to treat infertility. A reproductive endocrinologist may also use procedures, such as sperm banking and egg freezing, to help keep a person’s ability to have children. This is called fertility preservation.
reproductive hormone listen (REE-proh-DUK-tiv HOR-mone)
A type of hormone involved in fertility and sexuality. Reproductive hormones are usually made in the ovaries (in females) and testes (in males). Female reproductive hormones include estrogen and progesterone. They help develop and maintain female sex characteristics and play an important role in the menstrual cycle, fertility, and pregnancy. Male reproductive hormones, such as testosterone, help develop and maintain male sex characteristics and help make sperm in the testes. Some reproductive hormones may also be made in the laboratory and used to treat certain medical conditions.
reproductive medicine listen (REE-proh-DUK-tiv MEH-dih-sin)
A branch of medicine that specializes in fertility preservation, diagnosing and treating infertility, and other reproductive problems. Reproductive medicine also deals with issues related to puberty, menopause, contraception (birth control), and certain sexual problems.
reproductive system listen (REE-proh-DUK-tiv SIS-tem)
The organs involved in producing offspring. In women, this system includes the ovaries, the fallopian tubes, the uterus, the cervix, and the vagina. In men, it includes the prostate, the testes, and the penis.
rescue transplant listen (REH-skyoo TRANZ-plant)
A method of replacing blood-forming stem cells that were destroyed by treatment with high doses of anticancer drugs or radiation therapy. The stem cells help the bone marrow recover and make healthy blood cells. A rescue transplant may allow more chemotherapy or radiation therapy to be given so that more cancer cells are killed. It is usually done using the patient’s own stem cells that were saved before treatment. Also called stem cell rescue.
research advocate listen (REE-serch AD-vuh-kut)
A person who serves as a link between patients and scientific researchers. Research advocates help patients understand scientific information and research findings that may help them. They may also bring a patient perspective on research activities to scientific advisory boards and committees. For example, research advocates use their own experiences and the experiences of patients to work with researchers to help develop clinical trials that are safe and meet the needs of patients. They also help teach patients and their families about clinical trials and recruit patients to clinical trials.
research base listen (REE-serch bays)
Refers to the institutions, clinical staff, and patients that can take part in a clinical trial.
research study listen (REE-serch STUH-dee)
A scientific study of nature that sometimes includes processes involved in health and disease. For example, clinical trials are research studies that involve people. These studies may be related to new ways to screen, prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. They may also study certain outcomes and certain groups of people by looking at data collected in the past or future.
resectable listen (ree-SEK-tuh-bul)
Able to be removed by surgery.
resected listen (ree-SEK-ted)
Removed by surgery.
resection listen (ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove tissue or part or all of an organ.
resectoscope listen (ree-SEK-toh-skope)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to remove tissue from inside the body. A resectoscope has a light and lens for viewing. It also has a tool to remove tissue using an electrical current. It is inserted through the urethra to treat prostate disease in men and through the vagina and cervix to treat abnormal uterine bleeding in women.
residual disease listen (ree-ZID-yoo-ul dih-ZEEZ)
Cancer cells that remain after attempts to remove the cancer have been made.
resin listen (REH-zin)
A thick substance that comes from plants or can be made in the laboratory from certain chemicals. Resins do not dissolve in water, and are used in plastics, varnishes, printing inks, medicine, and to make fabrics stiff.
resiquimod listen (reh-SIH-kwih-mod)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of skin cancer. When put on the skin, resiquimod causes some immune cells to make certain chemicals that may help them kill tumor cells. It is also being studied to find out if adding it to a tumor vaccine improves the antitumor immune response. It is a type of imidazoquinoline and a type of immunomodulator.
resistant cancer listen (reh-ZIH-stunt KAN-ser)
Cancer that does not respond to treatment. The cancer may be resistant at the beginning of treatment, or it may become resistant during treatment. Also called refractory cancer.
resorption listen (ree-SORP-shun)
A process in which a substance, such as tissue, is lost by being destroyed and then absorbed by the body.
respirator listen (RES-pih-RAY-ter)
In medicine, a machine used to help a patient breathe. Also called ventilator.
respiratory disease listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee dih-ZEEZ)
A type of disease that affects the lungs and other parts of the respiratory system. Respiratory diseases may be caused by infection, by smoking tobacco, or by breathing in secondhand tobacco smoke, radon, asbestos, or other forms of air pollution. Respiratory diseases include asthma, chronic obstructive pulmonary disease (COPD), pulmonary fibrosis, pneumonia, and lung cancer. Also called lung disorder and pulmonary disease.
respiratory syncytial virus listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee sin-SIH-shul VY-rus)
A virus that causes respiratory infections with cold-like symptoms. Also called RSV.
respiratory system listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee SIS-tem)
The organs that are involved in breathing. These include the nose, throat, larynx, trachea, bronchi, and lungs. Also called respiratory tract.
respiratory therapist listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee THAYR-uh-pist)
A health professional trained to evaluate and treat people who have breathing problems or other lung disorders.
respiratory therapy listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee THAYR-uh-pee)
Exercises and treatments that help improve or restore lung function.
respiratory tract listen (RES-pih-ruh-TOR-ee trakt)
The organs that are involved in breathing. These include the nose, throat, larynx, trachea, bronchi, and lungs. Also called respiratory system.
respite care listen (REH-spit kayr)
Temporary care given to a person who is unable to care for himself or herself so that the usual caregivers can have a break. Respite care may include in-home care, adult daycare, or nursing home care.
response listen (reh-SPONTS)
In medicine, an improvement related to treatment.
Response Evaluation Criteria In Solid Tumors listen (reh-SPONTS ee-VAL-yoo-AY-shun kry-TEER-ee-uh … SAH-lid TOO-mers)
A standard way to measure how well a cancer patient responds to treatment. It is based on whether tumors shrink, stay the same, or get bigger. To use Response Evaluation Criteria In Solid Tumors, there must be at least one tumor that can be measured on x-rays, CT scans, or MRI scans. The types of response a patient can have are a complete response (CR), a partial response (PR), progressive disease (PD), and stable disease (SD). Also called RECIST.
response rate listen (reh-SPONTS...)
The percentage of patients whose cancer shrinks or disappears after treatment.
restaging listen (ree-STAY-jing)
A process used to find out the amount or spread of cancer in the body if it comes back or gets worse after treatment. Restaging may also be done to find out how the cancer responded to treatment. If restaging is done and a new stage is assigned, the new stage will be marked with an “r” in front of it to show that it’s different from the original stage. Usually, the original stage stays the same, even if the cancer comes back or gets worse. The same tests that were done to diagnose the cancer are usually done again. Restaging helps doctors plan the best treatment for cancer that has come back or gotten worse.
resting listen (RES-ting)
In biology, refers to a cell that is not dividing.
restless legs syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
A condition in which a person has a strong urge to move his or her legs in order to stop uncomfortable sensations. These include burning, itching, creeping, tugging, crawling, or pain. These feelings usually happen when a person is lying or sitting down, and are worse at night. They can also occur in other parts of the body. Also called RLS.
resveratrol listen (rez-VEER-uh-trol)
A substance found in the skins of grapes and in certain other plants, fruits, and seeds. It is made by various plants to help defend against invading fungi, stress, injury, infection, and too much sunlight. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer and heart disease. It is a type of antioxidant and a type of polyphenol.
Retacrit listen (REH-tuh-krit)
A drug used to treat anemia caused by chronic kidney disease, some types of chemotherapy, and an antiviral drug for HIV infection called zidovudine. It is also used to lower the number of donor blood transfusions needed during and after certain types of surgery. Retacrit is a form of erythropoietin (a substance naturally made by the kidneys) that is made in the laboratory. It helps the bone marrow make more red blood cells. Retacrit is a type of antianemic and a type of erythropoiesis-stimulating agent. Also called epoetin alfa, Epogen, and Procrit.
retch listen (RECH)
The action of the stomach and esophagus to try to vomit (eject some or all of the contents of the stomach). Retching that does not cause vomiting is called dry heaves.
rete testis listen (REE-tee TES-tis)
A network of small tubes in the testicle that helps move sperm cells (male reproductive cells) from the testicle to the epididymis. The epididymis is where the sperm mature and are stored.
reticular dermis listen (reh-TIH-kyoo-ler DER-mis)
The thick bottom layer of the dermis (the inner layer of the skin). The reticular dermis has blood vessels and connective tissue that supports the skin. Hair follicles, oil and sweat glands, and other structures are also found in the reticular dermis.
retiform hemangioendothelioma listen (REE-tih-form hee-MAN-jee-oh-EN-doh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing tumor that usually forms on or under the skin of the arms, legs, and trunk. The tumor has blood vessels that branch out like a tree. Retiform hemangioendotheliomas can spread to nearby tissue and often come back after treatment. They usually do not spread to other parts of the body. They occur in young adults and sometimes children. Retiform hemangioendotheliomas are a type of vascular tumor.
retina listen (REH-tih-nuh)
The light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye that receive images and sends them as electric signals through the optic nerve to the brain.
Retin-A listen (REH-tin …)
A topical preparation of tretinoin that is used to treat acne. Tretinoin is a form of vitamin A.
Retin-A-Micro listen (REH-tin … MY-kroh)
A topical preparation of tretinoin that is used to treat acne. Tretinoin is a form of vitamin A.
retinoblastoma listen (REH-tih-noh-blas-TOH-muh)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the retina (the light-sensitive layers of nerve tissue at the back of the eye). Retinoblastoma usually occurs in children younger than 5 years. It may be hereditary or nonhereditary (sporadic).
retinoic acid listen (REH-tih-NOH-ik A-sid)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Retinoic acid is made in the body from vitamin A and helps cells to grow and develop, especially in the embryo. A form of retinoic acid made in the laboratory is put on the skin to treat conditions such as acne and is taken by mouth to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (a fast-growing cancer in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow). Retinoic acid is being studied in the prevention and treatment of other types of cancer. Also called all-trans retinoic acid, ATRA, tretinoin, and vitamin A acid.
retinoic acid receptor alpha gene listen (REH-tih-NOH-ik A-sid reh-SEP-ter AL-fuh jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called retinoic acid receptor alpha (RARA), which controls the activity of certain genes that help white blood cells mature. Mutations (changes) in the retinoic acid receptor alpha gene can occur when a piece of the chromosome containing the retinoic acid receptor alpha gene breaks off and joins with a gene called PML on another chromosome. These changes may cause too many immature white blood cells to build up in the blood and bone marrow. This can lead to an aggressive (fast-growing) type of acute myeloid leukemia called acute promyelocytic leukemia. The protein made by the retinoic acid receptor alpha gene is a type of transcription factor. Also called RARA gene.
retinoid listen (REH-tih-noyd)
Vitamin A or a vitamin A-like compound.
retinol listen (REH-tih-nol)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Retinol helps in vision, bone growth, reproduction, growth of epithelium (cells that line the internal and external surfaces of the body), and fighting infections. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils). Retinol is found in liver, egg yolks, and whole milk dairy products from animals and in fish oils. It can also be made in the body from a substance found in some fruits and vegetables, such as cantaloupes, carrots, spinach, and sweet potatoes. Retinol is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called vitamin A.
retinyl palmitate listen (REH-tih-nil PAL-mih-tayt)
A drug that is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called retinoids.
retromolar trigone listen (reh-troh-MOH-ler TRY-gone)
The small area behind the wisdom teeth.
retroperitoneal listen (REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul)
Having to do with the area outside or behind the peritoneum (the tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen).
retroperitoneum listen (REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The area in the back of the abdomen behind the peritoneum (the tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen). The organs in the retroperitoneum include the adrenal glands, aorta, kidneys, esophagus, ureters, pancreas, rectum, and parts of the stomach and colon.
retropubic prostatectomy listen (reh-troh-PYOO-bik PROS-tuh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the prostate and some of the tissue around it. Nearby lymph nodes may also be removed. A retropubic prostatectomy may be done through an incision (cut) made in the wall of the lower abdomen, or it may be done using a laparoscope. A laparoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and lens for viewing. Several small incisions (cuts) are made in the wall of the abdomen, and the laparoscope is inserted through one opening to guide the surgery. Surgical instruments are inserted through the other openings to do the surgery.
retrospective listen (REH-troh-SPEK-tiv)
Looking back at events that have already taken place.
retrospective cohort study listen (REH-troh-SPEK-tiv KOH-hort STUH-dee)
A research study in which the medical records of groups of individuals who are alike in many ways but differ by a certain characteristic (for example, female nurses who smoke and those who do not smoke) are compared for a particular outcome (such as lung cancer). Also called historic cohort study.
retrospective study listen (REH-troh-SPEK-tiv STUH-dee)
A study that compares two groups of people: those with the disease or condition under study (cases) and a very similar group of people who do not have the disease or condition (controls). Researchers study the medical and lifestyle histories of the people in each group to learn what factors may be associated with the disease or condition. For example, one group may have been exposed to a particular substance that the other was not. Also called case-control study.
retroviral vector listen (REH-troh-VY-rul VEK-ter)
RNA from a virus that is used to insert genetic material into cells.
retrovirus listen (REH-troh-VY-rus)
A type of virus that has RNA instead of DNA as its genetic material. It uses an enzyme called reverse transcriptase to become part of the host cells’ DNA. This allows many copies of the virus to be made in the host cells. The virus that causes AIDS, the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV), is a type of retrovirus.
reverse transcription listen (ree-VERS tran-SKRIP-shun)
In biology, the process in cells by which an enzyme makes a copy of DNA from RNA. The enzyme that makes the DNA copy is called reverse transcriptase and is found in retroviruses, such as the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). Reverse transcription can also be carried out in the laboratory.
reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction listen (ree-VERS tran-SKRIP-shun-puh-LIH-meh-rays chayn ree-AK-shun)
A laboratory method used to make many copies of a specific genetic sequence for analysis or other studies. It uses an enzyme called reverse transcriptase to change a specific piece of RNA into DNA, which can be amplified (made in large numbers) by another enzyme called DNA polymerase. Reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction may be used to look for certain changes in a gene or chromosome, which may help diagnose a disease, such as cancer. It may also be used to study the RNA of certain viruses, such as the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus, to help diagnose and monitor an infection. Also called RT-PCR.
reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome listen (ree-VER-sih-bul pos-TEER-ee-er LOO-koh-en-SEH-fuh-LAH-puh-thee SIN-drome)
A rare condition marked by headaches, vision problems, mental changes, seizures, and swelling in the brain. The symptoms of reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome usually come on quickly and can be serious and life threatening. When treated, symptoms often go away within days or weeks. Reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome may occur in patients with certain conditions, such as high blood pressure, eclampsia, severe infection, kidney disease, and certain autoimmune diseases. It may also occur in patients treated with certain anticancer drugs and immunosuppressive drugs. Also called posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome, PRES, and RPLS.
ReVia listen (reh-VEE-uh)
A drug that blocks the action of opiates (drugs used to treat pain). It may be used in the treatment of intravenous opiate addiction or alcohol dependence. ReVia is also being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It may block the effects of the hormone estrogen, which causes some breast cancer cells to grow, or block the blood flow to tumors. It is a type of opiate antagonist. Also called naltrexone hydrochloride and Vivitrol.
Revlimid listen (REV-lih-mid)
A drug that is similar to thalidomide, and is used with rituximab to treat follicular lymphoma and marginal zone lymphoma in adults who have already received other treatment. It is also used alone or with dexamethasone to treat multiple myeloma in adults. Revlimid is also used in adults to treat anemia caused by certain types of myelodysplastic syndromes and to treat mantle cell lymphoma that came back or got worse after treatment that included bortezomib. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Revlimid may help the immune system kill abnormal blood cells or cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Revlimid is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of immunomodulating agent. Also called CC-5013 and lenalidomide.
RevM10 gene listen (… jeen)
An antiviral gene that is being studied in the treatment of cancer in patients who have HIV, the virus that causes AIDS.
Reye syndrome listen (ray SIN-drome)
A rare disease that damages the brain and liver and causes death if not treated. It occurs most often in children younger than 15 years who have had a fever-causing virus, such as chickenpox or flu. Taking aspirin during a viral illness may increase the risk of Reye syndrome.
R-flurbiprofen listen (… FLOOR-bih-PROH-fen)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drugs (NSAIDs).
RFS
In cancer, the length of time after primary treatment for a cancer ends that the patient survives without any signs or symptoms of that cancer. In a clinical trial, measuring the RFS is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called DFS, disease-free survival, and relapse-free survival.
RFT5-dgA immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A monoclonal antibody linked to a toxic substance. It is being studied in the treatment of melanoma that has spread to distant parts of the body. RFT5-dgA immunotoxin is made in the laboratory. It can find and kill certain white blood cells that prevent the immune system from killing cancer cells. Also called IgG-RFT5-dgA.
rF-TRICOM listen
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a chicken virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called recombinant fowlpox-TRICOM vaccine.
RG7204
A drug used to treat Erdheim-Chester disease (a very rare type of histiocytosis) and advanced melanoma. It is used in patients whose disease has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. RG7204 blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426, PLX4032, vemurafenib, and Zelboraf.
rhabdoid tumor listen (RAB-doyd TOO-mer)
A malignant tumor of either the central nervous system (CNS) or the kidney. Malignant rhabdoid tumors of the CNS often have an abnormality of chromosome 22. These tumors usually occur in children younger than 2 years.
rhabdomyosarcoma listen (RAB-doh-MY-oh-sar-KOH-muh)
Cancer that forms in the soft tissues in a type of muscle called striated muscle. Rhabdomyosarcoma can occur anywhere in the body.
rheumatism listen (ROO-muh-TIH-zum)
A group of disorders marked by inflammation or pain in the connective tissue structures of the body. These structures include bone, cartilage, and fat.
rheumatoid arthritis listen (ROO-muh-TOYD ar-THRY-tis)
An autoimmune disease that causes pain, swelling, and stiffness in the joints, and may cause severe joint damage, loss of function, and disability. The disease may last from months to a lifetime, and symptoms may improve and worsen over time.
Rheumatrex listen (ROO-muh-trex)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and severe psoriasis (a type of skin condition). Rheumatrex stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. Rheumatrex is a type of antimetabolite and a type of antifolate. Also called amethopterin, methotrexate, MTX, and Trexall.
rhIL-11
A drug used to increase the number of blood cells, especially platelets, in some cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. rhIL-11 is a form of interleukin-11 (a cytokine normally made by support cells in the bone marrow) that is made in the laboratory. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called Neumega, oprelvekin, and recombinant human interleukin-11.
rhinoscope listen (RY-noh-skope)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the nose. A rhinoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue. Also called nasoscope.
rhinoscopy listen (ry-NOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the nose using a rhinoscope. A rhinoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called nasoscopy.
rhizoxin listen (ry-ZOK-sin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It comes from a fungus and is similar to vinca alkaloid drugs. It belongs to the family of drugs called antimitotic agents.
rhubarb listen (ROO-barb)
The root of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rheum palmatum or Rheum officinale. Also called Chinese rhubarb, da-huang, Indian rhubarb, and Turkish rhubarb.
ribavirin listen (RY-buh-VY-rin)
A drug used to treat respiratory syncytial virus (RSV) infection in the lungs.
ribociclib succinate listen (RY-boh-SY-klib SUK-sih-nayt)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2 negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor (a type of hormone therapy) in women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is used with fulvestrant in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy or whose cancer got worse during treatment with hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ribociclib succinate blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called Kisqali.
riboflavin listen (RY-boh-FLAY-vin)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Riboflavin helps make red blood cells, helps some enzymes work properly, and keeps skin, nails, and hair healthy. It is found in milk, eggs, malted barley, organ meats, yeast, and leafy vegetables. Riboflavin is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough riboflavin can cause anemia (a low number of red blood cells), mouth sores, and skin problems. Amounts of riboflavin may be higher in the blood of patients with some types of cancer. Also called vitamin B2.
ribonucleic acid listen (RY-boh-noo-KLAY-ik A-sid)
One of two types of nucleic acid made by cells. Ribonucleic acid contains information that has been copied from DNA (the other type of nucleic acid). Cells make several different forms of ribonucleic acid, and each form has a specific job in the cell. Many forms of ribonucleic acid have functions related to making proteins. Ribonucleic acid is also the genetic material of some viruses instead of DNA. Ribonucleic acid can be made in the laboratory and used in research studies. Also called RNA.
ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor listen (RY-boh-NOO-klee-oh-tide ree-DUK-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A family of anticancer drugs that interfere with the growth of tumor cells by blocking the formation of deoxyribonucleotides (building blocks of DNA).
ribosome listen (RY-buh-some)
In biology, a structure found inside cells that is involved in making proteins. Ribosomes help link amino acids together to form proteins.
R-ICE
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, ifosfamide, carboplatin, and etoposide phosphate. Also called R-ICE regimen.
R-ICE regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs rituximab, ifosfamide, carboplatin, and etoposide phosphate. Also called R-ICE.
Richter syndrome listen (RIK-ter SIN-drome)
A rare condition in which chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) changes into a fast-growing type of lymphoma. Symptoms of Richter syndrome include fever, loss of weight and muscle mass, and other health problems. Also called Richter transformation.
Richter transformation listen (RIK-ter TRANZ-for-MAY-shun)
A rare condition in which chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) changes into a fast-growing type of lymphoma. Symptoms of Richter transformation include fever, loss of weight and muscle mass, and other health problems. Also called Richter syndrome.
rickets listen (RIH-kets)
A condition in children in which bones become soft and deformed because they don’t have enough calcium and phosphorus. It is caused by not having enough vitamin D in the diet or by not getting enough sunlight. In adults, this condition is called osteomalacia. Also called infantile rickets, juvenile rickets, and rachitis.
ridaforolimus listen (rih-duh-foh-ROH-lih-mus)
A substance being studied in the treatment of soft tissue and bone cancers. It is also being studied in the treatment of other solid tumors and hematologic cancer. Ridaforolimus stops cells from dividing and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of mTOR inhibitor. Also called AP23573.
rifabutin listen (RIH-fuh-BYOO-tin)
A drug used to prevent the spread of a bacterium called in patients with advanced HIV (the virus that causes AIDS) infection. It blocks an enzyme that the bacteria need to grow. It is a type of antibiotic. Also called Mycobutin.
rifampin listen (rih-FAM-pin)
A drug used in the treatment of infections caused by bacteria. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibiotics.
Rilutek listen (RIL-yoo-tek)
A drug used to treat a nerve disease called amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS). It is also being studied in the treatment of melanoma (a type of skin cancer). Rilutek blocks the release of a substance that melanoma cells need to grow. It is a type of glutamate release inhibitor. Also called riluzole.
riluzole listen (RIL-yoo-zole)
A drug used to treat a nerve disease called amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS). It is also being studied in the treatment of melanoma (a type of skin cancer). Riluzole blocks the release of a substance that melanoma cells need to grow. It is a type of glutamate release inhibitor. Also called Rilutek.
risedronate listen (rih-SEH-droh-nayt)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention and treatment of osteoporosis. It belongs to the family of drugs called bone resorption inhibitors.
risk assessment listen (… uh-SES-ment)
A process used to estimate the risk that a certain event will happen. In medicine, this may include a person’s risk of having a child with a certain condition or disease, such as cancer. It may also be used to estimate the risk of carrying a certain gene mutation (change), or of having an adverse event (unexpected medical problem) in response to certain types of drugs or other substances. A risk assessment may be done by collecting information about a person’s age, sex, personal and family medical history, ethnic background, lifestyle, and other factors and using statistics tools to calculate risk.
risk factor listen (... FAK-ter)
Something that increases the chance of developing a disease. Some examples of risk factors for cancer are age, a family history of certain cancers, use of tobacco products, being exposed to radiation or certain chemicals, infection with certain viruses or bacteria, and certain genetic changes.
risk group listen (risk groop)
In medicine, risk groups are used to describe people who are alike in important ways. For example, patients with the same type of cancer may be divided into different risk groups that depend on certain aspects of their disease. These risk groups may be based on the patients’ chance of being cured (good versus poor) or the chance that their disease will come back (high versus low). Treatment may be based on which risk group a patient falls into. Risk groups can also be used to describe people who share traits and behaviors that affect their chance of developing a disease. For example, people who do not smoke are in a lower risk group for lung cancer than people who smoke.
risk model (… MAH-dul)
In medicine, a tool used to estimate a person’s risk of developing a certain condition or disease, such as cancer. Risk models may also be used to estimate a person’s risk of carrying a certain gene change or of having a child with a certain condition. Risk models use computer programs and statistics to estimate risk based on information about a person that may include their age, sex, personal and family medical history, ethnic background, lifestyle, and other factors. There are many types of risk models, and each model looks at different factors that increase risk in different groups of people.
risk ratio listen (… RAY-shee-oh)
A measure of the risk of a certain event happening in one group compared to the risk of the same event happening in another group. In cancer research, risk ratios are used in prospective (forward looking) studies, such as cohort studies and clinical trials. A risk ratio of one means there is no difference between two groups in terms of their risk of cancer, based on whether or not they were exposed to a certain substance or factor, or how they responded to two treatments being compared. A risk ratio of greater than one or of less than one usually means that being exposed to a certain substance or factor either increases (risk ratio greater than one) or decreases (risk ratio less than one) the risk of cancer, or that the treatments being compared do not have the same effects. Also called relative risk.
Risperdal listen (RIS-per-dal)
A drug used to treat certain mental disorders, such as schizophrenia and bipolar disease. It may also be used to treat certain behavior problems in children. Risperdal blocks the action of certain chemicals in the brain. It is a type of antipsychotic. Also called risperidone.
risperidone listen (ris-PAYR-ih-done)
A drug used to treat certain mental disorders, such as schizophrenia and bipolar disease. It may also be used to treat certain behavior problems in children. Risperidone blocks the action of certain chemicals in the brain. It is a type of antipsychotic. Also called Risperdal.
Ritalin listen (RIH-tuh-lin)
A drug used to treat certain behavior disorders, such as attention deficit hyperactivity disorder (ADHD). It is also being studied as a way to improve brain function in patients treated with anticancer drugs. Ritalin acts on certain parts of the brain. It is a type of central nervous system stimulant. Also called Concerta and methylphenidate hydrochloride.
ritonavir listen (ry-TOH-nuh-veer)
A drug used to treat infection with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS). It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Ritonavir blocks the ability of HIV to make copies of itself and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called Norvir.
ritual listen (RIH-chuh-wul)
An action or series of actions that is repeated, often in a religious or social setting. In medicine, it may describe a repeated action (such as hand washing) done to relieve feelings of fear, dread, and uneasiness in people who have an obsessive-compulsive disorder.
Rituxan listen (rih-TUK-sun)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of chronic lymphocytic leukemia and B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that are CD20 positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Rituxan binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells and some types of cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Rituxan contains the active ingredient rituximab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
Rituxan Hycela listen (rih-TUK-sun hy-SEL-uh)
A combination of two drugs used to treat certain types of follicular lymphoma, diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, and chronic lymphocytic leukemia. It is a combination of rituximab and hyaluronidase. Rituximab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Hyaluronidase allows rituximab to be given by injection under the skin. Giving Rituxan Hycela by injection is faster than giving rituximab alone by infusion. Also called rituximab and hyaluronidase.
rituximab listen (rih-TUK-sih-mab)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that are CD20 positive. It is used under the brand names Truxima and Rituxan to treat these cancers. Rituximab is also used under the brand name Rituxan to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia that is CD20 positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Rituximab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells and some types of cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Rituximab is a type of monoclonal antibody.
rituximab and hyaluronidase listen (rih-TUK-sih-mab … HY-al-yoo-RAH-nih-days)
A combination of two drugs used to treat certain types of follicular lymphoma, diffuse large B-cell lymphoma, and chronic lymphocytic leukemia. It is a combination of rituximab and hyaluronidase. Rituximab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of white blood cell) and some types of cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Hyaluronidase allows rituximab to be given by injection under the skin. Giving rituximab and hyaluronidase by injection is faster than giving rituximab alone by infusion. Also called Rituxan Hycela.
RK-0202
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of oral mucositis in patients receiving radiation therapy or chemotherapy for head and neck cancer.
RLS
A condition in which a person has a strong urge to move his or her legs in order to stop uncomfortable sensations. These include burning, itching, creeping, tugging, crawling, or pain. These feelings usually happen when a person is lying or sitting down, and are worse at night. They can also occur in other parts of the body. Also called restless legs syndrome.
r-metHuSCF
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplasia. r-metHuSCF is a type of recombinant stem cell growth factor. Also called ancestim, recombinant human methionyl stem cell factor, and Stemgen.
RMP-7
A substance that is being studied for its ability to help other drugs reach the brain. It belongs to the family of drugs called bradykinin agonists. Also called lobradimil.
RNA
One of two types of nucleic acid made by cells. RNA contains information that has been copied from DNA (the other type of nucleic acid). Cells make several different forms of RNA, and each form has a specific job in the cell. Many forms of RNA have functions related to making proteins. RNA is also the genetic material of some viruses instead of DNA. RNA can be made in the laboratory and used in research studies. Also called ribonucleic acid.
RNA sequencing (… SEE-kwen-sing)
A laboratory method used to learn the exact sequence (order) of the building blocks that make up all RNA molecules in a cell. In a cell, RNA is copied from pieces of DNA and contains information to make proteins and perform other important functions. RNA sequencing is used to learn more about which genes are expressed (turned on) in different types of cells and when and how these genes are expressed. This may help researchers understand the cause of certain diseases, such as cancer.
Ro 31-7453
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may prevent cancer cells from dividing. It belongs to the family of drugs called cell cycle inhibitors.
Ro 50-3821
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of anemia in patients who are receiving chemotherapy. It is a form of erythropoietin (a substance produced in the kidneys that stimulates the production of red blood cells) that has been changed in the laboratory. Also called methoxypolyethylene glycol epoetin beta.
RO4929097
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks certain enzymes that are needed for cell growth. This may slow the growth of cancer cells. It may also decrease the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of gamma-secretase inhibitor and a type of Notch signaling inhibitor.
rofecoxib listen (ROH-feh-KOK-sib)
A drug that was being used for pain relief and was being studied for its ability to prevent cancer and to prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Rofecoxib was taken off the market in the U.S. because of safety concerns. Also called Vioxx.
rolapitant hydrochloride listen (roh-LA-pih-tunt HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Rolapitant hydrochloride blocks the action of chemicals in the central nervous system (CNS) that may trigger nausea and vomiting. It is a type of antiemetic. Also called Varubi.
Roman chamomile listen (ROH-mun KA-muh-mile)
A type of chamomile plant with daisy-like white flowers that is found in Europe, North America, and Argentina. The dried flowers are used in teas to calm and relax, to improve sleep, and to help with stomach problems. Its essential oil (scented liquid taken from plants) is used in perfumes, shampoos, face creams, lotions, and aromatherapy. The scientific names are Chamaemelum nobile and Anthemis nobilis. Also called English chamomile.
romidepsin listen (ROH-mih-DEP-sin)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma and peripheral T-cell lymphoma that have already been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Romidepsin blocks certain enzymes, which may help kill cancer cells. It is a type of depsipeptide and a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called FR901228 and Istodax.
romiplostim listen (ROH-mih-PLOH-stim)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. Romiplostim binds to the thrombopoietin receptor, which causes the bone marrow to make more platelets. It is a type of thrombopoietin receptor agonist. Also called AMG 531 and Nplate.
ropivacaine hydrochloride listen (roh-PIH-vuh-kayn HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to control pain and to cause a temporary loss of feeling in one part of the body, during and after surgery. It is also being studied for pain control after cancer surgery. It is a type of local anesthetic. Also called Naropin.
ROS1 gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called ROS1, which is involved in sending signals in cells and in cell growth. Mutated (changed) forms of the ROS1 gene have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), a type of brain cancer called glioblastoma multiforme, and cancers of the bile duct, ovary, stomach, colon, and rectum. ROS1 is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase.
ROS1 positive (… PAH-zih-tiv)
Describes cancer cells that have a change in the structure of the ROS1 gene or too much of a protein called ROS1 fusion protein on their surface. In normal cells, ROS1 is involved in cell signaling and cell growth. When cancer cells have the changed ROS1 gene or make too much ROS1 fusion protein, the cancer cells may grow more quickly. Knowing whether a cancer is ROS1 positive may help plan treatment. Cancers that may be ROS1 positive include non-small cell lung cancer, a type of brain cancer called glioblastoma multiforme, and cancers of the bile duct, ovary, stomach, colon, and rectum.
rosiglitazone maleate listen (roh-sig-LIH-tuh-zone MAY-lee-AYT)
A drug that helps control the amount of glucose (sugar) in the blood and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Rosiglitazone maleate stops cells from growing and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of thiazolidinedione and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Avandia.
rosuvastatin calcium listen (roh-SOO-vuh-STA-tin KAL-see-um)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol and other harmful substances, such as triglycerides, in the blood. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Rosuvastatin calcium blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body and it helps break down cholesterol. It also may cause cancer cells to die and may inhibit the growth of blood vessels that cancer cells need to grow. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called Crestor.
Roswell Park regimen listen (ROZ-wel … REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer. It is also used with radiation therapy to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs fluorouracil and leucovorin calcium.
rotationplasty listen (roh-TAY-shun-PLAS-tee)
Surgery used to remove a tumor in or near the knee joint, often in young people who are still growing. The knee and part of the thigh are removed. The part of the leg that remains below the knee is then attached to the part of the leg above the knee, with the foot facing backward and the ankle joint acting as a new knee. The patient is then fitted with an artificial lower leg and foot.
Rothmund-Thomson syndrome listen (ROT-moond-TOM-sun SIN-drome)
A rare inherited disorder that affects the skin and many other parts of the body, including the bones, eyes, nose, hair, nails, teeth, testes, and ovaries. People with Rothmund-Thomson syndrome have an increased risk of osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Also called RTS.
RPI.4610
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. RPI.4610 is a special type of RNA made in the laboratory. It stops a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor receptor (VEGFR) from being made. This may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor and a type of ribozyme. Also called Angiozyme.
RPLS
A rare condition marked by headaches, vision problems, mental changes, seizures, and swelling in the brain. The symptoms of RPLS usually come on quickly and can be serious and life threatening. When treated, symptoms often go away within days or weeks. RPLS may occur in patients with certain conditions, such as high blood pressure, eclampsia, severe infection, kidney disease, and certain autoimmune diseases. It may also occur in patients treated with certain anticancer drugs and immunosuppressive drugs. Also called posterior reversible encephalopathy syndrome, PRES, and reversible posterior leukoencephalopathy syndrome.
RPR 109881A
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called taxanes.
RRP
A rare condition in which wart-like growths called papillomas grow in the respiratory tract (air passages leading from the nose and mouth into the lungs). The papillomas most often grow in the larynx (voice box) and vocal cords. They can grow quickly, and they often grow back after they have been removed by surgery. Signs and symptoms of RRP include hoarseness, chronic cough, swallowing problems, and breathing problems, which may sometimes be life-threatening. RRP is caused by infection with certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV). It can occur in both children and adults. Also called recurrent respiratory papillomatosis.
RSR13
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain tumors and some other types of cancer. It increases the amount of oxygen in tumor tissues, which may make the tumor cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. RSR13 is a type of radiosensitizing agent. Also called efaproxiral.
RSV
A virus that causes respiratory infections with cold-like symptoms. Also called respiratory syncytial virus.
RTA 744
A substance being studied in the treatment of adult brain tumors. RTA 744 crosses the blood-brain barrier and blocks an enzyme needed for cancer growth. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called topoisomerase II inhibitor RTA 744.
r-tPA
A form of tissue plasminogen activator that is made in the laboratory. It helps dissolve blood clots and is used to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called Activase, Alteplase, and recombinant tissue plasminogen activator.
RT-PCR
A laboratory method used to make many copies of a specific genetic sequence for analysis or other studies. It uses an enzyme called reverse transcriptase to change a specific piece of RNA into DNA, which can be amplified (made in large numbers) by another enzyme called DNA polymerase. RT-PCR may be used to look for certain changes in a gene or chromosome, which may help diagnose a disease, such as cancer. It may also be used to study the RNA of certain viruses, such as the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) and the hepatitis C virus, to help diagnose and monitor an infection. Also called reverse transcription-polymerase chain reaction.
RTS
A rare inherited disorder that affects the skin and many other parts of the body, including the bones, eyes, nose, hair, nails, teeth, testes, and ovaries. People with RTS have an increased risk of osteosarcoma (bone cancer). Also called Rothmund-Thomson syndrome.
RU 486
A drug used to end early pregnancies. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. RU 486 blocks the action of progesterone, a hormone that helps some cancers grow. It is a type of antiprogesterone. Also called Mifeprex and mifepristone.
Rubinstein-Taybi syndrome listen (ROO-bin-stine-TAY-bee SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder marked by being short, having wide big toes and thumbs, certain facial features, and problems in developing and learning. Other problems may include heart and kidney defects, eye and dental problems, and obesity. People with Rubinstein syndrome have an increased risk of some types of leukemia and brain tumors.
Rubraca listen (roo-BRAH-kuh)
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. Rubraca is also used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes and who have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Rubraca blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Rubraca is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AG014699, PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699, and rucaparib camsylate.
rucaparib camsylate listen (roo-KA-puh-rib KAM-suh-layt)
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancer that has gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. It is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. Rucaparib camsylate is also used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes and who have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Rucaparib camsylate blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Rucaparib camsylate is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called AG014699, PARP-1 inhibitor AG014699, and Rubraca.
ruxolitinib phosphate listen (RUK-soh-LIH-tih-nib FOS-fayt)
A drug used to treat polycythemia vera in patients who cannot be treated with or have not gotten better with hydroxyurea. It is also used to treat certain types of myelofibrosis. It is being studied in the treatment of other blood diseases and some types of cancer. Ruxolitinib phosphate blocks a protein called JAK, which may help keep abnormal blood cells or cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Jakafi.
rV-TRICOM listen
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called recombinant vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine and vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine.
Rydapt listen (RY-dapt)
A drug used with cytarabine and daunorubicin to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also used to treat mast cell leukemia (a very rare type of leukemia) and systemic mastocytosis (a rare condition in which there are too many mast cells in the body). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Rydapt blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Rydapt is a type of protein kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called midostaurin, N-benzoyl-staurosporine, and PKC412.
S-1
A drug that is being studied for its ability to enhance the effectiveness of fluorouracil and prevent gastrointestinal side effects caused by fluorouracil. It belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites.
S100 calcium binding protein A8 listen (… KAL-see-um … PROH-teen …)
A protein that is made by many different types of cells and is involved in processes that take place both inside and outside of the cell. It is made in larger amounts in inflammatory diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis, and in some types of cancer. It is being studied as a biomarker for breast cancer. Also called calgranulin A.
S100 calcium binding protein A9 listen (… KAL-see-um … PROH-teen …)
A protein that is made by many different types of cells and is involved in processes that take place both inside and outside of the cell. It is made in larger amounts in inflammatory diseases such as rheumatoid arthritis, and in some types of cancer. It is being studied as a biomarker for breast cancer. Also called calgranulin B.
SAB
A temporary loss of feeling in the abdomen and/or the lower part of the body. Special drugs called anesthetics are injected into the fluid in the lower part of the spinal column to cause the loss of feeling. The patient stays awake during the procedure. It is a type of regional anesthesia. Also called spinal anesthesia, spinal block, and subarachnoid block.
sacrum listen (SAY-krum)
The large, triangle-shaped bone in the lower spine that forms part of the pelvis. It is made of 5 fused bones of the spine.
safingol listen (SA-fin-gol)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called protein kinase inhibitors. Also called L-threo-dihydrosphingosine.
SAHA listen
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that recurred (came back) or did not get better during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. SAHA blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called suberoylanilide hydroxamic acid, vorinostat, and Zolinza.
saline listen (SAY-leen)
A solution of salt and water.
saliva listen (suh-LY-vuh)
The watery fluid in the mouth made by the salivary glands. Saliva moistens food to help digestion and it helps protect the mouth against infections.
salivary gland listen (SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland)
A gland in the mouth that produces saliva.
salivary gland cancer listen (SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in tissues of a salivary gland (gland in the mouth that makes saliva). Most salivary gland cancers occur in older people.
salpingo-oophorectomy listen (sal-PIN-goh-oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgical removal of the fallopian tubes and ovaries.
salvage therapy listen (SAL-vij THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given after the cancer has not responded to other treatments.
samarium Sm 153 listen (suh-MAYR-ee-um ...)
A radioactive substance used to treat bone cancer and other cancers that have spread to the bone. Samarium Sm 153 is a radioactive form of the element samarium. It collects in bone, where it releases radiation that may kill cancer cells.
samarium Sm 153-lexidronam pentasodium listen (suh-MAYR-ee-um … LEK-sih-DROH-nam PEN-tuh-SOH-dee-um)
A drug used to treat bone pain caused by bone cancer and other cancers that have spread to the bone. It contains a radioactive substance called samarium Sm 153. Samarium Sm 153-lexidronam pentasodium collects in bone and gives off radiation that may kill cancer cells. Also called Quadramet.
Sancuso listen (san-KOO-soh)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Sancuso blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Sancuso is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called granisetron and Sustol.
saponin listen (SA-poh-nin)
A substance found in soybeans and many other plants. Saponins may help lower cholesterol and may have anticancer effects.
saquinavir mesylate listen (sa-KWIH-nuh-veer MEH-zih-layt)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called protease inhibitors. It interferes with the ability of a virus to make copies of itself.
sarCNU
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called sarcosinamide nitrosourea.
sarcoid listen (SAR-koyd)
An inflammatory disease marked by the formation of granulomas (small nodules of immune cells) in the lungs, lymph nodes, and other organs. Sarcoid may be acute and go away by itself, or it may be chronic and progressive. Also called sarcoidosis.
sarcoidosis listen (SAR-koy-DOH-sis)
An inflammatory disease marked by the formation of granulomas (small nodules of immune cells) in the lungs, lymph nodes, and other organs. Sarcoidosis may be acute and go away by itself, or it may be chronic and progressive. Also called sarcoid.
sarcoma listen (sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in bone or in the soft tissues of the body, including cartilage, fat, muscle, blood vessels, fibrous tissue, or other connective or supportive tissue. Different types of sarcoma are based on where the cancer forms. For example, osteosarcoma forms in bone, liposarcoma forms in fat, and rhabdomyosarcoma forms in muscle. Treatment and prognosis depend on the type and grade of the cancer (how abnormal the cancer cells look under a microscope and how quickly the cancer is likely to grow and spread). Sarcoma occurs in both adults and children.
sarcomatoid carcinoma listen (sar-KOH-muh-toyd KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that looks like a mixture of carcinoma (cancer that begins in the skin or in tissues that line or cover internal organs in the body) and sarcoma (cancer of the bone, cartilage, fat, muscle, blood vessels, or other connective or supportive tissue). The sarcoma-like cells are often spindle cells. Under a microscope, spindle cells look long and slender.
sarcosinamide nitrosourea listen (SAR-koh-SIH-nuh-MIDE ny-TROH-soh-YOO-ree-uh)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called sarCNU.
sargramostim listen (sar-GRA-moh-stim)
A substance that helps make more white blood cells, especially granulocytes, macrophages, and cells that become platelets. It is a cytokine that is a type of hematopoietic (blood-forming) agent. Also called GM-CSF and granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor.
satellite tumor listen (SA-teh-lite TOO-mer)
A group of tumor cells in an area near the primary (original) tumor. In melanoma, satellite tumors occur within 2 centimeters of the primary tumor, on or under the skin, and can be seen without a microscope. Satellite tumors may also be found in other types of cancer, including cancers of the breast, lung, liver, and brain. Having a satellite tumor is a sign that the cancer has spread from where it first formed.
satraplatin listen (SA-truh-PLA-tin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of prostate and other types of cancer. It contains the metal platinum and may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called BMS-182751 and JM 216.
saturated fat listen (SA-chuh-RAY-ted…)
A type of fat with certain chemical properties that is usually solid at room temperature. Most saturated fats come from animal food products, but some plant oils, such as palm and coconut oil, also contain high levels. Eating saturated fat increases the level of cholesterol in the blood and the risk of heart disease.
saw palmetto listen (...pawl-MEH-toh)
A shrub that is a member of the palm tree family. An extract made from the berries of this shrub has been studied in the treatment of certain urinary and prostate disorders. The scientific name is Serenoa repens.
SB-715992
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. SB-715992 blocks a protein that tumor cells need to divide. It is a type of mitotic inhibitor. Also called ispinesib.
SB939
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. SB939 blocks the action of an enzyme called histone deacetylase (HDAC) and may stop tumor cells from dividing. It is a type of HDAC inhibitor.
SC-70935
A substance being studied for its ability to stimulate the production of blood cells during chemotherapy. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor. Also called leridistim.
scalpel listen (SKAL-pul)
A small, thin knife used for surgery.
scan listen (skan)
A type of test that makes detailed pictures of areas inside the body. A scan may also refer to the picture that gets made during the test. Scans may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. There are many different types of scans, including computed tomography (CT) scans, magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) scans, and nuclear medicine scans (such as bone scans and liver scans). CT scans are done with an x-ray machine linked to a computer. MRI scans are done with radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer. Nuclear medicine scans are done with small amounts of radioactive substances that are injected into the body and a special machine that detects the radioactive substance.
scanner listen (SKA-ner)
In medicine, an instrument that takes pictures of the inside of the body.
scapula listen (SKA-pyoo-luh)
One of a pair of triangular bones at the back of the shoulder. The scapula connects the collarbone with the upper arm bone. Also called shoulder blade.
scar tissue listen (skar TIH-shoo)
Fibrous tissue that forms when normal tissue is destroyed by disease, injury, or surgery. For example, scar tissue forms when a wound heals after a cut, sore, burn, or other skin condition, or when an incision (cut) is made into the skin during surgery. It may also form inside the body when certain conditions, such as cirrhosis, cause normal tissue to become fibrous tissue.
scatter radiation listen (SKA-ter RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Radiation that spreads out in different directions from a radiation beam when the beam interacts with a substance, such as body tissue. For example, during x-ray mammography, very small amounts of radiation may be scattered to areas away from the breast, such as the head and neck, sternum, and thyroid gland. The energy of scatter radiation is usually much lower than that of the original radiation beam.
scattered fibroglandular breast tissue listen (SKA-terd FY-broh-GLAN-juh-ler brest TIH-shoo)
A term used to describe breast tissue that is made up of mostly fatty tissue and also has some dense fibrous tissue and glandular tissue. On a mammogram, the dense areas of the breast make it harder to find tumors or other changes. Scattered fibroglandular breast tissue is one of four categories used to describe a level of breast density seen on a mammogram. About 40% of women have this type of breast tissue.
SCF
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. SCF is a type of cytokine and a type of growth factor. Also called kit ligand and stem cell factor.
SCH 54031
A drug used to treat melanoma and chronic hepatitis C. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. SCH 54031 is used under the brand name Sylatron to treat melanoma in patients who have had surgery to remove cancer that has spread to the lymph nodes. It is also used under the brand name PEG-Intron to treat chronic hepatitis C. SCH 54031 is a form of interferon alfa (a substance normally made by cells in the immune system) linked to a substance called PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. SCH 54031 is made in the laboratory. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier. Also called peginterferon alfa-2b.
SCH 66336
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called enzyme inhibitors. Also called lonafarnib.
SCH-58500
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. SCH-58500 is a weakened adenovirus that carries the p53 gene into tumor cells, causing them to die. It is a type of gene therapy. Also called ACN53, rAd/p53, and recombinant adenovirus-p53.
Schedule I controlled substance (SKEH-jool … kun-TROLD SUB-stunts)
A drug or other substance that has a high chance of being abused or causing addiction and has no FDA-approved medical use in the United States. Schedule I controlled substances are tightly regulated by the federal government. Examples of Schedule I drugs are heroin, LSD, and ecstasy. Although marijuana (Cannabis) is classified as a Schedule I controlled substance by the federal government, some states have passed laws that allow the medical and recreational use of marijuana. Also called Schedule I drug.
Schedule I drug (SKEH-jool …)
A drug or other substance that has a high chance of being abused or causing addiction and has no FDA-approved medical use in the United States. Schedule I drugs are tightly regulated by the federal government. Examples of Schedule I drugs are heroin, LSD, and ecstasy. Although marijuana (Cannabis) is classified as a Schedule I drug by the federal government, some states have passed laws that allow the medical and recreational use of marijuana. Also called Schedule I controlled substance.
Schiller test listen (SHIH-ler …)
A test in which iodine is applied to the cervix. The iodine colors healthy cells brown; abnormal cells remain unstained, usually appearing white or yellow.
schistosome listen (SHIS-tuh-some)
A parasitic worm that can cause diseases of the liver, bladder, and gastrointestinal tract. One type of schistosome has been linked to bladder cancer. Schistosomes are found in Africa, the Middle East, East Asia, the Caribbean, and South America.
schizophrenia listen (SKIT-soh-FREE-nee-uh)
A group of severe mental disorders in which a person has trouble telling the difference between real and unreal experiences, thinking logically, having normal emotional responses to others, and behaving normally in social situations. Symptoms include seeing, hearing, feeling things that are not there, having false ideas about what is taking place or who one is, nonsense speech, unusual behavior, lack of emotion, and social withdrawal.
school liaison listen (skool lee-AY-zan)
A person who helps a child return to school after a serious illness, such as cancer, or a long hospital stay. A school liaison may also arrange for education services in the child’s home or at the hospital if the child is not able to return to school. School liaisons help parents, teachers, and other students understand special issues that the child may have in returning to the classroom as a result of the illness or its treatment. This may help in planning extra education services and support that the child may need.
Schwann cell listen (shwan sel)
A type of glial cell of the peripheral nervous system that helps separate and insulate nerve cells.
schwannoma listen (shwah-NOH-muh)
A tumor of the peripheral nervous system that arises in the nerve sheath (protective covering). It is almost always benign, but rare malignant schwannomas have been reported.
SCID listen
A rare, inherited disease that is marked by a lack of B lymphocytes (white blood cells that make antibodies and help fight infections) and a lack of T lymphocytes (white blood cells that attack virus-infected cells, foreign cells, and cancer cells). Patients with this disease have a high risk of developing viral, bacterial, and fungal infections. Also called severe combined immunodeficiency disease.
scientific review committee listen (SY-en-TIH-fik ree-VYOO kuh-MIH-tee)
A group of doctors, scientists, and other experts that reviews the detailed plan of a clinical trial for scientific quality and correct study design. There is a scientific review committee at every health care facility that does clinical research. Most clinical trials are reviewed by the scientific review committee before they go to the facility’s Institutional Review Board (IRB) for approval. Also called scientific review panel.
scientific review panel listen (SY-en-TIH-fik ree-VYOO PA-nil)
A group of doctors, scientists, and other experts that reviews the detailed plan of a clinical trial for scientific quality and correct study design. There is a scientific review panel at every health care facility that does clinical research. Most clinical trials are reviewed by the scientific review panel before they go to the facility’s Institutional Review Board (IRB) for approval. Also called scientific review committee.
scientist listen (SY-en-tist)
A person who has studied science, especially one who is active in a particular field of investigation.
scintigraphy listen (sin-TIH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that produces pictures (scans) of structures inside the body, including areas where there are cancer cells. Scintigraphy is used to diagnose, stage, and monitor disease. A small amount of a radioactive chemical (radionuclide) is injected into a vein or swallowed. Different radionuclides travel through the blood to different organs. A machine with a special camera moves over the person lying on a table and detects the type of radiation given off by the radionuclides. A computer forms an image of the areas where the radionuclide builds up. These areas may contain cancer cells. Also called radionuclide scanning.
scintimammography listen (SIN-tih-ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
A type of breast imaging test that is used to detect cancer cells in the breasts of some women who have had abnormal mammograms, or who have dense breast tissue. It is not used for screening or in place of a mammogram. In this test, a woman receives an injection of a small amount of a radioactive substance called technetium 99, which is taken up by cancer cells, and a gamma camera is used to take pictures of the breasts. Also called Miraluma test and sestamibi breast imaging.
sclera listen (SKLAYR-uh)
The white layer of the eye that covers most of the outside of the eyeball.
scleroderma listen (SKLAYR-oh-DER-muh)
A chronic disorder marked by hardening and thickening of the skin. Scleroderma can be localized or it can affect the entire body (systemic).
sclerosing adenosis listen (skleh-ROH-sing A-deh-NOH-sis)
A benign condition in which scar-like tissue is found in a gland, such as the breast lobules or the prostate. A biopsy may be needed to tell the difference between the abnormal tissue and cancer. Women with sclerosing adenosis of the breast may have a slightly increased risk of breast cancer.
sclerosing epithelioid fibrosarcoma listen (skleh-ROH-sing eh-pih-THEE-lee-oyd FY-broh-sar-KOH-muh)
A rare, type of cancer that forms in fibrous (connective) tissue. Sclerosing epithelioid fibrosarcoma is a slow growing tumor, but may recur (come back) and spread to other parts of the body many years after treatment. It usually occurs in middle-aged or older adults, and is rare in children and adolescents. Sclerosing epithelioid fibrosarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol listen (SKLAYR-oh-sol IN-truh-PLOOR-ul AYR-oh-sol)
A mineral, usually used in a powdered form. Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol is used to prevent malignant pleural effusions from coming back. Malignant pleural effusion is a condition in which cancer causes an abnormal collection of fluid in the space between the lung and chest wall. When Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol is inserted into the pleural space, it causes the space to close up so fluid cannot collect there. Also called sterile talc powder, Steritalc, and talc.
sclerotherapy listen (SKLAYR-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A treatment used to destroy abnormal blood vessels. A liquid is injected into a blood vessel, causing it to scar and break down. The blood flows through nearby healthy veins and the destroyed blood vessel is absorbed into normal tissue. Sclerotherapy is used to treat certain types of vascular tumors. It is also used to treat varicose and spider veins, hemorrhoids, and other blood vessel problems.
scoliosis listen (SKOH-lee-OH-sis)
A condition marked by a side-to-side curve of the backbone. The curve is usually shaped like an S or a C. In most cases, the cause of scoliosis is not known. In some cases, scoliosis may be present at birth or it may be caused by muscle spasms, inflammation, tumors, or certain other disorders. It may also occur at some point in time after radiation therapy to the backbone.
SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase listen (… as-PAYR-uh-jih-NAYS)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute lymphoblastic lymphoma in children and young adults aged 1 month to 21 years. SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase is a form of the drug L-asparaginase that is linked to a substance called SC-PEG, which makes the drug stay in the body longer. L-asparaginase is an enzyme taken from the bacterium Escherichia coli (E. coli). It breaks down the amino acid asparagine and may stop the growth of cancer cells that need asparagine to grow. SC-PEG E. coli L-asparaginase is a type of protein synthesis inhibitor. Also called Asparlas, calaspargase pegol, and EZN-2285.
screening listen (SKREE-ning)
Checking for disease when there are no symptoms. Since screening may find diseases at an early stage, there may be a better chance of curing the disease. Examples of cancer screening tests are the mammogram (for breast cancer), colonoscopy (for colon cancer), and the Pap test and HPV tests (for cervical cancer). Screening can also include doing a genetic test to check for a person’s risk of developing an inherited disease.
screening mammogram listen (SKREE-ning MA-muh-gram)
X-rays of the breasts taken to check for breast cancer in the absence of signs or symptoms.
scrotum listen (SKROH-tum)
In males, the external sac that contains the testicles.
Scutellaria barbata listen (skoo-tuh-LAYR-ee-uh bar-BAY-tuh)
An herb that belongs to a group of herbs named the Scutellaria species or scullcap. Both the root and the above-ground part have been used to make herbal medicines. The root has been used in traditional Chinese medicine to treat lung cancer and other medical problems.
SDR
An aunt, uncle, grandparent, grandchild, niece, nephew, or half-brother or -sister. Also called second-degree relative.
SDS
A rare, inherited disorder in which the pancreas and bone marrow do not work the way they should. Symptoms include problems digesting food, a low number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell), bone problems, and being short. Infants with the disorder get bacterial infections and are at an increased risk of aplastic anemia, myelodysplastic syndrome, and leukemia. Also called Shwachman syndrome and Shwachman-Diamond syndrome.
SDX-102
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites. Also called alanosine.
sebum listen (SEE-bum)
An oily substance produced by certain glands in the skin.
second opinion listen (SEH-kund uh-PIN-yun)
In medicine, the opinion of a doctor other than the patient’s current doctor. The second doctor reviews the patient’s medical records and gives an opinion about the patient’s health problem and how it should be treated. A second opinion may confirm or question the first doctor’s diagnosis and treatment plan, give more information about the patient’s disease or condition, and offer other treatment options.
second primary cancer listen (SEH-kund PRY-mayr-ee KAN-ser)
A term used to describe a new primary cancer that occurs in a person who has had cancer in the past. Second primary cancers may occur months or years after the original (primary) cancer was diagnosed and treated. Certain types of cancer treatment, such as chemotherapy and radiation therapy, may increase the risk of a second primary cancer. Having certain inherited gene mutations (changes) and being exposed to certain cancer-causing substances, such as tobacco smoke, may also increase the risk of a second primary cancer.
secondary cancer listen (SEH-kun-dayr-ee KAN-ser)
A term used to describe cancer that has spread (metastasized) from the place where it first started to another part of the body. Secondary cancers are the same type of cancer as the original (primary) cancer. For example, cancer cells may spread from the breast (primary cancer) to form new tumors in the lung (secondary cancer). The cancer cells in the lung are just like the ones in the breast. Also called secondary tumor.
secondary ovarian failure listen (SEH-kun-dayr-ee oh-VAYR-ee-un FAYL-yer)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. In secondary ovarian failure, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Secondary ovarian failure may also be caused by certain medicines, too much exercise, or certain eating disorders. Some women with secondary ovarian failure sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called secondary ovarian insufficiency.
secondary ovarian insufficiency listen (SEH-kun-dayr-ee oh-VAYR-ee-un IN-suh-FIH-shen-see)
A condition in which the ovaries stop working and menstrual periods stop before age 40. This can cause fertility problems and symptoms of menopause. In secondary ovarian insufficiency, the ovaries are normal but there is a problem getting hormone signals to them from the brain. This is usually caused by diseases of the pituitary gland or hypothalamus. Secondary ovarian insufficiency may also be caused by certain medicines, too much exercise, or certain eating disorders. Some women with secondary ovarian insufficiency sometimes have menstrual periods and may be able to have children. Also called secondary ovarian failure.
secondary tumor listen (SEH-kun-dayr-ee TOO-mer)
A term used to describe cancer that has spread (metastasized) from the place where it first started to another part of the body. Secondary tumors are the same type of cancer as the original (primary) cancer. For example, cancer cells may spread from the breast (primary cancer) to form new tumors in the lung (secondary tumor). The cancer cells in the lung are just like the ones in the breast. Also called secondary cancer.
second-degree relative listen (SEH-kund-deh-GREE REH-luh-tiv)
An aunt, uncle, grandparent, grandchild, niece, nephew, or half-brother or -sister. Also called SDR.
secondhand smoke listen (SEH-kund-hand ...)
Smoke that comes from the burning of a tobacco product and smoke that is exhaled by smokers. Inhaling secondhand smoke is called involuntary or passive smoking. Also called environmental tobacco smoke and ETS.
second-line therapy listen (SEH-kund ... THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given when initial treatment (first-line therapy) doesn’t work, or stops working.
second-look surgery listen (SEH-kund ... SER-juh-ree)
Surgery performed after primary treatment to determine whether tumor cells remain.
secrete listen (seh-KREET)
To form and release a substance. In the body, cells secrete substances, such as sweat that cools the body or hormones that act in other parts of the body.
secretin listen (seh-KREE-tin)
A hormone released into the blood by cells in the inner layer of the small intestine. It is released when partly digested food moves from the stomach into the small intestine. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release other substances that help digest food. Secretin may also be made in the laboratory.
secretin human listen (seh-KREE-tin HYOO-mun)
A drug used to help diagnose gastrinomas (tumors that cause too much gastric acid to be made) and other problems with the pancreas. It is also used to increase secretions from the pancreas and to help identify a duct called the ampulla of Vater. Secretin human is a form of secretin that is made in the laboratory. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release substances that help digest food. Also called ChiRhoStim and synthetic human secretin.
secretin stimulation test listen (seh-KREE-tin STIM-yoo-LAY-shun …)
A test used to measure the ability of the pancreas to respond to a hormone called secretin. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release substances that help digest food. During a secretin stimulation test, a tube is inserted through the nose or throat into the stomach and small intestine. Secretin is given to the patient by injection into a vein. After a certain amount of time, samples of fluid are taken from the small intestine through the tube and sent to a lab to test for a response. A secretin stimulation test may be used to help diagnose problems that affect the pancreas, such as pancreatitis, cystic fibrosis, and a type of pancreatic tumor called a gastrinoma. Also called pancreatic function test.
sedation listen (seh-DAY-shun)
A state of calmness, relaxation, or sleepiness caused by certain drugs. Sedation may be used to help relieve anxiety during medical or surgical procedures or to help cope with very stressful events. Drugs that relieve pain may be used at the same time.
sedative listen (SEH-duh-tiv)
A drug or substance used to calm a person down, relieve anxiety, or help a person sleep.
sedimentation rate listen (SEH-dih-men-TAY-shun rayt)
The distance red blood cells travel in one hour in a sample of blood as they settle to the bottom of a test tube. The sedimentation rate is increased in inflammation, infection, cancer, rheumatic diseases, and diseases of the blood and bone marrow. Also called erythrocyte sedimentation rate and ESR.
sedoxantrone trihydrochloride listen (seh-DOK-san-trone try-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Sedoxantrone trihydrochloride binds to DNA and stops cells, including cancer cells, from repairing damage to DNA and from making more DNA, RNA, and protein. It is a type of DNA intercalator. Also called CI-958.
SEGA listen
A benign (not cancer), slow-growing tumor that usually forms in the walls of fluid-filled spaces in the brain. The tumors are made up of large, star-shaped cells called astrocytes. SEGAs are common in patients with tuberous sclerosis (an inherited disorder in which benign tumors form in the brain and other parts of the body). Also called subependymal giant cell astrocytoma.
segmental cystectomy listen (seg-MEN-tul sis-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of the bladder (the organ that holds urine). Also called partial cystectomy.
segmental mastectomy listen (seg-MEN-tul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the cancer and some normal tissue around it, but not the breast itself. Some lymph nodes under the arm may be removed for biopsy. Part of the chest wall lining may also be removed if the cancer is near it. Also called breast-conserving surgery, breast-sparing surgery, lumpectomy, partial mastectomy, and quadrantectomy.
segmental resection listen (seg-MEN-tul ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove part of an organ or gland. It may also be used to remove a tumor and normal tissue around it. In lung cancer surgery, segmental resection refers to removing a section of a lobe of the lung. Also called segmentectomy.
segmentectomy listen (seg-men-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part of an organ or gland. It may also be used to remove a tumor and normal tissue around it. In lung cancer surgery, segmentectomy refers to removing a section of a lobe of the lung. Also called segmental resection.
seizure listen (SEE-zher)
Sudden, uncontrolled body movements and changes in behavior that occur because of abnormal electrical activity in the brain. Symptoms include loss of awareness, changes in emotion, loss of muscle control, and shaking. Seizures may be caused by drugs, high fevers, head injuries, and certain diseases, such as epilepsy.
selection bias listen (seh-LEK-shun BY-us)
An error in choosing the individuals or groups to take part in a study. Ideally, the subjects in a study should be very similar to one another and to the larger population from which they are drawn (for example, all individuals with the same disease or condition). If there are important differences, the results of the study may not be valid.
selective estrogen receptor modulator listen (seh-LEK-tiv ES-truh-jin reh-SEP-ter MAH-juh-lay-ter)
A drug that acts like estrogen on some tissues but blocks the effect of estrogen on other tissues. Tamoxifen and raloxifene are selective estrogen receptor modulators. Also called SERM.
selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor listen (seh-LEK-tiv SAYR-uh-TOH-nin ree-UP-tayk in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug that is used to treat depression. Selective serotonin reuptake inhibitors slow the process by which serotonin (a substance that nerves use to send messages to one another) is reused by nerve cells that make it. This increases the amount of serotonin available for stimulating other nerves. Also called SSRI.
selenium listen (seh-LEE-nee-um)
A mineral that is needed by the body to stay healthy. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Selenium is a type of antioxidant.
self-esteem listen (self-eh-STEEM)
A feeling of self-worth, self-confidence, and self-respect.
sella turcica listen (SEL-uh TER-sih-kuh)
A depression of the bone at the base of the skull where the pituitary gland is located.
selumetinib listen (SEL-yoo-MEH-tih-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Selumetinib blocks proteins needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of protein kinase inhibitor. Also called AZD6244 and MEK inhibitor AZD6244.
semaxanib listen (seh-MAK-suh-nib)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors and tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Also called SU5416.
semen listen (SEE-men)
The fluid that is released through the penis during orgasm. Semen is made up of sperm from the testicles and fluid from the prostate and other sex glands.
Se-methyl-seleno-L-cysteine listen (… MEH-thul-seh-LEE-noh-L-SIS-teh-een)
A substance that contains the element selenium (a nutrient that protects cells against damage) and is found in certain plants such as garlic and broccoli. Se-methyl-seleno-L-cysteine can act as an antioxidant and may help prevent or slow the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of amino acid.
seminal fluid listen (SEH-mih-nul FLOO-id)
Fluid from the prostate and other sex glands that helps transport sperm out of the man's body during orgasm. Seminal fluid contains sugar as an energy source for sperm.
seminal vesicle listen (SEH-mih-nul VEH-sih-kul)
A gland that helps produce semen.
seminal vesicle biopsy listen (SEH-mih-nul VEH-sih-kul BY-op-see)
The removal of fluid or tissue with a needle from the seminal vesicles for examination under a microscope. The seminal vesicles are glands in the male reproductive tract that produce a part of semen.
seminoma listen (SEH-mih-NOH-muh)
A type of cancer that begins in germ cells in males. Germ cells are cells that form sperm in males or eggs in females. Seminomas occur most often in the testicle, but they may also occur in other areas of the body, such as the brain, chest, or abdomen. Seminomas tend to grow and spread slowly. Some seminomas make a hormone called beta-human chorionic gonadotropin (beta-HCG) that may cause signs and symptoms of disease. Seminomas usually occur in young men.
semiparasitic listen (SEH-mee-PAYR-uh-SIH-tik)
In botany, a plant that gets food from a host but also contains chlorophyll and is capable of photosynthesis.
semustine listen (seh-MUS-teen)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Semustine damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent and a type of nitrosourea.
Seneca Valley virus-001 listen (SEH-nih-kuh VA-lee VY-rus…)
A virus being studied in the treatment of neuroendocrine tumors and other types of cancer. Neuroendocrine tumors form from cells that release hormones in response to a signal from the nervous system. The virus infects and breaks down these tumor cells but not normal cells. It is a type of oncolytic virus. Also called NTX-010 and SVV-001.
senega root listen (SEH-neh-guh root)
The root of an herb called Polygala senega. It has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including problems of the respiratory system.
senile keratosis listen (SEE-nile KAYR-uh-TOH-sis)
A thick, scaly patch of skin that may become cancer. It usually forms on areas exposed to the sun, such as the face, scalp, back of the hands, or chest. It is most common in people with fair skin. Also called actinic keratosis and solar keratosis.
senses listen (SENT-ses)
In medicine, the ways in which the body receives signals from the environment. The five human senses are sight, hearing, smell, taste, and touch. The body receives signals through the sense organs (the eyes, ears, nose, tongue, and skin). These organs have special nerves that send signals to the brain. The brain processes these signals and then sends information back to the rest of the body to tell it how to respond to the signal. Aging, certain diseases or conditions, and some types of medicines or treatments can affect the senses.
sensitivity listen (SEN-sih-TIH-vih-tee)
In medicine, sensitivity may describe how well a test can detect a specific disease or condition in people who actually have the disease or condition. No test has 100% sensitivity because some people who have the disease or condition will not be identified by the test (false-negative test result). Sensitivity may also refer to the way the body reacts to the environment or to drugs, chemicals, or other substances. For example, a person who is sensitive to the sun may have skin that burns easily or get a rash when exposed to the sun. A person who is sensitive to caffeine may need only small amounts of it to feel its effects.
sensor listen (SEN-sor)
A device that responds to a stimulus, such as heat, light, or pressure, and generates a signal that can be measured or interpreted.
Sensorcaine listen (SEN-sor-kane)
A drug used to relieve pain by blocking signals at nerve endings. It is being studied in the relief of pain following surgery for cancer. It is a type of local anesthetic. Also called bupivacaine hydrochloride and Marcaine.
sensory listen (SEN-sor-ee)
Having to do with the senses.
sentinel lymph node listen (SEN-tih-nul limf node)
The first lymph node to which cancer is likely to spread from the primary tumor. When cancer spreads, the cancer cells may appear first in the sentinel node before spreading to other lymph nodes.
sentinel lymph node biopsy listen (SEN-tih-nul limf node BY-op-see)
Removal and examination of the sentinel node(s) (the first lymph node(s) to which cancer cells are likely to spread from a primary tumor). To identify the sentinel lymph node(s), the surgeon injects a radioactive substance, blue dye, or both near the tumor. The surgeon then uses a probe to find the sentinel lymph node(s) containing the radioactive substance or looks for the lymph node(s) stained with dye. The surgeon then removes the sentinel node(s) to check for the presence of cancer cells.
sentinel lymph node mapping listen (SEN-tih-nul limf node MA-ping)
The use of dyes and radioactive substances to identify the first lymph node to which cancer is likely to spread from the primary tumor. Cancer cells may appear first in the sentinel node before spreading to other lymph nodes and other places in the body.
seocalcitol listen (see-oh-KAL-sih-tol)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called vitamin D analogs.
sepsis listen (SEP-sis)
The presence of bacteria or their toxins in the blood or tissues.
septate listen (SEP-tate)
An organ or structure that is divided into compartments.
septicemia listen (SEP-tih-SEE-mee-uh)
Disease caused by the spread of bacteria and their toxins in the bloodstream. Also called blood poisoning and toxemia.
sequential AC/Taxol-Trastuzumab regimen listen (see-KWEN-shul … TAK-sol-tras-TOO-zoo-mab REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin) and cyclophosphamide, followed by treatment with paclitaxel (Taxol) and trastuzumab (Herceptin). Also called AC-T-T, AC-T-T regimen, and AC-TH regimen.
sequential treatment listen (see-KWEN-shul TREET-ment)
One treatment after the other.
SERM listen
A drug that acts like estrogen on some tissues but blocks the effect of estrogen on other tissues. Tamoxifen and raloxifene are SERMs. Also called selective estrogen receptor modulator.
seroma listen (see-ROH-muh)
A mass or lump caused by a buildup of clear fluid in a tissue, organ, or body cavity. It usually goes away on its own but may need to be drained with a needle. It often occurs after breast surgery.
Seromycin listen (SAYR-oh-MY-sin)
A drug used to treat tuberculosis. It is also being studied in the treatment of pain and nerve problems (numbness, tingling) caused by chemotherapy and in the treatment of low back pain, autism, certain anxiety disorders, and schizophrenia. Seromycin is a type of antibiotic. Also called D-cycloserine.
serosa listen (seh-ROH-suh)
The outer lining of organs and body cavities of the abdomen and chest, including the stomach. Also called serous membrane.
serotonin listen (SAYR-uh-TOH-nin)
A hormone found in the brain, platelets, digestive tract, and pineal gland. It acts both as a neurotransmitter (a substance that nerves use to send messages to one another) and a vasoconstrictor (a substance that causes blood vessels to narrow). A lack of serotonin in the brain is thought to be a cause of depression. Also called 5-hydroxytryptamine.
serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor listen (sayr-uh-TOH-nin-NOR-eh-pih-NEH-frin ree-UP-tayk in-HIH-bih-ter)
A type of drug that is used to treat depression and certain other disorders. Serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitors increase the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain. Nerves use these chemicals to send messages to one another. Increasing their levels in the brain helps improve mood. Also called SNRI.
serous listen (SEER-us)
Having to do with serum, the clear liquid part of blood.
serous membrane listen (SEER-us MEM-brayn)
The outer lining of organs and body cavities of the abdomen and chest, including the stomach. Also called serosa.
Sertoli-Leydig cell tumor of the ovary listen (ser-TOH-lee-LY-dig sel TOO-mer ... OH-vuh-ree)
A rare type of ovarian tumor in which the tumor cells secrete a male sex hormone. This may cause virilization (the appearance of male physical characteristics in females). Also called androblastoma and arrhenoblastoma.
sertraline listen (SER-truh-leen)
A drug used to treat depression. It is a type of selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called Zoloft.
serum listen (SEER-um)
The clear liquid part of the blood that remains after blood cells and clotting proteins have been removed.
serum albumin listen (SEER-um al-BYOO-min)
The main protein in blood plasma. Low levels of serum albumin occur in people with malnutrition, inflammation, and serious liver and kidney disease.
serum glutamate pyruvate transaminase listen (SEER-um GLOO-tuh-mayt py-ROO-vayt tranz-A-mih-nays)
An enzyme found in the liver and other tissues. A high level of serum glutamate pyruvate transaminase released into the blood may be a sign of liver damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called alanine transferase and SGPT.
serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase listen (SEER-um gloo-TA-mik-ok-SA-loh-uh-SEE-tik tranz-A-mih-nays)
An enzyme found in the liver, heart, and other tissues. A high level of serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase released into the blood may be a sign of liver or heart damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called aspartate transaminase and SGOT.
serum tumor marker test listen (SEER-um TOO-mer MAR-ker ...)
A blood test that measures the amount of substances called tumor markers (or biomarkers). Tumor markers are released into the blood by tumor cells or by other cells in response to tumor cells. A high level of a tumor marker may be a sign of cancer.
Serzone listen (SER-zone)
A drug used to treat depression. It belongs to the family of drugs called antidepressant agents. Also called nefazodone.
sesquiterpene lactone listen (SES-kwih-TER-peen LAK-tone)
A substance found in some plants. Sesquiterpene lactones may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. Plants containing sesquiterpene lactones have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems.
sestamibi breast imaging listen (SES-tuh-MIH-bee brest IH-muh-jing)
A type of breast imaging test that is used to detect cancer cells in the breasts of some women who have had abnormal mammograms, or who have dense breast tissue. It is not used for screening or in place of a mammogram. In this test, a woman receives an injection of a small amount of a radioactive substance called technetium 99, which is taken up by cancer cells, and a gamma camera is used to take pictures of the breasts. Also called Miraluma test and scintimammography.
sestamibi scan listen (SES-tuh-MIH-bee...)
An imaging test used to find overactive parathyroid glands (four pea-sized glands found on the thyroid) and breast cancer cells, and to diagnose heart disease. The patient receives an injection of a small amount of a radioactive substance called technetium which is bound to another substance called sestamibi. This substance collects in overactive glands, cancer cells, heart muscle, or other tissues and a picture is taken by a gamma camera (a special camera that detects radioactivity).
severe combined immunodeficiency disease listen (seh-VEER kum-BIND IH-myoo-noh-deh-FIH-shun-see dih-ZEEZ)
A rare, inherited disease that is marked by a lack of B lymphocytes (white blood cells that make antibodies and help fight infections) and a lack of T lymphocytes (white blood cells that attack virus-infected cells, foreign cells, and cancer cells). Patients with this disease have a high risk of developing viral, bacterial, and fungal infections. Also called SCID.
severe myelosuppression listen (... MY-eh-loh-suh-PREH-shun)
A severe form of myelosuppression. Myelosuppression is a condition in which bone marrow activity is decreased, resulting in fewer red blood cells, white blood cells, and platelets. It is a side effect of some cancer treatments. Also called myeloablation.
sex cord tumor listen (… kord TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the tissues that support the ovaries or testes. These tumors may release sex hormones. Sex cord tumors include granulosa cell, Sertoli cell, and Leydig cell tumors. Also called sex cord-gonadal stromal tumor and sex cord-stromal tumor.
sex cord-gonadal stromal tumor listen (… kord-goh-NA-dul STROH-mul TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the tissues that support the ovaries or testes. These tumors may release sex hormones. Sex cord-gonadal stromal tumors include granulosa cell, Sertoli cell, and Leydig cell tumors. Also called sex cord tumor and sex cord-stromal tumor.
sex cord-stromal tumor listen (… kord-STROH-mul TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that forms in the tissues that support the ovaries or testes. These tumors may release sex hormones. Sex cord-stromal tumors include granulosa cell, Sertoli cell, and Leydig cell tumors. Also called sex cord tumor and sex cord-gonadal stromal tumor.
sex drive listen (sex drive)
The need for sex. Also called sexual drive.
sexual drive listen (SEK-shoo-ul …)
The need for sex. Also called sex drive.
sexuality listen (SEK-shoo-A-lih-tee)
A person's behaviors, desires, and attitudes related to sex and physical intimacy with others.
Sezary syndrome listen (say-zah-REE SIN-drome)
A cancer that affects the skin. It is a form of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma.
SGN-00101
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called fusion proteins.
SGN-30
A monoclonal antibody that binds to cells that have the CD30 antigen on their surface, including Hodgkin disease cells and cells from anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. SGN-30 is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
SGN-35
A drug used with other anticancer drugs to treat systemic anaplastic large cell lymphoma or other peripheral T-cell lymphomas, including angioimmunoblastic T-cell lymphoma, that are CD30 positive and have not been treated with other therapy. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat stage III or stage IV classical Hodgkin lymphoma that has not been treated with other therapy. SGN-35 is also used to treat certain types of Hodgkin lymphoma, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and mycosis fungoides that were treated with other therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. SGN-35 contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD30, which is found on some lymphoma cells. It also contains an anticancer drug, which may help kill cancer cells. SGN-35 is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called Adcetris and brentuximab vedotin.
SGN-40
A monoclonal antibody that binds to cells that have the CD40 antigen on their surface, including cells from multiple myeloma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, and chronic lymphocytic leukemia. SGN-40 is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
SGOT
An enzyme found in the liver, heart, and other tissues. A high level of SGOT released into the blood may be a sign of liver or heart damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called aspartate transaminase and serum glutamic-oxaloacetic transaminase.
SGPT
An enzyme found in the liver and other tissues. A high level of SGPT released into the blood may be a sign of liver damage, cancer, or other diseases. Also called alanine transferase and serum glutamate pyruvate transaminase.
sham therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
An inactive treatment or procedure that is intended to mimic as closely as possible a therapy in a clinical trial. Also called placebo therapy.
shave biopsy listen (shayv BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a skin abnormality and a thin layer of surrounding skin are removed with a small blade for examination under a microscope. Stitches are not needed with this procedure.
sheep sorrel listen (sheep SOR-ul)
A plant that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rumex acetosella. Also called dock and sorrel.
Sheridan’s Formula listen (SHAYR-ih-dunz FOR-myoo-luh)
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in Sheridan’s Formula have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. Sheridan’s Formula is not available in the United States. Also called 126–F, Cancell, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, JS–114, and Protocel.
shiitake mushroom listen (shee-TAH-kee ...)
A dark oriental mushroom widely used as a food. Several anticancer substances have been found in shiitake mushrooms, including lentinan, which has been studied in Japan as a treatment for stomach and colorectal cancer. The scientific name is Lentinus edodes.
shinbone listen (SHIN-bone)
The larger of two bones between the knee and ankle. Also called tibia.
short-term side effect listen (... eh-FEKT)
A problem that is caused by treatment of a disease but usually goes away after treatment ends. Short-term side effects of cancer treatment include nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, hair loss, fatigue, and mouth sores.
Sho-saiko-to listen (shoh-sah-ee-koh-toh)
A Japanese formulation of seven Chinese herbs that is being studied as a treatment for cancer.
shoulder blade listen (SHOLE-der blayd)
One of a pair of triangular bones at the back of the shoulder. The shoulder blade connects the collarbone with the upper arm bone. Also called scapula.
shunt listen (shunt)
In medicine, a passage that is made to allow blood or other fluid to move from one part of the body to another. For example, a surgeon may implant a tube to drain cerebrospinal fluid from the brain to the abdomen. A surgeon may also change normal blood flow by making a passage that leads from one blood vessel to another.
Shwachman syndrome listen (SHWAK-mun SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which the pancreas and bone marrow do not work the way they should. Symptoms include problems digesting food, a low number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell), bone problems, and being short. Infants with the disorder get bacterial infections and are at an increased risk of aplastic anemia, myelodysplastic syndrome, and leukemia. Also called SDS and Shwachman-Diamond syndrome.
Shwachman-Diamond syndrome listen (SHWAK-mun-DY-mund SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which the pancreas and bone marrow do not work the way they should. Symptoms include problems digesting food, a low number of neutrophils (a type of white blood cell), bone problems, and being short. Infants with the disorder get bacterial infections and are at an increased risk of aplastic anemia, myelodysplastic syndrome, and leukemia. Also called SDS and Shwachman syndrome.
sialic acid listen (sy-A-lik A-sid)
Any of a group of simple sugar molecules.
sialyl Tn-KLH listen (sy-A-lil ...)
A vaccine composed of a substance that enhances immunity plus an antigen found on some tumors of the colon, breast, lung, ovary, pancreas, and stomach.
sibling listen (SIB-ling)
A person’s brother or sister who has the same parents.
sickle cell anemia listen (SIH-kul sel uh-NEE-mee-uh)
An inherited disease in which the red blood cells have an abnormal crescent shape, block small blood vessels, and do not last as long as normal red blood cells. Sickle cell anemia is caused by a mutation (change) in one of the genes for hemoglobin (the substance inside red blood cells that binds to oxygen and carries it from the lungs to the tissues). It is most common in people of West and Central African descent. Also called sickle cell disease.
sickle cell disease listen (SIH-kul sel dih-ZEEZ)
An inherited disease in which the red blood cells have an abnormal crescent shape, block small blood vessels, and do not last as long as normal red blood cells. Sickle cell disease is caused by a mutation (change) in one of the genes for hemoglobin (the substance inside red blood cells that binds to oxygen and carries it from the lungs to the tissues). It is most common in people of West and Central African descent. Also called sickle cell anemia.
side effect listen (side eh-FEKT)
A problem that occurs when treatment affects healthy tissues or organs. Some common side effects of cancer treatment are nausea, vomiting, fatigue, pain, decreased blood cell counts, hair loss, and mouth sores.
sideropenic dysphagia listen (SIH-der-oh-PEE-nik dis-FAY-jee-uh)
A disorder marked by anemia caused by iron deficiency, and a web-like growth of membranes in the throat that makes swallowing difficult. Having sideropenic dysphagia may increase the risk of developing esophageal cancer. Also called Paterson-Kelly syndrome and Plummer-Vinson syndrome.
sidestream smoke listen (SIDE-streem …)
Smoke that comes from the lighted end of a burning tobacco product, such as a cigarette, pipe, or cigar. Sidestream smoke can be a form of secondhand smoke. It contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Inhaling sidestream smoke increases the risk of lung cancer and may increase the risk of other types of cancer. Inhaling it also increases the risk of other health problems, such as heart disease and lung disease.
side-to-end coloanal anastomosis listen (... KOH-loh-AY-nul uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A surgical procedure in which the side of the colon is attached to the anus after the rectum has been removed. A section of the colon about 2 inches long is formed into a mini-pouch in order to replace the function of the rectum and store stool until it can be eliminated. This procedure is similar to the J-pouch coloanal anastomosis but a much smaller pouch is formed.
SIDS listen
A disorder marked by the sudden and unexpected death of a healthy child who is younger than one year old, usually during sleep. The cause of SIDS is not known. Also called crib death and sudden infant death syndrome.
sigmoid colon listen (SIG-moyd KOH-lun)
The S-shaped section of the colon that connects to the rectum.
sigmoidoscope listen (sig-MOY-doh-skope)
A thin, tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the colon. A sigmoidoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have a tool to remove tissue.
sigmoidoscopy listen (sig-MOY-DOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the lower colon using a sigmoidoscope, inserted into the rectum. A sigmoidoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called proctosigmoidoscopy.
sign listen
In medicine, a sign is something found during a physical exam or from a laboratory test that shows that a person may have a condition or disease. Some examples of signs are fever, swelling, skin rash, high blood pressure, and high blood glucose.
signal transduction listen (SIG-nul tranz-DUK-shun)
The process by which a cell responds to substances in its environment. The binding of a substance to a molecule on the surface of a cell causes signals to be passed from one molecule to another inside the cell. These signals can affect many functions of the cell, including cell division and cell death. Cells that have permanent changes in signal transduction molecules may develop into cancer.
signal transduction inhibitor listen (SIG-nul tranz-DUK-shun in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks signals passed from one molecule to another inside a cell. Blocking these signals can affect many functions of the cell, including cell division and cell death, and may kill cancer cells. Certain signal transduction inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
signaling pathway listen (SIG-nuh-ling …)
Describes a group of molecules in a cell that work together to control one or more cell functions, such as cell division or cell death. After the first molecule in a pathway receives a signal, it activates another molecule. This process is repeated until the last molecule is activated and the cell function is carried out. Abnormal activation of signaling pathways can lead to cancer, and drugs are being developed to block these pathways. These drugs may help block cancer cell growth and kill cancer cells.
signature molecule listen (SIG-nuh-cher MAH-leh-kyool)
A biological molecule found in blood, other body fluids, or tissues that is a sign of a normal or abnormal process, or of a condition or disease. A signature molecule may be used to see how well the body responds to a treatment for a disease or condition. Also called biomarker and molecular marker.
signet ring cell carcinoma listen (SIG-nut ... sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A highly malignant type of cancer typically found in glandular cells that line the digestive organs. The cells resemble signet rings when examined under a microscope.
significant listen (sig-NIH-fih-kunt)
In statistics, describes a mathematical measure of difference between groups. The difference is said to be significant if it is greater than what might be expected to happen by chance alone. Also called statistically significant.
SIL
A general term for the abnormal growth of squamous cells on the surface of the cervix. The changes in the cells are described as low grade or high grade, depending on how much of the cervix is affected and how abnormal the cells appear. Also called squamous intraepithelial lesion.
sildenafil listen (sil-DEH-nuh-FIL)
A drug used to treat erectile dysfunction. Sildenafil relaxes the smooth muscle of the penis to allow increased blood flow and erection. It is a type of phosphodiesterase inhibitor. Also called Viagra.
silicon phthalocyanine 4 listen (SIH-lih-kon THA-loh-SY-uh-NEEN …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, it becomes active and kills the cancer cells. It is a type of photodynamic therapy agent.
silicone listen (SIH-lih-kone)
A synthetic gel that is used as an outer coating on breast implants and as the inside filling of some implants.
siltuximab listen (sil-TUK-sih-mab)
A drug used to treat a rare condition called Castleman disease in patients who do not have HIV or human herpesvirus 8. It is also being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. Siltuximab binds to a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by some white blood cells and other cells in the body. Siltuximab may help reduce inflammation and stop the growth of cancer cells or abnormal blood cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody, cCLB8, CNTO 328, and Sylvant.
Silybum marianum listen (SIH-lih-bum mayr-ee-AY-num)
A plant that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, including stomach, liver, and gallbladder disorders. The active extract of Silybum marianum seeds is called silymarin. It is being studied in the prevention of liver damage caused by some cancer treatments. Also called milk thistle.
silymarin listen (SIH-lih-MAYR-in)
A substance obtained from milk thistle seeds that is being studied in the prevention of liver damage caused by certain cancer treatments.
simian virus 40 listen (SIH-mee-un VY-rus…)
A virus that infects some types of monkeys. It may also infect humans, and was found in some polio vaccines tested in the early 1960s. Although the virus has been shown to cause cancer in laboratory animals, there is no evidence that it causes cancer in people. Also called SV40.
simple mastectomy listen (SIM-pul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the whole breast. Some of the lymph nodes under the arm may also be removed. Also called total mastectomy.
simple nephrectomy listen (SIM-pul neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove one kidney.
simple vulvectomy listen (SIM-pul vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina).
simulation listen (SIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
In cancer treatment, a process used to plan radiation therapy so that the target area is precisely located and marked.
simvastatin listen (SIM-vuh-STA-tin)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol and other harmful substances in the blood, such as triglycerides. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. Simvastatin blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called Zocor.
single nucleotide polymorphism listen (SING-gul NOO-klee-oh-tide PAH-lee-MOR-fih-zum)
The most common type of change in DNA (molecules inside cells that carry genetic information). Single nucleotide polymorphisms occur when a single nucleotide (building block of DNA) is replaced with another. These changes may cause disease, and may affect how a person reacts to bacteria, viruses, drugs, and other substances. Also called SNP.
single-blind study listen (SING-gul-blind STUH-dee)
A type of clinical trial in which only the researcher doing the study knows which treatment or intervention the participant is receiving until the trial is over. A single-blind study makes results of the study less likely to be biased. This means that the results are less likely to be affected by factors that are not related to the treatment or intervention being tested.
single-photon emission computed tomography listen (SIN-gul-FOH-ton ee-MIH-shun kum-PYOO-ted toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A special type of computed tomography (CT) scan in which a small amount of a radioactive drug is injected into a vein and a scanner is used to make detailed images of areas inside the body where the radioactive material is taken up by the cells. Single-photon emission computed tomography can give information about blood flow to tissues and chemical reactions (metabolism) in the body. Also called SPECT.
Singulair listen (SING-yoo-layr)
A drug used to treat symptoms of asthma, such as trouble breathing, tight chest, wheezing, coughing, and runny nose. Singulair blocks the action of a substance that causes airways in the lungs to narrow and causes other symptoms of asthma. It is a type of leukotriene receptor antagonist and a type of antiasthmatic agent. Also called montelukast sodium.
sinus listen (SY-nus)
A cavity, space, or channel in the body. Examples include hollow spaces in the bones at the front of the skull, and channels for blood and lymph. Sinuses may also be found in the heart, brain, kidney, and other organs.
sinusoidal obstruction syndrome listen (SINE-yoo-SOY-dul ub-STRUK-shun SIN-drome)
A condition in which some of the veins in the liver are blocked. This causes a decrease in blood flow inside the liver and may lead to liver damage. Signs and symptoms include weight gain, yellowing of the skin and whites of the eyes, dark-colored urine, and increased liver size. It may occur at some point in time after radiation therapy to the liver and bile ducts or after high-dose anticancer drugs were given before a stem cell transplant. Also called hepatic veno-occlusive disease.
siplizumab listen (sip-LIH-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of T-cell lymphoma. It is also being studied in the prevention of organ or tissue rejection after a kidney and/or bone marrow transplant. Siplizumab binds to a protein called CD2, which is found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. Siplizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called MEDI-507.
Sipple syndrome listen (SIH-pul SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that affects the endocrine glands and causes a type of thyroid cancer called medullary thyroid cancer, pheochromocytoma, and parathyroid gland cancer. It may also cause benign (noncancerous) tumors in the parathyroid glands and adrenal glands. The affected endocrine glands may make high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems such as high blood pressure and kidney stones. An itchy skin condition may also occur. Sipple syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene called RET. Also called MEN2A, MEN2A syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis type 2A, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 2A syndrome.
sipuleucel-T listen (SY-puh-LOO-sel...)
A vaccine used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who have few or no symptoms and whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Sipuleucel-T is made from a patient’s immune cells that have been treated in the laboratory with GM-CSF (a type of growth factor) and a protein found on prostate cancer cells. Sipuleucel-T may help the immune system kill prostate cancer cells. It is a type of cellular adoptive immunotherapy. Also called APC8015 and Provenge.
sirolimus listen (sih-ROH-lih-mus)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting organ and bone marrow transplants. Sirolimus blocks certain white blood cells that can reject foreign tissues and organs. It also blocks a protein that is involved in cell division. It is a type of antibiotic, a type of immunosuppressant, and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Sirolimus was previously called rapamycin. Also called Rapamune.
SIRS
A serious condition in which there is inflammation throughout the whole body. It may be caused by a severe bacterial infection (sepsis), trauma, or pancreatitis. It is marked by fast heart rate, low blood pressure, low or high body temperature, and low or high white blood cell count. The condition may lead to multiple organ failure and shock. Also called systemic inflammatory response syndrome.
SJG-136
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called DNA cross-linking agents.
Sjögren syndrome listen (SHOH-grin SIN-drome)
An autoimmune disease that affects the tear glands and salivary glands, and may affect glands in the stomach, pancreas, and intestines. The disease causes dry eyes and mouth, and may cause dryness in the nose, throat, air passages, skin, and vagina. It may also cause inflammation in the joints, muscles, and skin; pneumonia; tingling in the fingers and toes; and fatigue. It often occurs with rheumatoid arthritis or other connective tissue diseases.
SK&F106615
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain multiple myelomas and other advanced cancers. SK&F106615 may block the growth of tumors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. SK&F106615 is a type of signal transduction inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called atiprimod and azaspirane.
skeletal listen (SKEH-leh-tul)
Having to do with the skeleton (bones of the body).
skeleton listen (SKEH-leh-tun)
The framework that supports the soft tissues of vertebrate animals and protects many of their internal organs. The skeletons of vertebrates are made of bone and/or cartilage.
skin cancer listen (skin KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the skin. There are several types of skin cancer. Skin cancer that forms in melanocytes (skin cells that make pigment) is called melanoma. Skin cancer that forms in the lower part of the epidermis (the outer layer of the skin) is called basal cell carcinoma. Skin cancer that forms in squamous cells (flat cells that form the surface of the skin) is called squamous cell carcinoma. Skin cancer that forms in neuroendocrine cells (cells that release hormones in response to signals from the nervous system) is called neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin. Most skin cancers form in older people on parts of the body exposed to the sun or in people who have weakened immune systems.
skin conduction listen (... kun-DUK-shun)
A change in the heat and electricity passed through the skin by nerves and sweat. Skin conduction increases in certain emotional states and during hot flashes that happen with menopause. Also called electrodermal response and galvanic skin response.
skin graft listen (skin graft)
Skin that is moved from one part of the body to another.
skin patch listen (skin pach)
A bandage-like patch that releases medicine into the body through the skin. The medicine enters the blood slowly and steadily.
skin stimulation listen (skin STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
The process of applying pressure, friction, temperature change, or chemical substances to the skin to lessen or block a feeling of pain.
skin test listen (skin test)
A test for an immune response to a compound by placing it on or under the skin.
skin vesicle listen (… VEH-sih-kul)
A fluid-filled sac in the outer layer of skin. It can be caused by rubbing, heat, or diseases of the skin. Also called blister.
skinning vulvectomy listen (SKIH-ning vul-VEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the top layer of skin of the vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina). A skin graft may be used to replace the skin that was removed.
skull listen (skul)
The bones that form the head. The skull is made up of cranial bones (bones that surround and protect the brain) and facial bones (bones that form the eye sockets, nose, cheeks, jaw, and other parts of the face). An opening at the base of the skull is where the spinal cord connects to the brain. Also called cranium.
SL-11047
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of lymphoma. It belongs to the family of drugs called polyamine analogs.
SLE
A chronic, inflammatory, connective tissue disease that can affect many organs including the joints, skin, heart, lungs, kidneys, and nervous system. It is marked by many different symptoms; however, not everyone with SLE has all of the symptoms. Also called lupus and systemic lupus erythematosus.
sleep apnea listen (… AP-nee-uh)
A sleep disorder that is marked by pauses in breathing of 10 seconds or more during sleep, and causes unrestful sleep. Symptoms include loud or abnormal snoring, daytime sleepiness, irritability, and depression.
sleep disorder listen (sleep dis-OR-der)
A disturbance of normal sleep patterns. There are a number of sleep disorders that range from trouble falling asleep, to nightmares, sleepwalking, and sleep apnea (problems with breathing that cause loud snoring). Poor sleep may also be caused by diseases such as heart disease, lung disease, or nerve disorders.
sleep stage listen (sleep stayj)
One of 5 parts or stages of the sleep cycle based on the type of brain activity that occurs during the stage. During stages 1 to 4, a person will feel drowsy, fall asleep, and move into a deep, dreamless sleep. Stage 5 is called rapid eye movement (REM) sleep, and it is during this stage that dreams occur. During several hours of normal sleep, a person will go through several sleep cycles that include REM sleep and the 4 stages of non-REM sleep (light to deep sleep).
sleeve lobectomy listen (...loh-BEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a lung tumor in a lobe of the lung and a part of the main bronchus (airway). The ends of the bronchus are rejoined and any remaining lobes are reattached to the bronchus. This surgery is done to save part of the lung. Also called sleeve resection.
sleeve resection listen (...ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove a lung tumor in a lobe of the lung and a part of the main bronchus (airway). The ends of the bronchus are rejoined and any remaining lobes are reattached to the bronchus. This surgery is done to save part of the lung. Also called sleeve lobectomy.
slippery elm listen (SLIH-puh-ree elm)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, Indian elm, red elm, sweet elm, Ulmus fulva, and Ulmus rubra.
slit-lamp biomicroscopy listen (… BY-oh-my-KROS-koh-pee)
An eye exam using an instrument that combines a low-power microscope with a light source that makes a narrow beam of light. The instrument may be used to examine the retina, optic nerve, and other parts of the eye. Also called slit-lamp eye exam.
slit-lamp eye exam listen (... I eg-ZAM)
An eye exam using an instrument that combines a low-power microscope with a light source that makes a narrow beam of light. The instrument may be used to examine the retina, optic nerve, and other parts of the eye. Also called slit-lamp biomicroscopy.
SLL
An indolent (slow-growing) type of lymphoma in which too many immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found mostly in the lymph nodes. This causes the lymph nodes to become larger than normal. Sometimes cancer cells are found in the blood and bone marrow, and the disease is called chronic lymphocytic leukemia. The disease is most often seen in people older than 50 years. SLL is a type of non-Hodgkin Lymphoma. Also called small lymphocytic lymphoma and well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma.
SM-AHN
A rare condition in which too many mast cells (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs in the body, including the bone marrow, lymph nodes, bone, liver, spleen, and small intestine, and may damage them. In SM-AHN, this mast cell buildup occurs together with another blood disorder, usually a myelodysplastic syndrome, myeloproliferative disorder, or acute myeloid leukemia (AML). SM-AHN usually occurs in adults. Also called systemic mastocytosis with associated hematologic neoplasm.
small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
An aggressive (fast-growing) cancer that forms in tissues of the lung and can spread to other parts of the body. The cancer cells look small and oval-shaped when looked at under a microscope.
small intestine listen (... in-TES-tin)
A long tube-like organ that connects the stomach and the large intestine. It is about 20 feet long and folds many times to fit inside the abdomen. The small intestine has three parts: the duodenum, jejunum, and ileum. It helps to further digest food coming from the stomach. It absorbs nutrients (vitamins, minerals, carbohydrates, fats, proteins) and water from food so they can be used by the body. The small intestine is part of the digestive system.
small intestine cancer listen (... in-TES-tin KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in tissues of the small intestine (the part of the digestive tract between the stomach and the large intestine). The most common type is adenocarcinoma (cancer that begins in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids). Other types of small intestine cancer include sarcoma (cancer that begins in connective or supportive tissue), carcinoid tumor (a slow-growing type of cancer), gastrointestinal stromal tumor (a type of soft tissue sarcoma), and lymphoma (cancer that begins in immune system cells).
small lymphocytic lymphoma listen (... LIM-foh-SIH-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of lymphoma in which too many immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found mostly in the lymph nodes. This causes the lymph nodes to become larger than normal. Sometimes cancer cells are found in the blood and bone marrow, and the disease is called chronic lymphocytic leukemia. The disease is most often seen in people older than 50 years. Small lymphocytic lymphoma is a type of non-Hodgkin Lymphoma. Also called SLL and well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma.
small-molecule drug listen (… MAH-leh-kyool ...)
A substance that is able to enter cells easily because it has a low molecular weight. Once inside the cells, it can affect other molecules, such as proteins, and may cause cancer cells to die. This is different from drugs that have a large molecular weight, such as monoclonal antibodies, which are not able to get inside cells very easily. Many targeted therapies are small-molecule drugs or small molecule inhibitors.
smokeless tobacco listen (SMOKE-les tuh-BA-koh)
A type of tobacco that is not smoked or burned. It may be used as chewing tobacco or moist snuff, or inhaled through the nose as dry snuff. Smokeless tobacco contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, esophagus, and pancreas. It may also cause heart disease, gum disease, and other health problems.
smoking cessation listen (SMOH-king seh-SAY-shun)
To quit smoking. Smoking cessation lowers the risk of cancer and other serious health problems. Counseling, behavior therapy, medicines, and nicotine-containing products, such as nicotine patches, gum, lozenges, inhalers, and nasal sprays, may be used to help a person quit smoking.
smoldering myeloma listen (SMOLE-der-ing MY-eh-LOH-muh)
A very slow-growing type of myeloma in which abnormal plasma cells (a type of white blood cell) make too much of a single type of monoclonal antibody (a protein). This protein builds up in the blood or is passed in the urine. Patients with smoldering myeloma usually have no symptoms, but need to be checked often for signs of progression to fully developed multiple myeloma.
SN-38 liposome listen (... LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug irinotecan that is contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than irinotecan alone. SN-38 liposome is being studied in the treatment of advanced colorectal cancer and other types of cancer. SN-38 liposome blocks the ability of cells to divide and grow. It may stop the growth of tumor cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of irinotecan (CPT-11) derivative. Also called liposomal SN-38.
SNDX-275
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor. Also called entinostat and HDAC inhibitor SNDX-275.
SnET2
An anticancer drug that is also used in cancer prevention. It belongs to the family of drugs called photosensitizing agents. Also called tin ethyl etiopurpurin.
SNP listen (snip)
The most common type of change in DNA (molecules inside cells that carry genetic information). SNPs occur when a single nucleotide (building block of DNA) is replaced with another. These changes may cause disease, and may affect how a person reacts to bacteria, viruses, drugs, and other substances. Also called single nucleotide polymorphism.
SNRI
A type of drug that is used to treat depression and certain other disorders. SNRIs increase the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain. Nerves use these chemicals to send messages to one another. Increasing their levels in the brain helps improve mood. Also called serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor.
snuff tobacco listen (… tuh-BA-koh)
A type of smokeless tobacco that is made of finely ground or shredded tobacco leaves. It may have different scents and flavors and may be moist or dry. Moist snuff tobacco is placed in the mouth, usually between the cheek and gum or behind the upper or lower lip. Dry snuff tobacco is inhaled through the nose. Snuff tobacco contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, esophagus, and pancreas. Snuff tobacco use may also cause gum disease, heart disease, stroke, and other health problems. Using snuff tobacco is also called “dipping.”
SNX 111
A drug used in the treatment of chronic pain. Also called Prialt and ziconotide.
SNX-5422
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. SNX-5422 blocks a protein needed for cells to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of heat shock protein 90 inhibitor.
SNX-5422 mesylate listen (…MEH-zih-layt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. SNX-5422 mesylate blocks a protein needed for cells to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of heat shock protein 90 inhibitor.
soblidotin listen (soh-blih-DOH-tin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of tubulin inhibitor. Also called TZT-1027.
social service listen (SOH-shul SER-vis)
A community resource that helps people in need. Services may include help getting to and from medical appointments, home delivery of medication and meals, in-home nursing care, help paying medical costs not covered by insurance, loaning medical equipment, and housekeeping help.
social support listen (SOH-shul suh-PORT)
A network of family, friends, neighbors, and community members that is available in times of need to give psychological, physical, and financial help.
social worker listen (SOH-shul WUR-ker)
A professional trained to talk with people and their families about emotional or physical needs, and to find them support services.
SOD1 inhibitor ATN-224 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. SOD1 inhibitor ATN-224 also blocks enzymes that cells need to divide and grow, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of superoxide dismutase inhibitor. Also called ATN-224.
sodium listen (SOH-dee-um)
A mineral needed by the body to keep body fluids in balance. Sodium is found in table salt and in many processed foods. Too much sodium can cause the body to retain water.
sodium borocaptate listen (SOH-dee-um BORE-oh-KAP-tayt)
A substance used in a type of radiation therapy called boron neutron capture therapy. Sodium borocaptate is injected into a vein and becomes concentrated in tumor cells. The patient then receives radiation treatment with atomic particles called neutrons. The neutrons react with the boron in sodium borocaptate and make radioactive particles that kill the tumor cells without harming normal cells. Also called BSH.
sodium ferric gluconate listen (SOH-dee-um FAYR-ik GLOO-koh-nayt)
A form of the mineral iron that is used to treat anemia caused by low amounts of iron in the blood. Anemia is a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal. Sodium ferric gluconate is a type of hematinic and a dietary supplement. Also called Ferrlecit.
sodium salicylate listen (SOH-dee-um suh-LIH-sih-LAYT)
A drug that is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug. Sodium salicylate may be tolerated by people who are sensitive to aspirin.
sodium stibogluconate listen (SOH-dee-um stih-boh-GLOO-koh-nayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain solid tumors, lymphoma, and myeloma. Sodium stibogluconate may block enzymes needed for cancer growth. It is a type of pentavalent antimonial. Also called SSG.
sodium sulfite listen (SOH-dee-um SUL-fite)
A chemical used in photography, paper making, water treatment, and for other purposes.
sodium thiosulfate listen (SOH-dee-um THY-oh-SUL-fayt)
A substance that is used in medicine as an antidote to cyanide poisoning and to decrease side effects of the anticancer drug cisplatin.
soft diet listen (soft DY-et)
A diet consisting of bland foods that are softened by cooking, mashing, pureeing, or blending.
soft palate listen (... PAL-et)
The back, muscular (not bony) part of the roof of the mouth.
soft tissue listen (... TIH-shoo)
Refers to muscle, fat, fibrous tissue, blood vessels, or other supporting tissue of the body.
soft tissue sarcoma listen (…TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh)
A cancer that begins in the muscle, fat, fibrous tissue, blood vessels, or other supporting tissue of the body.
solar keratosis listen (SOH-ler KAYR-uh-TOH-sis)
A thick, scaly patch of skin that may become cancer. It usually forms on areas exposed to the sun, such as the face, scalp, back of the hands, or chest. It is most common in people with fair skin. Also called actinic keratosis and senile keratosis.
solid tumor listen (SAH-lid TOO-mer)
An abnormal mass of tissue that usually does not contain cysts or liquid areas. Solid tumors may be benign (not cancer), or malignant (cancer). Different types of solid tumors are named for the type of cells that form them. Examples of solid tumors are sarcomas, carcinomas, and lymphomas. Leukemias (cancers of the blood) generally do not form solid tumors.
Soliris listen (soh-LAYR-is)
A drug used to prevent red blood cells from being destroyed in patients with a rare red blood cell disorder called paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH). It is also used to treat another rare disorder called atypical hemolytic urea syndrome (aHUS), in which blood clots form in small blood vessels. Soliris binds to an immune system protein called C5. This helps keep red blood cells from breaking down and helps keep blood clots from forming. Soliris is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called eculizumab.
soluble listen (SOL-yoo-bul)
Able to be dissolved in a liquid.
solvent listen (SOL-vent)
A liquid that is able to dissolve a solid.
somatic listen (soh-MA-tik)
Having to do with the body.
somatic cell listen (soh-MA-tik ...)
Any of the body cells except the reproductive (germ) cells.
somatic mutation listen (soh-MA-tik myoo-TAY-shun)
An alteration in DNA that occurs after conception. Somatic mutations can occur in any of the cells of the body except the germ cells (sperm and egg) and therefore are not passed on to children. These alterations can (but do not always) cause cancer or other diseases.
somatomedin listen (SOH-muh-toh-MEE-din)
A protein made by the body that stimulates the growth of many types of cells. Somatomedin is similar to insulin (a hormone made in the pancreas). There are two forms of somatomedin called IGF-1 and IGF-2. Higher than normal levels of IGF-1 may increase the risk of several types of cancer. Somatomedin is a type of growth factor and a type of cytokine. Also called IGF and insulin-like growth factor.
somatostatin receptor listen (soh-MA-toh-STA-tin reh-SEP-ter)
A protein on the surface of cells that binds to a hormone called somatostatin, which helps control other hormones in the body. Somatostatin receptors are found on many different types of cells, and they may also be found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells. Knowing the amount of somatostatin receptor in tumor tissue may help diagnose cancer and plan treatment.
somatostatin receptor scintigraphy listen (soh-MA-toh-STA-tin reh-SEP-ter sin-TIH-gruh-fee)
A type of radionuclide scan used to find carcinoid and other types of tumors. Radioactive octreotide, a drug similar to somatostatin, is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. The radioactive octreotide attaches to tumor cells that have receptors for somatostatin. A radiation-measuring device detects the radioactive octreotide, and makes pictures showing where the tumor cells are in the body. Also called octreotide scan and SRS.
somatotropin listen (soh-MA-toh-TROH-pin)
A protein made by the pituitary gland that helps control body growth and the use of glucose and fat in the body. Also called growth hormone.
Somatuline Depot listen (soh-MA-too-leen DEE-poh)
A drug used to treat gastroenteropancreatic neuroendocrine tumors that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. These tumors form in the stomach, small and large intestines, rectum, and pancreas. Somatuline Depot is used for tumors that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also used to treat carcinoid syndrome and some patients with acromegaly (a condition in which the pituitary gland makes too much growth hormone). Somatuline Depot is like somatostatin (a hormone made by the body), and may help stop the body from making extra amounts of certain hormones, including growth hormone, insulin, glucagon, and hormones that affect digestion. It may also help keep certain types of tumor cells from growing. Somatuline Depot is a type of somatostatin analog. Also called lanreotide acetate.
somnolence syndrome listen (SOM-noh-lens SIN-drome)
Periods of drowsiness, lethargy, loss of appetite, and irritability in children following radiation therapy treatments to the head.
sonidegib phosphate listen (soh-NIH-deh-gib FOS-fayt)
A drug used to treat locally advanced basal cell carcinoma (BCC) that has come back after surgery or radiation therapy. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. Sonidegib phosphate is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Sonidegib phosphate blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called erismodegib, LDE225, and Odomzo.
sonogram listen (SAH-noh-gram)
A computer picture of areas inside the body created by high-energy sound waves. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of the body tissues on a computer screen. A sonogram may be used to help diagnose disease, such as cancer. It may also be used during pregnancy to check the fetus (unborn baby) and during medical procedures, such as biopsies. Also called ultrasonogram.
SOP
Written instructions for doing a specific task in a certain way. In clinical trials, SOPs are set up to store records, collect data, screen and enroll subjects, and submit Institutional Review Board (IRB) applications and renewals. Also called Standard Operating Procedure.
sorafenib tosylate listen (sor-A-feh-nib TOH-suh-layt)
A drug used to treat advanced kidney cancer and a type of liver cancer that cannot be removed by surgery. It is also used to treat a type of advanced thyroid cancer that did not get better with radioactive iodine treatment. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Sorafenib tosylate stops cancer cells from dividing and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called BAY 43-9006 and Nexavar.
sorivudine listen (sor-IH-vyoo-deen)
An antiviral drug that is being studied as a treatment for herpesvirus. It belongs to the family of drugs called nucleic acid synthesis inhibitors.
sorrel listen (SOR-ul)
A plant that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rumex acetosella. Also called dock and sheep sorrel.
soy listen (soy)
A product from a plant of Asian origin that produces beans used in many food products. Soy contains isoflavones (estrogen-like substances) that are being studied for the prevention of cancer, hot flashes that occur with menopause, and osteoporosis (loss of bone density). Soy in the diet may lower cholesterol levels and reduce the risk of heart disease. Also called Glycine max, soya, and soybean.
soya listen (SOY-uh)
A product from a plant of Asian origin that produces beans used in many food products. Soya contains isoflavones (estrogen-like substances) that are being studied for the prevention of cancer, hot flashes that occur with menopause, and osteoporosis (loss of bone density). Soya in the diet may lower cholesterol levels and reduce the risk of heart disease. Also called Glycine max, soy, and soybean.
soybean listen (SOY-been)
A product from a plant of Asian origin that produces beans used in many food products. Soybean contains isoflavones (estrogen-like substances) that are being studied for the prevention of cancer, hot flashes that occur with menopause, and osteoporosis (loss of bone density). Soybean in the diet may lower cholesterol levels and reduce the risk of heart disease. Also called Glycine max, soy, and soya.
spasm listen (SPA-zum)
A sudden contraction of a muscle or group of muscles, such as a cramp.
spastic colon listen (SPAS-tik KOH-lun)
A disorder of the intestines commonly marked by abdominal pain, bloating, and changes in a person’s bowel habits. This may include diarrhea or constipation, or both, with one occurring after the other. Also called IBS, irritable bowel syndrome, irritable colon, and mucus colitis.
specialist listen (SPEH-shuh-list)
In medicine, a doctor or other health care professional who is trained and licensed in a special area of practice. Examples of medical specialists include oncologists (cancer specialists) and hematologists (blood specialists).
specific immune cell listen (speh-SIH-fik ih-MYOON sel)
An immune cell such as a T or B lymphocyte that responds to a single, specific antigen.
specificity listen (SPEH-sih-FIH-sih-tee)
When referring to a medical test, specificity refers to the percentage of people who test negative for a specific disease among a group of people who do not have the disease. No test is 100% specific because some people who do not have the disease will test positive for it (false positive).
SPECT listen
A special type of computed tomography (CT) scan in which a small amount of a radioactive drug is injected into a vein and a scanner is used to make detailed images of areas inside the body where the radioactive material is taken up by the cells. SPECT can give information about blood flow to tissues and chemical reactions (metabolism) in the body. Also called single-photon emission computed tomography.
spectroscopy listen (spek-TROS-koh-pee)
The study of the amount of light that is taken up, given off, or scattered (reflected) by an object. Spectroscopy breaks down light and measures different wavelengths of visible and non-visible light. In medicine, different types of spectroscopy are being used to study tissues and to help make a diagnosis.
speculum listen (SPEK-yoo-lum)
An instrument used to widen an opening of the body to make it easier to look inside.
speech pathologist listen (... puh-THAH-loh-jist)
A specialist who evaluates and treats people with communication and swallowing problems. Also called speech therapist.
speech therapist listen (speech THAYR-uh-pist)
A specialist who evaluates and treats people with communication and swallowing problems. Also called speech pathologist.
sperm listen (spurm)
The male reproductive cell, formed in the testicle. A sperm unites with an egg to form an embryo.
sperm aspiration listen (… AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A procedure in which a sample of sperm cells is removed from the testicle or epididymis through a small needle attached to a syringe. The sperm is looked at under a microscope in the laboratory, where it may be used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. Sperm aspiration may be useful for men who have fertility problems caused by a blockage that keeps sperm from being ejaculated. It may also be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Sperm aspiration is a type of sperm retrieval method.
sperm banking listen (spurm...)
The process of freezing sperm and storing it for future use. Samples of semen are collected and checked under a microscope in the laboratory to count sperm cells and find out how healthy they are. The sperm cells are then frozen and stored. Sperm banking is often used for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Sperm banking is a type of fertility preservation. Also called sperm cryopreservation.
sperm count listen (spurm kownt)
A count of the number of sperm in a sample of semen. A sperm count may be used as a measure of fertility.
sperm cryopreservation listen (… KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
The process of freezing sperm and storing it for future use. Samples of semen are collected and checked under a microscope in the laboratory to count sperm cells and find out how healthy they are. The sperm cells are then frozen and stored. Sperm cryopreservation is often used for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Sperm cryopreservation is a type of fertility preservation. Also called sperm banking.
sperm retrieval listen (spurm reh-TREE-vul)
Removal of sperm from a man's testis or epididymis by a doctor using a fine needle or other instrument.
spermatic cord listen (sper-MA-tik kord)
A cord-like structure in the male reproductive system that contains nerves, blood and lymph vessels, and the vas deferens (a coiled tube that carries sperm out of the testicle). It runs from the abdomen to the testicle, and connects to the testicle in the scrotum (external sac). Also called testicular cord.
spermicide listen (SPER-mih-side)
A chemical substance that kills sperm and is used as a type of birth control. It is available over-the-counter (without a doctor’s order) and comes in many different forms such as cream, gel, foam, and suppository. Spermicides can be used alone or with another birth control method such as a condom or diaphragm. They do not protect against sexually transmitted diseases (STDs).
SPF
A scale for rating the level of sunburn protection in sunscreen products. The higher the SPF, the more sunburn protection it gives. Sunscreens with a value of 2 through 11 give minimal protection against sunburns. Sunscreens with a value of 12 through 29 give moderate protection. SPFs of 30 or higher give high protection against sunburn. Also called sun protection factor.
S-phase fraction listen (... fayz FRAK-shun)
A measure of the percentage of cells in a tumor that are in the phase of the cell cycle during which DNA is synthesized. The S-phase fraction may be used with the proliferative index to give a more complete understanding of how fast a tumor is growing.
sphenoid sinus listen (SFEE-noyd SY-nus)
A type of paranasal sinus (a hollow space in the bones around the nose). There are two large sphenoid sinuses in the sphenoid bone, which is behind the nose between the eyes. The sphenoid sinuses are lined with cells that make mucus to keep the nose from drying out.
sphincter listen (SFINK-ter)
A ring-shaped muscle that relaxes or tightens to open or close a passage or opening in the body. Examples are the anal sphincter (around the opening of the anus) and the pyloric sphincter (at the lower opening of the stomach).
spiculated mass listen (SPIH-kyoo-LAY-ted …)
A lump of tissue with spikes or points on the surface.
spinal anesthesia listen (SPY-nul A-nes-THEE-zhuh)
A temporary loss of feeling in the abdomen and/or the lower part of the body. Special drugs called anesthetics are injected into the fluid in the lower part of the spinal column to cause the loss of feeling. The patient stays awake during the procedure. It is a type of regional anesthesia. Also called SAB, spinal block, and subarachnoid block.
spinal block listen (SPY-nul blok)
A temporary loss of feeling in the abdomen and/or the lower part of the body. Special drugs called anesthetics are injected into the fluid in the lower part of the spinal column to cause the loss of feeling. The patient stays awake during the procedure. It is a type of regional anesthesia. Also called SAB, spinal anesthesia, and subarachnoid block.
spinal canal listen (SPY-nul kuh-NAL)
The narrow, fluid-filled space in the spinal column (the bones, muscles, tendons, and other tissues that reach from the base of the skull to the tailbone). The spinal cord runs through the spinal canal.
spinal column listen (SPY-nul KAH-lum)
The bones, muscles, tendons, and other tissues that reach from the base of the skull to the tailbone. The spinal column encloses the spinal cord and the fluid surrounding the spinal cord. Also called backbone, spine, and vertebral column.
spinal cord listen (SPY-nul kord)
A column of nerve tissue that runs from the base of the skull down the center of the back. It is covered by three thin layers of protective tissue called membranes. The spinal cord and membranes are surrounded by the vertebrae (back bones). The spinal cord and the brain make up the central nervous system (CNS). Spinal cord nerves carry messages between the brain and the rest of the body.
spinal cord compression listen (SPY-nul kord kum-PREH-shun)
Pressure on the spinal cord that may be caused by a tumor, a spinal fracture, or other conditions. Spinal cord compression may cause pain, weakness, loss of feeling, paralysis, incontinence (inability to control urine or stool), or impotence (inability to have an erection of the penis).
spinal tap listen (SPY-nul ...)
A procedure in which a thin needle called a spinal needle is put into the lower part of the spinal column to collect cerebrospinal fluid or to give drugs. Also called lumbar puncture.
spindle cell hemangioma listen (SPIN-dul sel hee-MAN-jee-OH-muh)
A benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that forms on or under the skin. Spindle cell hemangiomas have cells called spindle cells that look long and slender under a microscope. These tumors are painful red-brown or bluish lesions that usually appear on the arms or legs. One or more lesions may form, and they can sometimes rupture (break open) and bleed. Spindle cell hemangiomas usually occur in young adults but can sometimes occur in children. They are a type of vascular tumor.
spindle cell sarcoma listen (SPIN-dul sel sar-KOH-muh)
A type of sarcoma that contains spindle cells. Under a microscope, spindle cells look long and slender. Sarcomas are cancers that begin in muscle, fat, fibrous tissue, or other connective or supportive tissue in the body. Spindle cell sarcomas usually occur in adults.
spindle cell tumor listen (SPIN-dul sel TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that contains cells called spindle cells, based on their shape. Under a microscope, spindle cells look long and slender. Spindle cell tumors may be sarcomas or carcinomas.
spine listen (spine)
The bones, muscles, tendons, and other tissues that reach from the base of the skull to the tailbone. The spine encloses the spinal cord and the fluid surrounding the spinal cord. Also called backbone, spinal column, and vertebral column.
spine cancer listen (... KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in the spinal column (backbone) or spinal cord. The spinal column is made up of linked bones, called vertebrae. The spinal cord is a column of nerve tissue that runs from the base of the skull down the back. It is surrounded by three protective membranes, and is enclosed within the vertebrae. Many different types of cancer may form in the bones, tissues, fluid, or nerves of the spine.
spiral CT scan listen (SPY-rul … skan)
A procedure that uses a computer linked to an x-ray machine to make a series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The x-ray machine scans the body in a spiral path. This allows more images to be made in a shorter time than with older CT methods. A dye may be injected into a vein or swallowed to help the organs or tissues show up more clearly on the x-ray. Spiral CT scan also creates more detailed pictures and may be better at finding small abnormal areas inside the body. It may be used to help diagnose disease, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working. Also called helical computed tomography.
spirituality listen (SPEER-ih-choo-A-lih-tee)
Having to do with deep, often religious, feelings and beliefs, including a person’s sense of peace, purpose, connection to others, and beliefs about the meaning of life.
spit tobacco listen (… tuh-BA-koh)
A type of smokeless tobacco made from cured tobacco leaves. It may be sweetened and flavored with licorice and other substances. It comes in the form of loose tobacco leaves, pellets or “bits” (leaf tobacco rolled into small pellets), plugs (leaf tobacco pressed and held together with some type of sweetener), or twists (leaf tobacco rolled into rope-like strands and twisted). It is placed in the mouth, usually between the cheek and lower lip, and may be chewed. Spit tobacco contains nicotine and many harmful, cancer-causing chemicals. Using it can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause cancers of the mouth, throat, esophagus, and pancreas. Spit tobacco use may also cause gum disease, heart disease, stroke, and other health problems. Also called chewing tobacco.
spleen listen (spleen)
An organ that is part of the lymphatic system. The spleen makes lymphocytes, filters the blood, stores blood cells, and destroys old blood cells. It is located on the left side of the abdomen near the stomach.
splenectomy listen (spleh-NEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the spleen.
splenic listen (SPLEH-nik)
Having to do with the spleen (an organ in the abdomen that makes immune cells, filters the blood, stores blood cells, and destroys old blood cells).
splenomegaly listen (SPLEH-noh-MEH-guh-lee)
Enlarged spleen.
sporadic cancer listen (spuh-RA-dik KAN-ser)
Cancer that occurs in people who do not have a family history of that cancer or an inherited change in their DNA that would increase their risk for that cancer.
spotted thistle listen (... THIH-sul)
A plant whose leaves, stems, and flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. Spotted thistle may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Cnicus benedictus. Also called blessed thistle, cardin, holy thistle, and St. Benedict's thistle.
Sprycel listen (SPRY-sel)
A drug used to treat children with chronic phase chronic myeloid leukemia (CML) that is Philadelphia chromosome positive (Ph+). It is also used to treat adults with certain types of CML and acute lymphoblastic leukemia that are Ph+. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Sprycel blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called BMS-354825 and dasatinib.
sputum listen (SPYOO-tum)
Mucus and other matter brought up from the lungs by coughing.
sputum cytology listen (SPYOO-tum sy-TAH-loh-jee)
Examination under a microscope of cells found in sputum (mucus and other matter brought up from the lungs by coughing). The test checks for abnormal cells, such as lung cancer cells.
squalamine lactate listen (SKWAH-luh-meen LAK-tayt)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors. It prevents the growth of new blood vessels into a solid tumor.
squamous cell listen (SKWAY-mus sel)
Flat cell that looks like a fish scale under a microscope. These cells are found in the tissues that form the surface of the skin, the passages of the respiratory and digestive tracts, and the lining of the hollow organs of the body (such as the bladder, kidney, and uterus, including the cervix).
squamous cell carcinoma listen (SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Cancer that begins in squamous cells. Squamous cells are thin, flat cells that look like fish scales, and are found in the tissue that forms the surface of the skin, the lining of the hollow organs of the body, and the lining of the respiratory and digestive tracts. Most cancers of the anus, cervix, head and neck, and vagina are squamous cell carcinomas. Also called epidermoid carcinoma.
squamous cell carcinoma in situ listen (SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the tissues that form the surface of the skin, the lining of the hollow organs of the body (such as the bladder and uterus), and the lining of the respiratory and digestive tracts. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Squamous cell carcinoma in situ occurs in the skin, anus, bladder, uterus, cervix, head and neck, lung, and vagina, and in other parts of the body. Also called stage 0 squamous cell carcinoma.
squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck listen (SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh …)
Cancer of the head and neck that begins in squamous cells (thin, flat cells that form the surface of the skin, eyes, various internal organs, and the lining of hollow organs and ducts of some glands). Squamous cell carcinoma of the head and neck includes cancers of the nasal cavity, sinuses, lips, mouth, salivary glands, throat, and larynx (voice box). Most head and neck cancers are squamous cell carcinomas.
squamous cell carcinoma of the skin listen (SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh … skin)
Cancer that begins in cells that form the epidermis (outer layer of the skin). It usually occurs on areas of the skin that have been exposed to natural sunlight or artificial sunlight (such as from tanning beds) over long periods of time. These areas include the face, ears, lower lip, neck, arms, or back of the hands. It may also occur on areas of the skin that have been burned or exposed to chemicals or radiation. Squamous cell carcinoma of the skin may appear as a firm red bump, a scaly red patch, an open sore, or a wart that may crust or bleed easily. Squamous cell carcinoma of the skin that has not spread can usually be cured. Also called cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma and squamous cell skin cancer.
squamous cell skin cancer listen (SKWAY-mus sel skin KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in cells that form the epidermis (outer layer of the skin). It usually occurs on areas of the skin that have been exposed to natural sunlight or artificial sunlight (such as from tanning beds) over long periods of time. These areas include the face, ears, lower lip, neck, arms, or back of the hands. It may also occur on areas of the skin that have been burned or exposed to chemicals or radiation. Squamous cell skin cancer may appear as a firm red bump, a scaly red patch, an open sore, or a wart that may crust or bleed easily. Squamous cell skin cancer that has not spread can usually be cured. Also called cutaneous squamous cell carcinoma and squamous cell carcinoma of the skin.
squamous intraepithelial lesion listen (SKWAY-mus IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul LEE-zhun)
A general term for the abnormal growth of squamous cells on the surface of the cervix. The changes in the cells are described as low grade or high grade, depending on how much of the cervix is affected and how abnormal the cells appear. Also called SIL.
SR-29142
A drug that may protect healthy tissue from the toxic effects of anticancer drugs.
SR-45023A
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called bisphosphonates. It affects cancer cell receptors governing cell growth and cell death.
SR49059
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It inhibits a hormone growth factor that causes some cancer cells to divide. It is a type of vasopressin receptor antagonist.
SRS
A type of radionuclide scan used to find carcinoid and other types of tumors. Radioactive octreotide, a drug similar to somatostatin, is injected into a vein and travels through the bloodstream. The radioactive octreotide attaches to tumor cells that have receptors for somatostatin. A radiation-measuring device detects the radioactive octreotide, and makes pictures showing where the tumor cells are in the body. Also called octreotide scan and somatostatin receptor scintigraphy.
SSG
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain solid tumors, lymphoma, and myeloma. SSG may block enzymes needed for cancer growth. It is a type of pentavalent antimonial. Also called sodium stibogluconate.
SSRI
A type of drug that is used to treat depression. SSRIs slow the process by which serotonin (a substance that nerves use to send messages to one another) is reused by nerve cells that make it. This increases the amount of serotonin available for stimulating other nerves. Also called selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor.
St. Benedict's thistle listen (saynt BEH-neh-diktz THIH-sul)
A plant whose leaves, stems, and flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. St. Benedict's thistle may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Cnicus benedictus. Also called blessed thistle, cardin, holy thistle, and spotted thistle.
St. John's wort listen (… wort)
An herbal product sold as an over-the-counter treatment for depression. It is being studied for its ability to lessen certain side effects of cancer treatment. Also called Hypericum perforatum.
ST1481
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors. Also called gimatecan.
stable disease listen (STAY-bul dih-ZEEZ)
Cancer that is neither decreasing nor increasing in extent or severity.
stage listen (stayj)
The extent of a cancer in the body. Staging is usually based on the size of the tumor, whether lymph nodes contain cancer, and whether the cancer has spread from the original site to other parts of the body.
stage 0 anal HSIL listen (... AY-nul ...)
Abnormal cells are found in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the anus. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 is also called high-grade squamous intraepithelial lesion (HSIL).
stage 0 bladder carcinoma in situ listen (... BLA-der KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in tissue lining the inside of the bladder. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 is divided into stages 0a and 0is, depending on the type of tumor. Stage 0a is also called noninvasive papillary carcinoma, which may look like long, thin growths growing from the lining of the bladder. Stage 0is is also called carcinoma in situ, which is a flat tumor on the tissue lining the inside of the bladder.
stage 0 breast carcinoma in situ listen (... brest KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the tissues of the breast. There are 2 types of stage 0 breast carcinoma in situ: ductal carcinoma in situ (DCIS) and Paget disease of the nipple. DCIS is a condition in which the abnormal cells are found in the lining of a breast duct. The abnormal cells have not spread outside the duct to other tissues in the breast. Paget disease of the nipple is a condition in which abnormal cells are found in the skin cells of the nipple and may spread to the areola. Patients with Paget disease of the nipple may also have DCIS or invasive breast cancer in the same breast. Also called breast carcinoma in situ.
stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ listen (... SER-vih-kul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Severely abnormal cells are found on the surface of the cervix. Stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ is usually caused by certain types of human papillomavirus (HPV) and is found when a cervical biopsy is done. If not treated, these abnormal cells may become cancer and spread to nearby normal tissue. Treatment for stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ may include cryotherapy, laser therapy, loop electrosurgical procedure (LEEP), or cone biopsy to remove or destroy the abnormal tissue. Stage 0 cervical carcinoma in situ is sometimes called high-grade or severe dysplasia. Also called cervical squamous intraepithelial neoplasia 3 and CIN 3.
stage 0 chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (... KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
There are too many lymphocytes in the blood, but there are no other symptoms of leukemia. Stage 0 is indolent (slow-growing).
stage 0 colorectal carcinoma in situ listen (...KOH-loh-REK-tul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectal wall. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 disease listen (stayj … dih-ZEEZ)
A group of abnormal cells that remain in the place where they first formed. They have not spread. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called carcinoma in situ.
stage 0 distal extrahepatic bile duct carcinoma in situ listen (... DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the innermost layer of tissue lining the distal extrahepatic bile duct. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 is also called high-grade dysplasia.
stage 0 esophageal carcinoma in situ listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Cancer has formed in the inner lining of the esophagus wall. Stage 0 is also called high-grade dysplasia.
stage 0 gallbladder carcinoma in situ listen (... GAWL-bla-der KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the gallbladder wall. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 gastric carcinoma in situ listen (... GAS-trik KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the stomach wall. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 hypopharyngeal carcinoma in situ listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the hypopharynx. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 intrahepatic bile duct carcinoma in situ listen (... IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the innermost layer of tissue lining the intrahepatic bile duct. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 laryngeal carcinoma in situ listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the larynx. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 lip and oral cavity carcinoma in situ listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the lips and oral cavity. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 maxillary sinus carcinoma in situ listen (... MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the innermost lining of the maxillary sinus. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Abnormal melanocytes (cells that make melanin, the pigment that gives skin its natural color) are found in the epidermis (outer layer of the skin). These abnormal melanocytes may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called melanoma in situ.
stage 0 Merkel cell carcinoma in situ listen (stayj … MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal Merkel cells are found in the top layer of the skin. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus carcinoma in situ listen (... NAY-zul KA-vih-tee … ETH-moyd SY-nus KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the innermost lining of the nasal cavity or ethmoid sinus. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 nasopharyngeal carcinoma in situ listen (...NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the nasopharynx. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the eyelid listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too ... I-lid)
Abnormal cells are found in the epidermis, usually in the basal cell layer. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the eyelid.
stage 0 nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too ...)
Abnormal cells are found in the squamous cell or basal cell layer of the epidermis. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Also called nonmelanoma skin carcinoma in situ on the head and neck (not on the eyelid).
stage 0 non-small cell lung carcinoma in situ listen (... sel lung KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the airways. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 non-small cell lung carcinoma in situ may be adenocarcinoma in situ (AIS) or squamous cell carcinoma in situ (SCIS).
stage 0 oropharyngeal carcinoma in situ listen (... OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the oropharynx. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 pancreatic carcinoma in situ listen (...PAN-kree-A-tik KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the pancreas. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 penile carcinoma in situ listen (... PEE-nile KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Stage 0 is divided into stages 0is and 0a. In stage 0is, abnormal cells are found on the surface of the skin of the penis. These abnormal cells form growths that may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0is is also called penile intraepithelial neoplasia. In stage 0a, squamous cell cancer that does not spread is found on the surface of the skin of the penis or on the underneath surface of the foreskin of the penis. Stage 0a is also called noninvasive localized squamous cell carcinoma.
stage 0 perihilar bile duct carcinoma in situ listen (... PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the innermost layer of tissue lining the perihilar bile duct. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 is also called high-grade dysplasia.
stage 0 salivary gland carcinoma in situ listen (... SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the lining of the salivary ducts or the small sacs that make up the salivary gland. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue.
stage 0 squamous cell carcinoma listen (… SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A condition in which abnormal cells are found in the tissues that form the surface of the skin, the lining of the hollow organs of the body (such as the bladder and uterus), and the lining of the respiratory and digestive tracts. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 squamous cell carcinoma occurs in the skin, anus, bladder, uterus, cervix, head and neck, lung, and vagina, and in other parts of the body. Also called squamous cell carcinoma in situ.
stage 0 testicular carcinoma in situ listen (...tes-TIH-kyoo-ler KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found in the tiny tubules where the sperm cells begin to develop. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. All tumor marker levels are normal. Also called testicular intraepithelial neoplasia and testicular intratubular germ cell neoplasia.
stage 0 transitional cell carcinoma in situ of the renal pelvis and ureter listen (... tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too ... REE-nul PEL-vus ... YER-eh-ter)
Abnormal cells are found in tissue lining the inside of the renal pelvis or ureter. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. Stage 0 is divided into stages 0a and 0is, depending on the type of tumor. Stage 0a is also called noninvasive papillary carcinoma, which may look like long, thin growths that grow out from the tissue lining the inside of the renal pelvis or ureter. Stage 0is is also called carcinoma in situ, which is a flat tumor on the tissue lining the inside of the renal pelvis or ureter.
stage 1 neuroblastoma listen (... NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Tumor is only found in one area; all of the tumor that can be seen is completely removed during surgery.
stage 2 neuroblastoma listen (... NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Stage 2 is divided into stages 2A and 2B. In stage 2A, the tumor is in one area only and not all of the tumor that can be seen can be completely removed during surgery. In stage 2B, the tumor is in one area only and all of the tumor that can be seen may be completely removed during surgery, but cancer cells are found in nearby lymph nodes.
stage 3 neuroblastoma listen (... NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
In stage 3 neuroblastoma, the tumor (1) cannot be completely removed during surgery and has spread from one side of the body to the other side and may also have spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) is in one area of one side of the body only, but has spread to lymph nodes on the other side of the body; or (3) is in the middle of the body and has spread to tissues or lymph nodes on both sides of the body, and the tumor cannot be removed by surgery.
stage 4 neuroblastoma listen (... NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Stage 4 neuroblastoma is divided into stages 4 and 4S. In stage 4, the tumor has spread to distant lymph nodes, the skin, and/or other parts of the body. In stage 4S, (1) the child is younger than 1 year; and (2) the cancer has spread to the skin, liver, and/or bone marrow; and (3) the tumor is in one area only and all of the tumor that can be seen may be completely removed during surgery; and/or (4) cancer cells may be found in the lymph nodes near the tumor.
stage A esthesioneuroblastoma listen (… es-THEE-zee-oh-NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Cancer is found in the nasal cavity only.
stage B esthesioneuroblastoma listen (… es-THEE-zee-oh-NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Cancer has spread from the nasal cavity to the nasal sinuses.
stage C esthesioneuroblastoma listen (… es-THEE-zee-oh-NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Cancer has spread through the nasal sinuses to nearby tissue.
stage D esthesioneuroblastoma listen (… es-THEE-zee-oh-NOOR-oh-blas-TOH-muh)
Cancer has spread to distant parts of the body, such as the lymph nodes in the neck, or to the bone, liver, or lung.
stage I adrenocortical cancer listen (... uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAN-ser)
The tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and is found in the adrenal gland only.
stage I adult Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages I and IE. In stage I, cancer is found in one of the following places in the lymph system: (1) one or more lymph nodes in a group of lymph nodes; (2) Waldeyer’s ring; (3) thymus; or (4) spleen. In stage IE, cancer is found in one area outside the lymph system.
stage I adult non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages I and IE. In stage I, cancer is found in one of the following places in the lymph system: (1) one or more lymph nodes in a group of lymph nodes; (2) Waldeyer’s ring; (3) thymus; or (4) spleen. In stage IE, cancer is found in one area outside the lymph system.
stage I adult soft tissue sarcoma of the retroperitoneum (… uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ... REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and is low grade or the grade is unknown. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and grow and spread more slowly than mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters and is low grade or the grade is unknown.
stage I adult soft tissue sarcoma of the trunk, arms, and legs listen (... uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ...)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and is low grade or the grade is unknown. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and grow and spread more slowly than mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters and is low grade or the grade is unknown.
stage I AIDS-related lymphoma listen (... ree-LAY-ted lim-FOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages I and IE. In stage I, cancer is found in one of the following places in the lymph system: (1) one or more lymph nodes in a group of lymph nodes; (2) Waldeyer’s ring; (3) thymus; or (4) spleen. In stage IE, cancer is found in one area outside the lymph system.
stage I anal cancer listen (... AY-nul KAN-ser)
The tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I bladder cancer listen (... BLA-der KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to the layer of connective tissue next to the inner lining of the bladder.
stage I cancer of the uterus listen (... KAN-ser ... YOO-ter-us)
Cancer found in only the main part of the uterus, not the cervix.
stage I cervical cancer listen (... SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the cervix only. Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB, based on the amount of cancer that is found. In stage IA, a very small amount of cancer that can only be seen with a microscope is found in the tissues of the cervix. Stage IA is divided into stages IA1 and IA2, based on the size of the tumor. In stage IA1, the cancer is not more than 3 millimeters deep and not more than 7 millimeters wide. In stage IA2, the cancer is more than 3 but not more than 5 millimeters deep, and not more than 7 millimeters wide. Stage IB is divided into stages IB1 and IB2, based on the size of the tumor. In stage IB1, (1) the cancer can only be seen with a microscope and is more than 5 millimeters deep and more than 7 millimeters wide; or (2) the cancer can be seen without a microscope and is not more than 4 centimeters. In stage IB2, the cancer can be seen without a microscope and is more than 4 centimeters.
stage I childhood Hodgkin lymphoma listen (...HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages I and IE. In stage I, cancer is found in one of the following places in the lymph system: (1) one or more lymph nodes in one lymph node group; (2) Waldeyer’s ring; (3) thymus; or (4) spleen. In stage IE, cancer is found outside the lymph system in one organ or area.
stage I childhood liver cancer listen (... LIH-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor was in the liver only and all of the cancer was removed by surgery.
stage I childhood non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in one group of lymph nodes; or (2) in one area outside the lymph nodes. No cancer is found in the abdomen or mediastinum (area between the lungs).
stage I chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (… KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
There are too many lymphocytes in the blood and the lymph nodes are larger than normal.
stage I colorectal cancer listen (...KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall and has spread to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) or to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall. Also called Dukes A colorectal cancer.
stage I cutaneous T-cell lymphoma listen (... kyoo-TAY-nee-us T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
May be either of the following: (1) stage IA cancer affecting less than 10% of the skin's surface and appearing as red, dry, scaly patches; (2) stage IB cancer affecting 10% or more of the skin's surface and appearing as red, dry, scaly patches.
stage I distal extrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread fewer than 5 millimeters into the wall of the distal extrahepatic bile duct.
stage I endometrial cancer listen (... EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the uterus only. Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IA, cancer is in the endometrium only or less than halfway through the myometrium (muscle layer of the uterus). In stage IB, cancer has spread halfway or more into the myometrium.
stage I esophageal adenocarcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages IA, IB, and IC, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IA, cancer has spread into the mucosa layer or thin muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1 or the grade is not known. Grade 1 cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and grow and spread more slowly than grade 2 and 3 cancer cells. In stage IB, cancer has spread (1) into the mucosa layer or thin muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 2. Grade 2 cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than grade 1 cancer cells; or (2) into the submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1 or 2 or the grade is not known. In stage IC, cancer has spread (1) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 3. Grade 3 cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than grade 1 and 2 cancer cells; or (2) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1 or 2.
stage I esophageal squamous cell carcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IA, cancer has spread into the mucosa layer or thin muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1 or the grade is not known. Grade 1 cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and grow and spread more slowly than grade 2 and 3 cancer cells. In stage IB, cancer has spread (1) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are any grade or the grade is not known; or (2) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1.
stage I gallbladder cancer listen (... GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the gallbladder wall and may have spread to the muscle layer of the gallbladder wall.
stage I gastric cancer listen (... GAS-trik KAN-ser)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, cancer has formed in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the stomach wall and may have spread to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa). In stage IB, cancer (1) has formed in the mucosa of the stomach wall and may have spread to the submucosa. Cancer has spread to 1 or 2 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) has formed in the mucosa of the stomach wall and has spread to the muscle layer.
stage I gestational trophoblastic neoplasia listen (... jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
The tumor is in the uterus only.
stage I hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in one area of the hypopharynx only and/or the tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I intrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage I intrahepatic bile duct cancer is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, cancer has formed in an intrahepatic bile duct and the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller. In stage IB, cancer has formed in an intrahepatic bile duct and the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters.
stage I intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
The tumor is size category 1 (not more than 12 millimeters wide and not more than 3 millimeters thick; or not more than 9 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick) and is in the choroid only.
stage I kidney cancer listen (... KID-nee KAN-ser)
The tumor is 7 centimeters or smaller and is found in the kidney only. Also called stage I renal cell cancer.
stage I laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis area of the larynx. Cancer (1) is in one area of the supraglottis and the vocal cords work normally; or (2) is in one or both vocal cords and the vocal cords work normally; or (3) is in the subglottis only.
stage I lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
The tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has not spread to lymph nodes.
stage I malignant pleural mesothelioma listen (...muh-LIG-nunt PLOOR-ul MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, cancer is found in the inside lining of the chest wall on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer may also be found in one or more of the following: the thin layer of tissue that covers the lung; the thin layer of tissue that covers the organs between the lungs; and/or the thin layer of tissue that covers the top of the diaphragm. In stage IB, cancer is found in the inside lining of the chest wall, and in each of the thin layers of tissue that cover the lung, the organs between the lungs, and the top of the diaphragm on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer has also spread into one or more of the following: diaphragm; lung tissue; tissue between the ribs and the inside lining of the chest wall; fat in the area between the lungs; soft tissues of the chest wall; and/or sac around the heart.
stage I maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the mucous membranes of the maxillary sinus.
stage I medullary thyroid cancer listen (... MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the thyroid only and the tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is not more than 1 millimeter thick, with or without ulceration (a break in the skin). In stage IB, the tumor is more than 1 but not more than 2 millimeters thick, without ulceration.
stage I Merkel cell carcinoma listen (stayj ... MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I multiple myeloma listen (... MUL-tih-pul MY-eh-LOH-muh)
Relatively few cancer cells have spread throughout the body. There may be no symptoms of disease.
stage I mycosis fungoides listen (... my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, patches, papules, and/or plaques cover less than 10% of the skin surface. In stage IB, patches, papules, and/or plaques cover 10% or more of the skin surface. In both stages, there may be a low number of Sezary cells in the blood.
stage I nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in only one area (of either the nasal cavity or the ethmoid sinus) and may have spread into bone.
stage I nasopharyngeal cancer listen (...NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer (1) is found in the nasopharynx only; or (2) has spread from the nasopharynx to the oropharynx and/or to the nasal cavity.
stage I nonmelanoma skin cancer on the eyelid listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ... I-lid)
Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is 10 millimeters or smaller and may have spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are, to the connective tissue in the eyelid, or to the full thickness of the eyelid. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 10 millimeters but not larger than 20 millimeters and has not spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are or to the connective tissue in the eyelid.
stage I nonmelanoma skin cancer on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (… non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ...)
The tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I oropharyngeal cancer listen (... OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is 2 centimeters or smaller and is found in the oropharynx only.
stage I ovarian epithelial and fallopian tube cancer listen (...oh-VAYR-ee-un EH-pih-THEE-lee-ul ... fuh-LOH-pee-in ... KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries or fallopian tubes. Stage I is divided into stages IA, IB, and IC. In stage IA, cancer is found inside a single ovary or fallopian tube. In stage IB, cancer is found inside both ovaries or fallopian tubes. In stage IC, cancer is found inside one or both ovaries or fallopian tubes and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is also found on the outside surface of one or both ovaries or fallopian tubes; or (2) the capsule (outer covering) of the ovary has ruptured (broken open); or (3) cancer cells are found in the fluid of the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen) or in washings of the peritoneum (tissue lining the peritoneal cavity).
stage I ovarian germ cell tumor listen (...oh-VAYR-ee-un jerm sel TOO-mer)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries. Stage I is divided into stages IA, IB, and IC. In stage IA, cancer is found inside a single ovary. In stage IB, cancer is found inside both ovaries. In stage IC, cancer is found inside one or both ovaries and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is also found on the outside surface of one or both ovaries; or (2) the capsule (outer covering) of the ovary has ruptured (broken open); or (3) cancer cells are found in the fluid of the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen) or in washings of the peritoneum (tissue lining the peritoneal cavity).
stage I ovarian low malignant potential tumor listen (… oh-VAYR-ee-un...muh-LIG-nunt poh-TEN-shul TOO-mer)
The tumor is found in one or both ovaries. Stage I is divided into stages IA, IB, and IC. In stage IA, the tumor is found inside a single ovary. In stage IB, the tumor is found inside both ovaries. In stage IC, the tumor is found inside one or both ovaries and one of the following is true: (1) tumor cells are found on the outside surface of one or both ovaries; or (2) the capsule (outer covering) of the ovary has ruptured (broken open); or (3) tumor cells are found in the fluid of the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen) or in washings of the peritoneum (tissue lining the peritoneal cavity).
stage I pancreatic cancer listen (... PAN-kree-A-tik KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the pancreas only. Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB, depending on the size of the tumor. In stage IA, the tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters.
stage I papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (55 years and older) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
Cancer is found in the thyroid only and the tumor is 4 centimeters or smaller.
stage I papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (younger than 55 years) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
The tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to nearby tissues and lymph nodes. Cancer has not spread to other parts of the body.
stage I penile cancer listen (... PEE-nile KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to tissue just under the skin of the penis. Cancer has not spread to lymph vessels, blood vessels, or nerves. The cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope.
stage I perihilar bile duct cancer listen (... PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the innermost layer of tissue lining the perihilar bile duct and has spread into the muscle layer or fibrous tissue layer of the perihilar bile duct wall.
stage I prostate cancer listen (...PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the prostate only. The cancer (1) is not felt during a digital rectal exam and is found by needle biopsy done for a high prostate-specific antigen (PSA) level or in a sample of tissue removed during surgery for other reasons (such as benign prostatic hyperplasia). The PSA level is lower than 10 and the Grade Group is 1 (Gleason score is 6 or less ); or (2) is felt during a digital rectal exam and is found in one-half or less of one side of the prostate. The PSA level is lower than 10 and the Grade Group is 1.
stage I renal cell cancer listen (... REE-nul sel KAN-ser)
The tumor is 7 centimeters or smaller and is found in the kidney only. Also called stage I kidney cancer.
stage I salivary gland cancer listen (...SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
The tumor is in the salivary gland only and is 2 centimeters or smaller.
stage I testicular cancer listen (...tes-TIH-kyoo-ler KAN-ser)
Stage I is divided into stages IA, IB, and IS. In stage IA, cancer is found in the testicle, including the rete testis, but has not spread to the blood vessels or lymph vessels in the testicle. All tumor marker levels are normal. In stage IB, cancer (1) is found in the testicle, including the rete testis, and has spread to the blood vessels or lymph vessels in the testicle; or (2) has spread into the hilar soft tissue (tissue made of fibers and fat with blood vessels and lymph vessels), the epididymis, or the outer membranes around the testicle; or (3) has spread to the spermatic cord; or (4) has spread to the scrotum. All tumor marker levels are normal. In stage IS, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Tumor marker levels range from slightly above normal to high.
stage I thymoma listen (... thy-MOH-muh)
Cancer is found only within the thymus. All cancer cells are inside the capsule (sac) that surrounds the thymus.
stage I transitional cell cancer of the renal pelvis and ureter listen (... tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAN-ser ... REE-nul PEL-vus ... YER-eh-ter)
Cancer has spread from the tissue lining the inside of the renal pelvis or ureter to the connective tissue layer.
stage I uterine sarcoma listen (…YOO-teh-rin sar-KOH-muh)
Cancer is found in the uterus only. Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IA, cancer is in the endometrium only or less than halfway through the myometrium (muscle layer of the uterus). In stage IB, cancer has spread halfway or more into the myometrium.
stage I vaginal cancer listen (...VA-jih-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in the vaginal wall only.
stage I vulvar cancer listen (... VUL-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor is found only in the vulva or perineum (area between the rectum and the vagina). Stage I is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is 2 centimeters or smaller and has spread 1 millimeter or less into the tissue of the vulva. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 2 centimeters or has spread more than 1 millimeter into the tissue of the vulva. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes.
stage I Wilms tumor listen (... wilmz TOO-mer)
The tumor was completely removed by surgery and all of the following are true: (1) cancer was found only in the kidney and did not spread to blood vessels of the kidney; (2) the outer layer of the kidney did not break open; (3) the tumor did not break open; (4) a biopsy of the tumor was not done; and (5) no cancer cells were found at the edges of the area where the tumor was removed.
stage IA non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage I non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IA, the tumor is in the lung only and is 3 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes.
stage IB non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage I non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IA and IB. In stage IB, the tumor is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes; OR the tumor is 4 centimeters or smaller and one or more of the following is found: (1) cancer has spread to the main bronchus, but has not spread to the carina; and/or (2) cancer has spread to the innermost layer of the membrane that covers the lung; and/or (3) part of the lung or the whole lung has collapsed or has developed pneumonitis. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes.
stage II adrenocortical cancer listen (... uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAN-ser)
The tumor is larger than 5 centimeters and is found in the adrenal gland only.
stage II adult Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages II and IIE. In stage II, cancer is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm. In stage IIE, cancer has spread from a group of lymph nodes to a nearby area that is outside the lymph system. Cancer may have spread to other lymph node groups on the same side of the diaphragm.
stage II adult non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages II and IIE. In stage II, cancer is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm. In stage IIE, cancer has spread from a group of lymph nodes to a nearby area that is outside the lymph system. Cancer may have spread to other lymph node groups on the same side of the diaphragm.
stage II adult soft tissue sarcoma of the retroperitoneum listen (… uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ... REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and is mid grade or high grade. Mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells.
stage II adult soft tissue sarcoma of the trunk, arms, and legs listen (... uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ...)
The tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and is mid grade or high grade. Mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells.
stage II AIDS-related lymphoma listen (... ree-LAY-ted lim-FOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages II and IIE. In stage II, cancer is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm. In stage IIE, cancer has spread from a group of lymph nodes to a nearby area that is outside the lymph system. Cancer may have spread to other lymph node groups on the same side of the diaphragm.
stage II anal cancer listen (... AY-nul KAN-ser)
Stage II anal cancer is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, the tumor is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 5 centimeters. In stage IIB, the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters.
stage II bladder cancer listen (... BLA-der KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to the layers of muscle tissue of the bladder.
stage II cancer of the uterus listen (... KAN-ser ... YOO-ter-us)
Cancer that has spread to the cervix.
stage II cervical cancer listen (... SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread beyond the uterus but not onto the pelvic wall (the tissues that line the part of the body between the hips) or to the lower third of the vagina. Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IIA, cancer has spread beyond the cervix to the upper two thirds of the vagina but not to tissues around the uterus. Stage IIA is divided into stages IIA1 and IIA2, based on the size of the tumor. In stage IIA1, the tumor can be seen without a microscope and is not more than 4 centimeters. In stage IIA2, the tumor can be seen without a microscope and is more than 4 centimeters. In stage IIB, cancer has spread beyond the cervix to the tissues around the uterus but not onto the pelvic wall.
stage II childhood Hodgkin lymphoma listen (...HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages II and IIE. In stage II, cancer is found in two or more lymph node groups either above or below the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs that helps breathing and separates the chest from the abdomen). In stage IIE, cancer is found in one or more lymph node groups either above or below the diaphragm and outside the lymph nodes in a nearby organ or area.
stage II childhood liver cancer listen (... LIH-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor was in the liver only. After the cancer was removed by surgery, a small amount of cancer remains that can only be seen with a microscope.
stage II childhood non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in one area outside the lymph nodes and in nearby lymph nodes; or (2) in two or more areas above or below the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs that helps breathing and separates the chest from the abdomen), and may or may not have spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (3) to have started in the stomach or intestines and can be completely removed by surgery. Cancer may or may not have spread to certain nearby lymph nodes.
stage II chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (… KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
There are too many lymphocytes in the blood, the liver or spleen is larger than normal, and the lymph nodes may be larger than normal.
stage II colorectal cancer listen (...KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Stage II colorectal cancer is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, cancer has spread through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall to the serosa (outermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall. In stage IIB, cancer has spread through the serosa of the colon and/or rectum wall to the tissue that lines the organs in the abdomen (visceral peritoneum). In stage IIC, cancer has spread through the serosa of the colon and/or rectum wall to nearby organs.
stage II cutaneous T-cell lymphoma listen (... kyoo-TAY-nee-us T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
Stage II cutaneous T-cell lymphoma may be either of the following: (1) stage IIA, in which the skin has red, dry, scaly patches but no tumors, and lymph nodes are enlarged but do not contain cancer cells; (2) stage IIB, in which tumors are found on the skin, and lymph nodes are enlarged but do not contain cancer cells.
stage II distal extrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, cancer has spread (1) fewer than 5 millimeters into the wall of the distal extrahepatic bile duct and has spread to 1 to 3 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) 5 to 12 millimeters into the wall of the distal extrahepatic bile duct. In stage IIB, cancer has spread 5 millimeters or more into the wall of the distal extrahepatic bile duct. Cancer may have spread to 1 to 3 nearby lymph nodes.
stage II endometrial cancer listen (... EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread into connective tissue of the cervix, but has not spread outside the uterus.
stage II esophageal adenocarcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IIA, cancer has spread into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 3 or the grade is not known. Grade 3 cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than grade 1 and 2 cancer cells. In stage IIB, cancer has spread (1) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall; or (2) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 or 2 lymph nodes near the tumor.
stage II esophageal squamous cell carcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IIA, cancer has spread (1) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 2 or 3 or the grade is not known. Grade 2 and 3 cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than grade 1 cancer cells; or (2) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. The tumor is in the lower esophagus; or (3) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 1. Grade 1 cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and grow and spread more slowly than grade 2 and 3 cancer cells. The tumor is in either the upper or middle esophagus. In stage IIB, cancer has spread (1) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. The cancer cells are grade 2 or 3. The tumor is in either the upper or middle esophagus; or (2) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. The grade of the cancer cells is not known, or it is not known where the tumor has formed in the esophagus; or (3) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 or 2 lymph nodes near the tumor.
stage II gallbladder cancer listen (... GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB, depending on where the cancer has spread in the gallbladder. In stage IIA, cancer has spread through the muscle layer to the connective tissue layer of the gallbladder wall on the side of the gallbladder that is not near the liver. In stage IIB, cancer has spread through the muscle layer to the connective tissue layer of the gallbladder wall on the same side as the liver. Cancer has not spread to the liver.
stage II gastric cancer listen (... GAS-trik KAN-ser)
Stage II gastric cancer is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, cancer (1) may have spread to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 3 to 6 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) has spread to the muscle layer of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 1 or 2 nearby lymph nodes; or (3) has spread to the subserosa (layer of connective tissue next to the muscle layer) of the stomach wall. In stage IIB, cancer (1) may have spread to the submucosa of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 7 to 15 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) has spread to the muscle layer of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 3 to 6 nearby lymph nodes; or (3) has spread to the subserosa of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 1 or 2 nearby lymph nodes; or (4) has spread to the serosa (outermost layer) of the stomach wall.
stage II gestational trophoblastic neoplasia listen (... jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Cancer has spread outside of the uterus to the ovary, fallopian tube, vagina, and/or the ligaments that support the uterus.
stage II hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
The tumor is either (1) larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters and has not spread to the larynx (voice box); or (2) found in more than one area of the hypopharynx or in nearby tissues.
stage II intrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Either of the following is found: (1) the tumor has spread through the wall of an intrahepatic bile duct and into a blood vessel; or (2) more than one tumor has formed in the intrahepatic bile duct and may have spread into a blood vessel.
stage II kidney cancer listen (... KID-nee KAN-ser)
The tumor is larger than 7 centimeters and is found in the kidney only. Also called stage II renal cell cancer.
stage II laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis area of the larynx. Cancer (1) is in more than one area of the supraglottis or has spread to the area at the base of the tongue or to tissues near the vocal cords. The vocal cords work normally; or (2) has spread from the glottis to the supraglottis, subglottis, or both, and/or the vocal cords do not work normally; or (3) has spread from the subglottis to one or both vocal cords and the vocal cords may not work normally.
stage II lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
The tumor is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters, and cancer has not spread to lymph nodes.
stage II malignant pleural mesothelioma listen (...muh-LIG-nunt PLOOR-ul MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
Cancer (1) is found in the inside lining of the chest wall on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer may also be found in one or more of the following: the thin layer of tissue that covers the lung; the thin layer of tissue that covers the organs between the lungs; and/or the thin layer of tissue that covers the top of the diaphragm. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes along the center of the chest on the same side of the chest as the tumor; or (2) is found in the inside lining of the chest wall, and in each of the thin layers of tissue that cover the lung, the organs between the lungs, and the top of the diaphragm on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer has also spread into the diaphragm and/or lung tissue. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes along the center of the chest on the same side of the chest as the tumor.
stage II maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to bone around the maxillary sinus, including the roof of the mouth and the nose, but not to bone at the back of the maxillary sinus or the base of the skull.
stage II medullary thyroid cancer listen (... MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
One of the following is found: (1) cancer is found in the thyroid only and the tumor is larger than 2 centimeters; or (2) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread from the thyroid to nearby muscles in the neck.
stage II melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, the tumor is either (1) more than 1 but not more than 2 millimeters thick, with ulceration (a break in the skin); or (2) more than 2 but not more than 4 millimeters thick, without ulceration. In stage IIB, the tumor is either (1) more than 2 but not more than 4 millimeters thick, with ulceration; or (2) more than 4 millimeters thick, without ulceration. In stage IIC, the tumor is more than 4 millimeters thick, with ulceration.
stage II Merkel cell carcinoma listen (stayj ... MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage II Merkel cell carcinoma is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, the tumor is larger than 2 centimeters. In stage IIB, the tumor has spread to nearby connective tissue, muscle, cartilage, or bone.
stage II multiple myeloma listen (... MUL-tih-pul MY-eh-LOH-muh)
Cancer in which a moderate number of cancer cells have spread throughout the body.
stage II mycosis fungoides listen (... my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, patches, papules, and/or plaques cover any amount of the skin surface. Lymph nodes are abnormal, but they are not cancerous. In stage IIB, one or more tumors that are 1 centimeter or larger are found on the skin. Lymph nodes may be abnormal, but they are not cancerous. In both stages, there may be a low number of Sezary cells in the blood.
stage II nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in two areas (of either the nasal cavity or the ethmoid sinus) that are near each other or has spread to an area next to the sinuses. Cancer may also have spread into bone.
stage II nasopharyngeal cancer listen (...NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
One of the following is true: (1) cancer has spread to one or more lymph nodes on one side of the neck and/or to one or more lymph nodes on one or both sides of the back of the throat. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller. Cancer is found in the nasopharynx only, or has spread from the nasopharynx to the oropharynx and/or to the nasal cavity, or is found only in the lymph nodes in the neck. The cancer cells in the lymph nodes are infected with Epstein-Barr virus (a virus linked to nasopharyngeal cancer); or (2) cancer has spread to the parapharyngeal space (area near the pharynx, between the base of the skull and the lower jaw) and/or to nearby muscles. Cancer may have also spread to one or more lymph nodes on one side of the neck and/or to one or more lymph nodes on one or both sides of the back of the throat. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller.
stage II nonmelanoma skin cancer on the eyelid listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ... I-lid)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, the tumor is (1) larger than 10 millimeters but not larger than 20 millimeters and has spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are, to the connective tissue in the eyelid, or to the full thickness of the eyelid; or (2) larger than 20 millimeters but not larger than 30 millimeters and may have spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are, to the connective tissue in the eyelid, or to the full thickness of the eyelid. In stage IIB, the tumor may be any size and has spread to the eye, eye socket, sinuses, tear ducts, or brain, or to the tissues that support the eye.
stage II nonmelanoma skin cancer on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (… non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ...)
The tumor is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters.
stage II oropharyngeal cancer listen (... OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters and is found in the oropharynx only.
stage II ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, and primary peritoneal cancer listen (... oh-VAYR-ee-un EH-pih-THEE-lee-ul fuh-LOH-pee-in ... PRY-mayr-ee PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries or fallopian tubes and has spread into other areas of the pelvis, or primary peritoneal cancer is found within the pelvis. Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, cancer has spread from where it first formed to the uterus and/or the fallopian tubes and/or the ovaries. In stage IIB, cancer has spread from the ovary or fallopian tube to organs in the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen).
stage II ovarian germ cell tumor listen (...oh-VAYR-ee-un jerm sel TOO-mer)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries and has spread into other areas of the pelvis. Stage II is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, cancer has spread to the uterus and/or fallopian tubes (the long slender tubes through which eggs pass from the ovaries to the uterus). In stage IIB, cancer has spread to other tissue within the pelvis. In stage IIC, cancer is found inside one or both ovaries and has spread to the uterus and/or fallopian tubes, or to other tissue within the pelvis. Also, one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found on the outside surface of one or both ovaries; or (2) the capsule (outer covering) of the ovary has ruptured (broken open); or (3) cancer cells are found in the fluid of the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen) or in washings of the peritoneum (tissue lining the peritoneal cavity).
stage II ovarian low malignant potential tumor listen (… oh-VAYR-ee-un...muh-LIG-nunt poh-TEN-shul TOO-mer)
The tumor is found in one or both ovaries and has spread into other areas of the pelvis. Stage II is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, the tumor has spread to the uterus and/or fallopian tubes (the long slender tubes through which eggs pass from the ovaries to the uterus). In stage IIB, the tumor has spread to other tissue within the pelvis. In stage IIC, the tumor is found inside one or both ovaries and has spread to the uterus and/or fallopian tubes, or to other tissue within the pelvis. Also, one of the following is true: (1) tumor cells are found on the outside surface of one or both ovaries; or (2) the capsule (outer covering) of the ovary has ruptured (broken open); or (3) tumor cells are found in the fluid of the peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen) or in washings of the peritoneum (tissue lining the peritoneal cavity).
stage II pancreatic cancer listen (... PAN-kree-A-tik KAN-ser)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB, depending on the size of the tumor and where the cancer has spread. In stage IIA, the tumor is larger than 4 centimeters. In stage IIB, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to 1 to 3 nearby lymph nodes.
stage II papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (55 years and older) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
One of the following is found: (1) cancer is found in the thyroid and the tumor is 4 centimeters or smaller; cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) cancer is found in the thyroid, the tumor is larger than 4 centimeters, and cancer may have spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (3) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread from the thyroid to nearby muscles in the neck and may have spread to nearby lymph nodes.
stage II papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (younger than 55 years) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
The tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to nearby tissues and lymph nodes. Cancer has spread from the thyroid to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or bones.
stage II penile cancer listen (... PEE-nile KAN-ser)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, cancer has spread (1) to tissue just under the skin of the penis. Cancer has spread to lymph vessels, blood vessels, and/or nerves; or (2) to tissue just under the skin of the penis. Under a microscope, the cancer cells look very abnormal or the cells are sarcomatoid; or (3) into the corpus spongiosum (spongy erectile tissue in the shaft and glans that fills with blood to make an erection). In stage IIB, cancer has spread through the layer of connective tissue that surrounds the corpus cavernosum and into the corpus cavernosum (spongy erectile tissue that runs along the shaft of the penis).
stage II perihilar bile duct cancer listen (... PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread through the wall of the perihilar bile duct to nearby fatty tissue or to liver tissue.
stage II prostate cancer listen (...PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Cancer is more advanced than in stage I, but has not spread outside the prostate. Stage II is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, cancer (1) is found in one-half or less of one side of the prostate. The prostate-specific antigen (PSA) level is at least 10 but lower than 20 and the Grade Group is 1 (Gleason score is 6 or less); or (2) is found in more than one-half of one side of the prostate or in both sides of the prostate. The PSA level is lower than 20 and the Grade Group is 1. In stage IIB, cancer is found in one or both sides of the prostate. The PSA level is lower than 20 and the Grade Group is 2 (Gleason score is 7). In stage IIC, cancer is found in one or both sides of the prostate. The PSA level is lower than 20 and the Grade Group is 3 or 4 (Gleason score is 7 or 8).
stage II renal cell cancer listen (... REE-nul sel KAN-ser)
The tumor is larger than 7 centimeters and is found in the kidney only. Also called stage II kidney cancer.
stage II salivary gland cancer listen (...SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
The tumor is in the salivary gland only and is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters.
stage II testicular cancer listen (...tes-TIH-kyoo-ler KAN-ser)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA, IIB, and IIC. In stage IIA, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has spread to 1 to 5 nearby lymph nodes and the lymph nodes are 2 centimeters or smaller. All tumor marker levels are normal or slightly above normal. In stage IIB, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has spread to (1) one nearby lymph node and the lymph node is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 5 centimeters; or (2) more than 5 nearby lymph nodes and the lymph nodes are not larger than 5 centimeters; or (3) a nearby lymph node and the cancer has spread outside the lymph node. All tumor marker levels are normal or slightly above normal. In stage IIC, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has spread to a nearby lymph node and the lymph node is larger than 5 centimeters. All tumor marker levels are normal or slightly above normal.
stage II thymoma listen (... thy-MOH-muh)
Cancer has spread through the capsule (sac) that surrounds the thymus and into the fat around the thymus or into the lining of the chest cavity.
stage II transitional cell cancer of the renal pelvis and ureter listen (... tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAN-ser ... REE-nul PEL-vus ... YER-eh-ter)
Cancer has spread to the muscle layer of the renal pelvis or ureter.
stage II uterine sarcoma listen (…YOO-teh-rin sar-KOH-muh)
Cancer has spread into connective tissue of the cervix, but has not spread outside the uterus.
stage II vaginal cancer listen (...VA-jih-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread through the wall of the vagina to the tissue around the vagina. Cancer has not spread to the wall of the pelvis.
stage II vulvar cancer listen (... VUL-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor may be any size and has spread into the lower part of the urethra, the lower part of the vagina, or the anus. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes.
stage II Wilms tumor listen (… wilmz TOO-mer)
Cancer spread out of the kidney to nearby soft tissue or to blood vessels of the kidney and was completely removed by surgery. No cancer cells were found at the edges of the area where the cancer was removed.
stage IIA intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, the tumor (1) is size category 1 (not more than 12 millimeters wide and not more than 3 millimeters thick; or not more than 9 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick) and has spread to the ciliary body; or (2) is size category 1 and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor may have spread to the ciliary body; or (3) is size category 2 (12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and not more than 3 millimeters thick; or 9.1 to 15 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or not more than 12 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick) and is in the choroid only.
stage IIA non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage II non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIA, the tumor is larger than 4 centimeters but not larger than 5 centimeters. Cancer has not spread to the lymph nodes and one or more of the following may be found: (1) cancer has spread to the main bronchus, but has not spread to the carina; and/or (2) cancer has spread to the innermost layer of the membrane that covers the lung; and/or (3) part of the lung or the whole lung has collapsed or has developed pneumonitis.
stage IIB intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
Stage II is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIB, the tumor (1) is size category 2 (12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and not more than 3 millimeters thick; or 9.1 to 15 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or not more than 12 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick) and has spread to the ciliary body; or (2) is size category 3 (15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or 12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick; or not more than 18 millimeters wide and 9.1 to 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and 12.1 to 15 millimeters thick) and is in the choroid only.
stage IIB non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage II non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IIA and IIB. In stage IIB, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and cancer has spread to the lymph nodes on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor. The lymph nodes with cancer are in the lung or near the bronchus. Also, one or more of the following may be found: (1) cancer has spread to the main bronchus, but has not spread to the carina; and/or (2) cancer has spread to the innermost layer of the membrane that covers the lung; and/or (3) part of the lung or the whole lung has collapsed or has developed pneumonitis; OR cancer has not spread to lymph nodes and one or more of the following is found: (1) the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters but not larger than 7 centimeters; and/or (2) there are one or more separate tumors in the same lobe of the lung as the primary tumor; and/or (3) cancer has spread to any of the following: the membrane that lines the inside of the chest wall, the chest wall, the nerve that controls the diaphragm, and/or the outer layer of tissue of the sac around the heart.
stage III adrenocortical cancer listen (... uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size and has spread to (1) nearby lymph nodes; or (2) nearby tissues, organs (kidney, diaphragm, pancreas, spleen, or liver), or large blood vessels (renal vein or vena cava) and may have spread to nearby lymph nodes.
stage III adult Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in groups of lymph nodes both above and below the diaphragm; or (2) in lymph nodes above the diaphragm and in the spleen.
stage III adult non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in groups of lymph nodes both above and below the diaphragm; or (2) in lymph nodes above the diaphragm and in the spleen.
stage III adult soft tissue sarcoma of the retroperitoneum listen (… uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ... REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters but not larger than 10 centimeters and is mid grade or high grade. Mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells. In stage IIIB, the tumor is (1) larger than 10 centimeters and is mid grade or high grade; or (2) any size, any grade, and has spread to nearby lymph nodes.
stage III adult soft tissue sarcoma of the trunk, arms, and legs listen (... uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ...)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters but not larger than 10 centimeters and is mid grade or high grade. Mid-grade and high-grade cancer cells look more abnormal under a microscope and grow and spread more quickly than low-grade cancer cells. In stage IIIB, the tumor is larger than 10 centimeters and is mid grade or high grade.
stage III AIDS-related lymphoma listen (... ree-LAY-ted lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in groups of lymph nodes both above and below the diaphragm; or (2) in lymph nodes above the diaphragm and in the spleen.
stage III anal cancer listen (... AY-nul KAN-ser)
Stage III anal cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and has spread to lymph nodes near the anus or groin. In stage IIIB, the tumor is any size and has spread to nearby organs, such as the vagina, urethra, or bladder. Cancer has not spread to lymph nodes. In stage IIIC, the tumor is any size and may have spread to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes near the anus or groin.
stage III bladder cancer listen (... BLA-der KAN-ser)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread from the bladder to (1) the layer of fat surrounding the bladder and may have spread to the reproductive organs (prostate, seminal vesicles, uterus, or vagina), and cancer has not spread to lymph nodes; or (2) one lymph node in the pelvis that is not near the common iliac arteries (major arteries in the pelvis). In stage IIIB, cancer has spread from the bladder to more than one lymph node in the pelvis that is not near the common iliac arteries or to at least one lymph node that is near the common iliac arteries.
stage III cancer of the uterus listen (... KAN-ser ... YOO-ter-us)
Cancer cells have spread outside the uterus to the vagina and/or lymph nodes in the pelvis but have not spread outside the pelvis.
stage III cervical cancer listen (... SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to the lower third of the vagina, and/or onto the pelvic wall, and/or has caused kidney problems. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread to the lower third of the vagina but not onto the pelvic wall. In stage IIIB, (1) cancer has spread onto the pelvic wall; or (2) the tumor has become large enough to block one or both ureters (tubes that connect the kidneys to the bladder) and has caused one or both kidneys to get bigger or stop working.
stage III childhood Hodgkin lymphoma listen (...HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages III, IIIE, IIIS, and IIIE,S. In stage III, cancer is found in lymph node groups above and below the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs that helps breathing and separates the chest from the abdomen). In stage IIIE, cancer is found in lymph node groups above and below the diaphragm and outside the lymph nodes in a nearby organ or area. In stage IIIS, cancer is found in lymph node groups above and below the diaphragm, and in the spleen. In stage IIIE,S, cancer is found in lymph node groups above and below the diaphragm, outside the lymph nodes in a nearby organ or area, and in the spleen.
stage III childhood liver cancer listen (... LIH-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor cannot be removed by surgery; or cancer that can be seen without a microscope remains after surgery; or the cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes.
stage III childhood non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) in at least one area above the diaphragm (the thin muscle below the lungs that helps with breathing and separates the chest from the abdomen) and in at least one area below the diaphragm; or (2) to have started in the chest; or (3) to have started in the abdomen and spread throughout the abdomen, and cannot be completely removed by surgery; or (4) in the area around the spine.
stage III chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (… KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
There are too many lymphocytes in the blood and there are too few red blood cells. The lymph nodes, liver, or spleen may be larger than normal.
stage III cutaneous T-cell lymphoma listen (... kyoo-TAY-nee-us T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
Nearly all of the skin is red, dry, and scaly; lymph nodes are either normal or enlarged but do not contain cancer cells.
stage III distal extrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage III distal extrahepatic bile duct cancer is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread into the wall of the distal extrahepatic bile duct and to 4 or more nearby lymph nodes. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to the large vessels that carry blood to the organs in the abdomen. Cancer may have spread to 1 or more nearby lymph nodes.
stage III endometrial cancer listen (... EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread beyond the uterus and cervix, but has not spread beyond the pelvis. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC, based on how far the cancer has spread within the pelvis. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread to the outer layer of the uterus and/or to the fallopian tubes, ovaries, and ligaments of the uterus. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to the vagina or to the parametrium (connective tissue and fat around the uterus). In stage IIIC, cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the pelvis and/or around the aorta (largest artery in the body, which carries blood away from the heart).
stage III esophageal adenocarcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread (1) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 3 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 or 2 lymph nodes near the tumor. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread (1) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 3 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (3) into the diaphragm, pleura, sac around the heart, azygos vein, or peritoneum. Cancer may be found in 0 to 2 lymph nodes near the tumor.
stage III esophageal squamous cell carcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread (1) into the mucosa layer, thin muscle layer, or submucosa layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 3 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into the thick muscle layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 or 2 lymph nodes near the tumor. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread (1) into the thick muscle layer or the connective tissue layer of the esophagus wall. Cancer is found in 1 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into the diaphragm, pleura, sac around the heart, azygos vein, or peritoneum. Cancer may be found in 0 to 2 lymph nodes near the tumor.
stage III gallbladder cancer listen (... GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread through the connective tissue layer of the gallbladder wall to (1) the serosa (layer of tissue that covers the gallbladder); and/or (2) the liver; and/or (3) one nearby organ or structure (such as the stomach, small intestine, colon, pancreas, or the bile ducts outside the liver). In stage IIIB, cancer has formed in the mucosa (innermost layer) of the gallbladder wall and may have spread to the muscle, connective tissue, or serosa and may have also spread to the liver or to one nearby organ or structure (such as the stomach, small intestine, colon, pancreas, or the bile ducts outside the liver). Cancer has spread to one to three nearby lymph nodes.
stage III gastric cancer listen (... GAS-trik KAN-ser)
Stage III gastric cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread (1) to the muscle layer of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 7 to 15 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) to the subserosa (layer of connective tissue next to the muscle layer) of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 3 to 6 nearby lymph nodes; or (3) to the serosa (outermost layer) of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 1 to 6 nearby lymph nodes; or (4) to nearby organs, such as the spleen, colon, liver, diaphragm, pancreas, abdomen wall, adrenal gland, kidney, or small intestine, or to the back of the abdomen. In stage IIIB, cancer (1) may have spread to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) or to the muscle layer of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 16 or more nearby lymph nodes; or (2) has spread to the subserosa or to the serosa of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 7 to 15 nearby lymph nodes; or (3) has spread to nearby organs, such as the spleen, colon, liver, diaphragm, pancreas, abdomen wall, adrenal gland, kidney, or small intestine, or to the back of the abdomen. Cancer has spread to 1 to 6 nearby lymph nodes. In stage IIIC, cancer has spread (1) to the subserosa or to the serosa of the stomach wall. Cancer has spread to 16 or more nearby lymph nodes; or (2) to nearby organs, such as the spleen, colon, liver, diaphragm, pancreas, abdomen wall, adrenal gland, kidney, or small intestine, or to the back of the abdomen. Cancer has spread to 7 or more nearby lymph nodes.
stage III gestational trophoblastic neoplasia listen (... jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Cancer has spread to the lung.
stage III hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
The tumor (1) is larger than 4 centimeters or has spread to the larynx (voice box) or esophagus. Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller and cancer is found (1) in one area of the hypopharynx and/or is 2 centimeters or smaller; or (2) in more than one area of the hypopharynx or in nearby tissues, or is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters and has not spread to the larynx.
stage III intrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage III intrahepatic bile duct cancer is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, the tumor has spread through the capsule (outer lining) of the liver. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to organs or tissues near the liver, such as the duodenum, colon, stomach, common bile duct, abdominal wall, diaphragm, or the part of the vena cava behind the liver, or the cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes.
stage III kidney cancer listen (... KID-nee KAN-ser)
One of the following is found: (1) the cancer in the kidney is any size and cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) cancer has spread to blood vessels in or near the kidney (renal vein or vena cava), to the fat around the structures in the kidney that collect urine, or to the layer of fatty tissue around the kidney. Cancer may have spread to nearby lymph nodes. Also called stage III renal cell cancer.
stage III laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has formed in the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis area of the larynx. In stage III cancer of the supraglottis, (1) cancer is in the larynx only and the vocal cords do not work, and/or cancer has spread near or through the inner part of the thyroid cartilage. Cancer may have also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer is in one area of the supraglottis and the vocal cords work normally. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (3) cancer is in more than one area of the supraglottis or has spread to the area at the base of the tongue or to tissues near the vocal cords. The vocal cords work normally. Cancer has also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller. In stage III cancer of the glottis, (1) cancer is in the larynx only and the vocal cords do not work, and/or cancer has spread near or through the inner part of the thyroid cartilage. Cancer may have also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer is in one or both vocal cords and the vocal cords work normally. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (3) cancer has spread to the supraglottis, subglottis, or both, and/or the vocal cords do not work normally. Cancer has also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller. In stage III cancer of the subglottis, (1) cancer is in the larynx only and the vocal cords do not work, and/or cancer has spread near or through the inner part of the thyroid cartilage. Cancer may have also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer is in the subglottis only. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (3) cancer has spread to one or both vocal cords and the vocal cords may not work normally. Cancer has also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller.
stage III lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
The tumor may be any size and has spread to one lymph node that is 3 centimeters or smaller, on the same side of the neck as the tumor; or the tumor is larger than 4 centimeters.
stage III lymphedema listen (… LIM-fuh-DEE-muh)
A condition in which tissue or a limb becomes very swollen and thick, and changes color. It is caused by a block in the flow of lymph and a buildup of fluid in tissues. Also called lymphostatic elephantiasis.
stage III malignant pleural mesothelioma listen (...muh-LIG-nunt PLOOR-ul MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, cancer is found in the inside lining of the chest wall, and in each of the thin layers of tissue that cover the lung, the organs between the lungs, and the top of the diaphragm on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer has also spread into one or more of the following: tissue between the ribs and the inside lining of the chest wall; fat in the area between the lungs; soft tissues of the chest wall; and/or sac around the heart. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes along the center of the chest on the same side of the chest as the tumor. In stage IIIB, cancer (1) is found in the inside lining of the chest wall, and may also be found in the thin layers of tissue that cover the lung, the organs between the lungs, and/or the top of the diaphragm on one side of the chest. On the same side of the chest, cancer may have also spread into one or more of the following: diaphragm; lung tissue; tissue between the ribs and the inside lining of the chest wall; fat in the area between the lungs; soft tissues of the chest wall; and/or sac around the heart. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes above the collarbone on either side of the chest, or cancer has spread to lymph nodes along the center of the chest on the opposite side of the chest as the tumor; or (2) is found in the inside lining of the chest wall, and in each of the thin layers of tissue that cover the lung, the organs between the lungs, and the top of the diaphragm on one side of the chest. Cancer has also spread to one or more of the following: the chest wall and may be found in the rib; through the diaphragm into the peritoneum; the tissue lining the chest on the opposite side of the body as the tumor; the organs in the area between the lungs (esophagus, trachea, thymus, blood vessels); the spine; and/or through the sac around the heart or into the heart muscle. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage III maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: bone at the back of the maxillary sinus, tissues under the skin, the eye socket, the base of the skull, and/or the ethmoid sinuses; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has also spread to any of the following: the lining of the maxillary sinus, bones around the maxillary sinus (including the roof of the mouth and the nose), tissues under the skin, the eye socket, the base of the skull, and/or the ethmoid sinuses.
stage III medullary thyroid cancer listen (... MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size and cancer may have spread from the thyroid to nearby muscles in the neck. Cancer has spread to lymph nodes on one or both sides of the trachea or larynx.
stage III Merkel cell carcinoma listen (stayj ... MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage III Merkel cell cancer is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, (1) the tumor may be any size and may have spread to nearby connective tissue, muscle, cartilage, or bone. A lymph node cannot be felt during a physical exam but cancer is found in the lymph node by sentinel lymph node biopsy or after the lymph node is removed and checked under a microscope for signs of cancer; or (2) a swollen lymph node is felt during a physical exam and/or seen on an imaging test. When the lymph node is removed and checked under a microscope for signs of cancer, cancer is found in the lymph node. The place where the cancer began is not known. In stage IIIB, the tumor may be any size and (1) may have spread to nearby connective tissue, muscle, cartilage, or bone. A swollen lymph node is felt during a physical exam and/or seen on an imaging test. When the lymph node is removed and checked under a microscope for signs of cancer, cancer is found in the lymph node; or (2) cancer is in a lymph vessel between the primary tumor and lymph nodes that are near or far away. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage III multiple myeloma listen (... MUL-tih-pul MY-eh-LOH-muh)
A relatively large number of cancer cells have spread throughout the body. There may be one or more of the following: 1) a decrease in the number of red blood cells, causing anemia; 2) the amount of calcium in the blood is very high, because the bones are being damaged; 3) more than three bone tumors (plasmacytomas) are found; or 4) high levels of M protein are found in the blood or urine.
stage III mycosis fungoides listen (... my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez)
In stage III, 80% or more of the skin surface is reddened and may have patches, papules, plaques, or tumors. Lymph nodes may be abnormal, but they are not cancerous. There may be a low number of Sezary cells in the blood.
stage III nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: the eye socket, maxillary sinus, roof of the mouth, and/or the bone between the eyes; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has also spread to any of the following: the nasal cavity, ethmoid sinus, eye socket, maxillary sinus, roof of the mouth, and/or the bone between the eyes.
stage III nasopharyngeal cancer listen (...NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
One of the following is true: (1) cancer has spread to one or more lymph nodes on both sides of the neck. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller. Cancer is found in the nasopharynx only, or has spread from the nasopharynx to the oropharynx and/or to the nasal cavity, or is found only in the lymph nodes in the neck. The cancer cells in the lymph nodes are infected with Epstein-Barr virus (a virus linked to nasopharyngeal cancer); or (2) cancer has spread to the parapharyngeal space (area near the pharynx, between the base of the skull and the lower jaw) and/or to nearby muscles. Cancer has also spread to one or more lymph nodes on both sides of the neck. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller; or (3) cancer has spread to the bones at the bottom of the skull, the bones in the neck, the jaw muscles, and/or the sinuses around the nose and eyes. Cancer may have also spread to one or more lymph nodes on one or both sides of the neck and/or the back of the throat. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller.
stage III nonmelanoma skin cancer on the eyelid listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ... I-lid)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, the tumor may be any size and may have spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are, to the connective tissue in the eyelid, or to the full thickness of the eyelid, or to the eye, eye socket, sinuses, tear ducts, or brain, or to the tissues that support the eye. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor and the node is 3 centimeters or smaller. In stage IIIB, the tumor may be any size and may have spread to the edge of the eyelid where the lashes are, to the connective tissue in the eyelid, or to the full thickness of the eyelid, or to the eye, eye socket, sinuses, tear ducts, or brain, or to the tissues that support the eye. Cancer has spread to (1) one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor and the node is larger than 3 centimeters; or (2) more than one lymph node on the opposite side of the body as the tumor or on both sides of the body.
stage III nonmelanoma skin cancer on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (… non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ...)
The tumor (1) is larger than 4 centimeters, or cancer has spread to the bone and the bone has little damage, or has spread to tissue covering the nerves below the dermis, or has spread below the subcutaneous tissue. Cancer may have also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor and the node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) is 4 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor and the node is 3 centimeters or smaller.
stage III oropharyngeal cancer listen (... OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is either (1) 4 centimeters or smaller; cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) larger than 4 centimeters or has spread to the epiglottis (the flap that covers the trachea during swallowing). Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller.
stage III ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, and primary peritoneal cancer listen (... oh-VAYR-ee-un EH-pih-THEE-lee-ul fuh-LOH-pee-in ... PRY-mayr-ee PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries or fallopian tubes, or is primary peritoneal cancer, and has spread outside the pelvis to other parts of the abdomen and/or to nearby lymph nodes. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, one of the following is true: (1) cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the area outside or behind the peritoneum (tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers organs in the abdomen) only; or (2) cancer cells that can be seen only with a microscope have spread to the surface of the peritoneum outside the pelvis. Cancer may have spread to nearby lymph nodes. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to the peritoneum outside the pelvis and the cancer in the peritoneum is 2 centimeters or smaller. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes behind the peritoneum. In stage IIIC, cancer has spread to the peritoneum outside the pelvis and the cancer in the peritoneum is larger than 2 centimeters. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes behind the peritoneum or to the surface of the liver or spleen.
stage III ovarian germ cell tumor listen (...oh-VAYR-ee-un jerm sel TOO-mer)
Cancer is found in one or both ovaries and has spread outside the pelvis to other parts of the abdomen and/or nearby lymph nodes. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, the tumor is found in the pelvis only, but cancer cells that can be seen only with a microscope have spread to the surface of the peritoneum (tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen), the small intestines, or the tissue that connects the small intestines to the wall of the abdomen. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to the peritoneum and the cancer in the peritoneum is 2 centimeters or smaller. In stage IIIC, cancer has spread to the peritoneum and the cancer in the peritoneum is larger than 2 centimeters and/or has spread to lymph nodes in the abdomen. Cancer that has spread to the surface of the liver is also considered stage III ovarian cancer.
stage III ovarian low malignant potential tumor listen (… oh-VAYR-ee-un...muh-LIG-nunt poh-TEN-shul TOO-mer)
The tumor is found in one or both ovaries and has spread outside the pelvis to other parts of the abdomen and/or nearby lymph nodes. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, the tumor is found in the pelvis only, but tumor cells that can be seen only with a microscope have spread to the surface of the peritoneum (tissue that lines the abdominal wall and covers most of the organs in the abdomen), the small intestines, or the tissue that connects the small intestines to the wall of the abdomen. In stage IIIB, the tumor has spread to the peritoneum and the tumor in the peritoneum is 2 centimeters or smaller. In stage IIIC, the tumor has spread to the peritoneum and the tumor in the peritoneum is larger than 2 centimeters and/or has spread to lymph nodes in the abdomen. The spread of tumor cells to the surface of the liver is also considered stage III disease.
stage III pancreatic cancer listen (... PAN-kree-A-tik KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size and cancer has spread to (1) four or more nearby lymph nodes; or (2) the major blood vessels near the pancreas.
stage III papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (55 years and older) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
The tumor is any size and cancer has spread from the thyroid to soft tissue under the skin, the esophagus, the trachea, the larynx, or the recurrent laryngeal nerve (a nerve that goes to the larynx). Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage III penile cancer listen (... PEE-nile KAN-ser)
Stage III penile cancer is divided into stages IIIA and IIIB. In stage IIIA, cancer is found in the penis and has spread to 1 or 2 lymph nodes on one side of the groin. In stage IIIB, cancer is found in the penis and has spread to 3 or more lymph nodes on one side of the groin or to lymph nodes on both sides of the groin.
stage III perihilar bile duct cancer listen (... PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread to branches on one side of the hepatic artery or of the portal vein. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to one or more of the following: (1) the main part of the portal vein or its branches on both sides; (2) the common hepatic artery; (3) the right hepatic duct and the left branch of the hepatic artery or of the portal vein; and/or (4) the left hepatic duct and the right branch of the hepatic artery or of the portal vein. In stage IIIC, cancer has spread to 1 to 3 nearby lymph nodes.
stage III prostate cancer listen (...PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, cancer is found in one or both sides of the prostate. The prostate-specific antigen (PSA) level is at least 20 and the Grade Group is 1, 2, 3, or 4 (Gleason score is 8 or less). In stage IIIB, cancer has spread from the prostate to the seminal vesicles or to nearby tissue or organs, such as the rectum, bladder, or pelvic wall. The PSA can be any level and the Grade Group is 1, 2, 3, or 4. In stage IIIC, cancer is found in one or both sides of the prostate and may have spread to the seminal vesicles or to nearby tissue or organs, such as the rectum, bladder, or pelvic wall. The PSA can be any level and the Grade Group is 5 (Gleason score is 9 or 10).
stage III renal cell cancer listen (... REE-nul sel KAN-ser)
One of the following is found: (1) the cancer in the kidney is any size and cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) cancer has spread to blood vessels in or near the kidney (renal vein or vena cava), to the fat around the structures in the kidney that collect urine, or to the layer of fatty tissue around the kidney. Cancer may have spread to nearby lymph nodes. Also called stage III kidney cancer.
stage III salivary gland cancer listen (...SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
One of the following is true: (1) the tumor is larger than 4 centimeters and/or cancer has spread to soft tissue around the salivary gland; or (2) the tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to soft tissue around the salivary gland. Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor. The lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller and cancer has not grown outside the lymph node.
stage III testicular cancer listen (...tes-TIH-kyoo-ler KAN-ser)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer may have spread to one or more nearby lymph nodes. Cancer has spread to distant lymph nodes or to the lungs. All tumor marker levels are normal or slightly above normal. In stage IIIB, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has spread (1) to one or more nearby lymph nodes and has not spread to other parts of the body; or (2) to one or more nearby lymph nodes. Cancer has spread to distant lymph nodes or to the lungs. The level of one or more tumor markers is moderately above normal. In stage IIIC, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has spread (1) to one or more nearby lymph nodes and has not spread to other parts of the body; or (2) to one or more nearby lymph nodes. Cancer has spread to distant lymph nodes or to the lungs. The level of one or more tumor markers is high. OR, cancer is found anywhere in the testicle and may have spread into the spermatic cord or scrotum. Cancer has not spread to distant lymph nodes or the lung, but has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver or bone. Tumor marker levels may range from normal to high.
stage III thymoma listen (... thy-MOH-muh)
Cancer has spread to nearby organs in the chest, including the lung, the sac around the heart, or large blood vessels that carry blood to the heart.
stage III transitional cell cancer of the renal pelvis and ureter listen (... tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAN-ser ... REE-nul PEL-vus ... YER-eh-ter)
Cancer has spread (1) from the muscle layer of the renal pelvis to fat around the renal pelvis or to tissue in the kidney; or (2) from the muscle layer of the ureter to fat around the ureter.
stage III uterine sarcoma listen (…YOO-teh-rin sar-KOH-muh)
Cancer has spread beyond the uterus and cervix, but has not spread beyond the pelvis. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC, based on how far the cancer has spread within the pelvis. In stage IIIA, cancer has spread to the outer layer of the uterus and/or to the fallopian tubes, ovaries, and ligaments of the uterus. In stage IIIB, cancer has spread to the vagina or to the parametrium (connective tissue and fat around the uterus). In stage IIIC, cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the pelvis and/or around the aorta (largest artery in the body, which carries blood away from the heart).
stage III vaginal cancer listen (...VA-jih-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to the wall of the pelvis.
stage III vulvar cancer listen (... VUL-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor may be any size and may have spread into the lower part of the urethra, the lower part of the vagina, or the anus. Cancer has spread to one or more nearby lymph nodes. Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, cancer is found in 1 or 2 lymph nodes that are smaller than 5 millimeters or in one lymph node that is 5 millimeters or larger. In stage IIIB, cancer is found in 2 or more lymph nodes that are 5 millimeters or larger, or in 3 or more lymph nodes that are smaller than 5 millimeters. In stage IIIC, cancer is found in lymph nodes and has spread to the outside surface of the lymph nodes.
stage III Wilms tumor listen (… wilmz TOO-mer)
Cancer remains in the abdomen after surgery and at least one of the following is true: (1) cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the abdomen or pelvis (the part of the body between the hips); (2) cancer has spread to or through the surface of the peritoneum (the layer of tissue that lines the abdominal cavity and covers most organs in the abdomen); (3) a biopsy of the tumor was done during surgery to remove it; (4) the tumor was removed in more than one piece.
stage IIIA colorectal cancer listen (...KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Stage III colorectal cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, (1) cancer has spread through the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) or to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall. Cancer has spread to one to three nearby lymph nodes or cancer cells have formed in tissue near the lymph nodes; or (2) cancer has spread through the mucosa of the colon and/or rectum wall to the submucosa. Cancer has spread to four to six nearby lymph nodes.
stage IIIA intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, the tumor (1) is size category 2 (12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and not more than 3 millimeters thick; or 9.1 to 15 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or not more than 12 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick) and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor may have spread to the ciliary body; or (2) is size category 3 (15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or 12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick; or not more than 18 millimeters wide and 9.1 to 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and 12.1 to 15 millimeters thick) and has spread to the ciliary body; or (3) is size category 3 and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor has not spread to the ciliary body; or (4) is size category 4 (more than 18 millimeters wide and may be any thickness; or 15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and more than 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and more than 15 millimeters thick) and is in the choroid only.
stage IIIA melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, IIIC, and IIID. In stage IIIA, the tumor is not more than 1 millimeter thick, with ulceration (a break in the skin), or not more than 2 millimeters thick, without ulceration. Cancer is found in one to three lymph nodes by sentinel lymph node biopsy.
stage IIIA non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage III non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIA, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and cancer has spread to lymph nodes on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor. The lymph nodes with cancer are around the trachea or aorta, or where the trachea divides into the bronchi. Also, one or more of the following may be found: (1) cancer has spread to the main bronchus, but has not spread to the carina; and/or (2) cancer has spread to the innermost layer of the membrane that covers the lung; and/or (3) part of the lung or the whole lung has collapsed or has developed pneumonitis; OR cancer has spread to lymph nodes on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor. The lymph nodes with cancer are in the lung or near the bronchus. Also, one or more of the following is found: (1) the tumor is larger than 5 centimeters but not larger than 7 centimeters; and/or (2) there are one or more separate tumors in the same lobe of the lung as the primary tumor; and/or (3) cancer has spread to any of the following: the membrane that lines the inside of the chest wall, the chest wall, the nerve that controls the diaphragm, or the outer layer of tissue of the sac around the heart; OR cancer may have spread to lymph nodes on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor. The lymph nodes with cancer are in the lung or near the bronchus. Also, one or more of the following is found: (1) the tumor is larger than 7 centimeters; and/or (2) there are one or more separate tumors in a different lobe of the lung with the primary tumor; and/or (3) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to any of the following: the trachea, carina, esophagus, breastbone or backbone, diaphragm, heart, major blood vessels that lead to or from the heart (aorta or vena cava), or the nerve that controls the larynx (voice box).
stage IIIB colorectal cancer listen (... KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Stage III colorectal cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIB, (1) cancer has spread through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall to the serosa (outermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall or has spread through the serosa to the tissue that lines the organs in the abdomen (visceral peritoneum). Cancer has spread to one to three nearby lymph nodes or cancer cells have formed in tissue near the lymph nodes; or (2) cancer has spread to the muscle layer or to the serosa of the colon and/or rectum wall. Cancer has spread to four to six nearby lymph nodes; or (3) cancer has spread through the mucosa (innermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall to the submucosa (layer of tissue next to the mucosa) or to the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall. Cancer has spread to seven or more nearby lymph nodes.
stage IIIB intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIB, the tumor (1) is size category 3 (15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 3.1 to 6 millimeters thick; or 12.1 to 18 millimeters wide and 6.1 to 9 millimeters thick; or not more than 18 millimeters wide and 9.1 to 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and 12.1 to 15 millimeters thick) and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor has spread to the ciliary body; or (2) is size category 4 (more than 18 millimeters wide and may be any thickness; or 15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and more than 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and more than 15 millimeters thick) and has spread to the ciliary body; or (3) is size category 4 and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor has not spread to the ciliary body.
stage IIIB melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, IIIC, and IIID. In stage IIIB, it is not known where the cancer began or the primary tumor can no longer be seen, and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found in one lymph node by physical exam or imaging tests; or (2) there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; OR the tumor is not more than 1 millimeter thick, without ulceration (a break in the skin), or not more than 2 millimeters thick, without ulceration, and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found in one to three lymph nodes by physical exam or imaging tests; or (2) there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; OR the tumor is more than 1 but not more than 2 millimeters thick, with ulceration, or more than 2 but not more than 4 millimeters thick, without ulceration, and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found in one to three lymph nodes; or (2) there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin.
stage IIIB non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage III non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIB, the tumor is 5 centimeters or smaller and cancer has spread to lymph nodes above the collarbone on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor or to any lymph nodes on the opposite side of the chest as the primary tumor. Also, one or more of the following may be found: (1) cancer has spread to the main bronchus, but has not spread to the carina; and/or (2) cancer has spread to the innermost layer of the membrane that covers the lung; and/or (3) part of the lung or the whole lung has collapsed or has developed pneumonitis; OR the tumor may be any size and cancer has spread to lymph nodes on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor. The lymph nodes with cancer are around the trachea or aorta, or where the trachea divides into the bronchi. Also, one or more of the following is found: (1) there are one or more separate tumors in the same lobe or a different lobe of the lung with the primary tumor; and/or (2) cancer has spread to any of the following: the membrane that lines the inside of the chest wall, the chest wall, the nerve that controls the diaphragm, the outer layer of tissue of the sac around the heart, the trachea, carina, esophagus, breastbone or backbone, diaphragm, heart, major blood vessels that lead to or from the heart (aorta or vena cava), or the nerve that controls the larynx (voice box).
stage IIIC colorectal cancer listen (... KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Stage III colorectal cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIC, cancer has spread (1) through the serosa (outermost layer) of the colon and/or rectum wall to the tissue that lines the organs in the abdomen (visceral peritoneum). Cancer has spread to 4 to 6 nearby lymph nodes; or (2) through the muscle layer of the colon and/or rectum wall to the serosa of the colon and/or rectum wall or has spread through the serosa to the visceral peritoneum. Cancer has spread to seven or more nearby lymph nodes; or (3) through the serosa of the colon and/or rectum wall to nearby organs. Cancer has spread to one or more nearby lymph nodes or cancer cells have formed in tissue near the lymph nodes.
stage IIIC intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIC, the tumor (1) is size category 4 (more than 18 millimeters wide and may be any thickness; or 15.1 to 18 millimeters wide and more than 12 millimeters thick; or not more than 15 millimeters wide and more than 15 millimeters thick) and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is not more than 5 millimeters thick. The tumor has spread to the ciliary body; or (2) may be any size and has spread through the sclera to the outside of the eyeball. The part of the tumor outside the eyeball is more than 5 millimeters thick.
stage IIIC melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, IIIC, and IIID. In stage IIIC, it is not known where the cancer began or the primary tumor can no longer be seen. Cancer is found: (1) in two or three lymph nodes; or (2) in one lymph node and there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; or (3) in four or more lymph nodes, or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together; or (4) in two or more lymph nodes and/or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together. There are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; OR the tumor is not more than 2 millimeters thick, with or without ulceration (a break in the skin), or not more than 4 millimeters thick, without ulceration. Cancer is found: (1) in one lymph node and there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; or (2) in four or more lymph nodes, or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together; or (3) in two or more lymph nodes and/or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together. There are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; OR the tumor is more than 2 but not more than 4 millimeters thick, with ulceration, or more than 4 millimeters thick, without ulceration. Cancer is found in one or more lymph nodes and/or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together. There may be microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin; OR the tumor is more than 4 millimeters thick, with ulceration. Cancer is found in one or more lymph nodes and/or there are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin.
stage IIIC non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage III non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, and IIIC. In stage IIIC, the tumor may be any size and cancer has spread to lymph nodes above the collarbone on the same side of the chest as the primary tumor or to any lymph nodes on the opposite side of the chest as the primary tumor. Also, one or more of the following is found: (1) there are one or more separate tumors in the same lobe or a different lobe of the lung with the primary tumor; and/or (2) cancer has spread to any of the following: the membrane that lines the inside of the chest wall, the chest wall, the nerve that controls the diaphragm, the outer layer of tissue of the sac around the heart, the trachea, carina, esophagus, breastbone or backbone, diaphragm, heart, major blood vessels that lead to or from the heart (aorta or vena cava), or the nerve that controls the larynx (voice box).
stage IIID melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Stage III is divided into stages IIIA, IIIB, IIIC, and IIID. In stage IIID, the tumor is more than 4 millimeters thick, with ulceration (a break in the skin). Cancer is found: (1) in four or more lymph nodes, or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together; or (2) in two or more lymph nodes and/or in any number of lymph nodes that are matted together. There are microsatellite tumors, satellite tumors, and/or in-transit metastases on or under the skin.
stage IV adrenocortical cancer listen (... uh-DREE-noh-KOR-tih-kul KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size, may have spread to nearby lymph nodes, and has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung, bone, or peritoneum.
stage IV adult Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer (1) has spread throughout one or more organs outside the lymph system; or (2) is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm and in one organ that is outside the lymph system and not near the affected lymph nodes; or (3) is found in groups of lymph nodes both above and below the diaphragm and in any organ that is outside the lymph system; or (4) is found in the liver, bone marrow, more than one place in the lung, or cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). The cancer has not spread directly into the liver, bone marrow, lung, or CSF from nearby lymph nodes.
stage IV adult non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... uh-dult non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer (1) has spread throughout one or more organs outside the lymph system; or (2) is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm and in one organ that is outside the lymph system and not near the affected lymph nodes; or (3) is found in groups of lymph nodes above and below the diaphragm and in any organ that is outside the lymph system; or (4) is found in the liver, bone marrow, more than one place in the lung, or cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). The cancer has not spread directly into the liver, bone marrow, lung, or CSF from nearby lymph nodes.
stage IV adult soft tissue sarcoma of the retroperitoneum listen (… uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ... REH-troh-PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The tumor is any size, any grade, and may have spread to nearby lymph nodes. Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung.
stage IV adult soft tissue sarcoma of the trunk, arms, and legs listen (... uh-DULT ... TIH-shoo sar-KOH-muh ...)
The tumor is (1) any size, any grade, and has spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) any size, any grade, and may have spread to nearby lymph nodes. Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung.
stage IV AIDS-related lymphoma listen (... ree-LAY-ted lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer (1) has spread throughout one or more organs outside the lymph system; or (2) is found in two or more groups of lymph nodes that are either above the diaphragm or below the diaphragm and in one organ that is outside the lymph system and not near the affected lymph nodes; or (3) is found in groups of lymph nodes both above and below the diaphragm and in any organ that is outside the lymph system; or (4) is found in the liver, bone marrow, more than one place in the lung, or cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). The cancer has not spread directly into the liver, bone marrow, lung, or CSF from nearby lymph nodes.
stage IV anal cancer listen (... AY-nul KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes or nearby organs and has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver or lungs.
stage IV bladder cancer listen (... BLA-der KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer has spread (1) from the bladder to the wall of the abdomen or pelvis; or (2) to lymph nodes that are above the common iliac arteries (major arteries in the pelvis). In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung, bone, or liver.
stage IV cancer of the uterus listen (... KAN-ser ... YOO-ter-us)
Cancer cells have spread to the lining of the bladder or rectum or to distant parts of the body.
stage IV cervical cancer listen (... SER-vih-kul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread beyond the pelvis, or can be seen in the lining of the bladder and/or rectum, or has spread to other parts of the body. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, based on where the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to nearby organs, such as the bladder or rectum. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lungs, bones, or distant lymph nodes.
stage IV childhood Hodgkin lymphoma listen (...HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found (1) outside the lymph nodes throughout one or more organs, and may be in lymph nodes near those organs; or (2) outside the lymph nodes in one organ and has spread to areas far away from that organ; or (3) in the lung, liver, bone marrow, or cerebrospinal fluid (CSF). The cancer has not spread to the lung, liver, bone marrow, or CSF from nearby areas.
stage IV childhood liver cancer listen (... LIH-ver KAN-ser)
The cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung or brain.
stage IV childhood non-Hodgkin lymphoma listen (... non-HOJ-kin lim-FOH-muh)
Cancer is found in the bone marrow, brain, or cerebrospinal fluid. Cancer may also be found in other parts of the body.
stage IV chronic lymphocytic leukemia listen (… KRAH-nik LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
There are too many lymphocytes in the blood and too few platelets. The lymph nodes, liver, or spleen may be larger than normal and there may be too few red blood cells.
stage IV colorectal cancer listen (...KOH-loh-REK-tul KAN-ser)
Stage IV colorectal cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to one area or organ that is not near the colon and/or rectum, such as the liver, lung, ovary, or a distant lymph node. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to more than one area or organ that is not near the colon and/or rectum, such as the liver, lung, ovary, or a distant lymph node. In stage IVC, cancer has spread to the tissue that lines the wall of the abdomen and may have spread to other areas or organs.
stage IV cutaneous T-cell lymphoma listen (... kyoo-TAY-nee-us T-sel lim-FOH-muh)
Stage IV cutaneous T-cell lymphoma may be either of the following: in stage IVA cancer, the skin is red, dry, and scaly, and the lymph nodes contain cancer cells; in stage IVB cancer, the skin is red, dry and scaly, cancer cells may be found in lymph nodes, and cancer has spread to other organs in the body.
stage IV distal extrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... DIS-tul EK-struh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lungs, or tissue lining the wall of the abdomen and most organs in the abdomen.
stage IV endometrial cancer listen (... EN-doh-MEE-tree-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread beyond the pelvis. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to the bladder and/or bowel wall. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body beyond the pelvis, including the abdomen and/or lymph nodes in the groin.
stage IV esophageal adenocarcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul A-deh-noh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread (1) into the diaphragm, pleura, sac around the heart, azygos vein, or peritoneum. Cancer is found in 3 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into nearby structures, such as the aorta, airway, or spine. Cancer may be found in 0 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (3) to 7 or more lymph nodes near the tumor. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver or lung.
stage IV esophageal squamous cell carcinoma listen (... ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul SKWAY-mus sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread (1) into the diaphragm, pleura, sac around the heart, azygos vein, or peritoneum. Cancer is found in 3 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (2) into nearby structures, such as the aorta, airway, or spine. Cancer may be found in 0 to 6 lymph nodes near the tumor; or (3) to 7 or more lymph nodes near the tumor. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver or lung.
stage IV gallbladder cancer listen (... GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to the portal vein or hepatic artery or to two or more organs or structures other than the liver. Cancer may have spread to one to three nearby lymph nodes. In stage IVB, cancer may have spread to nearby organs or structures. Cancer has spread to (1) four or more nearby lymph nodes; or (2) other parts of the body, such as the peritoneum and liver.
stage IV gastric cancer listen (... GAS-trik KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs, liver, distant lymph nodes, and the tissue that lines the abdomen wall.
stage IV gestational trophoblastic neoplasia listen (... jeh-STAY-shuh-nul troh-fuh-BLAS-tik NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Cancer has spread to distant parts of the body other than the lungs.
stage IV hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to cartilage around the thyroid or trachea, the bone under the tongue, the thyroid, or nearby soft tissue. Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor (the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters) or to lymph nodes anywhere in the neck (affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller), and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found in one area of the hypopharynx and/or is 2 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer is found in more than one area of the hypopharynx or in nearby tissues, or is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters and has not spread to the larynx (voice box); or (3) cancer has spread to the larynx or esophagus and is more than 4 centimeters; or (4) cancer has spread to cartilage around the thyroid or trachea, the bone under the tongue, the thyroid, or nearby soft tissue. In stage IVB, the tumor (1) has spread to muscles around the upper part of the spinal column, the carotid artery, or the lining of the chest cavity and may have spread to lymph nodes, which can be any size; or (2) may be any size and has spread to one or more lymph nodes that are larger than 6 centimeters. In stage IVC, the tumor may be any size and has spread beyond the hypopharynx to other parts of the body.
stage IV intrahepatic bile duct cancer listen (... IN-truh-heh-PA-tik bile dukt KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the bone, lungs, distant lymph nodes, or tissue lining the wall of the abdomen and most organs in the abdomen.
stage IV intraocular melanoma of the ciliary body and choroid listen (... IN-truh-AH-kyoo-ler MEH-luh-NOH-muh ... SIH-lee-ayr-ee BAH-dee ... KOR-oyd)
The tumor may be any size and has spread (1) to one or more nearby lymph nodes or to the eye socket separate from the primary tumor; or (2) to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lung, bone, brain, or tissue under the skin.
stage IV kidney cancer listen (... KID-nee KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread (1) beyond the layer of fatty tissue around the kidney and may have spread into the adrenal gland above the kidney with cancer or to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) to other parts of the body, such as the bones, liver, lungs, brain, adrenal glands, or distant lymph nodes. Also called stage IV renal cell cancer.
stage IV lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, (1) the tumor has spread through tissue in the lip or oral cavity into nearby tissue and/or bone (jaw, tongue, floor of mouth, maxillary sinus, or skin of chin or nose); cancer may have spread to one lymph node that is 3 centimeters or smaller, on the same side of the neck as the tumor; or (2) the tumor is any size or has spread through tissue in the lip or oral cavity into nearby tissue and/or bone (jaw, tongue, floor of mouth, maxillary sinus, or skin of chin or nose). Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters, or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters. In stage IVB, (1) the tumor may be any size and has spread to one or more lymph nodes that are larger than 6 centimeters; or (2) the tumor has spread further into the muscles or bones in the oral cavity, or to the base of the skull and/or the carotid artery. Cancer may have spread to one or more lymph nodes anywhere in the neck. In stage IVC, the tumor has spread beyond the lip or oral cavity to distant parts of the body, such as the lungs. The tumor may be any size and may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IV malignant pleural mesothelioma listen (...muh-LIG-nunt PLOOR-ul MEH-zoh-THEE-lee-OH-muh)
Cancer has spread to tissue covering the lung or the lung on the opposite side of the chest, peritoneum, bones, liver, lymph nodes outside the chest, or to other parts of the body.
stage IV maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV maxillary sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters; or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the original tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters; or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the original tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, and cancer has also spread to any of the following: the lining of the maxillary sinus, bones around the maxillary sinus (including the roof of the mouth and the nose), tissues under the skin, the eye socket, the base of the skull, and/or the ethmoid sinuses; or (2) has spread to any of the following: the front of the eye, skin of the cheek, base of the skull, behind the jaw, the bone between the eyes, and/or the sphenoid or frontal sinuses, and cancer may also have spread to one or more lymph nodes 6 centimeters or smaller, anywhere in the neck. In stage IVB, cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: the back of the eye, brain, middle parts of the skull, nerves in the head that go to the brain, upper part of the throat behind the nose, and/or the base of the skull, and cancer may be found in one or more lymph nodes of any size, anywhere in the neck; or (2) is found in a lymph node larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer may also be found anywhere in or near the maxillary sinus. In stage IVC, cancer may be anywhere in or near the maxillary sinus, may have spread to lymph nodes, and has spread to organs far away from the maxillary sinus, such as the lungs.
stage IV medullary thyroid cancer listen (... MED-yoo-LAYR-ee THY-royd KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, the tumor is any size and (1) cancer has spread from the thyroid to soft tissue under the skin, the esophagus, the trachea, the larynx, or the recurrent laryngeal nerve (a nerve that goes to the larynx); cancer may have spread to lymph nodes on one or both sides of the neck; or (2) cancer may have spread from the thyroid to nearby muscles in the neck; cancer has spread to lymph nodes on one or both sides of the neck. In stage IVB, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to tissue in front of the spine or to the spine or has surrounded the carotid artery or the blood vessels in the area between the lungs. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes. In stage IVC, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or liver. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IV melanoma listen (... MEH-luh-NOH-muh)
Cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung, liver, brain, spinal cord, bone, soft tissue (including muscle), gastrointestinal tract, and/or distant lymph nodes. Cancer may have spread to places in the skin far away from where it first started.
stage IV Merkel cell carcinoma listen (stayj … MER-kul sel KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
The tumor has spread to skin that is not close to the primary tumor or to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lung, bone, or brain.
stage IV mycosis fungoides/Sezary syndrome listen (... my-KOH-sis fun-GOY-deez/say-zah-REE SIN-drome)
When there is a high number of Sezary cells in the blood, the disease is called Sezary syndrome. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA1, IVA2, and IVB. In stage IVA1, patches, papules, plaques, or tumors may cover any amount of the skin surface, and 80% or more of the skin surface may be reddened. The lymph nodes may be abnormal, but they are not cancerous. There is a high number of Sezary cells in the blood. In stage IVA2, patches, papules, plaques, or tumors may cover any amount of the skin surface, and 80% or more of the skin surface may be reddened. The lymph nodes are very abnormal, or cancer has formed in the lymph nodes. There may be a high number of Sezary cells in the blood. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other organs in the body, such as the spleen or liver. Patches, papules, plaques, or tumors may cover any amount of the skin surface, and 80% or more of the skin surface may be reddened. The lymph nodes may be abnormal or cancerous. There may be a high number of Sezary cells in the blood.
stage IV nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters; or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the original tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters; or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the original tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, and cancer has also spread to any of the following: the nasal cavity, ethmoid sinus, eye socket, maxillary sinus, roof of the mouth, and/or the bone between the eyes; or (2) has spread to any of the following: the front of the eye, skin of the nose or cheek, front parts of the skull, base of the skull, and/or the sphenoid or frontal sinuses, and cancer may also have spread to one or more lymph nodes 6 centimeters or smaller, anywhere in the neck. In stage IVB, cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: the back of the eye, brain, middle parts of the skull, nerves in the head that go to the brain, upper part of the throat behind the nose, and/or the base of the skull, and cancer may be found in one or more lymph nodes of any size, anywhere in the neck; or (2) is found in a lymph node larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer may also be found anywhere in or near the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus. In stage IVC, cancer may be found anywhere in or near the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus, may have spread to lymph nodes, and has spread to organs far away from the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus, such as the lungs.
stage IV nasopharyngeal cancer listen (...NAY-zoh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV nasopharyngeal cancer is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, (1) cancer has spread to the brain, the cranial nerves, the hypopharynx, the salivary gland in the front of the ear, the bone around the eye, and/or the soft tissues of the jaw. Cancer may have also spread to one or more lymph nodes on one or both sides of the neck and/or the back of the throat. The affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer has spread to one or more lymph nodes on one or both sides of the neck. The affected lymph nodes are larger than 6 centimeters and/or are found in the lowest part of the neck. In stage IVB, cancer has spread beyond the lymph nodes in the neck to distant lymph nodes, such as those between the lungs, below the collarbone, or in the armpit or groin, or to other parts of the body, such as the lung, bone, or liver.
stage IV nonmelanoma skin cancer on the eyelid listen (... non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ... I-lid)
The tumor has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung or liver.
stage IV nonmelanoma skin cancer on the head and neck (not on the eyelid) listen (… non-MEH-luh-NOH-muh skin KAN-ser ...)
One of the following is found: (1) the tumor is any size and may have spread to the bone and the bone has little damage, or to tissue covering the nerves below the dermis, or below the subcutaneous tissue. Cancer has spread to the lymph nodes as follows: (a) one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor, the affected node is 3 centimeters or smaller, and cancer has spread outside the lymph node; or (b) one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor, the affected node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters, and cancer has not spread outside the lymph node; or (c) more than one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor, the affected nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller, and cancer has not spread outside the lymph nodes; or (d) one or more lymph nodes on the opposite side of the body as the tumor or on both sides of the body, the affected nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller, and cancer has not spread outside the lymph nodes; OR (2) the tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to tissue covering the nerves below the dermis, or below the subcutaneous tissue, or to bone marrow or to bone, including the bottom of the skull, and one of the following is found: (a) cancer has spread to one lymph node that is larger than 6 centimeters and cancer has not spread outside the lymph node; or (b) cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the body as the tumor, the affected node is larger than 3 centimeters, and cancer has spread outside the lymph node; or (c) cancer has spread to one lymph node on the opposite side of the body as the tumor, the affected node is any size, and cancer has spread outside the lymph node; or (d) cancer has spread to more than one lymph node on one or both sides of the body and cancer has spread outside the lymph nodes; OR (3) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to bone marrow or to bone, including the bottom of the skull, and the bone has been damaged. Cancer may have also spread to the lymph nodes; OR (4) cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lung.
stage IV non-small cell lung cancer listen (... sel lung KAN-ser)
Stage IV non-small cell lung cancer is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, the tumor may be any size and cancer may have spread to the lymph nodes. One or more of the following is found: (1) there are one or more tumors in the lung that does not have the primary tumor; and/or (2) cancer is found in the lining around the lungs or the sac around the heart; and/or (3) cancer is found in fluid around the lungs or the heart; and/or (4) cancer has spread to one place in an organ not near the lung, such as the brain, liver, adrenal gland, kidney, or bone, or to a lymph node that is not near the lung. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to multiple places in one or more organs that are not near the lung.
stage IV oropharyngeal cancer listen (... OR-oh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV oropharyngeal cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to the larynx, front part of the roof of the mouth, lower jaw, or muscles that move the tongue or are used for chewing. Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor (the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters) or to more than one lymph node anywhere in the neck (the lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller), and one of the following is true: (1) tumor in the oropharynx is any size and may have spread to the epiglottis (the flap that covers the trachea during swallowing); or (2) tumor has spread to the larynx, front part of the roof of the mouth, lower jaw, or muscles that move the tongue or are used for chewing. In stage IVB, the tumor (1) surrounds the carotid artery or has spread to the muscle that opens the jaw, the bone attached to the muscles that move the jaw, nasopharynx, or base of the skull. Cancer may have spread to one or more lymph nodes, which can be any size; or (2) may be any size and has spread to one or more lymph nodes that are larger than 6 centimeters. In stage IVC, the tumor may be any size and has spread beyond the oropharynx to other parts of the body, such as the lung, bone, or liver.
stage IV ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, and primary peritoneal cancer listen (... oh-VAYR-ee-un EH-pih-THEE-lee-ul fuh-LOH-pee-in ... PRY-mayr-ee PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread beyond the abdomen to other parts of the body. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer cells are found in extra fluid that builds up around the lungs. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to organs and tissues outside the abdomen, including lymph nodes in the groin.
stage IV ovarian germ cell tumor listen (...oh-VAYR-ee-un jerm sel TOO-mer)
Cancer has spread beyond the abdomen to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or tissue inside the liver. Cancer cells in the fluid around the lungs is also considered stage IV ovarian cancer.
stage IV ovarian low malignant potential tumor listen (… oh-VAYR-ee-un...muh-LIG-nunt poh-TEN-shul TOO-mer)
Tumor cells have spread beyond the abdomen to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or tissue inside the liver. Tumor cells in the fluid around the lungs is also considered stage IV disease. Ovarian low malignant potential tumors almost never reach stage IV.
stage IV pancreatic cancer listen (... PAN-kree-A-tik KAN-ser)
The tumor is any size and cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lung, or peritoneal cavity (the body cavity that contains most of the organs in the abdomen).
stage IV papillary and follicular thyroid cancer (55 years and older) listen (... PA-pih-LAYR-ee ... fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler THY-royd KAN-ser ...)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to tissue in front of the spine or has surrounded the carotid artery or the blood vessels in the area between the lungs. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes. In stage IVB, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or bones. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IV penile cancer listen (... PEE-nile KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread (1) to tissues near the penis, such as the scrotum, prostate, or pubic bone, and may have spread to lymph nodes in the groin or pelvis; or (2) to one or more lymph nodes in the pelvis, or cancer has spread through the outer covering of the lymph nodes to nearby tissue; or (3) to lymph nodes outside the pelvis or to other parts of the body, such as the lung, liver, or bone.
stage IV perihilar bile duct cancer listen (... PAYR-ee-HY-ler bile dukt KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to 4 or more nearby lymph nodes. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the liver, lung, bone, brain, skin, distant lymph nodes, or tissue lining the wall of the abdomen and most organs in the abdomen.
stage IV prostate cancer listen (...PROS-tayt KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer is found in one or both sides of the prostate and may have spread to the seminal vesicles or to nearby tissue or organs, such as the rectum, bladder, or pelvic wall. Cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes. The prostate-specific antigen (PSA) can be any level and the Grade Group is 1, 2, 3, 4, or 5 (Gleason score is 10 or less). In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the bones or distant lymph nodes.
stage IV renal cell cancer listen (... REE-nul sel KAN-ser)
Cancer has spread (1) beyond the layer of fatty tissue around the kidney and may have spread into the adrenal gland above the kidney with cancer or to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) to other parts of the body, such as the bones, liver, lungs, brain, adrenal glands, or distant lymph nodes. Also called stage IV kidney cancer.
stage IV thymoma listen (... thy-MOH-muh)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, depending on where the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread widely around the lungs and heart. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to the blood or lymph system.
stage IV transitional cell cancer of the renal pelvis and ureter listen (... tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAN-ser ... REE-nul PEL-vus ... YER-eh-ter)
Cancer has spread to at least one of the following: (1) a nearby organ; (2) the layer of fat around the kidney; (3) lymph nodes; and/or (4) other parts of the body, such as the lung, liver, or bone.
stage IV uterine sarcoma listen (…YOO-teh-rin sar-KOH-muh)
Cancer has spread beyond the pelvis. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB, based on how far the cancer has spread. In stage IVA, cancer has spread to the bladder and/or bowel wall. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to other parts of the body beyond the pelvis, including the abdomen and/or lymph nodes in the groin.
stage IV vaginal cancer listen (...VA-jih-nul KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, cancer may have spread to one or more of the following areas: (1) the lining of the bladder; (2) the lining of the rectum; and/or (3) beyond the area of the pelvis that has the bladder, uterus, ovaries, and cervix. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to parts of the body that are not near the vagina, such as the lung or bone.
stage IV vulvar cancer listen (... VUL-ver KAN-ser)
The tumor has spread into the upper part of the urethra, the upper part of the vagina, or to other parts of the body. Stage IV is divided into stages IVA and IVB. In stage IVA, (1) cancer has spread into the lining of the upper urethra, the upper vagina, the bladder, or the rectum, or has attached to the pelvic bone; or (2) cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes and the lymph nodes are not moveable or have formed an ulcer. In stage IVB, cancer has spread to lymph nodes in the pelvis or to other parts of the body.
stage IV Wilms tumor listen (… wilmz TOO-mer)
Cancer has spread through the blood to organs such as the lungs, liver, bone, or brain, or to lymph nodes outside of the abdomen and pelvis (the part of the body between the hips).
stage IVA anaplastic thyroid cancer listen (... A-nuh-PLAS-tik THY-royd KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer is found in the thyroid only and the tumor may be any size.
stage IVA hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV hypopharyngeal cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to cartilage around the thyroid or trachea, the bone under the tongue, the thyroid, or nearby soft tissue. Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor (the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters) or to lymph nodes anywhere in the neck (affected lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller), and one of the following is true: (1) cancer is found in one area of the hypopharynx and/or is 2 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer is found in more than one area of the hypopharynx or in nearby tissues, or is larger than 2 centimeters but not larger than 4 centimeters and has not spread to the larynx (voice box); or (3) cancer has spread to the larynx or esophagus and is more than 4 centimeters; or (4) cancer has spread to cartilage around the thyroid or trachea, the bone under the tongue, the thyroid, or nearby soft tissue.
stage IVA laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, stage IVB, and stage IVC. In stage IVA, (1) cancer has spread through the thyroid cartilage and/or has spread to tissues beyond the larynx, such as the neck, trachea, thyroid, or esophagus. Cancer may have also spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller; or (2) cancer may have spread from the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis to tissues beyond the larynx, such as the neck, trachea, thyroid, or esophagus. The vocal cords may not work normally. Cancer has spread: (a) to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller. Cancer has spread through the outside covering of the lymph node; or (b) to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer has not spread through the outside covering of the lymph node; or (c) to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer has not spread through the outside covering of the lymph nodes; or (d) to lymph nodes on both sides of the neck or on the side of the neck opposite the primary tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer has not spread through the outside covering of the lymph nodes.
stage IVA lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, (1) the tumor has spread through tissue in the lip or oral cavity into nearby tissue and/or bone (jaw, tongue, floor of mouth, maxillary sinus, or skin of chin or nose); cancer may have spread to one lymph node that is 3 centimeters or smaller, on the same side of the neck as the tumor; or (2) the tumor is any size or has spread through tissue in the lip or oral cavity into nearby tissue and/or bone (jaw, tongue, floor of mouth, maxillary sinus, or skin of chin or nose). Cancer has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters, or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters.
stage IVA maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV maxillary sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters; or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the original tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters; or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the original tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, and cancer has also spread to any of the following: the lining of the maxillary sinus, bones around the maxillary sinus (including the roof of the mouth and the nose), tissues under the skin, the eye socket, the base of the skull, and/or the ethmoid sinuses; or (2) has spread to any of the following: the front of the eye, skin of the cheek, base of the skull, behind the jaw, the bone between the eyes, and/or the sphenoid or frontal sinuses, and cancer may also have spread to one or more lymph nodes 6 centimeters or smaller, anywhere in the neck.
stage IVA nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, cancer (1) has spread to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the cancer and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters; or to more than one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the original tumor and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters; or to lymph nodes on the opposite side of the neck as the original tumor or on both sides of the neck, and the lymph nodes are not larger than 6 centimeters, and cancer has also spread to any of the following: the nasal cavity, ethmoid sinus, eye socket, maxillary sinus, roof of the mouth, and/or the bone between the eyes; or (2) has spread to any of the following: the front of the eye, skin of the nose or cheek, front parts of the skull, base of the skull, and/or the sphenoid or frontal sinuses, and cancer may also have spread to one or more lymph nodes 6 centimeters or smaller, anywhere in the neck.
stage IVA salivary gland cancer listen (...SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
Stage IV salivary gland cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVA, (1) cancer has spread to the skin, jawbone, ear canal, and/or facial nerve. Cancer may have spread to one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor. The lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller and cancer has not grown outside the lymph node; OR (2) the tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to soft tissue around the salivary gland or to the skin, jawbone, ear canal, and/or facial nerve. Cancer has spread (a) to one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor; the lymph node is 3 centimeters or smaller and cancer has grown outside the lymph node; or (b) to one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor; the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters but not larger than 6 centimeters and cancer has not grown outside the lymph node; or (c)to more than one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor; the lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller and cancer has not grown outside the lymph nodes; or (d) to lymph nodes on both sides of the head or neck or on the side opposite the primary tumor; the lymph nodes are 6 centimeters or smaller and cancer has not grown outside the lymph nodes.
stage IVB anaplastic thyroid cancer listen (... A-nuh-PLAS-tik THY-royd KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, one of the following is found: (1) cancer is found in the thyroid and the tumor may be any size; cancer has spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (2) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread from the thyroid to nearby muscles in the neck and may have spread to nearby lymph nodes; or (3) the tumor is any size and cancer has spread from the thyroid to soft tissue under the skin, the esophagus, the trachea, the larynx, the recurrent laryngeal nerve (a nerve that goes to the larynx), or tissue in front of the spine, or cancer has surrounded the carotid artery or the blood vessels in the area between the lungs; cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IVB hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV hypopharyngeal cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, the tumor (1) has spread to muscles around the upper part of the spinal column, the carotid artery, or the lining of the chest cavity and may have spread to lymph nodes, which can be any size; or (2) may be any size and has spread to one or more lymph nodes that are larger than 6 centimeters.
stage IVB laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, stage IVB, and stage IVC. In stage IVB, (1) cancer may have spread from the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis to the space in front of the spine, the area around the carotid artery, or the area between the lungs. The vocal cords may not work normally. Cancer has spread: (a) to one lymph node that is larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer has not spread through the outside covering of the lymph node; or (b) to one lymph node on the same side of the neck as the primary tumor and the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters. Cancer has spread through the outside covering of the lymph node; or (c) to more than one lymph node anywhere in the neck. Cancer has spread through the outside covering of the lymph nodes; or (d) to one lymph node of any size on the side of the neck opposite the primary tumor. Cancer has spread through the outside covering of the lymph nodes; OR (2) cancer has spread from the supraglottis, glottis, or subglottis to the space in front of the spine, the area around the carotid artery, or the area between the lungs. Cancer may have also spread to one or more lymph nodes anywhere in the neck and the lymph nodes may be any size.
stage IVB lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, (1) the tumor may be any size and has spread to one or more lymph nodes that are larger than 6 centimeters; or (2) the tumor has spread further into the muscles or bones in the oral cavity, or to the base of the skull and/or the carotid artery. Cancer may have spread to one or more lymph nodes anywhere in the neck.
stage IVB maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV maxillary sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: the back of the eye, brain, middle parts of the skull, nerves in the head that go to the brain, upper part of the throat behind the nose, and/or the base of the skull, and cancer may be found in one or more lymph nodes of any size, anywhere in the neck; or (2) is found in a lymph node larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer may also be found anywhere in or near the maxillary sinus.
stage IVB nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, cancer (1) has spread to any of the following: the back of the eye, brain, middle parts of the skull, nerves in the head that go to the brain, upper part of the throat behind the nose, and/or the base of the skull, and cancer may be found in one or more lymph nodes of any size, anywhere in the neck; or (2) is found in a lymph node larger than 6 centimeters. Cancer may also be found anywhere in or near the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus.
stage IVB salivary gland cancer listen (... SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
Stage IV salivary gland cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVB, (1) the tumor is any size and cancer may have spread to soft tissue around the salivary gland or to the skin, jawbone, ear canal, and/or facial nerve. Cancer has spread (a) to one lymph node larger than 6 centimeters and cancer has not grown outside the lymph node; or (b) to one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor; the lymph node is larger than 3 centimeters and cancer has grown outside the lymph node; or (c) to more than one lymph node on the same side of the head or neck as the tumor, on the side opposite the primary tumor, or on both sides of the head or neck; cancer has grown outside any of the lymph nodes; or (d) to one lymph node of any size on the side of the head or neck opposite the primary tumor; cancer has grown outside the lymph node; OR (2) cancer has spread to the bottom of the skull and/or surrounds the carotid artery. Cancer may have spread to one or more lymph nodes of any size on either or both sides of the head or neck and may have grown outside the lymph nodes.
stage IVC anaplastic thyroid cancer listen (... A-nuh-PLAS-tik THY-royd KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, the tumor is any size and cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs or bones. Cancer may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IVC hypopharyngeal cancer listen (... HY-poh-fuh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV hypopharyngeal cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, the tumor may be any size and has spread beyond the hypopharynx to other parts of the body.
stage IVC laryngeal cancer listen (... luh-RIN-jee-ul KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, stage IVB, and stage IVC. In stage IVC, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs, liver, or bone.
stage IVC lip and oral cavity cancer listen (... OR-ul KA-vih-tee KAN-ser)
Stage IV is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, the tumor has spread beyond the lip or oral cavity to distant parts of the body, such as the lungs. The tumor may be any size and may have spread to lymph nodes.
stage IVC maxillary sinus cancer listen (...MAK-sih-LAYR-ee SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV maxillary sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, cancer may be anywhere in or near the maxillary sinus, may have spread to lymph nodes, and has spread to organs far away from the maxillary sinus, such as the lungs.
stage IVC nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer listen (...NAY-zul KA-vih-tee…ETH-moyd SY-nus KAN-ser)
Stage IV nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, cancer may be found anywhere in or near the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus, may have spread to lymph nodes, and has spread to organs far away from the nasal cavity and ethmoid sinus, such as the lungs.
stage IVC salivary gland cancer listen (... SA-lih-VAYR-ee gland KAN-ser)
Stage IV salivary gland cancer is divided into stages IVA, IVB, and IVC. In stage IVC, cancer has spread to other parts of the body, such as the lungs.
stage V Wilms tumor listen (… wilmz TOO-mer)
Cancer cells are found in both kidneys when the disease is first diagnosed. Each kidney is staged separately as I, II, III, or IV.
staging listen (STAY-jing)
Performing exams and tests to learn the extent of the cancer within the body, especially whether the disease has spread from where it first formed to other parts of the body. It is important to know the stage of the disease in order to plan the best treatment.
staging system listen (STAY-jing SIS-tem)
A system that is used to describe the extent of cancer in the body. Staging is usually based on the size of the tumor and whether the cancer has spread from where it started to nearby areas, lymph nodes, or other parts of the body.
stamina listen (STA-mih-nuh)
The energy and strength to endure physical activity, stress, or illness over time.
standard medical care listen (STAN-durd MEH-dih-kul kayr)
Treatment that is accepted by medical experts as a proper treatment for a certain type of disease and that is widely used by healthcare professionals. Also called best practice, standard of care, and standard therapy.
standard of care listen (STAN-durd ... kayr)
Treatment that is accepted by medical experts as a proper treatment for a certain type of disease and that is widely used by healthcare professionals. Also called best practice, standard medical care, and standard therapy.
Standard Operating Procedure listen (STAN-durd AH-puh-RAY-ting proh-SEE-jer)
Written instructions for doing a specific task in a certain way. In clinical trials, Standard Operating Procedures are set up to store records, collect data, screen and enroll subjects, and submit Institutional Review Board (IRB) applications and renewals. Also called SOP.
standard therapy listen (STAN-durd THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is accepted by medical experts as a proper treatment for a certain type of disease and that is widely used by healthcare professionals. Also called best practice, standard medical care, and standard of care.
Stanford V listen (STAN-furd …)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs mechlorethamine, doxorubicin hydrochloride, vinblastine sulfate, vincristine sulfate, bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, and prednisone and was developed at Stanford University. Also called Stanford V regimen.
Stanford V regimen listen (STAN-furd … REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination that is used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs mechlorethamine, doxorubicin hydrochloride, vinblastine sulfate, vincristine sulfate, bleomycin sulfate, etoposide phosphate, and prednisone and was developed at Stanford University. Also called Stanford V.
starch listen (starch)
A substance found in plants. It contains sugar molecules joined chemically. It is found in high levels in foods such as potatoes, rice, corn, and wheat. It may be used as a dusting powder, a skin softener, a filler in medicine tablets, and a clothes stiffener.
statin listen (STA-tin)
Any of a group of drugs that lower the amount of cholesterol and certain fats in the blood. Statins inhibit a key enzyme that helps make cholesterol. Statin drugs are being studied in the prevention and treatment of cancer.
statistically significant listen (stuh-TIS-tih-kuh-lee sig-NIH-fih-kunt)
Describes a mathematical measure of difference between groups. The difference is said to be statistically significant if it is greater than what might be expected to happen by chance alone. Also called significant.
stature listen (STA-cher)
The height of a person while standing.
staurosporine listen (STAW-roh-SPOR-een)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkaloids. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
stavudine listen (STA-vyoo-deen)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called nucleoside analogs. It is used to treat infection caused by viruses.
Stavzor listen (STAV-zore)
A drug used to treat epileptic seizures and bipolar disorder and to prevent migraine headaches. It is also being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme that cells need to grow and may cause cancer cells to die. It also blocks the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of anticonvulsant, histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, antimaniacal, migraine headache prophylactic, and antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Depakene and valproic acid.
stellate listen (STEH-layt)
Star shaped.
stem cell listen (stem sel)
A cell from which other types of cells develop. For example, blood cells develop from blood-forming stem cells.
stem cell engraftment listen (stem sel en-GRAFT-ment)
A process in which transplanted stem cells travel through the blood to the bone marrow, where they begin to make new white blood cells, red blood cells, and platelets. It usually happens within 2 to 4 weeks after a stem cell transplant. The transplanted stem cells may come from a donor or from the patient.
stem cell factor listen (stem sel FAK-ter)
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. Stem cell factor is a type of cytokine and a type of growth factor. Also called kit ligand and SCF.
stem cell factor receptor listen (… sel FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter)
A protein found on the surface of many different types of cells. It binds to a substance called stem cell factor (SCF), which causes certain types of blood cells to grow. Stem cell factor receptor may also be found in higher than normal amounts, or in a changed form, on some types of cancer cells, including gastrointestinal stromal tumors and melanoma. Measuring the amount of stem cell factor receptor in tumor tissue may help diagnose cancer and plan treatment. Stem cell factor receptor is a type of receptor tyrosine kinase and a type of tumor marker. Also called c-kit and CD117.
stem cell mobilization listen (stem sel MOH-bih-lih-ZAY-shun)
A process in which certain drugs are used to cause the movement of stem cells from the bone marrow into the blood. The stem cells can be collected and stored. They may be used later to replace the bone marrow during a stem cell transplant.
stem cell rescue listen (stem sel REH-skyoo)
A method of replacing blood-forming stem cells that were destroyed by treatment with high doses of anticancer drugs or radiation therapy. The stem cells help the bone marrow recover and make healthy blood cells. A stem cell rescue may allow more chemotherapy or radiation therapy to be given so that more cancer cells are killed. It is usually done using the patient’s own stem cells that were saved before treatment. Also called rescue transplant.
stem cell transplant listen (stem sel TRANZ-plant)
A procedure in which a patient receives healthy blood-forming cells (stem cells) to replace their own that have been destroyed by disease or by the radiation or high doses of anticancer drugs that are given as part of the procedure. The healthy stem cells may come from the blood or bone marrow of the patient, from a donor, or from the umbilical cord blood of a newborn baby. A stem cell transplant may be autologous (using a patient’s own stem cells that were collected and saved before treatment), allogeneic (using stem cells donated by someone who is not an identical twin), or syngeneic (using stem cells donated by an identical twin).
Stemgen listen (STEM-jen)
A substance that causes blood stem cells (cells from which other types of cells develop) to change into different types of blood cells and increases the number and actions of these cells in the blood. It is being studied in the treatment of myelodysplasia. Stemgen is a type of recombinant stem cell growth factor. Also called ancestim, r-metHuSCF, and recombinant human methionyl stem cell factor.
stent listen (stent)
A device placed in a body structure (such as a blood vessel or the gastrointestinal tract) to keep the structure open.
stereotactic biopsy listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik BY-op-see)
A biopsy procedure that uses a computer and a 3-dimensional scanning device to find a tumor site and guide the removal of tissue for examination under a microscope.
stereotactic body radiation therapy listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik BAH-dee RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position a patient and precisely deliver radiation to tumors in the body (except the brain). The total dose of radiation is divided into smaller doses given over several days. This type of radiation therapy helps spare normal tissue.
stereotactic external-beam radiation therapy listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik ... RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely deliver radiation to a tumor. The total dose of radiation is divided into several smaller doses given over several days. Stereotactic external-beam radiation therapy is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer, such as lung cancer. Also called stereotactic radiation therapy and stereotaxic radiation therapy.
stereotactic injection listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik in-JEK-shun)
A procedure in which a computer and a 3-dimensional scanning device are used to inject anticancer drugs directly into a tumor.
stereotactic radiation therapy listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely deliver radiation to a tumor. The total dose of radiation is divided into several smaller doses given over several days. Stereotactic radiation therapy is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer, such as lung cancer. Also called stereotactic external-beam radiation therapy and stereotaxic radiation therapy.
stereotactic radiosurgery listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-tik RAY-dee-oh-SER-juh-ree)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely give a single large dose of radiation to a tumor. It is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders that cannot be treated by regular surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called radiation surgery, radiosurgery, and stereotaxic radiosurgery.
stereotaxic radiation therapy listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-sik RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely deliver radiation to a tumor. The total dose of radiation is divided into several smaller doses given over several days. Stereotaxic radiation therapy is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer, such as lung cancer. Also called stereotactic external-beam radiation therapy and stereotactic radiation therapy.
stereotaxic radiosurgery listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-sik RAY-dee-oh-SER-juh-ree)
A type of external radiation therapy that uses special equipment to position the patient and precisely give a single large dose of radiation to a tumor. It is used to treat brain tumors and other brain disorders that cannot be treated by regular surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called radiation surgery, radiosurgery, and stereotactic radiosurgery.
stereotaxis listen (STAYR-ee-oh-TAK-sis)
Use of a computer and scanning devices to create 3-dimensional pictures. This method can be used to direct a biopsy, external radiation, or the insertion of radiation implants.
sterile listen (STAYR-il)
Unable to produce children. Also means free from germs.
sterile talc powder listen (STAYR-il ... POW-der)
A mineral, usually used in a powdered form. Sterile talc powder is used to prevent malignant pleural effusions from coming back. Malignant pleural effusion is a condition in which cancer causes an abnormal collection of fluid in the space between the lung and chest wall. When sterile talc powder is inserted into the pleural space, it causes the space to close up so fluid cannot collect there. Also called Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol, Steritalc, and talc.
Steritalc listen (STAYR-ih-talc)
A mineral, usually used in a powdered form. Steritalc is used to prevent malignant pleural effusions from coming back. Malignant pleural effusion is a condition in which cancer causes an abnormal collection of fluid in the space between the lung and chest wall. When Steritalc is inserted into the pleural space, it causes the space to close up so fluid cannot collect there. Also called Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol, sterile talc powder, and talc.
sternum listen (STER-num)
The long flat bone that forms the center front of the chest wall. The sternum is attached to the collarbone and the first seven ribs. Also called breastbone.
steroid listen (STAYR-oyd)
Any of a group of lipids (fats) that have a certain chemical structure. Steroids occur naturally in plants and animals or they may be made in the laboratory. Examples of steroids include sex hormones, cholesterol, bile acids, and some drugs.
steroid cream listen (STAYR-oyd...)
A skin cream containing a type of drug that relieves swelling, itching, and inflammation.
steroid drug listen (STAYR-oyd ...)
A type of drug used to relieve swelling and inflammation. Some steroid drugs may also have antitumor effects.
steroid metabolism gene listen (STAYR-oyd meh-TA-buh-lih-zum jeen)
A type of gene that helps the body build up or break down steroids. Steroids may be made by the body (such as hormones and cholesterol) or made in a laboratory (such as drugs). A steroid metabolism gene called CYP17 is being studied in breast, ovarian, and uterine cancers.
steroid therapy listen (STAYR-oyd THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with corticosteroid drugs to reduce swelling, pain, and other symptoms of inflammation.
Stewart-Treves syndrome listen (STOO-wert-treevz SIN-drome)
A rare disorder marked by the presence of an angiosarcoma (a malignant tumor of blood or lymph vessels) in a person with chronic (long-term) lymphedema. Lymphedema is a condition in which extra lymph fluid builds up in tissues and causes swelling, usually in the arm or leg. Stewart-Treves syndrome usually occurs in patients with breast cancer who develop chronic lymphedema after surgery to remove the breast and lymph nodes under the arm.
STI571
A drug used to treat certain types of leukemia and other blood cancers. It is also used to treat gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST), skin tumors called dermatofibrosarcoma protuberans, and a rare condition called systemic mastocytosis. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. STI571 blocks the protein made by the BCR-ABL oncogene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. STI571 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Gleevec and imatinib mesylate.
Stivarga listen (stih-VAR-guh)
A drug used to treat hepatocellular carcinoma (a type of liver cancer) that was already treated with sorafenib (a type of anticancer drug). It is also used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with other treatment. Stivarga is also used to treat gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body and have not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Stivarga blocks the action of certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Stivarga is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called regorafenib.
stoma listen (STOH-muh)
A surgically created opening from an area inside the body to the outside.
stomach listen (STUH-muk)
An organ that is part of the digestive system. The stomach helps digest food by mixing it with digestive juices and churning it into a thin liquid.
stomach acid stimulation test listen (STUH-muk A-sid STIM-yoo-LAY-shun …)
A test used to measure the amount of gastric acid made by the stomach. The patient receives an injection of the hormone gastrin or insulin. A tube is put through the nose or throat into the stomach and samples are taken from the stomach and sent to a laboratory for testing. Also called gastric acid secretion test and stomach acid test.
stomach acid test listen (STUH-muk A-sid …)
A test used to measure the amount of gastric acid made by the stomach. The patient receives an injection of the hormone gastrin or insulin. A tube is put through the nose or throat into the stomach and samples are taken from the stomach and sent to a laboratory for testing. Also called gastric acid secretion test and stomach acid stimulation test.
stomach cancer listen (STUH-muk KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues lining the stomach. Also called gastric cancer.
stomatitis listen (STOH-muh-TY-tis)
Inflammation or irritation of the mucous membranes in the mouth.
stool listen (stool)
The material in a bowel movement. Stool is made up of undigested food, bacteria, mucus, and cells from the lining of the intestines. Also called feces.
stool guaiac test listen (stool GWY-ak …)
A test that checks for occult (hidden) blood in the stool. Small samples of stool are placed on special cards coated with a chemical substance called guaiac and sent to a doctor or laboratory for testing. A testing solution is put on the cards and the guaiac causes the stool sample to change color. If there is blood in the stool, the color changes very quickly. Blood in the stool may be a sign of colorectal cancer or other problems, such as polyps, ulcers, or hemorrhoids. Also called gFOBT, guaiac fecal occult blood test, and guaiac smear test.
stool test listen (stool test)
A test to check for hidden blood in the bowel movement.
straight colorectal anastomosis listen (strayt KOH-loh-REK-tul uh-NAS-toh-MOH-sis)
A surgical procedure in which the colon is attached directly to the remainder of the rectum after most of it has been removed during surgery for rectal cancer. This procedure is different from the J-pouch colorectal anastomosis because a pouch to store stool is not made from the colon before it is attached to the rectum.
streptavidin listen (strep-TA-vih-din)
A small bacterial protein that binds with high affinity to the vitamin biotin. This streptavidin-biotin combination can be used to link molecules such as radioisotopes and monoclonal antibodies together. These bound products have the property of being attracted to, and attaching to, cancer cells, rather than normal cells. The radiolabeled products are more easily removed from the body, thus decreasing their toxicity.
streptozocin listen (STREP-toh-ZOH-sin)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
stress listen (stres)
In medicine, the body’s response to physical, mental, or emotional pressure. Stress causes chemical changes in the body that can raise blood pressure, heart rate, and blood sugar levels. It may also lead to feelings of frustration, anxiety, anger, or depression. Stress can be caused by normal life activities or by an event, such as trauma or illness. Long-term stress or high levels of stress may lead to mental and physical health problems.
stress protein listen (... PROH-teen)
One of a group of proteins that help protect cells from stresses such as heat, cold, and low amounts of oxygen or glucose (sugar). Stress proteins help other proteins function in normal cells and may be present at high levels in cancer cells. Blocking the activity of a stress protein called HSP90 is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Other stress proteins including HSP70 and gp96 are being studied in vaccines to treat cancer. Also called heat-shock protein and HSP.
stroke listen (stroke)
In medicine, a loss of blood flow to part of the brain, which damages brain tissue. Strokes are caused by blood clots and broken blood vessels in the brain. Symptoms include dizziness, numbness, weakness on one side of the body, and problems with talking, writing, or understanding language. The risk of stroke is increased by high blood pressure, older age, smoking, diabetes, high cholesterol, heart disease, atherosclerosis (a buildup of fatty material and plaque inside the coronary arteries), and a family history of stroke. Also called cerebrovascular accident and CVA.
Stromagen listen (stroh-MUH-jen)
A product that is made of special stem cells taken from a patient’s bone marrow and grown in the laboratory. After a patient’s bone marrow is destroyed by treatment with whole body irradiation or chemotherapy, these cells are injected back into the patient to help rebuild bone marrow. Stromagen has been studied in the prevention of graft-versus-host disease during stem cell transplant in patients receiving treatment for cancer. Stromagen is used in cellular therapy. Also called autologous expanded mesenchymal stem cells OTI-010.
stromal cell listen (STROH-mul sel)
A type of cell that makes up certain types of connective tissue (supporting tissue that surrounds other tissues and organs).
stromal tumor listen (STROH-mal TOO-mer)
A tumor that arises in the supporting connective tissue of an organ.
strontium listen (STRON-shee-um)
A metal often used in a radioactive form for imaging tests and in the treatment of cancer.
strontium chloride Sr 89 listen (STRON-shee-um KLOR-ide …)
A salt form of the radioactive metal strontium-89 that is absorbed by a part of growing bone. It is being studied in the treatment of bone pain caused by cancer that has spread to the bone.
strontium ranelate listen (STRON-shee-um RAN-eh-layt)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of osteoporosis in postmenopausal women. Strontium ranelate helps new bone tissue to grow and decreases bone loss. This lowers the risk of bone fractures.
strontium Sr 89 listen (STRON-shee-um …)
A radioactive form of the metal strontium that is taken up by a part of growing bone. It is being studied in the treatment of bone pain caused by some types of cancer.
study agent listen (STUH-dee AY-jent)
A medicine, vitamin, mineral, food supplement, or a combination of them that is being tested in a clinical trial.
Sturge-Weber syndrome listen (sterj-VAY-ber SIN-drome)
A rare, congenital disorder that affects the brain, skin, and eyes. Abnormal blood vessel growth occurs in the trigeminal nerve in the face and the meninges (covering) of the brain. This abnormal growth causes red or purple skin discoloration (sometimes called a port wine stain), usually on one side of the face, and can also cause seizures, learning disabilities, and glaucoma. Also called SWS.
SU006668
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. SU006668 blocks proteins involved in the growth and spread of cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called orantinib and SU6668.
SU011248
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat renal cell carcinoma in patients who had surgery to remove the kidney and have a high risk that the cancer will come back. SU011248 is also used to treat certain types of pancreatic cancer and gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) in some patients. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. SU011248 blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. SU011248 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called SU11248, sunitinib malate, and Sutent.
SU101
An anticancer drug that works by inhibiting a cancer cell growth factor. Also called leflunomide.
SU11248
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat renal cell carcinoma in patients who had surgery to remove the kidney and have a high risk that the cancer will come back. SU11248 is also used to treat certain types of pancreatic cancer and gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) in some patients. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. SU11248 blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. SU11248 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called SU011248, sunitinib malate, and Sutent.
SU5416
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors and tyrosine kinase inhibitors. Also called semaxanib.
SU6668
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. SU6668 blocks proteins involved in the growth and spread of cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called orantinib and SU006668.
subarachnoid block listen (sub-uh-RAK-noyd blok)
A temporary loss of feeling in the abdomen and/or the lower part of the body. Special drugs called anesthetics are injected into the fluid in the lower part of the spinal column to cause the loss of feeling. The patient stays awake during the procedure. It is a type of regional anesthesia. Also called SAB, spinal anesthesia, and spinal block.
subcutaneous listen (SUB-kyoo-TAY-nee-us)
Beneath the skin.
subcutaneous port listen (SUB-kyoo-TAY-nee-us ...)
A tube surgically placed into a blood vessel and attached to a disk placed under the skin. It is used for the administration of intravenous fluids and drugs; it can also be used to obtain blood samples.
subependymal listen (SUB-eh-PEN-dih-mul)
Describes the layer of cells just under the ependyma (the thin membrane that lines the fluid-filled spaces in the brain and spinal cord).
subependymal giant cell astrocytoma listen (SUB-eh-PEN-dih-mul JY-unt sel AS-troh-sy-TOH-muh)
A benign (not cancer), slow-growing tumor that usually forms in the walls of fluid-filled spaces in the brain. The tumors are made up of large, star-shaped cells called astrocytes. Subependymal giant cell astrocytomas are common in patients with tuberous sclerosis (an inherited disorder in which benign tumors form in the brain and other parts of the body). Also called SEGA.
suberoylanilide hydroxamic acid listen (SOO-beh-royl-AN-ih-lide hy-drok-SA-mik A-sid)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that recurred (came back) or did not get better during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Suberoylanilide hydroxamic acid blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called SAHA, vorinostat, and Zolinza.
subglottis listen (SUB-glah-tis)
The lowest part of the larynx; the area from just below the vocal cords down to the top of the trachea.
subjective improvement listen (sub-JEK-tiv im-PROOV-ment)
An improvement that is reported by the patient, but cannot be measured by the healthcare provider (for example, "I feel better").
submucosa listen (sub-myoo-KOH-suh)
The layer of tissue under the mucosa (inner lining of some organs and body cavities that makes mucus).
subserosa listen (sub-seh-ROH-suh)
The layer of tissue under the serosa (outer lining of some organs and body cavities).
subset analysis listen (... uh-NA-lih-sis)
In a clinical study, the evaluation of results for some but not all of the patients who participated. The selected patients have one or more characteristics in common, such as the same stage of disease or the same hormone receptor status.
substance abuse listen (SUB-stunts uh-BYOOS)
The use of illegal drugs or the use of prescription or over-the-counter drugs or alcohol for purposes other than those for which they are meant to be used, or in excessive amounts. Substance abuse may lead to social, physical, emotional, and job-related problems.
subtenon listen (SUB-teh-non)
Used to describe injections through the membrane covering the muscles and nerves at the back of the eyeball.
subtotal hysterectomy listen (sub-TOH-tul HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the uterus, but not the cervix. Also called partial hysterectomy.
sucralfate listen (soo-KRAL-fayt)
A drug used to treat ulcers. It adheres to proteins at the ulcer site and forms a protective coating over the ulcer. Sucralfate is also used to treat mucositis.
suction aspiration listen (SUK-shun AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A surgical procedure in which the cervix is dilated (opened) and vacuum is used to remove tissue from the uterus. Also called suction evacuation and vacuum aspiration.
suction evacuation listen (SUK-shun ee-VA-kyoo-A-shun)
A surgical procedure in which the cervix is dilated (opened) and vacuum is used to remove tissue from the uterus. Also called suction aspiration and vacuum aspiration.
sudden infant death syndrome listen (suh-DEN in-FUNT deth SIN-drome)
A disorder marked by the sudden and unexpected death of a healthy child who is younger than one year old, usually during sleep. The cause of sudden infant death syndrome is not known. Also called crib death and SIDS.
suicide listen (SOO-ih-SIDE)
The act of taking one's own life on purpose.
sulfa drug listen (SUL-fuh ...)
A type of antibiotic used to treat infection. Also called sulfonamide.
sulfonamide listen (sul-FAH-nuh-mide)
A type of antibiotic used to treat infection. Also called sulfa drug.
sulfuric acid listen (sul-FYUR-ik A-sid)
A strong acid that, when concentrated, is extremely corrosive to the skin and mucous membranes. It is used in making fertilizers, dyes, electroplating, and industrial explosives.
sulindac listen (SUL-in-dak)
A nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID) that is being studied as a treatment for cancer.
sun protection factor listen (... proh-TEK-shun FAK-ter)
A scale for rating the level of sunburn protection in sunscreen products. The higher the sun protection factor, the more sunburn protection it gives. Sunscreens with a value of 2 through 11 give minimal protection against sunburns. Sunscreens with a value of 12 through 29 give moderate protection. Sun protection factors of 30 or higher give high protection against sunburn. Also called SPF.
sunitinib malate listen (soo-NIH-tih-nib MA-layt)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat renal cell carcinoma in patients who had surgery to remove the kidney and have a high risk that the cancer will come back. Sunitinib malate is also used to treat certain types of pancreatic cancer and gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) in some patients. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Sunitinib malate blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Sunitinib malate is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called SU011248, SU11248, and Sutent.
Sun's Soup listen (sunz soop)
A mixture of vegetables and other edible plants that has been studied in the treatment of cancer. The vegetables include soybean, shiitake mushroom, mung bean, red date, scallion, garlic, leek, lentil, Hawthorn fruit, onion, ginseng, Angelica root, licorice, dandelion root, senega root, ginger, olive, sesame seed, and parsley. Sun’s Soup is available in the United States as a dietary supplement.
sunscreen listen (SUN-skreen)
A substance that helps protect the skin from the sun's harmful rays. Sunscreens reflect, absorb, and scatter both ultraviolet A and B radiation to provide protection against both types of radiation. Using lotions, creams, or gels that contain sunscreens can help protect the skin from premature aging and damage that may lead to skin cancer.
superficial listen (SOO-per-FIH-shul)
Affecting cells on the surface. Not invasive.
superfractionated radiation therapy listen (SOO-per FRAK-shuh-NAY-ted RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation treatment in which the total dose of radiation is divided into small doses and treatments are given more than once a day. Superfractionated radiation therapy is given over the same period of time (days or weeks) as standard radiation therapy. Also called hyperfractionated radiation therapy.
superior vena cava listen (soo-PEER-ee-er VEE-nuh KAY-vuh)
The large vein that carries blood from the head, neck, arms, and chest to the heart.
superior vena cava syndrome listen (soo-PEER-ee-er VEE-nuh KAY-vuh SIN-drome)
A condition in which a tumor presses against the superior vena cava (the large vein that carries blood from the head, neck, arms, and chest to the heart). This pressure blocks blood flow to the heart and may cause coughing, difficulty in breathing, and swelling of the face, neck, and upper arms.
supplemental health insurance listen (SUH-pleh-MEN-tul helth in-SHOOR-ents)
An additional insurance plan that helps pay for healthcare costs that are not covered by a person’s regular health insurance plan. These costs include copayments, coinsurance, and deductibles. There are many different types of supplemental health insurance, including vision, dental, hospital, accident, disability, long-term care, and Medicare supplemental plans. There are also supplemental health insurance plans for specific conditions, such as cancer, stroke, or kidney failure. Some types of supplemental health insurance may also be used to help pay for food, medicine, transportation, and other expenses related to an illness or injury.
supplemental nutrition listen (SUH-pleh-MEN-tul noo-TRIH-shun)
A substance or product that is added to a person’s diet to make sure they get all the nutrients they need. It may include vitamins, minerals, protein, or fat, and may be given by mouth, by tube feeding, or into a vein.
supplemental oxygen therapy listen (SUH-pleh-MEN-tul OK-sih-jen THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment in which a storage tank of oxygen or a machine called a compressor is used to give oxygen to people with breathing problems. It may be given through a nose tube, a mask, or a tent. The extra oxygen is breathed in along with normal air. Also called oxygen therapy.
supplementation listen (SUH-pleh-men-TAY-shun)
Adding nutrients to the diet.
support group listen (suh-PORT groop)
A group of people with similar disease or concerns who help each other cope by sharing experiences and information.
supportive care listen (suh-POR-tiv kayr)
Care given to improve the quality of life of patients who have a serious or life-threatening disease. The goal of supportive care is to prevent or treat as early as possible the symptoms of a disease, side effects caused by treatment of a disease, and psychological, social, and spiritual problems related to a disease or its treatment. Also called comfort care, palliative care, and symptom management.
suppository listen (suh-PAH-zih-TOR-ee)
A form of medicine contained in a small piece of solid material, such as cocoa butter or glycerin, that melts at body temperature. A suppository is inserted into the rectum, vagina, or urethra and the medicine is absorbed into the bloodstream.
suppressor T cell listen (suh-PREH-ser T sel)
A type of immune cell that blocks the actions of some other types of lymphocytes, to keep the immune system from becoming over-active. Suppressor T cells are being studied in the treatment of cancer. A suppressor T cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called regulatory T cell, T reg, and T-regulatory cell.
supraclavicular lymph node listen (SOO-pruh-kla-VIH-kyuh-ler...)
A lymph node located above the clavicle (collarbone).
supraglottic laryngectomy listen (SOO-pruh-GLAH-tik LAYR-in-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove the supraglottis, which is part of the larynx (voice box) above the vocal cords.
supraglottis listen (SOO-pruh-GLAH-tis)
The upper part of the larynx (voice box), including the epiglottis; the area above the vocal cords.
suprarenal gland listen (SOO-pruh-REE-nul...)
A small gland that makes steroid hormones, adrenaline, and noradrenaline. These hormones help control heart rate, blood pressure, and other important body functions. There are two suprarenal glands, one on top of each kidney. Also called adrenal gland.
supratentorium listen (SOO-pruh-ten-TOR-ee-um)
The upper part of the brain that contains the cerebrum, ventricles (fluid-filled spaces), choroid plexus, hypothalamus, pineal gland, pituitary gland, and optic nerve. Examples of tumors that form in the supratentorium are glioblastomas, pineal region tumors, and ependymomas.
suramin listen (SOO-ruh-min)
A drug that is used to treat infections caused by parasites. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called antiprotozoals and anthelmintics.
surface electrode listen (SER-fus ee-LEK-trode)
A small device that is attached to the skin to measure or cause electrical activity in the tissue under it. Surface electrodes may be used to look for problems with muscles and nerves.
surgeon listen (SER-jun)
A doctor who removes or repairs a part of the body by operating on the patient.
Surgeon General listen (SER-jun JEH-neh-rul)
The chief medical doctor and health educator for the United States. The mission of the U.S. Surgeon General is to give the public the best scientific information available on how to improve health and lower the risk of illness and injury. The U.S. Surgeon General oversees the U.S. Public Health Service and is chosen by the U.S. President. Each state public health agency and branch of the U.S. military also has its own Surgeon General. The office of the U.S. Surgeon General is part of the Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS).
surgery listen (SER-juh-ree)
A procedure to remove or repair a part of the body or to find out whether disease is present. An operation.
surgical biopsy listen (SER-jih-kul BY-op-see)
The removal of tissue by a surgeon for examination by a pathologist. The pathologist may study the tissue under a microscope.
surgical castration listen (SER-jih-kul kas-TRAY-shun)
Surgical removal of the testicles (orchiectomy) or ovaries (oophorectomy) to stop the production of sex hormones. Decreasing the levels of hormones may stop the growth of certain cancers.
surgical menopause listen (SER-jih-kul MEH-nuh-pawz)
Describes a stop in a woman’s menstrual periods that is caused by surgery to remove her ovaries. Symptoms of menopause include hot flashes, mood swings, night sweats, vaginal dryness, trouble concentrating, and infertility.
surgical oncologist listen (SER-jih-kul on-KAH-loh-jist)
A surgeon who has special training in performing biopsies and other surgical procedures in cancer patients.
surrogate endpoint listen (SER-uh-gut END-poynt)
In clinical trials, an indicator or sign used in place of another to tell if a treatment works. Surrogate endpoints include a shrinking tumor or lower biomarker levels. They may be used instead of stronger indicators, such as longer survival or improved quality of life, because the results of the trial can be measured sooner. The use of surrogate endpoints in clinical trials may allow earlier approval of new drugs to treat serious or life-threatening diseases, such as cancer. Surrogate endpoints are not always true indicators or signs of how well a treatment works.
surrogate pregnancy listen (SER-uh-gut PREG-nun-see)
A type of pregnancy in which a woman carries and gives birth to a baby for a person who is not able to have children. In a surrogate pregnancy, eggs from the woman who will carry the baby or from an egg donor are fertilized with sperm from a sperm donor to make an embryo. The embryo is implanted in the uterus of the surrogate mother, who carries the baby until birth. Surrogate pregnancy may be an option for men or women who want to have children and have had certain anticancer treatments, such as chemotherapy or radiation therapy, that can cause infertility.
surveillance listen (ser-VAY-lents)
In medicine, closely watching a patient’s condition but not treating it unless there are changes in test results. Surveillance is also used to find early signs that a disease has come back. It may also be used for a person who has an increased risk of a disease, such as cancer. During surveillance, certain exams and tests are done on a regular schedule. In public health, surveillance may also refer to the ongoing collection of information about a disease, such as cancer, in a certain group of people. The information collected may include where the disease occurs in a population and whether it affects people of a certain gender, age, or ethnic group.
survival rate listen (ser-VY-vul ...)
The percentage of people in a study or treatment group who are still alive for a certain period of time after they were diagnosed with or started treatment for a disease, such as cancer. The survival rate is often stated as a five-year survival rate, which is the percentage of people in a study or treatment group who are alive five years after their diagnosis or the start of treatment. Also called overall survival rate.
survivor listen (ser-VY-ver)
One who remains alive and continues to function during and after overcoming a serious hardship or life-threatening disease. In cancer, a person is considered to be a survivor from the time of diagnosis until the end of life.
survivorship listen (ser-VY-ver-ship)
In cancer, survivorship focuses on the health and life of a person with cancer post treatment until the end of life. It covers the physical, psychosocial, and economic issues of cancer, beyond the diagnosis and treatment phases. Survivorship includes issues related to the ability to get health care and follow-up treatment, late effects of treatment, second cancers, and quality of life. Family members, friends, and caregivers are also considered part of the survivorship experience.
survivorship care plan listen (ser-VY-ver-ship kayr plan)
A detailed plan given to a patient after treatment ends, that contains a summary of the patient’s treatment, along with recommendations for follow-up care. In cancer, the plan is based on the type of cancer and the treatment the patient received. A survivorship care plan may include schedules for physical exams and medical tests to see if the cancer has come back or spread to other parts of the body. Getting follow-up care also helps check for health problems that may occur months or years after treatment ends, including other types of cancer. A survivorship care plan may also include information to help meet the emotional, social, legal, and financial needs of the patient. It may include referrals to specialists and recommendations for a healthy lifestyle, such as changes in diet and exercise and quitting smoking. Also called follow-up care plan.
Sustiva listen (suh-STEE-vuh)
A drug used with other drugs to treat infection with the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV). It blocks HIV from making copies of itself. It is a type of non-nucleoside reverse transcriptase inhibitor and a type of antiviral agent. Also called efavirenz.
Sustol listen (SUS-tol)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Sustol blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. Sustol is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called granisetron and Sancuso.
Sutent listen (SOO-tent)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat renal cell carcinoma in patients who had surgery to remove the kidney and have a high risk that the cancer will come back. Sutent is also used to treat certain types of pancreatic cancer and gastrointestinal stromal tumors (GIST) in some patients. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Sutent blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. Sutent is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called SU011248, SU11248, and sunitinib malate.
SV40
Simian virus 40. A virus that infects some types of monkeys. It may also infect humans, and was found in some polio vaccines tested in the early 1960s. Although the virus has been shown to cause cancer in laboratory animals, there is no evidence that it causes cancer in people. Also called simian virus 40.
SVV-001
A virus being studied in the treatment of neuroendocrine tumors and other types of cancer. Neuroendocrine tumors form from cells that release hormones in response to a signal from the nervous system. The virus infects and breaks down these tumor cells but not normal cells. It is a type of oncolytic virus. Also called NTX-010 and Seneca Valley virus-001.
sweet elm listen (sweet elm)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, Indian elm, red elm, slippery elm, Ulmus fulva, and Ulmus rubra.
SWS
A rare, congenital disorder that affects the brain, skin, and eyes. Abnormal blood vessel growth occurs in the trigeminal nerve in the face and the meninges (covering) of the brain. This abnormal growth causes red or purple skin discoloration (sometimes called a port wine stain), usually on one side of the face, and can also cause seizures, learning disabilities, and glaucoma. Also called Sturge-Weber syndrome.
Swyer syndrome listen (SWY-er SIN-drome)
A rare genetic condition in which people who have an X chromosome and a Y chromosome (the usual pattern for males) look female. They have normal female reproductive organs, including a uterus, fallopian tubes, and vagina. However, the ovaries do not develop and are replaced by clumps of tissue where they would normally form. Swyer syndrome is usually not diagnosed until puberty, when menstrual periods do not begin as they should. Having Swyer syndrome increases the risk of certain types of germ cell tumors.
Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788 listen (sik KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter …)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788 is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme called Syk, which may help keep the immune system from destroying platelets. Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called fostamatinib disodium, R788 sodium, and Tavalisse.
Sylatron listen (SY-luh-tron)
A drug used to treat melanoma in patients who have had surgery to remove cancer that has spread to the lymph nodes. Sylatron contains the active ingredient peginterferon alfa-2b. It is a type of cytokine and a type of biological response modifier.
Sylvant listen (SIL-vant)
A drug used to treat a rare condition called Castleman disease in patients who do not have HIV or human herpesvirus 8. It is also being studied in the treatment of multiple myeloma. Sylvant binds to a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by some white blood cells and other cells in the body. Sylvant may help reduce inflammation and stop the growth of cancer cells or abnormal blood cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called anti-IL-6 chimeric monoclonal antibody, cCLB8, CNTO 328, and siltuximab.
sympathetic nervous system listen (SIM-puh-THEH-tik NER-vus SIS-tem)
The part of the nervous system that increases heart rate, blood pressure, breathing rate, and pupil size. It also causes blood vessels to narrow and decreases digestive juices.
symptom listen (SIMP-tum)
A physical or mental problem that a person experiences that may indicate a disease or condition. Symptoms cannot be seen and do not show up on medical tests. Some examples of symptoms are headache, fatigue, nausea, and pain.
symptom management listen (SIMP-tum MA-nij-ment)
Care given to improve the quality of life of patients who have a serious or life-threatening disease. The goal of symptom management is to prevent or treat as early as possible the symptoms of a disease, side effects caused by treatment of a disease, and psychological, social, and spiritual problems related to a disease or its treatment. Also called comfort care, palliative care, and supportive care.
symptomatic listen (SIMP-toh-MA-tik)
Having to do with symptoms, which are signs of a condition or disease.
synapse listen (SIH-naps)
The space between the end of a nerve cell and another cell. Nerve impulses are usually carried to the neighboring cell by chemicals called neurotransmitters, which are released by the nerve cell and are taken up by another cell on the other side of the synapse. The neighboring cell may be another nerve cell, a muscle cell, or a gland cell.
syncytium listen (sin-SIH-shee-um)
A large cell-like structure formed by the joining together of two or more cells. The plural is syncytia.
syndrome listen (SIN-drome)
A set of symptoms or conditions that occur together and suggest the presence of a certain disease or an increased chance of developing the disease.
synergistic listen (SIH-ner-JIS-tik)
In medicine, describes the interaction of two or more drugs when their combined effect is greater than the sum of the effects seen when each drug is given alone.
syngeneic listen (SIN-jeh-NAY-ik)
Having to do with individuals or tissues that have identical genes. For example, identical twins and cells and tissues from them are syngeneic.
syngeneic bone marrow transplantation listen (SIN-jeh-NAY-ik bone MAYR-oh tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which a person receives bone marrow donated by his or her healthy identical twin.
syngeneic stem cell transplantation listen (SIN-jeh-NAY-ik stem sel tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A procedure in which a patient receives blood-forming stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop) donated by his or her healthy identical twin.
synovial membrane listen (sih-NOH-vee-ul MEM-brayn)
A layer of connective tissue that lines the cavities of joints, tendon sheaths, and bursae (fluid-filled sacs between tendons and bones). The synovial membrane makes synovial fluid, which has a lubricating function.
synovial sarcoma listen (sih-NOH-vee-ul sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that usually forms in the tissue around the joints in the arms or legs. It may also form in the trunk (chest and abdomen), or the head and neck and it may spread to the lungs, bones, and lymph nodes. Synovial sarcoma usually occurs in children and young adults. It is a type of soft tissue sarcoma.
synovitis listen (SIH-noh-VY-tis)
Inflammation (swelling, pain, and warmth) of a synovial membrane, which is a layer of connective tissue that lines a joint, such as the hip, knee, ankle, or shoulder. Synovitis is caused by some types of arthritis and other diseases.
Synribo listen (sin-RY-boh)
A drug used to treat certain types of chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that have not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Synribo blocks certain proteins involved in cancer cell growth and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of plant alkaloid. Also called homoharringtonine and omacetaxine mepesuccinate.
synthetic listen (sin-THEH-tik)
Having to do with substances that are man-made instead of taken from nature.
synthetic human secretin listen (sin-THEH-tik HYOO-mun seh-KREE-tin)
A drug used to help diagnose gastrinomas (tumors that cause too much gastric acid to be made) and other problems with the pancreas. It is also used to increase secretions from the pancreas and to help identify a duct called the ampulla of Vater. Synthetic human secretin is a form of secretin that is made in the laboratory. Secretin causes the pancreas, liver, and stomach to release substances that help digest food. Also called ChiRhoStim and secretin human.
synthetic protegrin analog listen (sin-THEH-tik proh-TEH-grin A-nuh-log)
A form of a protegrin that is made in the laboratory. Protegrins kill certain bacteria, fungi, and viruses by making holes in their outer membranes and causing them to burst. Synthetic protegrin analogs, such as iseganan, are being studied in the treatment of oral mucositis (painful mouth sores) caused by radiation therapy. It is a type of synthetic antimicrobial peptide.
synthetic retinoid listen (sin-THEH-tik REH-tih-noyd)
A substance related to vitamin A that is produced in a laboratory.
syringe listen (suh-RINJ)
A small hollow tube used for injecting or withdrawing liquids. It may be attached to a needle in order to withdraw fluid from the body or inject drugs into the body.
systemic listen (sis-TEH-mik)
Affecting the entire body.
systemic chemotherapy listen (sis-TEH-mik KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with anticancer drugs that travel through the blood to cells all over the body.
systemic disease listen (sis-TEH-mik dih-ZEEZ)
Disease that affects the whole body.
systemic inflammatory response syndrome listen (sis-TEH-mik in-FLA-muh-TOR-ee reh-SPONTS SIN-drome)
A serious condition in which there is inflammation throughout the whole body. It may be caused by a severe bacterial infection (sepsis), trauma, or pancreatitis. It is marked by fast heart rate, low blood pressure, low or high body temperature, and low or high white blood cell count. The condition may lead to multiple organ failure and shock. Also called SIRS.
systemic lupus erythematosus listen (sis-TEH-mik LOO-pus AYR-ih-THEE-muh-TOH-sus)
A chronic, inflammatory, connective tissue disease that can affect the joints and many organs, including the skin, heart, lungs, kidneys, and nervous system. It can cause many different symptoms; however, not everyone with systemic lupus erythematosus has all of the symptoms. Also called lupus and SLE.
systemic mastocytosis listen (sis-TEH-mik MAS-toh-sy-TOH-sis)
A rare disease in which too many mast cells (a type of immune system cell) are found in the skin, bones, joints, lymph nodes, liver, spleen, and gastrointestinal tract. Mast cells give off chemicals such as histamine that can cause flushing (a hot, red face), itching, abdominal cramps, muscle pain, nausea, vomiting, diarrhea, low blood pressure, and shock.
systemic mastocytosis with associated hematologic neoplasm listen (sis-TEH-mik MAS-toh-sy-TOH-sis … uh-SOH-see-ay-ted HEE-muh-tuh-LAH-jik NEE-oh-PLA-zum)
A rare condition in which too many mast cells (a type of white blood cell) build up in certain tissues and organs in the body, including the bone marrow, lymph nodes, bone, liver, spleen, and small intestine, and may damage them. In systemic mastocytosis with associated hematologic neoplasm, this mast cell buildup occurs together with another blood disorder, usually a myelodysplastic syndrome, myeloproliferative disorder, or acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Systemic mastocytosis with associated hematologic neoplasm usually occurs in adults. Also called SM-AHN.
systemic radiation therapy listen (sis-TEH-mik RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which a radioactive substance, such as radioactive iodine or a radioactively labeled monoclonal antibody, is swallowed or injected into the body and travels through the blood, locating and killing tumor cells.
systemic scleroderma listen (sis-TEH-mik SKLAYR-oh-DER-muh)
A disease that is marked by hardening and thickening of skin, connective tissue that surrounds other tissues and organs, and blood vessels. Also called systemic sclerosis.
systemic sclerosis listen (sis-TEH-mik skleh-ROH-sis)
A disease that is marked by hardening and thickening of skin, connective tissue that surrounds other tissues and organs, and blood vessels. Also called systemic scleroderma.
systemic therapy listen (sis-TEH-mik THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using substances that travel through the bloodstream, reaching and affecting cells all over the body.
T cell listen (... sel)
A type of white blood cell. T cells are part of the immune system and develop from stem cells in the bone marrow. They help protect the body from infection and may help fight cancer. Also called T lymphocyte and thymocyte.
T lymphocyte listen (… LIM-foh-site)
A type of white blood cell. T lymphocytes are part of the immune system and develop from stem cells in the bone marrow. They help protect the body from infection and may help fight cancer. Also called T cell and thymocyte.
T reg listen (... reg)
A type of immune cell that blocks the actions of some other types of lymphocytes, to keep the immune system from becoming over-active. T regs are being studied in the treatment of cancer. A T reg is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called regulatory T cell, suppressor T cell, and T-regulatory cell.
t test listen (... test)
A statistical test that is used to find out if there is a real difference between the means (averages) of two different groups. It is sometimes used to see if there is a significant difference in response to treatment between groups in a clinical trial.
T138067
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. It inhibits the growth of cancer cells by preventing cell division.
T-3
A thyroid hormone. Also called triiodothyronine.
T4
A hormone that is made by the thyroid gland and contains iodine. T4 increases the rate of chemical reactions in cells and helps control growth and development. T4 can also be made in the laboratory and is used to treat thyroid disorders. Also called L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine, thyroxin, and thyroxine.
T4N5 liposomal lotion listen (... LY-poh-SOH-mul LOH-shun)
A lotion being studied in the treatment of skin cancer and a skin condition called xeroderma pigmentosum. It has an enzyme contained in very tiny, fat-like particles. The enzyme repairs damage caused by ultraviolet radiation. T4N5 liposomal lotion is a type of DNA repair enzyme topical agent. Also called Dimericine.
T900607
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called tubulin-binding agents.
Tabloid listen (TAB-loyd)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tabloid stops cells from making DNA and RNA and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called thioguanine.
TAC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide. Also called TAC regimen.
TAC regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with other types of therapy to treat breast cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide. Also called TAC.
TAC-101
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called synthetic retinoids and angiogenesis inhibitors.
TACE listen
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor is blocked after anticancer drugs are given in blood vessels near the tumor. Sometimes, the anticancer drugs are attached to small beads that are injected into an artery that feeds the tumor. The beads block blood flow to the tumor as they release the drug. This allows a higher amount of drug to reach the tumor for a longer period of time, which may kill more cancer cells. It also causes fewer side effects because very little of the drug reaches other parts of the body. TACE is used to treat liver cancer. Also called chemoembolization and transarterial chemoembolization.
tachycardia listen (TA-kih-KAR-dee-uh)
Rapid beating of the heart, usually defined as greater than 100 beats per minute.
tachypnea listen (TA-kip-NEE-uh)
Rapid breathing.
tacrolimus listen (tak-ROH-lih-mus)
A drug used to help reduce the risk of rejection by the body of organ and bone marrow transplants.
tadalafil listen (tuh-DA-luh-fil)
A drug used to treat erectile dysfunction. It is also being studied in the treatment of sexual problems in patients treated with radiation or surgery for prostate cancer. Tadalafil blocks the action of a certain enzyme, which can result in increased blood flow to the penis, causing an erection. It is a type of cGMP phosphodiesterase type 5 (PDE5) inhibitor. Also called Cialis.
TAE
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor or an abnormal area of tissue is blocked. During TAE, a small incision (cut) is made in the inner thigh and a catheter (thin, flexible tube) is inserted and guided into an artery near the tumor or abnormal tissue. Once the catheter is in place, small particles made of tiny gelatin sponges or beads are injected. This blocks the artery and stops the flow of blood to the tumor or abnormal area of tissue. TAE is used to treat some types of liver cancer, kidney cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors. It may also be used to treat uterine fibroids, aneurysms, and other conditions. Also called arterial embolization and transarterial embolization.
Tafinlar listen (TA-fin-lar)
A drug used with trametinib to treat anaplastic thyroid cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also used alone or with trametinib to treat certain types of melanoma. Tafinlar is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tafinlar blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called dabrafenib mesylate.
TAG-72 antigen listen (... AN-tih-jen)
A protein/sugar complex found on the surface of many cancer cells, including breast, colon, and pancreatic cells.
tagraxofusp listen (tag-RAK-soh-fusp)
A drug used to treat a rare blood cancer called blastic plasmacytoid dendritic cell neoplasm. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tagraxofusp is made up of interleukin-3 (IL-3), which binds to an IL-3 receptor protein called CD123. CD123 may be found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells. Tagraxofusp is also made up of a diphtheria toxin, which may help kill cancer cells. Tagraxofusp is a type of cytotoxin. Also called Elzonris.
Tagrisso listen (tuh-GRIH-soh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is used in patients whose cancer has not been treated or has gotten worse during or after treatment with another anticancer drug that blocks EGFR. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tagrisso blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called osimertinib mesylate.
tai chi listen (ty chee)
A form of traditional Chinese mind/body exercise and meditation that uses slow sets of body movements and controlled breathing. Tai chi is done to improve balance, flexibility, muscle strength, and overall health.
tailbone listen (TAYL-bone)
The small bone at the bottom of the spine. It is made up of 3-5 fused bones. Also called coccyx.
tailored intervention listen (TAY-lurd IN-ter-VEN-shun)
The use of communication, drugs, or other types of treatments that are specific for an individual or a group to improve health or change behavior.
talabostat mesylate listen (tal-A-boh-stat MEH-zih-layt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer, including certain types of lung, pancreas, and brain cancer. Talabostat mesylate may help the immune system block the growth of cancer cells. It may also increase the growth of new blood cells. It is a type of enzyme inhibitor. Also called PT-100.
talactoferrin listen (tuh-LAK-toh-FAYR-in)
A drug being studied in the treatment of kidney cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. Talactoferrin increases the activity of dendritic cells (a type of immune cell) to help kill cancer cells. It is a form of human lactoferrin (a protein found in milk, tears, mucus, bile, and some white blood cells) that is made in the laboratory. Talactoferrin is a type of recombinant protein and a type of immunomodulatory protein. Also called talactoferrin alfa and TLF.
talactoferrin alfa listen (tuh-LAK-toh-FAYR-in AL-fuh)
A drug being studied in the treatment of kidney cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. Talactoferrin alfa increases the activity of dendritic cells (a type of immune cell) to help kill cancer cells. It is a form of human lactoferrin (a protein found in milk, tears, mucus, bile, and some white blood cells) that is made in the laboratory. Talactoferrin alfa is a type of recombinant protein and a type of immunomodulatory protein. Also called talactoferrin and TLF.
talampanel listen (tuh-LAM-puh-nel)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of brain tumors and other brain disorders, such as epilepsy and Parkinson disease. It is a type of AMPA receptor antagonist.
talaporfin sodium listen (ta-luh-POR-fin SOH-dee-um)
A drug used in photodynamic therapy. When absorbed by cancer cells and exposed to light, the drug becomes active and kills the cancer cells.
talazoparib tosylate listen (TA-luh-ZOH-puh-rib TOH-suh-layt)
A drug used to treat HER2-negative breast cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Talazoparib tosylate blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Talazoparib tosylate is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called Talzenna.
talc listen
A mineral, usually used in a powdered form. Talc is used to prevent malignant pleural effusions from coming back. Malignant pleural effusion is a condition in which cancer causes an abnormal collection of fluid in the space between the lung and chest wall. When talc is inserted into the pleural space, it causes the space to close up so fluid cannot collect there. Also called Sclerosol Intrapleural Aerosol, sterile talc powder, and Steritalc.
talimogene laherparepvec listen (tah-LIH-moh-jeen lah-HER-pah-REP-vek)
A drug used to treat melanoma that has recurred (come back) after surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer is in the skin and lymph nodes and cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Talimogene laherparepvec is made with a form of the herpesvirus that has been changed in the laboratory to infect and break down cancer cells without harming normal cells. It may also help the immune system kill cancer cells. Talimogene laherparepvec is injected directly into tumors in the skin and lymph nodes. It is a type of oncolytic virus therapy. Also called Imlygic and T-VEC.
talk therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment of mental, emotional, personality, and behavioral disorders using methods such as discussion, listening, and counseling. Also called psychotherapy.
talotrexin listen (ta-loh-TREK-sin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of leukemia and some other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called antifolates.
Talzenna listen (tal-ZEH-nuh)
A drug used to treat HER2-negative breast cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients with certain mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 or BRCA2 genes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Talzenna blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Talzenna is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called talazoparib tosylate.
TAM
A bone marrow disorder that can occur in newborns who have Down syndrome. It is marked by abnormal, immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow (especially the cells involved in making platelets). The liver may also be larger than normal. TAM is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called GATA1. TAM usually goes away on its own within the first 3 months of life. Sometimes TAM causes severe or life-threatening problems, such as bleeding problems, infection, heart, kidney, and liver failure, and abnormal build-up of fluid in the tissues that cover the organs in the body. Infants who have TAM have an increased risk of developing acute myeloid leukemia (AML) before the age of 3 years. Also called TMD, transient abnormal myelopoiesis, transient leukemia, and transient myeloproliferative disorder.
Tamiflu listen (TA-mih-floo)
A drug used to prevent and to treat influenza virus infections. It blocks the release of the virus from infected cells. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called oseltamivir phosphate.
t-AML
A type of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that is caused by previous treatment with chemotherapy or radiation therapy. t-AML is an aggressive (fast-growing) cancer in which there are too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells) in the blood or bone marrow. t-AML usually occurs within 7 years after treatment. It is more common in adults. Also called therapy-related acute myeloid leukemia.
tamoxifen listen (tuh-MOK-sih-FEN)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in women and men. It is also used to prevent breast cancer in women who have had ductal carcinoma in situ (abnormal cells in the ducts of the breast) and in women who are at a high risk of developing breast cancer. Tamoxifen is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. Tamoxifen is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called tamoxifen citrate.
tamoxifen citrate listen (tuh-MOK-sih-FEN SIH-trayt)
A drug used to treat certain types of breast cancer in women and men. It is also used to prevent breast cancer in women who have had ductal carcinoma in situ (abnormal cells in the ducts of the breast) and in women who are at a high risk of developing breast cancer. Tamoxifen citrate is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. Tamoxifen citrate is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called tamoxifen.
tamsulosin hydrochloride listen (tam-SOO-loh-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. Tamsulosin hydrochloride relaxes the muscles of the prostate and bladder, which helps the flow of urine. It is a type of alpha blocker. Also called Flomax.
tandutinib listen (tan-DOO-tih-nib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may stop cancer cell growth by blocking certain enzymes. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called CT53518 and MLN518.
tanespimycin listen (ta-NEH-spih-MY-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made from an antibiotic called geldanamycin. Tanespimycin helps cause the breakdown of certain proteins in the cell, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic and a type of HSP90 inhibitor. Also called 17-AAG and 17-N-allylamino-17-demethoxygeldanamycin.
tannic acid listen (TA-nik A-sid)
A type of chemical found in plants and in certain foods, such as fruits, vegetables, nuts, wine, and tea. Tannic acid has antioxidant properties and may promote good health. It is being studied in the prevention of cancer, heart disease, and other diseases. It is also used in certain medicines, fabrics, leather, and ink. Tannic acid is a type of polyphenol. Also called tannin.
tannin listen (TA-nin)
A type of chemical found in plants and in certain foods, such as fruits, vegetables, nuts, wine, and tea. Tannins have antioxidant properties and may promote good health. They are being studied in the prevention of cancer, heart disease, and other diseases. They are also used in certain medicines, fabrics, leather, and ink. A tannin is a type of polyphenol. Also called tannic acid.
tapentadol hydrochloride listen (tuh-PEN-tuh-dol HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain. It binds to opioid receptors and other molecules in the central nervous system. Tapentadol hydrochloride is a type of opioid and a type of analgesic agent. Also called Nucynta.
Tarceva listen (tar-SEE-vuh)
A drug used to treat certain types of non-small cell lung cancer. It is also used with gemcitabine hydrochloride to treat pancreatic cancer that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tarceva blocks a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of EGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called CP-358,774, erlotinib hydrochloride, and OSI-774.
targeted radionuclide therapy listen (TAR-geh-ted RAY-dee-oh-NOO-klide THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy in which a radionuclide (a radioactive chemical) is linked to a cell-targeting molecule, such as a monoclonal antibody, and injected into the body. The cell-targeting molecule binds to a specific target found on some cancer cells. This may help kill the targeted cancer cells while limiting the harm to normal cells. Targeted radionuclide therapy is used to treat prostate cancer and some other types of cancer. Also called molecular radiation therapy.
targeted therapy listen (TAR-geh-ted THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses drugs or other substances to identify and attack specific types of cancer cells with less harm to normal cells. Some targeted therapies block the action of certain enzymes, proteins, or other molecules involved in the growth and spread of cancer cells. Other types of targeted therapies help the immune system kill cancer cells or deliver toxic substances directly to cancer cells and kill them. Targeted therapy may have fewer side effects than other types of cancer treatment. Most targeted therapies are either small molecule drugs or monoclonal antibodies.
Targretin listen (tar-GREH-tin)
A drug used to treat skin problems caused by cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that have not gotten better after other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Targretin is a type of retinoid. Also called bexarotene and LGD1069.
tariquidar listen (tar-IH-kwih-dar)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may help tumor cells respond again to drugs they have become resistant (unable to respond) to. Tariquidar is a type of multidrug resistance inhibitor and a type of P-glycoprotein antagonist. Also called XR9576.
Tarvacin listen (TAR-vuh-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer and infections caused by certain viruses. It binds to substances on the surface of tumor cells, certain viruses, and cells infected with a virus. The immune system detects Tarvacin on the cells and the viruses and may destroy them. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called bavituximab.
Tasigna listen (tuh-SIG-nuh)
A drug used to treat certain types of chronic myelogenous leukemia (CML) that are Philadelphia chromosome positive. It is used in some newly diagnosed patients. It is also used in patients who are not able to take or who have not gotten better after treatment with imatinib mesylate or other tyrosine kinase inhibitor. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tasigna blocks BCR-ABL and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called nilotinib hydrochloride monohydrate.
taurolidine listen (TAW-roh-LIH-deen)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called anti-infectives.
Tavalisse listen (TA-vah-lees)
A drug used to treat thrombocytopenia (low platelet levels) in patients with chronic immune thrombocytopenic purpura (ITP) that did not get better with other treatment. ITP is a condition in which platelets are destroyed by the immune system. Tavalisse is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme called Syk, which may help keep the immune system from destroying platelets. Tavalisse is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called fostamatinib disodium, R788 sodium, and Syk kinase inhibitor R-935788.
taxane listen (TAK-sayn)
A type of drug that blocks cell growth by stopping mitosis (cell division). Taxanes interfere with microtubules (cellular structures that help move chromosomes during mitosis). They are used to treat cancer. A taxane is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent.
taxoid XRP6258 listen (TAK-zoyd …)
A drug used with prednisone to treat hormone-resistant prostate cancer that has spread and that had been treated with docetaxel. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Taxoid XRP6258 blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimitotic agent. Also called cabazitaxel and Jevtana.
Taxol listen (TAK-sol)
A drug used to treat AIDS-related Kaposi sarcoma, advanced ovarian cancer, and certain types of breast cancer. It is also used with cisplatin to treat non-small cell lung cancer in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Taxol blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimitotic agent. Also called paclitaxel.
Taxotere listen (TAK-soh-teer)
A drug used to treat certain types of cancers of the breast, stomach, lung, prostate, and head and neck. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Taxotere kills cancer cells by stopping them from dividing. It is a type of taxane. Also called docetaxel.
Taxotere-Platinol-fluorouracil listen (TAK-soh-teer-PLA-tih-nol-floor-oh-YOOR-uh-sil)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), cisplatin (Platinol), and fluorouracil. Also called DCF, docetaxel-cisplatin-fluorouracil, TPF, and TPF regimen.
tazarotene listen (ta-ZAR-oh-teen)
A drug used on the skin to treat several skin conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of basal cell skin cancer and basal cell nevus syndrome. Tazarotene is related to vitamin A and is made in the laboratory. It turns on a gene that may help stop the growth of skin cancer cells. Tazarotene is a type of synthetic retinoid. Also called Avage and Tazorac.
tazemetostat listen (TA-zeh-MEH-toh-stat)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Tazemetostat blocks certain enzymes involved in gene expression and cell division. In some types of cancer cells, these enzymes may be found at high levels or in a mutated (changed) form. Blocking these enzymes may help keep cancer cells from growing. Tazemetostat is a type of histone methyltransferase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy.
Tazorac listen (TAZ-oh-rak)
A drug used on the skin to treat several skin conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of basal cell skin cancer and basal cell nevus syndrome. Tazorac is related to vitamin A and is made in the laboratory. It turns on a gene that may help stop the growth of skin cancer cells. Tazorac is a type of synthetic retinoid. Also called Avage and tazarotene.
TB
A disease caused by a specific type of bacteria that spreads from one person to another through the air. TB can affect many parts of the body, but most often affects the lungs. A person may not have symptoms of TB for years, but they may appear when the patient becomes ill with a serious condition like diabetes, AIDS, or cancer. TB can usually be treated and cured with antibiotics. Also called tuberculosis.
TBI
A type of radiation therapy that is given to the entire body. TBI is often used with high-dose anticancer drugs to help prepare a patient for a stem cell transplant. It is done to kill any cancer cells that are left in the body and helps make room in the patient’s bone marrow for new blood stem cells to grow. TBI may also help prevent the body’s immune system from rejecting the transplanted stem cells. Also called total-body irradiation.
Tc 99m sulfur colloid listen (… SUL-fur KAH-loyd)
A substance being studied as a way to find cancer in the body. It is also used to find sentinel lymph nodes in breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called sulfur colloid. Sulfer colloid is taken up by special cells in lymph tissue, and in the liver, spleen, and bone marrow after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity is used to find where the Tc 99m sulfur colloid is in the body. Also called Tc-99m SC and technetium Tc 99m-sulfur colloid.
Tc-99m Dextran listen (... DEK-stran)
A substance being studied as a way to find sentinel lymph nodes in some types of skin cancer and breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called dextran. Dextran helps technetium stay in blood and lymph vessels after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity shows which lymph nodes near the tumor have Tc-99m Dextran in them. Also called 99m-Tc-Dx and technetium Tc 99m-dextran.
Tc-99m SC
A substance being studied as a way to find cancer in the body. It is also used to find sentinel lymph nodes in breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called sulfur colloid. Sulfer colloid is taken up by special cells in lymph tissue, and in the liver, spleen, and bone marrow after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity is used to find where the Tc-99m SC is in the body. Also called Tc 99m sulfur colloid and technetium Tc 99m-sulfur colloid.
TCE
A device used to look at tissues in the esophagus. It is a tiny capsule with a laser scanner inside and a very thin cord attached to it. The patient swallows the capsule and the thin cord helps keep the capsule in a specific area in the esophagus. The cord is also used to remove the capsule. Pictures are taken by the laser scanner and sent to a computer for viewing. A TCE is used to find early cancers of the esophagus and other parts of the body. Also called tethered capsule endoscope.
T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia listen (T-sel uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-BLAS-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many T-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called precursor T-lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia.
T-cell acute lymphocytic leukemia listen (T-sel uh-KYOOT LIM-foh-SIH-tik loo-KEE-mee-uh)
An aggressive (fast-growing) type of leukemia (blood cancer) in which too many T-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the bone marrow and blood. Also called precursor T-lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia.
T-cell depletion listen (... sel dih-PLEE-shun)
Treatment to destroy T cells, which play an important role in the immune response. Elimination of T cells from a bone marrow graft from a donor may reduce the chance of an immune reaction against the recipient's tissues.
T-cell large granular lymphocyte leukemia listen (… sel larj GRAN-yoo-lur LIM-foh-site loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia in which large T lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) that contain granules (small particles) are found in the blood. It is a chronic disease that may last for a long time and get worse. Also called T-LGL leukemia.
T-cell lymphoma listen (... sel lim-FOH-muh)
A type of cancer that forms in T cells (a type of immune system cell). T-cell lymphomas may be either indolent (slow-growing) or aggressive (fast-growing). Most T-cell lymphomas are non-Hodgkin lymphomas. There are many different types of T-cell non-Hodgkin lymphomas. These include mycosis fungoides, anaplastic large cell lymphoma, and precursor T-lymphoblastic lymphoma. Prognosis and treatment depend on type and stage of the cancer.
T-cell receptor listen (… sel reh-SEP-ter)
A group of proteins found on T cells (a type of immune cell that recognizes and binds to foreign substances). T-cell receptors bind to certain antigens (proteins) found on abnormal cells, cancer cells, cells from other organisms, and cells infected with a virus or another microorganism. This interaction causes the T cells to attack these cells and helps the body fight infection, cancer, or other diseases. Also called TCR.
T-cell receptor gene rearrangement test listen (… reh-SEP-ter jeen REE-uh-RAYNJ-ment …)
A laboratory test in which blood or bone marrow cells are checked to see if there is a certain change in the genes that make receptors on T cells (white blood cells that fight infection). Testing for this gene change can tell whether large numbers of T cells with a certain receptor are being made. This may be a sign of cancer.
T-cell transfer therapy listen (… sel TRANZ-fer THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of immunotherapy in which T cells (a type of immune cell) are given to a patient to help the body fight diseases, such as cancer. In cancer therapy, T cells are usually taken from the patient's own blood or tumor tissue, grown in large numbers in the laboratory, and then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight the cancer. Sometimes, the T cells are changed in the laboratory to make them better able to target the patient's cancer cells and kill them. Types of T-cell transfer therapy include chimeric antigen receptor T-cell (CAR T-cell) therapy and tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte (TIL) therapy. T-cell transfer therapy that uses T cells from a donor is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and some infections. Also called adoptive cell therapy, adoptive cell transfer, and cellular adoptive immunotherapy.
TCGA
A project to identify the complete set of DNA changes in many different types of cancer. Studying these changes may help researchers understand how different types of cancer form. This may lead to new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. TCGA is led by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) and the National Human Genome Research Institute (NHGRI), which are parts of the National Institutes of Health (NIH). Also called The Cancer Genome Atlas.
TCM
A medical system that has been used for thousands of years to prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. It is based on the belief that qi (the body's vital energy) flows along meridians (channels) in the body and keeps a person’s spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical health in balance. TCM aims to restore the body’s balance and harmony between the natural opposing forces of yin and yang, which can block qi and cause disease. TCM includes acupuncture, diet, herbal therapy, meditation, physical exercise, and massage. Also called Oriental medicine and Traditional Chinese Medicine.
TCR
A group of proteins found on T cells (a type of immune cell that recognizes and binds to foreign substances). TCRs bind to certain antigens (proteins) found on abnormal cells, cancer cells, cells from other organisms, and cells infected with a virus or another microorganism. This interaction causes the T cells to attack these cells and helps the body fight infection, cancer, or other diseases. Also called T-cell receptor.
T-DM1
A drug used to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is used in certain patients who have already been treated with an anticancer drug called trastuzumab and a type of drug called a taxane. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. T-DM1 contains a monoclonal antibody called trastuzumab that binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some breast cancer cells. It also contains an anticancer drug called DM1, which may help kill cancer cells. T-DM1 is a type of antibody-drug conjugate. Also called ado-trastuzumab emtansine and Kadcyla.
tea tree listen (tee tree)
A tree that is a member of the myrtle family. Oil from the tea tree is used in shampoos and skin care products and to treat skin infections. It has been used in some cultures to treat other skin conditions, including acne, burns, and insect bites. The scientific name is Melaleuca alternifolia.
Tecentriq listen (teh-SEN-trik)
A drug used to treat certain types of small cell lung cancer, breast cancer, non-small cell lung cancer, and urothelial cancer (a type of bladder cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tecentriq binds to a protein called PD-L1, which is found on some cancer cells. Tecentriq may block this protein and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called atezolizumab.
technetium Tc 99m-demobesin-4 listen (tek-NEE-shee-um … deh-MAH-beh-sin …)
A substance being studied as a way to find certain types of cancer in the body. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called demobesin. Demobesin binds to the receptor for bombesin (a substance that is found at higher-than-normal levels on some types of cancer cells). Technetium Tc 99m-demobesin-4 collects in cancer cells and a machine is used to find where the cancer cells are in the body.
technetium Tc 99m-dextran listen (tek-NEE-shee-um ... DEK-stran)
A substance being studied as a way to find sentinel lymph nodes in some types of skin cancer and breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called dextran. Dextran helps technetium stay in blood and lymph vessels after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity shows which lymph nodes near the tumor have technetium Tc 99m-dextran in them. Also called 99m-Tc-Dx and Tc-99m Dextran.
technetium Tc 99m-sulfur colloid listen (tek-NEE-shee-um ... SUL-fur KAH-loyd)
A substance being studied as a way to find cancer in the body. It is also used to find sentinel lymph nodes in breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called sulfur colloid. Sulfer colloid is taken up by special cells in lymph tissue, and in the liver, spleen, and bone marrow after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity is used to find where the technetium Tc 99m-sulfur colloid is in the body. Also called Tc 99m sulfur colloid and Tc-99m SC.
technician listen (tek-NIH-shun)
A person trained in the techniques (methods) and skills of a profession. For example, a mammogram technician is trained to perform mammograms.
tegafur listen (TEH-guh-fer)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites.
tegafur-uracil listen (TEH-guh-fer-YOOR-uh-sil)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a combination of tegafur and uracil. The tegafur is taken up by the cancer cells and breaks down into 5-FU, a substance that kills tumor cells. The uracil causes higher amounts of 5-FU to stay inside the cells and kill them. Tegafur-uracil is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Ftorafur and UFT.
teicoplanin listen (ty-koh-PLAY-nin)
A substance used to treat bacterial infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called antibiotics.
telangiectasia listen (teh-LAN-jee-ek-TAY-zhuh)
The permanent enlargement of blood vessels, causing redness in the skin or mucous membranes.
Telcyta listen (tel-SY-tuh)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called glutathione analogs. Also called TLK286.
telemedicine listen (TEH-leh-MEH-dih-sin)
The delivery of healthcare from a distance using electronic information and technology such as computers, cameras, videoconferencing, the Internet, satellite, and wireless communications.
telomerase listen (teh-LOH-meh-rays)
An enzyme in cells that helps keep them alive by adding DNA to telomeres (the ends of chromosomes). Each time a cell divides, the telomeres lose a small amount of DNA and become shorter. Over time, the chromosomes become damaged and the cells die. Telomerase helps keep this from happening. Cancer cells usually have more telomerase than most normal cells.
telomere listen (TEH-loh-meer)
The ends of a chromosome. Each time a cell divides, the telomeres lose a small amount of DNA and become shorter. Over time, the chromosomes become damaged and the cells die. In cancer cells the telomeres do not get shorter, and may become longer, as the cells divide.
Temodar listen (TEH-moh-dar)
A drug used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Temodar damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called temozolomide.
temoporfin listen (teh-moh-POR-fin)
An anticancer drug that is also used in cancer prevention. It belongs to the family of drugs called photosensitizing agents.
temozolomide listen (teh-moh-ZOH-loh-mide)
A drug used to treat certain types of brain tumors. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Temozolomide damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called Temodar.
temsirolimus listen (TEM-sih-ROH-lih-mus)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Temsirolimus blocks a protein involved in cell division, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of rapamycin analog and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Also called CCI-779 and Torisel.
tendon listen (TEN-dun)
Tough, fibrous, cord-like tissue that connects muscle to bone or another structure, such as an eyeball. Tendons help the bone or structure to move.
teniposide listen (teh-nih-POH-side)
An anticancer drug that is a podophyllotoxin derivative and belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors.
TENS listen
A procedure in which mild electric currents are applied to some areas of the skin. Also called transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation.
teratocarcinoma listen (TAYR-uh-toh-KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A type of germ cell cancer that usually forms in the testes (testicles).
teratoma listen (TAYR-uh-TOH-muh)
A type of germ cell tumor that may contain several different types of tissue, such as hair, muscle, and bone. Teratomas may be mature or immature, based on how normal the cells look under a microscope. Sometimes teratomas are a mix of mature and immature cells. Teratomas usually occur in the ovaries in women, the testicles in men, and the tailbone in children. They may also occur in the central nervous system (brain or spinal cord), chest, or abdomen. Teratomas may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer).
terazosin hydrochloride listen (ter-AY-zoh-sin HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat urinary problems caused by an enlarged prostate. It is also used to treat high blood pressure and is being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Terazosin hydrochloride relaxes muscle tissue in blood vessels and in the prostate. It is a type of alpha blocker. Also called Hytrin.
terminal cancer listen (TER-mih-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer that cannot be cured and leads to death. Also called end-stage cancer.
terpene listen (TER-peen)
A type of strong-smelling chemical substance found in some plants, especially trees that have cones. Terpenes are found in essential oils (scented liquid taken from plants).
TESA
A procedure in which a sample of sperm cells and tissue are removed from the testicle through a small needle attached to a syringe. The sperm is separated from the tissue and looked at under a microscope in the laboratory. It may then be used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. TESA may be useful for men who have fertility problems caused by a blockage that keeps sperm from being ejaculated. This could be caused by previous vasectomy, certain genetic conditions, ejaculation problems, infection, or other conditions. It may also be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. TESA is a type of sperm retrieval method. Also called testicular sperm aspiration.
TESE
A procedure in which sperm cells are removed and either used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. Tissue is removed from the testicle through a small incision (cut) and looked at under a microscope in the laboratory to find sperm cells. TESE may be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. TESE is a type of sperm retrieval method. Also called testicular sperm extraction.
testicle listen (TES-tih-kul)
One of two egg-shaped glands inside the scrotum that produce sperm and male hormones. Also called testis.
testicular cancer listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of one or both testicles. Testicular cancer is most common in young or middle-aged men. Most testicular cancers begin in germ cells (cells that make sperm) and are called testicular germ cell tumors.
testicular cord listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler kord)
A cord-like structure in the male reproductive system that contains nerves, blood and lymph vessels, and the vas deferens (a coiled tube that carries sperm out of the testicle). It runs from the abdomen to the testicle, and connects to the testicle in the scrotum (external sac). Also called spermatic cord.
testicular germ cell tumor listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler jerm sel TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that forms in a testicle from germ cells (cells that make sperm). Two main types of testicular germ cell tumors are seminomas and nonseminomas. Seminomas grow and spread slowly and are sensitive to radiation therapy. Nonseminomas grow and spread more quickly than seminomas. There are several different types of nonseminomas.
testicular intraepithelial neoplasia listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal cells are found in the tiny tubules where the sperm cells begin to develop. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. All tumor marker levels are normal. Also called stage 0 testicular carcinoma in situ and testicular intratubular germ cell neoplasia.
testicular intratubular germ cell neoplasia listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler IN-truh-TOO-byoo-ler jerm sel NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal cells are found in the tiny tubules where the sperm cells begin to develop. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby normal tissue. All tumor marker levels are normal. Also called stage 0 testicular carcinoma in situ and testicular intraepithelial neoplasia.
testicular shielding listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler SHEEL-ding)
A procedure used to help keep a man fertile by preventing damage to the testicles during radiation therapy. A protective shield is placed over the scrotum (the external sac that contains the testicles) during radiation to the pelvic area. Testicular shielding is a type of fertility preservation.
testicular sperm aspiration listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler … AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A procedure in which a sample of sperm cells and tissue are removed from the testicle through a small needle attached to a syringe. The sperm is separated from the tissue and looked at under a microscope in the laboratory. It may then be used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. Testicular sperm aspiration may be useful for men who have fertility problems caused by a blockage that keeps sperm from being ejaculated. This could be caused by previous vasectomy, certain genetic conditions, ejaculation problems, infection, or other conditions. It may also be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Testicular sperm aspiration is a type of sperm retrieval method. Also called TESA.
testicular sperm extraction listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler spurm ek-STRAK-shun)
A procedure in which sperm cells are removed and either used right away to fertilize eggs or frozen for future infertility treatment. Tissue is removed from the testicle through a small incision (cut) and looked at under a microscope in the laboratory to find sperm cells. Testicular sperm extraction may be useful for men who want to have children after having treatment that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Testicular sperm extraction is a type of sperm retrieval method. Also called TESE.
testicular tissue banking listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler TIH-shoo BANK-ing)
A process being developed to freeze testicular tissue from boys who have not gone through puberty, to save for future infertility treatment. Tissue that contains cells that make sperm is removed from the testicles through a small incision (cut). It is then frozen and stored. At a later date, the tissue can be thawed to retrieve sperm. Testicular tissue banking is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for young boys who are going to have treatments that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called testicular tissue cryopreservation and testicular tissue freezing.
testicular tissue cryopreservation listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler TIH-shoo KRY-oh-PREH-zer-VAY-shun)
A process being developed to freeze testicular tissue from boys who have not gone through puberty, to save for future infertility treatment. Tissue that contains cells that make sperm is removed from the testicles through a small incision (cut). It is then frozen and stored. At a later date, the tissue can be thawed to retrieve sperm. Testicular tissue cryopreservation is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for young boys who are going to have treatments that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called testicular tissue banking and testicular tissue freezing.
testicular tissue freezing listen (tes-TIH-kyoo-ler TIH-shoo FREE-zing)
A process being developed to freeze testicular tissue from boys who have not gone through puberty, to save for future infertility treatment. Tissue that contains cells that make sperm is removed from the testicles through a small incision (cut). It is then frozen and stored. At a later date, the tissue can be thawed to retrieve sperm. Testicular tissue freezing is being studied as a type of fertility preservation. It may be useful for young boys who are going to have treatments that may cause infertility, such as certain cancer treatments. Also called testicular tissue banking and testicular tissue cryopreservation.
testimonial listen (TES-tih-MOH-nee-ul)
Information provided by an individual who claims to have been helped or cured by a particular product. The information provided lacks the necessary elements to be evaluated in a rigorous and scientific manner and is not used in the scientific literature.
testis listen (TES-tis)
One of two egg-shaped glands inside the scrotum that produce sperm and male hormones. Also called testicle.
testosterone listen (tes-TOS-teh-rone)
A hormone made mainly in the testes (part of the male reproductive system). It is needed to develop and maintain male sex characteristics, such as facial hair, deep voice, and muscle growth. Testosterone may also be made in the laboratory and is used to treat certain medical conditions.
testosterone flare listen (tes-TOS-teh-rone flayr)
A temporary increase in testosterone levels in the body caused by certain types of hormone therapy used to treat prostate cancer. A testosterone flare may occur in patients who are taking drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonists. When first given, these drugs cause the testicles to make more testosterone. This may cause symptoms, such as bone pain and urinary problems, to get worse, but they usually go away after the first few weeks of treatment.
tetanus toxoid listen (TEH-tuh-nus TOK-soyd)
A substance that is derived from the toxin released by the bacterium that causes the disease tetanus. It is used as a vaccine to prevent tetanus or to help boost the immune response to other vaccines.
tethered capsule endoscope listen (TEH-thurd KAP-sul EN-doh-SKOPE)
A device used to look at tissues in the esophagus. It is a tiny capsule with a laser scanner inside and a very thin cord attached to it. The patient swallows the capsule and the thin cord helps keep the capsule in a specific area in the esophagus. The cord is also used to remove the capsule. Pictures are taken by the laser scanner and sent to a computer for viewing. A tethered capsule endoscope is used to find early cancers of the esophagus and other parts of the body. Also called TCE.
tetracycline listen (TEH-truh-SY-kleen)
A drug used to treat bacterial infections. It stops the growth of bacteria by keeping them from making proteins. Tetracycline also binds to new bone tissue and is being studied as a way to detect bone growth. Tetracycline is a type of antibiotic and a type of bone-labeling agent.
tetradecanoylphorbol acetate listen (TEH-truh-DEH-kuh-noyl-FOR-bol A-seh-tayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of leukemias and lymphomas. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tetradecanoylphorbol acetate affects many cell actions and may cause tumor cells to die. It is a type of phorbol ester. Also called 12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate and TPA.
tetrahydrouridine listen (TEH-truh-HY-droh-YOOR-ih-deen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may help make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. Tetrahydrouridine is a type of radiosensitizing agent, a type of multidrug resistance modulator, and a type of cytidine deaminase inhibitor. Also called THU.
tetra-O-methyl NDGA listen (TEH-truh-O-MEH-thul ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks proteins needed for cancer growth. It is a type of transcriptional inhibitor. Also called EM-1421 and tetra-O-methyl nordihydroguaiaretic acid.
tetra-O-methyl nordihydroguaiaretic acid listen (TEH-truh-O-MEH-thul NOR-dy-HY-droh-GWY-uh-reh-tik A-sid)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It blocks proteins needed for cancer growth. It is a type of transcriptional inhibitor. Also called EM-1421 and tetra-O-methyl NDGA.
TG4010
A substance that is being studied as an anticancer drug.
thalamus listen (THA-luh-mus)
An area of the brain that helps process information from the senses and transmit it to other parts of the brain.
thalidomide listen (thuh-LIH-doh-mide)
A drug used with another drug to treat multiple myeloma in patients who have just been diagnosed. It is also used to treat a painful skin disease related to leprosy. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Thalidomide may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of immunomodulating agent. Also called Thalomid.
Thalomid listen (THA-loh-MID)
A drug used with another drug to treat multiple myeloma in patients who have just been diagnosed. It is also used to treat a painful skin disease related to leprosy. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Thalomid may help the immune system kill cancer cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of immunomodulating agent. Also called thalidomide.
The Cancer Genome Atlas listen (… KAN-ser JEE-nome AT-lus)
A project to identify the complete set of DNA changes in many different types of cancer. Studying these changes may help researchers understand how different types of cancer form. This may lead to new ways to prevent, diagnose, and treat cancer. The Cancer Genome Atlas is led by the National Cancer Institute (NCI) and the National Human Genome Research Institute (NHGRI), which are parts of the National Institutes of Health (NIH). Also called TCGA.
theaflavin listen (thee-uh-FLAY-vin)
A substance formed when green tea is fermented to make black tea. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions, such as high cholesterol. It is a type of antioxidant.
thearubigin listen (thee-uh-ROO-bih-jin)
A substance formed when green tea is fermented to make black tea. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions, such as high cholesterol. It is a type of antioxidant.
theobromine listen (thee-oh-BROH-meen)
A substance that is closely related to caffeine and is found in cocoa beans, cola nuts, and tea. It may also be made in the laboratory. Theobromine is used to increase the amount of urine made by the kidneys, to stimulate the heart, and to widen blood vessels. It is a type of alkaloid.
theophylline listen (thee-AH-fih-lin)
A drug used to improve breathing in people who are short of breath. It belongs to the family of drugs called bronchodilators or respiratory smooth muscle relaxants.
Theraloc listen (THAYR-uh-lok)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Theraloc binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some normal cells and some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Theraloc is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called nimotuzumab.
therapeutic listen (THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik)
Having to do with treating disease and helping healing take place.
therapeutic (subthreshold) electrical stimulation listen (THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik … ee-LEK-trih-kul STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
A procedure in which small electric impulses are used to stimulate muscles that are weak or paralyzed. It helps to increase muscle strength, blood circulation, and range of motion and to lessen muscle spasms. Also called NES, neuromuscular electrical stimulation, and NMES.
therapeutic angiotensin-(1-7) listen (THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik AN-jee-oh-TEN-sin ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. Therapeutic angiotensin-(1-7) is a hormone that is made in the laboratory, and helps control blood pressure. It may stop the growth of some types of cancer cells and may stop the growth of blood vessels needed by tumors to grow. It is a type of antiproliferative agent.
therapeutic medical play listen (THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik MEH-dih-kul …)
The use of games, toys, books, art, and role playing, sometimes with real or pretend medical equipment, to help children understand and become more comfortable with medical tests, procedures, treatments, and their illness. Therapeutic medical play gives children a way to express their feelings, fears, and anxieties and helps them learn ways to cope with things that may be stressful or upsetting.
therapeutic touch listen (THAYR-uh-PYOO-tik tuch)
A form of complementary and alternative medicine based on the belief that vital energy flows through the human body. This energy is said to be balanced or made stronger by practitioners who pass their hands over, or gently touch, a patient's body. Therapeutic touch is being studied in patients receiving cancer therapy, to find out if it can improve quality of life, boost the immune system, or reduce side effects. Therapeutic touch is a type of energy therapy. Also called healing touch.
therapy listen (THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment.
therapy-related acute myeloid leukemia listen (THAYR-uh-pee-ree-LAY-ted uh-KYOOT MY-eh-loyd loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) that is caused by previous treatment with chemotherapy or radiation therapy. Therapy-related acute myeloid leukemia is an aggressive (fast-growing) cancer in which there are too many myeloblasts (immature white blood cells) in the blood or bone marrow. Therapy-related acute myeloid leukemia usually occurs within 7 years after treatment. It is more common in adults. Also called t-AML.
thermal ablation listen (THER-mul a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure using heat to remove tissue or a part of the body, or destroy its function. For example, to remove the lining of the uterus, a catheter is inserted through the cervix into the uterus, a balloon at the end of the catheter is inflated, and fluid inside the balloon is heated to destroy the lining of the uterus.
thermography listen (ther-MAH-gruh-fee)
In medicine, a procedure in which a heat-sensing infrared camera is used to record the surface heat produced by different parts of the body. Abnormal tissue growth can cause temperature changes, which may show up on the thermogram. Thermography may be used to diagnose breast cancer and other tumors.
thermotherapy listen (THER-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment of disease using heat.
thiamine listen (THY-uh-min)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Thiamine helps some enzymes work properly, helps break down sugars in the diet, and keeps nerves and the heart healthy. It is found in pork, organ meats, peas, beans, nuts, and whole grains. Thiamine is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in daily. Not enough thiamine can cause a disease called beriberi (a condition marked by heart, nerve, and digestive disorders). Too much thiamine may help cancer cells grow faster. Also called vitamin B1.
thiazide diuretic listen (THY-uh-zide DY-yoo-REH-tik)
A type of drug used to treat high blood pressure, edema (extra fluid in the tissues), and other conditions. Thiazide diuretics cause the kidneys to make more urine, which allows the body to get rid of extra fluid and salt.
thiethylperazine listen (thy-EH-thul-PAYR-uh-zeen)
A drug used to prevent or reduce nausea and vomiting. It belongs to the families of drugs called antiemetics and phenothiazines.
thioguanine listen (THY-oh-GWAH-neen)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Thioguanine stops cells from making DNA and RNA and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Tabloid.
thiotepa listen (THY-oh-TEH-puh)
A drug used to treat certain types of bladder cancer, breast cancer, and ovarian cancer. It is also used to treat malignant effusion (a condition in which cancer causes an abnormal amount of fluid to collect in hollow spaces or between tissues of the body). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Thiotepa damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent.
third molar listen (...MOH-ler)
The last tooth to come in at the back of each side of the upper and lower jaws. Third molars usually come in between 17 and 23 years of age, but not everyone has them. Also called wisdom tooth.
third-line therapy listen (... THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment that is given when both initial treatment (first-line therapy) and subsequent treatment (second-line therapy) don’t work, or stop working.
thoracalgia listen (THOR-uh-KAL-juh)
Chest pain. Also called thoracodynia.
thoracentesis listen (THOR-uh-sen-TEE-sis)
Removal of fluid from the pleural cavity through a needle inserted between the ribs.
thoracic listen (thor-A-sik)
Having to do with the chest.
thoracic surgeon listen (thor-A-sik SER-jun)
A surgeon who has special training in operating on organs inside the chest, including the heart and lungs.
thoracic surgical oncologist listen (thor-A-sik SER-jih-kul on-KAH-loh-jist)
A surgeon who has special training in operating on tumors found inside the chest.
thoracodynia listen (THOR-uh-koh-DIN-ee-uh)
Chest pain. Also called thoracalgia.
thoracoscope listen (thor-A-koh-skope)
A thin tube-like instrument used to examine the inside of the chest. A thoracoscope has a light and a lens for viewing and may have tool to remove tissue.
thoracoscopy listen (THOR-uh-KOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the chest, using a thoracoscope. A thoracoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease.
thoracotomy listen (THOR-uh-KAH-toh-mee)
An operation to open the chest.
throat listen (throte)
The hollow tube inside the neck that starts behind the nose and ends at the top of the trachea (windpipe) and esophagus (the tube that goes to the stomach). The throat is about 5 inches long, depending on body size. Also called pharynx.
throat cancer listen (throte KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the pharynx (the hollow tube inside the neck that starts behind the nose and ends at the top of the windpipe and esophagus). Throat cancer includes cancer of the nasopharynx (the upper part of the throat behind the nose), the oropharynx (the middle part of the pharynx), and the hypopharynx (the bottom part of the pharynx). Cancer of the larynx (voice box) may also be included as a type of throat cancer. Most throat cancers are squamous cell carcinomas (cancer that begins in thin, flat cells that look like fish scales). Also called pharyngeal cancer.
thrombectomy listen (throm-BEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a thrombus (blood clot) from a blood vessel.
thrombocyte listen (THROM-boh-site)
A tiny, disc-shaped piece of cell that is found in the blood and spleen. Thrombocytes are pieces of very large cells in the bone marrow called megakaryocytes. They help form blood clots to slow or stop bleeding and to help wounds heal. Having too many or too few thrombocytes or having platelets that don’t work as they should can cause problems. Checking the number of thrombocytes in the blood may help diagnose certain diseases or conditions. Also called platelet.
thrombocytopenia listen (THROM-boh-sy-toh-PEE-nee-uh)
A condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of platelets in the blood. It may result in easy bruising and excessive bleeding from wounds or bleeding in mucous membranes and other tissues.
thrombohemorrhagic event listen (THROM-boh-HEH-muh-RA-jik eh-VENT)
A process that involves either a blood clot or bleeding, such as a heart attack or stroke.
thrombolysis listen (throm-BOL-ih-sis)
The process of breaking up a thrombus (blood clot) that is blocking blood flow. The blood clot may be dissolved using drugs delivered through a catheter (tube) into the clot.
thrombophlebitis listen (THROM-boh-fleh-BY-tis)
Inflammation of a vein that occurs when a blood clot forms.
thrombopoietin listen (THROM-boh-POY-eh-tin)
A substance made by the body that helps make blood cells, especially platelets. A form of thrombopoietin made in the laboratory is called recombinant human thrombopoietin and rHu thrombopoietin. Thrombopoietin is being studied as a way to increase the number of platelets in cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. Also called TPO.
thrombosis listen (throm-BOH-sis)
The formation or presence of a thrombus (blood clot) inside a blood vessel.
thrombus listen (THROM-bus)
A blood clot that forms on the wall of a blood vessel or in the heart when blood platelets, proteins, and cells stick together. A thrombus may block the flow of blood.
thrush listen (thrush)
A condition in which Candida albicans, a type of yeast, grows out of control in moist skin areas of the body. It is usually a result of a weakened immune system, but can be a side effect of chemotherapy or treatment with antibiotics. Thrush usually affects the mouth (oral thrush); however, rarely, it spreads throughout the entire body. Also called candidiasis and candidosis.
THU
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may help make cancer cells easier to kill with radiation therapy. THU is a type of radiosensitizing agent, a type of multidrug resistance modulator, and a type of cytidine deaminase inhibitor. Also called tetrahydrouridine.
thymic carcinoma listen (THY-mik KAR-sih-NOH-muh)
A rare type of thymus gland cancer. It usually spreads, has a high risk of recurrence, and has a poor survival rate. Thymic carcinoma is divided into subtypes, depending on the types of cells in which the cancer began. Also called type C thymoma.
thymidine listen (THY-mih-deen)
A chemical compound found in DNA. Also used as treatment for mucositis.
thymidylate synthase listen (THY-mih-DIH-layt SIN-thays)
A protein involved in making and repairing DNA (molecules inside cells that carry genetic information and pass it on from parent to child). High levels of thymidylate synthase may be involved in how certain types of cancer form and respond to treatment.
thymidylate synthase inhibitor listen (THY-mih-DIH-layt SIN-thays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A drug that blocks DNA synthesis and may prevent tumor cell growth. It is being studied as a treatment for cancer.
thymine listen (THY-meen)
A chemical compound that is used to make one of the building blocks of DNA. It is a type of pyrimidine.
Thymitaq listen (THY-mih-tak)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called thymidylate synthase inhibitors. Also called AG337 and nolatrexed.
thymocyte listen (THY-moh-site)
A type of white blood cell. Thymocytes are part of the immune system and develop from stem cells in the bone marrow. They help protect the body from infection and may help fight cancer. Also called T cell and T lymphocyte.
thymoma listen (thy-MOH-muh)
A tumor of the thymus, an organ that is part of the lymphatic system and is located in the chest, behind the breastbone.
thymus listen (THY-mus)
An organ that is part of the lymphatic system, in which T lymphocytes grow and multiply. The thymus is in the chest behind the breastbone.
Thyrogen listen (THY-roh-jen)
A form of thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) that is made in the laboratory. It is used to test for remaining or recurring cancer cells in patients who have been treated for thyroid cancer. Also called thyrotropin alfa.
thyroglobulin listen (THY-roh-GLAH-byoo-lin)
The form that thyroid hormone takes when stored in the cells of the thyroid. If the thyroid has been removed, thyroglobulin should not show up on a blood test. Doctors measure thyroglobulin level in blood to detect thyroid cancer cells that remain in the body after treatment.
thyroid listen (THY-royd)
A gland located beneath the larynx (voice box) that makes thyroid hormone and calcitonin. The thyroid helps regulate growth and metabolism. Also called thyroid gland.
thyroid cancer listen (THY-royd KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the thyroid gland (an organ at the base of the throat that makes hormones that help control heart rate, blood pressure, body temperature, and weight). Four main types of thyroid cancer are papillary, follicular, medullary, and anaplastic thyroid cancer. The four types are based on how the cancer cells look under a microscope.
thyroid follicular cell listen (THY-royd fuh-LIH-kyoo-ler sel)
A type of cell in the thyroid. Thyroid follicular cells make thyroid hormone.
thyroid gland listen (THY-royd...)
A gland located beneath the larynx (voice box) that makes thyroid hormone and calcitonin. The thyroid gland helps regulate growth and metabolism. Also called thyroid.
thyroid hormone listen (THY-royd HOR-mone)
A hormone that affects heart rate, blood pressure, body temperature, and weight. Thyroid hormone is made by the thyroid gland and can also be made in the laboratory.
thyroid hormone treatment listen (THY-royd HOR-mone TREET-ment)
Treatment with thyroid hormone, which is a hormone that affects heart rate, blood pressure, body temperature, and weight.
thyroidectomy listen (THY-roy-DEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the thyroid.
thyroiditis listen (thy-roy-DY-tis)
Inflammation of the thyroid gland. Thyroiditis may be an autoimmune disease that affects the thyroid gland over time, causing hypothyroidism (too little thyroid hormone). A temporary form of thyroiditis may also occur after the birth of a baby, or when viral or bacterial infections spread to the thyroid.
thyroidologist listen (THY-roy-DAH-loh-jist)
A medical doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating thyroid diseases.
thyroid-stimulating hormone listen (THY-royd STIM-yoo-LAY-ting HOR-mone)
A hormone produced by the pituitary gland. Thyroid-stimulating hormone stimulates the release of thyroid hormone from thyroglobulin. It also stimulates the growth of thyroid follicular cells. An abnormal thyroid-stimulating hormone level may mean that the thyroid hormonal regulation system is out of control, usually as a result of a benign condition (hyperthyroidism or hypothyroidism). Also called TSH.
thyrotropin alfa listen (THY-roh-TROH-pin AL-fuh)
A form of thyroid-stimulating hormone (TSH) that is made in the laboratory. It is used to test for remaining or recurring cancer cells in patients who have been treated for thyroid cancer. Also called Thyrogen.
thyroxin listen (thy-ROK-sin)
A hormone that is made by the thyroid gland and contains iodine. Thyroxin increases the rate of chemical reactions in cells and helps control growth and development. Thyroxin can also be made in the laboratory and is used to treat thyroid disorders. Also called L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine, T4, and thyroxine.
thyroxine listen (thy-ROK-seen)
A hormone that is made by the thyroid gland and contains iodine. Thyroxine increases the rate of chemical reactions in cells and helps control growth and development. Thyroxine can also be made in the laboratory and is used to treat thyroid disorders. Also called L-3,5,5’-tetraiodothyronine, T4, and thyroxin.
tiacumicin B listen (ty-a-KYOO-my-sin ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of diarrhea caused by infection with Clostridium difficile (a type of bacteria that can grow without oxygen) in cancer patients. Tiacumicin B is a type of antibiotic. Also called OPT-80 and PAR-101.
tiazofurin listen (ty-A-zoh-FYOOR-in)
An anticancer drug being studied to stop cell growth.
tibia listen (TIH-bee-uh)
The larger of two bones between the knee and ankle. Also called shinbone.
Tibsovo listen (tib-SOH-voh)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia that has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called isocitrate dehydrogenase-1 (IDH1). It is used in adults whose cancer is newly diagnosed and who are either 75 years and older or cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. Tibsovo is also used in adults whose cancer has relapsed (come back) or has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tibsovo blocks the protein made by the mutated IDH1 gene. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Tibsovo is a type of enzyme inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called ivosidenib.
TIL
A type of immune cell that has moved from the blood into a tumor to try and attack the cancer. In cancer therapy, TILs are removed from a patient’s tumor and are then treated in the laboratory with substances that activate the lymphocytes to help them better kill the patient’s cancer cells. Large numbers of these activated lymphocytes are then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight cancer. Also called tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte.
time to progression listen (… pruh-GREH-shun)
The length of time from the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease until the disease starts to get worse or spread to other parts of the body. In a clinical trial, measuring the time to progression is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called TTP.
tin ethyl etiopurpurin listen (tin EH-thul EE-tee-oh-PUR-pyoo-rin)
An anticancer drug that is also used in cancer prevention. It belongs to the family of drugs called photosensitizing agents. Also called SnET2.
tinidazole listen (ty-NIH-duh-zole)
A drug used to treat protozoal infections, such as amebiasis, giardiasis, and trichomoniasis. It belongs to a family of drugs called antiprotozoal agents. Tinidazole is also being evaluated in the treatment of Helicobacter pylori infections in people with low-grade gastric lymphoma.
tinnitus listen (tih-NY-tus)
A disorder in which a person hears noises such as buzzing, ringing, clicking, or the sound of a pulse, when no outside sound is causing them. Tinnitus may have many different causes, and may be a symptom of another disease or condition. It may be caused by certain tumors and anticancer drugs.
tinzaparin sodium listen (tin-ZA-puh-rin SOH-dee-um)
A drug that is used with another drug, warfarin, to treat blood clots that form deep in the veins and to prevent new blood clots from forming. It is a type of anticoagulant. Also called Innohep.
tipifarnib listen (tih-pee-FAR-nib)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called farnesyltransferase inhibitors. Also called R115777 and Zarnestra.
tipranavir sodium listen (tih-PRA-nuh-veer SOH-dee-um)
A drug used with another drug, ritonavir, to treat patients who are infected with HIV (the virus that causes AIDS) and have been treated with other anti-HIV drugs. Tipranavir sodium blocks the HIV virus from making copies of itself. It is a type of anti-HIV agent and a type of protease inhibitor. Also called Aptivus.
tirapazamine listen (TEER-uh-PA-zuh-meen)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may cause damage to the DNA in cells that have a low level of oxygen, including cancer cells. This may make the cells easier to kill with radiation therapy and chemotherapy. Tirapazamine is a type of radiosensitizing agent and a type of chemosensitizing agent.
tisagenlecleucel listen (TIH-suh-jen-LEK-loo-sel)
A drug used to treat diffuse large B-cell lymphoma that relapsed (came back) or did not get better after treatment with at least two other types of anticancer therapy. Tisagenlecleucel is also used to treat B-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) in patients aged 25 years and younger. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other treatment or has relapsed two or more times. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tisagenlecleucel is made using a patient’s T cells (a type of immune system cell). A gene for a special receptor called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) is added to the T cells in the laboratory. These changed T cells called CAR T cells are grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. Tisagenlecleucel binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on some leukemia and lymphoma cells. This helps the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Tisagenlecleucel is a type of CAR T-cell therapy. Also called Kymriah.
tissue listen (TIH-shoo)
A group or layer of cells that work together to perform a specific function.
tissue flap reconstruction listen (TIH-shoo ... REE-kun-STRUK-shun)
A type of breast reconstruction in which a flap of tissue is surgically moved from another area of the body to the chest, and formed into a new breast mound.
tissue fluid listen (TIH-shoo FLOO-id)
Fluid found in the spaces around cells. It comes from substances that leak out of blood capillaries (the smallest type of blood vessel). It helps bring oxygen and nutrients to cells and to remove waste products from them. As new tissue fluid is made, it replaces older fluid, which drains towards lymph vessels. When it enters the lymph vessels, it is called lymph. Also called interstitial fluid.
tissue plasminogen activator listen (TIH-shoo plaz-MIH-noh-jen AK-tih-vay-ter)
An enzyme made in the body that helps dissolve blood clots. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. Tissue plasminogen activator is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called tPA.
tissue-agnostic therapy listen (TIH-shoo-ag-NAH-stik THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses drugs or other substances to treat cancer based on the cancer’s genetic and molecular features without regard to the cancer type or where the cancer started in the body. Tissue-agnostic therapy uses the same drug to treat all cancer types that have the genetic mutation (change) or biomarker that is targeted by the drug. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called tumor-agnostic therapy.
TLF
A drug being studied in the treatment of kidney cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer and other conditions. TLF increases the activity of dendritic cells (a type of immune cell) to help kill cancer cells. It is a form of human lactoferrin (a protein found in milk, tears, mucus, bile, and some white blood cells) that is made in the laboratory. TLF is a type of recombinant protein and a type of immunomodulatory protein. Also called talactoferrin and talactoferrin alfa.
T-LGL leukemia listen (... loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A type of leukemia in which large T lymphocytes (a type of white blood cell) that contain granules (small particles) are found in the blood. It is a chronic disease that may last for a long time and get worse. Also called T-cell large granular lymphocyte leukemia.
TLK286
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called glutathione analogs. Also called Telcyta.
T-lymphoblastic lymphoma listen (T-LIM-foh-BLAS-tik lim-FOH-muh)
A type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma in which too many T-cell lymphoblasts (immature white blood cells) are found in the lymph nodes and spleen. It is most common in young men. Also called precursor T-lymphoblastic lymphoma.
TM
A mental technique used to promote relaxation, reduce stress, and improve quality of life. TM is the registered trademark of the Maharishi Foundation Ltd. Also called Transcendental Meditation.
TMB
The total number of mutations (changes) found in the DNA of cancer cells. Knowing the TMB may help plan the best treatment. For example, tumors that have a high number of mutations appear to be more likely to respond to certain types of immunotherapy. TMB is being used as a type of biomarker. Also called tumor mutational burden.
TMD
A bone marrow disorder that can occur in newborns who have Down syndrome. It is marked by abnormal, immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow (especially the cells involved in making platelets). The liver may also be larger than normal. TMD is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called GATA1. TMD usually goes away on its own within the first 3 months of life. Sometimes TMD causes severe or life-threatening problems, such as bleeding problems, infection, heart, kidney, and liver failure, and abnormal build-up of fluid in the tissues that cover the organs in the body. Infants who have TMD have an increased risk of developing acute myeloid leukemia (AML) before the age of 3 years. Also called TAM, transient abnormal myelopoiesis, transient leukemia, and transient myeloproliferative disorder.
TNF
A protein made by white blood cells in response to an antigen (substance that causes the immune system to make a specific immune response) or infection. TNF can also be made in the laboratory. It may boost a person’s immune response, and also may cause necrosis (cell death) of some types of tumor cells. TNF is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of cytokine. Also called tumor necrosis factor.
TNF-bound colloidal gold listen (... bownd kuh-LOY-dul ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. TNF-bound colloidal gold is made in the laboratory by binding a cancer-killing protein called tumor necrosis factor (TNF) to the surface of very tiny particles of gold. These TNF-gold particles may kill cancer cells without harming healthy tissue. Also called Aurimmune and colloidal gold-bound tumor necrosis factor.
TNFerade listen
A gene therapy product that is being studied in combination with radiation therapy in the treatment of cancer.
TNF-related apoptosis-inducing ligand listen (… ree-LAY-ted A-pop-TOH-sis-in-DOO-sing LIH-gund)
A cell protein that can attach to certain molecules in some cancer cells and may kill the cells. TNF-related apoptosis-inducing ligand is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called Apo-2L, TRAIL, and tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand.
TNM staging system listen (… STAY-jing SIS-tem)
A system to describe the amount and spread of cancer in a patient’s body, using TNM. T describes the size of the tumor and any spread of cancer into nearby tissue; N describes spread of cancer to nearby lymph nodes; and M describes metastasis (spread of cancer to other parts of the body). This system was created and is updated by the American Joint Committee on Cancer (AJCC) and the International Union Against Cancer (UICC). The TNM staging system is used to describe most types of cancer. Also called AJCC staging system.
TNP-470
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
tobacco listen (tuh-BA-koh)
A plant with leaves that have high levels of the addictive chemical nicotine. After harvesting, tobacco leaves are cured, aged, and processed in various ways. The resulting products may be smoked (in cigarettes, cigars, and pipes), applied to the gums (as dipping and chewing tobacco), or inhaled (as snuff). Cured tobacco leaves and the products made from them contain many cancer-causing chemicals, and tobacco use and exposure to secondhand tobacco smoke have been strongly linked to many types of cancer and other diseases. The scientific name of the most common tobacco plant is Nicotiana tabacum.
tobacco tar listen (tuh-BA-koh tar)
A chemical substance made when tobacco is burned. Tar contains most of the cancer-causing and other harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke. When tobacco smoke is inhaled, the tar can form a sticky layer on the inside of the lungs. This damages the lungs and may lead to lung cancer, emphysema, or other lung problems. Cigarettes and other smoked tobacco products may produce different amounts of tar, depending on how they are made. Inhaling tobacco smoke also causes other types of cancer, including cancers of the mouth and throat.
tobacco-specific nitrosamine listen (tuh-BA-koh-speh-SIH-fik ny-TROH-suh-meen)
A type of harmful, cancer-causing chemical found in tobacco and tobacco smoke. Tobacco-specific nitrosamines are formed when tobacco leaves are grown, cured, aged, and processed. Tobacco products can contain different amounts of tobacco-specific nitrosamines, depending on how they are made. Also called TSNA.
tocilizumab listen (toh-sih-LIH-zoo-mab)
A drug used to treat severe or life-threatening cytokine release syndrome caused by a type of immunotherapy called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) T-cell therapy. It is used in patients aged 2 years and older. Tocilizumab is also used to treat certain types of arthritis and a condition that causes inflammation of the lining of the arteries. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Tocilizumab binds to receptors for a protein called interleukin-6 (IL-6), which is made by white blood cells and other cells in the body. This may help lower the body’s immune response and reduce inflammation. Tocilizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Actemra.
tocladesine listen (toh-KLA-deh-seen)
A substance that has been studied as an anticancer drug. It is an analog of a substance that occurs naturally in the body (cyclic adenosine monophosphate).
Tolak listen (TOL-lak)
A drug used as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). Tolak stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It contains the active ingredient fluorouracil. Tolak is a type of antimetabolite.
toluene listen (TOL-yoo-een)
A strong-smelling, colorless liquid used to make gasoline and other types of fuel, paint, paint thinner, fingernail polish, glue, and rubber. Being exposed to toluene may cause headache, tiredness, confusion, weakness, memory loss, nausea, loss of appetite, hearing and color vision loss, dizziness, loss of consciousness, kidney damage, and death.
tomography listen (toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A series of detailed pictures of areas inside the body. The pictures are created by a computer linked to an x-ray machine.
tomotherapy listen (toh-mah-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy in which radiation is aimed at a tumor from many different directions. The patient lays on a table and is moved through a donut-shaped machine. The radiation source in the machine rotates around the patient in a spiral pattern. Before radiation, a 3-dimensional (3-D) image of the tumor is taken. This helps doctors find the highest dose of radiation that can be used to kill tumor cells while causing less damage to nearby tissue. Tomotherapy is a type of intensity-modulated radiation therapy (IMRT). Also called helical tomotherapy.
tonga listen (TON-guh)
An herb native to islands in the South Pacific. Substances taken from the root have been used in some cultures to relieve stress, anxiety, tension, sleeplessness, and problems of menopause. Tonga may increase the effect of alcohol and of certain drugs used to treat anxiety and depression. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration advises users that tonga may cause severe liver damage. The scientific name is Piper methysticum. Also called intoxicating pepper, kava kava, rauschpfeffer, and yangona.
tongue cancer listen (tung KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in the tongue. When the cancer begins in the front two-thirds of the tongue, it is considered to be a type of oral cavity cancer; when the cancer begins in the back third of the tongue, it is considered to be a type of oropharyngeal or throat cancer.
tonsil listen (TON-sil)
One of two small masses of lymphoid tissue on either side of the throat.
topical listen (TAH-pih-kul)
On the surface of the body.
topical chemotherapy listen (TAH-pih-kul KEE-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment with anticancer drugs in a lotion or cream applied to the skin.
topoisomerase II inhibitor listen (TOH-poh-i-SAH-meh-rays … in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the activity of the enzyme topoisomerase II, which cuts and repairs tangled strands of DNA. Topoisomerase II is involved in cell division and growth, so blocking activity of this enzyme may kill cancer cells. Some topoisomerase II inhibitors are being used to treat cancer.
topoisomerase II inhibitor RTA 744 listen (TOH-poh-i-SAH-meh-rays ... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of adult brain tumors. Topoisomerase II inhibitor RTA 744 crosses the blood-brain barrier and blocks an enzyme needed for cancer growth. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called RTA 744.
topoisomerase inhibitor listen (TOH-poh-i-SAH-meh-rays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks topoisomerases (enzymes that break and rejoin DNA strands and are needed for cells to divide and grow). Blocking these enzymes may kill cancer cells. Certain topoisomerase inhibitors are being studied in the treatment of cancer.
topotecan hydrochloride listen (toh-poh-TEE-kan HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat certain types of ovarian cancer, small cell lung cancer, and cervical cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Topotecan hydrochloride blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Hycamtin.
toremifene citrate listen (tor-EH-mih-feen SIH-trayt)
A drug used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in postmenopausal women whose cancer is estrogen receptor positive (ER+) or when it is not known if the cancer is ER+ or estrogen receptor negative (ER-). Toremifene citrate blocks the effects of the hormone estrogen in breast tissue, which may help keep breast cancer cells from growing. It is a type of selective estrogen receptor modulator (SERM). Also called Fareston.
Torisel listen (TOR-ih-sel)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma (a type of kidney cancer). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Torisel blocks a protein involved in cell division, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of rapamycin analog and a type of serine/threonine kinase inhibitor. Also called CCI-779 and temsirolimus.
TORS
Surgery in which a robot with arms is used to remove cancer from hard-to-reach areas of the mouth and throat. Cameras attached to the robot give a 3-dimensional (3D) image that a surgeon can see. The surgeon guides tools at the ends of the robot arms to remove the cancer. Also called transoral robotic surgery.
torso listen (TOR-soh)
The main part of the body that contains the chest, abdomen, pelvis, and back. Most of the body’s organs and the backbone are found in the torso. Also called trunk.
tositumomab listen (TAH-sih-TOO-moh-mab)
A drug used together with another drug to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tositumomab binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on the surface of B cells, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
total androgen blockade listen (TOH-tul AN-droh-jen blah-KAYD)
Treatment used to block androgen (male hormone) activity in the body. This may be done by giving an antiandrogen drug and removing the testicles (orchiectomy) or by giving an antiandrogen drug with a gonadotropin-releasing hormone (GnRH) agonist. Total androgen blockade may stop the growth of cancer cells that need androgens to grow, and is used in the treatment of prostate cancer. Also called combined androgen blockade and complete androgen blockade.
total estrogen blockade listen (TOH-tul ES-truh-jin blah-KAYD)
Therapy used to eliminate estrogen in the body. This may be done with surgery, radiation therapy, chemotherapy, or a combination of these procedures.
total hysterectomy listen (TOH-tul HIS-teh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire uterus, including the cervix. Also called complete hysterectomy.
total laryngectomy listen (TOH-tul LAYR-in-JEK-toh-mee)
An operation to remove all of the larynx (voice box).
total mastectomy listen (TOH-tul ma-STEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the whole breast. Some of the lymph nodes under the arm may also be removed. Also called simple mastectomy.
total nodal irradiation listen (TOH-tul NOH-dul ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Radiation therapy to the mantle field, the spleen, the lymph nodes in the upper abdomen, and the lymph nodes in the pelvic area.
total pancreatectomy listen (TOH-tul PAN-kree-uh-TEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the entire pancreas. Part of the stomach, part of the small intestine, the common bile duct, gallbladder, spleen, and nearby lymph nodes are also removed.
total parenteral nutrition listen (TOH-tul puh-REN-teh-rul noo-TRIH-shun)
A form of nutrition that is delivered into a vein. Total parenteral nutrition does not use the digestive system. It may be given to people who are unable to absorb nutrients through the intestinal tract because of vomiting that won't stop, severe diarrhea, or intestinal disease. It may also be given to those undergoing high-dose chemotherapy or radiation and bone marrow transplantation. It is possible to give all of the protein, calories, vitamins and minerals a person needs using total parenteral nutrition. Also called hyperalimentation, parenteral nutrition, and TPN.
total PSA listen (TOH-tul ...)
The total amount of prostate-specific antigen (PSA) in the blood. It includes the amount of free PSA and the amount of PSA attached to other proteins.
total skin electron beam radiation therapy listen (TOH-tul skin ee-LEK-tron beem RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy using electrons that is directed at the entire surface of the body. This type of radiation goes into the outer layers of the skin, but does not go deeper into tissues and organs below the skin. Also called TSEB radiation therapy.
total-body irradiation listen (TOH-tul-BAH-dee ih-RAY-dee-AY-shun)
A type of radiation therapy that is given to the entire body. Total-body irradiation is often used with high-dose anticancer drugs to help prepare a patient for a stem cell transplant. It is done to kill any cancer cells that are left in the body and helps make room in the patient’s bone marrow for new blood stem cells to grow. Total-body irradiation may also help prevent the body’s immune system from rejecting the transplanted stem cells. Also called TBI.
Totect listen (TOH-tekt)
A drug used to treat the toxic effects of an anticancer drug that leaks from a vein into surrounding tissue and causes tissue damage. Totect contains the active ingredient dexrazoxane. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
totipotent listen (toh-TIH-puh-tent)
Having to do with cells that are able to develop into any type of cell found in the body.
tourniquet listen (TOOR-nih-ket)
A device, such as a strip of cloth or a band of rubber, that is wrapped tightly around a leg or an arm to prevent the flow of blood to the leg or the arm for a period of time. A tourniquet may be used when drawing blood or to stop bleeding after an injury.
toxemia listen (tok-SEE-mee-uh)
Disease caused by the spread of bacteria and their toxins in the bloodstream. Also called blood poisoning and septicemia.
toxic listen (TOK-sik)
Having to do with poison or something harmful to the body. Toxic substances usually cause unwanted side effects.
toxicant listen (TOK-sih-kunt)
A poison that is made by humans or that is put into the environment by human activities. Many pesticides are toxicants.
toxicity listen (tok-SIH-sih-tee)
The extent to which something is poisonous or harmful.
toxicology listen (TOK-sih-KAH-loh-jee)
The study of poisons, including the source, effect, and treatment of poisoning. It is a branch of pharmacology (the study of drugs).
toxin listen (TOK-sin)
A poison made by certain bacteria, plants, or animals, including insects.
TP-38 immunotoxin listen (... IH-myoo-noh-TOK-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain tumors. It combines a protein that binds to certain tumor cells with a bacterial toxin that kills tumor cells.
TP53 gene listen (... jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called tumor protein p53. This protein is found inside the nucleus of cells and plays a key role in controlling cell division and cell death. It helps keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. Mutations (changes) in the TP53 gene may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. These changes have been found in a genetic condition called Li-Fraumeni syndrome and in many types of cancer. The TP53 gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called p53 gene and tumor protein p53 gene.
tPA
An enzyme made in the body that helps dissolve blood clots. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory to treat heart attacks, strokes, and clots in the lungs. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer. tPA is a type of systemic thrombolytic agent. Also called tissue plasminogen activator.
TPA
A substance being studied in the treatment of leukemias and lymphomas. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. TPA affects many cell actions and may cause tumor cells to die. It is a type of phorbol ester. Also called 12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate and tetradecanoylphorbol acetate.
TPF
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), cisplatin (Platinol), and fluorouracil. Also called DCF, docetaxel-cisplatin-fluorouracil, Taxotere-Platinol-fluorouracil, and TPF regimen.
TPF regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat certain types of head and neck cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs docetaxel (Taxotere), cisplatin (Platinol), and fluorouracil. Also called DCF, docetaxel-cisplatin-fluorouracil, Taxotere-Platinol-fluorouracil, and TPF.
TPN
A form of nutrition that is delivered into a vein. TPN does not use the digestive system. It may be given to people who are unable to absorb nutrients through the intestinal tract because of vomiting that won't stop, severe diarrhea, or intestinal disease. It may also be given to those undergoing high-dose chemotherapy or radiation and bone marrow transplantation. It is possible to give all of the protein, calories, vitamins and minerals a person needs using TPN. Also called hyperalimentation, parenteral nutrition, and total parenteral nutrition.
TPO
A substance made by the body that helps make blood cells, especially platelets. A form of TPO made in the laboratory is called recombinant human TPO and rHu TPO. TPO is being studied as a way to increase the number of platelets in cancer patients receiving chemotherapy. Also called thrombopoietin.
trabectedin listen (truh-BEK-teh-din)
A drug used to treat liposarcoma and leiomyosarcoma (types of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who were treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trabectedin may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called ecteinascidin 743, ET-743, and Yondelis.
trabecular cancer listen (truh-BEH-kyoo-ler KAN-ser)
A rare type of cancer that forms on or just beneath the skin, usually in parts of the body that have been exposed to the sun. It is most common in older people and in people with weakened immune systems. Also called Merkel cell cancer, Merkel cell carcinoma, and neuroendocrine carcinoma of the skin.
trace element listen (trays EH-leh-ment)
An element found in very small amounts in a given substance. Organisms need certain trace elements to survive.
tracer listen (TRAY-ser)
A substance (such as a radioisotope) used in imaging procedures.
trach tube listen (trake...)
A 2-inch- to 3-inch-long curved metal or plastic tube placed in a surgically created opening (tracheostomy) in the windpipe to keep it open. Also called tracheostomy tube.
trachea listen (TRAY-kee-uh)
The airway that leads from the larynx (voice box) to the bronchi (large airways that lead to the lungs). Also called windpipe.
tracheal carina listen (TRAY-kee-ul kuh-RY-nuh)
A ridge at the base of the trachea (windpipe) that separates the openings of the right and left main bronchi (the large air passages that lead from the trachea to the lungs). Also called carina of trachea.
trachelectomy listen (TRAY-kee-LEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the cervix (the end of the uterus that forms a canal between the uterus and the vagina).The upper part of the vagina and certain pelvic lymph nodes may also be removed. Also called cervicectomy.
tracheoesophageal puncture listen (TRAY-kee-oh-ee-SAH-fuh-JEE-ul PUNK-cher)
A small opening made by a surgeon between the esophagus and the trachea. A valve keeps food out of the trachea but lets air into the esophagus for esophageal speech.
tracheostomy listen (TRAY-kee-OS-toh-mee)
Surgery to create an opening (stoma) into the windpipe. The opening itself may also be called a tracheostomy.
tracheostomy button listen (TRAY-kee-OS-toh-mee...)
A 0.5-inch- to 1.5-inch-long plastic tube placed in a surgically created opening (tracheostomy) in the windpipe to keep it open.
tracheostomy tube listen (TRAY-kee-OS-toh-mee...)
A 2-inch- to 3-inch-long curved metal or plastic tube placed in a surgically created opening (tracheostomy) in the windpipe to keep it open. Also called trach tube.
tradition listen (truh-DIH-shun)
A belief or behavior that is passed from generation to generation in a family, a culture, or a religion.
traditional acupuncture listen (truh-DIH-shuh-nul AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
An ancient form of acupuncture based on the principle that there are five universal elements (wood, fire, earth, metal, and water) that affect a person's emotions, personality, health, and response to treatment. Each person is affected by one element more than the others. Also called five element acupuncture.
Traditional Chinese Medicine listen (truh-DIH-shuh-nul chy-NEEZ MEH-dih-sin)
A medical system that has been used for thousands of years to prevent, diagnose, and treat disease. It is based on the belief that qi (the body's vital energy) flows along meridians (channels) in the body and keeps a person’s spiritual, emotional, mental, and physical health in balance. Traditional Chinese medicine aims to restore the body’s balance and harmony between the natural opposing forces of yin and yang, which can block qi and cause disease. Traditional Chinese medicine includes acupuncture, diet, herbal therapy, meditation, physical exercise, and massage. Also called Oriental medicine and TCM.
traditional surrogate listen (truh-DIH-shuh-nul SER-uh-gut)
A woman who carries and gives birth to a baby for a person who is not able to have children. The woman who is the traditional surrogate can either get pregnant by artificial insemination with sperm from a sperm donor, or her eggs can be fertilized in the laboratory with sperm from a sperm donor to make an embryo. The embryo is implanted in the uterus of the traditional surrogate, who carries the baby until birth. The traditional surrogate is genetically related to the baby and is the biological mother.
TRAIL listen (trayl)
A cell protein that can attach to certain molecules in some cancer cells and may kill the cells. TRAIL is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called Apo-2L, TNF-related apoptosis-inducing ligand, and tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand.
TRAIL receptor 1 listen (… reh-SEP-ter 1)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of TRAIL receptor 1 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 4, DR4, TRAIL-R1, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A.
TRAIL receptor 2 listen (… reh-SEP-ter 2)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of TRAIL receptor 2 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 5, DR5, TRAIL-R2, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B.
TRAIL-R1 listen (trayl ...)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of TRAIL-R1 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 4, DR4, TRAIL receptor 1, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A.
TRAIL-R2 listen (trayl …)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of TRAIL-R2 on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 5, DR5, TRAIL receptor 2, and tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B.
TRAM flap listen (… flap)
A type of surgery used to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy. A muscle in the lower abdomen called the rectus abdominis, along with skin, fat, and blood vessels, is moved from the lower abdomen to the chest. This is usually done by passing the muscle tissue and blood vessels through a tunnel under the skin to the chest. A TRAM flap forms a natural-looking breast, so the patient usually does not need a breast implant. It is a type of breast reconstruction. Also called transverse rectus abdominis myocutaneous flap.
tramadol hydrochloride listen (TRA-muh-dol HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain in adults. It binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Tramadol hydrochloride is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid. Also called Ultram.
trametinib dimethyl sulfoxide listen (truh-MEH-tih-nib dy-MEH-thul sul-FOK-side)
A drug used with dabrafenib to treat anaplastic thyroid cancer and non-small cell lung cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also used alone or with dabrafenib to treat certain types of melanoma. Trametinib dimethyl sulfoxide is used in patients whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trametinib dimethyl sulfoxide blocks proteins called MEK1 and MEK2. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Trametinib dimethyl sulfoxide is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called Mekinist.
tranquilizer listen (TRANG-kwih-LY-zer)
A drug that calms and soothes, and reduces stress and tension. Tranquilizers are used to treat anxiety and insomnia.
trans fat listen (tranz fat)
A type of fat that has certain chemical properties and is usually found in processed foods such as baked goods, snack foods, fried foods, shortening, margarine, and certain vegetable oils. Eating trans fat increases blood cholesterol levels and the risk of heart disease.
transabdominal ultrasound listen (TRANZ-ab-DAH-mih-nul UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure used to examine the organs in the abdomen. An ultrasound transducer (probe) is pressed firmly against the skin of the abdomen. High-energy sound waves from the transducer bounce off tissues and create echoes. The echoes are sent to a computer, which makes a picture called a sonogram. Also called abdominal ultrasound.
transaminase listen (tranz-A-mih-nays)
A type of enzyme that causes the transfer of a chemical substance called an amino group from one molecule to another. Transaminases are involved in many processes in the body, such as making amino acids.
transarterial chemoembolization listen (tranz-ar-TEER-ee-ul KEE-moh-EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor is blocked after anticancer drugs are given in blood vessels near the tumor. Sometimes, the anticancer drugs are attached to small beads that are injected into an artery that feeds the tumor. The beads block blood flow to the tumor as they release the drug. This allows a higher amount of drug to reach the tumor for a longer period of time, which may kill more cancer cells. It also causes fewer side effects because very little of the drug reaches other parts of the body. Transarterial chemoembolization is used to treat liver cancer. Also called chemoembolization and TACE.
transarterial embolization listen (tranz-ar-TEER-ee-ul EM-boh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure in which the blood supply to a tumor or an abnormal area of tissue is blocked. During transarterial embolization, a small incision (cut) is made in the inner thigh and a catheter (thin, flexible tube) is inserted and guided into an artery near the tumor or abnormal tissue. Once the catheter is in place, small particles made of tiny gelatin sponges or beads are injected. This blocks the artery and stops the flow of blood to the tumor or abnormal area of tissue. Transarterial embolization is used to treat some types of liver cancer, kidney cancer, and neuroendocrine tumors. It may also be used to treat uterine fibroids, aneurysms, and other conditions. Also called arterial embolization and TAE.
Transcendental Meditation listen (TRAN-sen-DEN-tul MEH-dih-TAY-shun)
A mental technique used to promote relaxation, reduce stress, and improve quality of life. Transcendental Meditation is the registered trademark of the Maharishi Foundation Ltd. Also called TM.
transcription listen (tran-SKRIP-shun)
In biology, the process by which a cell makes an RNA copy of a piece of DNA. This RNA copy, called messenger RNA (mRNA), carries the genetic information needed to make proteins in a cell. It carries the information from the DNA in the nucleus of the cell to the cytoplasm, where proteins are made.
transcriptomics listen (trans-krip-TOH-mix)
The study of all RNA molecules in a cell. RNA is copied from pieces of DNA and contains information to make proteins and perform other important functions in the cell. Transcriptomics is used to learn more about how genes are turned on in different types of cells and how this may help cause certain diseases, such as cancer.
transcutaneous electrical nerve stimulation listen (tranz-kyoo-TAY-nee-us ee-LEK-trih-kul nerv STIM-yoo-LAY-shun)
A procedure in which mild electric currents are applied to some areas of the skin. Also called TENS.
transdermal listen (tranz-DER-mul)
Absorbed through the unbroken skin.
transfer factor listen (TRANZ-fer FAK-ter)
A substance made by some white blood cells. Transfer factor from one person’s white blood cells may be able to cause a specific immune response when injected into the skin of another person.
transferrin-CRM107 listen (tranz-FAYR-in...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of brain tumors. Transferrin-CRM107 is made by linking a diphtheria toxin to transferrin, a protein that binds to fast growing cells, such as tumor cells. The diphtheria toxin then kills the tumor cells. Transferrin-CRM107 is a type of immunotoxin.
transformation listen (TRANZ-for-MAY-shun)
In medicine, the change that a normal cell undergoes as it becomes malignant.
transfusion listen (tranz-FYOO-zhun)
A procedure in which whole blood or parts of blood are put into a patient’s bloodstream through a vein. The blood may be donated by another person or it may have been taken from the patient and stored until needed. Also called blood transfusion.
transgenic mice listen (trans-JEH-nik...)
Mice that have had DNA from another source put into their DNA. The foreign DNA is put into the nucleus of a fertilized mouse egg. The new DNA becomes part of every cell and tissue of the mouse. These mice are used in the laboratory to study diseases.
transient abnormal myelopoiesis listen (TRAN-zee-ent ab-NOR-mul MY-eh-loh-poy-EE-sis)
A bone marrow disorder that can occur in newborns who have Down syndrome. It is marked by abnormal, immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow (especially the cells involved in making platelets). The liver may also be larger than normal. Transient abnormal myelopoiesis is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called GATA1. Transient abnormal myelopoiesis usually goes away on its own within the first 3 months of life. Sometimes transient abnormal myelopoiesis causes severe or life-threatening problems, such as bleeding problems, infection, heart, kidney, and liver failure, and abnormal build-up of fluid in the tissues that cover the organs in the body. Infants who have transient abnormal myelopoiesis have an increased risk of developing acute myeloid leukemia (AML) before the age of 3 years. Also called TAM, TMD, transient leukemia, and transient myeloproliferative disorder.
transient leukemia listen (TRAN-zee-ent loo-KEE-mee-uh)
A bone marrow disorder that can occur in newborns who have Down syndrome. It is marked by abnormal, immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow (especially the cells involved in making platelets). The liver may also be larger than normal. Transient leukemia is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called GATA1. Transient leukemia usually goes away on its own within the first 3 months of life. Sometimes transient leukemia causes severe or life-threatening problems, such as bleeding problems, infection, heart, kidney, and liver failure, and abnormal build-up of fluid in the tissues that cover the organs in the body. Infants who have transient leukemia have an increased risk of developing acute myeloid leukemia (AML) before the age of 3 years. Also called TAM, TMD, transient abnormal myelopoiesis, and transient myeloproliferative disorder.
transient myeloproliferative disorder listen (TRAN-zee-ent MY-eh-loh-proh-LIH-feh-ruh-tiv dis-OR-der)
A bone marrow disorder that can occur in newborns who have Down syndrome. It is marked by abnormal, immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow (especially the cells involved in making platelets). The liver may also be larger than normal. Transient myeloproliferative disorder is caused by mutations (changes) in a gene called GATA1. Transient myeloproliferative disorder usually goes away on its own within the first 3 months of life. Sometimes transient myeloproliferative disorder causes severe or life-threatening problems, such as bleeding problems, infection, heart, kidney, and liver failure, and abnormal build-up of fluid in the tissues that cover the organs in the body. Infants who have transient myeloproliferative disorder have an increased risk of developing acute myeloid leukemia (AML) before the age of 3 years. Also called TAM, TMD, transient abnormal myelopoiesis, and transient leukemia.
transient receptor potential cation channel, subfamily V, member 6 listen (TRAN-zee-ent reh-SEP-ter poh-TEN-shul KA-ty-on CHA-nul sub-FA-mih-lee …)
A protein found in cell membranes that moves calcium into cells. Levels of transient receptor potential cation channel, subfamily V, member 6 are lower than normal in patients who don’t have enough vitamin D. High levels of the protein may be found in breast cancer tissue. It is a type of calcium channel protein. Also called TRPV6.
transitional care listen (tran-ZIH-shuh-nul kayr)
Support given to patients when they move from one phase of disease or treatment to another, such as from hospital care to home care. It involves helping patients and families with medical, practical, and emotional needs as they adjust to different levels and goals of care.
transitional cell listen (tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel)
A cell that varies in shape depending on whether the tissue is being stretched. Transitional cells may be stretched without breaking apart. They line hollow organs such as the bladder.
transitional cell cancer listen (tran-ZIH-shuh-nul sel KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in cells called urothelial cells that line the urethra, bladder, ureters, renal pelvis, and some other organs. Urothelial cells are also called transitional cells. These cells can change shape and stretch without breaking apart. Also called urothelial cancer.
translation listen (trans-LAY-shun)
In biology, the process by which a cell makes proteins using the genetic information carried in messenger RNA (mRNA). The mRNA is made by copying DNA, and the information it carries tells the cell how to link amino acids together to form proteins.
translational research listen (trans-LAY-shuh-nul REE-serch)
A term used to describe the process by which the results of research done in the laboratory are used to develop new ways to diagnose and treat disease.
translocation listen (TRANZ-loh-KAY-shun)
A genetic change in which a piece of one chromosome breaks off and attaches to another chromosome. Sometimes pieces from two different chromosomes will trade places with each other. Translocations may lead to medical problems such as leukemia, breast cancer, schizophrenia, muscular dystrophy, and Down syndrome.
transoral robotic surgery listen (TRANZ-or-ul roh-BAH-tik SER-juh-ree)
Surgery in which a robot with arms is used to remove cancer from hard-to-reach areas of the mouth and throat. Cameras attached to the robot give a 3-dimensional (3D) image that a surgeon can see. The surgeon guides tools at the ends of the robot arms to remove the cancer. Also called TORS.
transperineal biopsy listen (TRANZ-PAYR-ih-NEE-ul BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a sample of tissue is removed from the prostate for examination under a microscope. The sample is removed with a thin needle that is inserted through the skin between the scrotum and rectum and into the prostate.
transperineal template-guided prostate mapping biopsy listen (TRANZ-payr-ih-NEE-ul TEM-plut-GY-ded PROS-tayt MA-ping BY-op-see)
A procedure being studied in the diagnosis of prostate cancer and in planning prostate cancer treatment. Ultrasound is used to create a map of the prostate so the whole prostate gland can be seen in three dimensions and divided into 24 areas. Needles are then inserted through a template into each of the 24 areas and tissue is removed to be checked under a microscope. Also called TTMB.
transplant surgeon listen (TRANZ-plant SER-jun)
A surgeon who has special training in transplantation surgery. The surgeon replaces a patient's organ with an organ from another person.
transplantation listen (tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
A surgical procedure in which tissue or an organ is transferred from one area of a person’s body to another area, or from one person (the donor) to another person (the recipient).
transrectal biopsy listen (tranz-REK-tul BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a sample of tissue is removed from the prostate using a thin needle that is inserted through the rectum and into the prostate. Transrectal ultrasound (TRUS) is usually used to guide the needle. The sample is examined under a microscope to see if it contains cancer.
transrectal ultrasound listen (tranz-REK-tul UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure in which a probe that sends out high-energy sound waves is inserted into the rectum. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of body tissue called a sonogram. Transrectal ultrasound is used to look for abnormalities in the rectum and nearby structures, including the prostate. Also called endorectal ultrasound, ERUS, and TRUS.
transsphenoidal surgery listen (TRANS-sfee-NOY-dul SER-juh-ree)
A type of surgery in which instruments are inserted through the nose and sphenoid sinus (a hollow space in a bone in the nose) to remove tumors that are in or near the pituitary gland. The pituitary gland is a pea-sized organ that lies at the base of the brain above the back of the nose.
transurethral biopsy listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a sample of tissue is removed from the prostate for examination under a microscope. A thin, lighted tube is inserted through the urethra into the prostate, and a small piece of tissue is removed with a cutting loop.
transurethral electroevaporation of the prostate listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul ee-LEK-troh-ee-VA-per-AY-shun ... PROS-tayt)
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. A ball or special wire loop on the instrument heats the prostate tissue and turns it to vapor. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral electrovaporization of the prostate, TUEVAP, and TUVP.
transurethral electrovaporization of the prostate listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul ee-LEK-troh-VAY-per-ih-ZAY-shun ... PROS-tayt)
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. A ball or special wire loop on the instrument heats the prostate tissue and turns it to vapor. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral electroevaporation of the prostate, TUEVAP, and TUVP.
transurethral incision of the prostate listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul in-SIH-zhun ... PROS-tayt)
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra and one or two small cuts are made in the bladder neck and prostate. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called TUIP.
transurethral microwave thermotherapy listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul MY-kroh-WAYV THER-moh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the bladder. A small microwave antenna on the instrument heats nearby prostate tissue and destroys it. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called TUMT.
transurethral needle ablation listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul NEE-dul a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure that is used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument with a small probe that gives off low-level radiofrequency energy is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. The energy from the probe heats nearby prostate tissue and destroys it. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral radiofrequency ablation and TUNA.
transurethral radiofrequency ablation listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul RAY-dee-oh-FREE-kwen-see a-BLAY-shun)
A procedure that is used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument with a small probe that gives off low-level radiofrequency energy is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. The energy from the probe heats nearby prostate tissue and destroys it. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral needle ablation and TUNA.
transurethral resection listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery performed with a special instrument inserted through the urethra. Also called TUR.
transurethral resection of the prostate listen (TRANZ-yoo-REE-thrul ree-SEK-shun ... PROS-tayt)
Surgery to remove tissue from the prostate using an instrument inserted through the urethra. Also called TURP.
transvaginal sonography listen (tranz-VA-jih-nul soh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure used to examine the vagina, uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and bladder. An instrument is inserted into the vagina that causes sound waves to bounce off organs inside the pelvis. These sound waves create echoes that are sent to a computer, which creates a picture called a sonogram. Also called transvaginal ultrasound and TVS.
transvaginal ultrasound listen (tranz-VA-jih-nul UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure used to examine the vagina, uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and bladder. An instrument is inserted into the vagina that causes sound waves to bounce off organs inside the pelvis. These sound waves create echoes that are sent to a computer, which creates a picture called a sonogram. Also called transvaginal sonography and TVS.
transverse rectus abdominis myocutaneous flap listen (TRANZ-vers REK-tus ab-DAH-mih-nis MY-oh-kyoo-TAY-nee-us …)
A type of surgery used to rebuild the shape of the breast after a mastectomy. A muscle in the lower abdomen called the rectus abdominis, along with skin, fat, and blood vessels, is moved from the lower abdomen to the chest. This is usually done by passing the muscle tissue and blood vessels through a tunnel under the skin to the chest. A transverse rectus abdominis myocutaneous flap forms a natural-looking breast, so the patient usually does not need a breast implant. It is a type of breast reconstruction. Also called TRAM flap.
trastuzumab listen (tras-TOO-zoo-mab)
A drug used under the brand names Herzuma, Herceptin, and Ogivri to treat HER2-positive breast cancer. It is also used with other drugs under the brand names Herceptin and Ogivri to treat HER2-positive stomach cancer or HER2-positive gastroesophageal junction cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trastuzumab binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Trastuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of HER2 receptor antagonist.
trastuzumab and hyaluronidase listen (tras-TOO-zoo-mab … HY-al-yoo-RAH-nih-days)
A combination of two drugs used to treat certain types of HER2-positive breast cancer. It is a combination of trastuzumab and hyaluronidase. Trastuzumab binds to a protein called HER2, which is found on some cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Hyaluronidase allows trastuzumab to be given by injection under the skin. Trastuzumab and hyaluronidase can be given more quickly than trastuzumab alone, which is given as an infusion. This shortens the amount of time it takes to receive each treatment. Also called Herceptin Hylecta.
trauma listen (TRAW-muh)
Injury to the body, or an event that causes long-lasting mental or emotional damage.
Traumeel S listen (TRUH-meel …)
A substance that contains minerals and extracts of 14 plants, including belladonna, arnica, St. John's wort, and Echinacea. It is being studied as a mouth rinse treatment for oral mucositis (painful mouth sores) caused by cancer therapy. It is known as a homeopathic remedy.
trazodone listen (TRA-zoh-done)
A drug used to treat depression. It may also be used to help relieve anxiety and insomnia (trouble sleeping) and to treat certain other disorders. Trazodone increases the level of the chemical serotonin in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant. Also called Oleptro.
Treanda listen (tree-AN-duh)
A drug used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL). It is also used to treat slow-growing B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) that got worse during or within 6 months after treatment with rituximab. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Treanda damages the cell’s DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called bendamustine hydrochloride and Bendeka.
treatment course listen (TREET-ment kors)
A treatment plan made up of several cycles of treatment. For example, treatment given for one week followed by three weeks of rest (no treatment) is one treatment cycle. When a treatment cycle is repeated multiple times on a regular schedule, it makes up a treatment course. A treatment course can last for several months. Also called course of treatment.
treatment cycle listen (TREET-ment SY-kul)
A period of treatment followed by a period of rest (no treatment) that is repeated on a regular schedule. For example, treatment given for one week followed by three weeks of rest is one treatment cycle. When this cycle is repeated multiple times on a regular schedule, it makes up a course of treatment. Also called cycle of treatment.
treatment field listen (TREET-ment feeld)
In radiation therapy, the place on the body where the radiation beam is aimed.
treatment plan listen (TREET-ment plan)
A detailed plan with information about a patient’s disease, the goal of treatment, the treatment options for the disease and possible side effects, and the expected length of treatment. A treatment plan may also include information about how much the treatment is likely to cost and about regular follow-up care after treatment ends.
treatment schedule listen (TREET-ment SKEH-jool)
A step-by-step plan of the treatment that a patient is going to receive. A treatment schedule includes the type of treatment that will be given (such as chemotherapy or radiation therapy), how it will be given (such as by mouth or by infusion into a vein), and how often it will be given (such as once a day or once a week). It also includes the amount of time between courses of treatment and the total length of time of treatment.
treatment summary listen (TREET-ment SUH-muh-ree)
A detailed summary of a patient’s disease, the type of treatment the patient received, and any side effects or other problems caused by treatment. It usually includes results of laboratory tests (such as pathology reports and biomarker tests) and imaging tests (such as x-rays, CT scans, and MRIs), and whether a patient took part in a clinical trial. A treatment summary may be used to help plan follow-up care after treatment for a disease, such as cancer.
T-regulatory cell listen (T-REH-gyoo-luh-TOR-ee sel)
A type of immune cell that blocks the actions of some other types of lymphocytes, to keep the immune system from becoming over-active. T-regulatory cells are being studied in the treatment of cancer. A T-regulatory cell is a type of white blood cell and a type of lymphocyte. Also called regulatory T cell, suppressor T cell, and T reg.
Trelstar listen (TREL-star)
A drug that is used to treat advanced prostate cancer, and is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It belongs to the family of hormonal drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogs. Also called triptorelin.
tremelimumab listen (treh-meh-LIM-yoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Tremelimumab binds to a protein called CTLA-4, which is found on the surface of T cells (a type of white blood cell). It may block CTLA-4 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. Tremelimumab is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immunomodulatory agent.
treosulfan listen (TREE-oh-SUL-fan)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
trephine listen (TREE-fine)
A surgical tool used to cut out circular pieces of bone or other tissue.
tretinoin listen (TREH-tih-NOYN)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Tretinoin is made in the body from vitamin A and helps cells to grow and develop, especially in the embryo. A form of tretinoin made in the laboratory is put on the skin to treat conditions such as acne and is taken by mouth to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (a fast-growing cancer in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow). Tretinoin is being studied in the prevention and treatment of other types of cancer. Also called all-trans retinoic acid, ATRA, retinoic acid, and vitamin A acid.
Trexall listen (TREK-sawl)
A drug used to treat many types of cancer. It is also used to treat rheumatoid arthritis and severe psoriasis (a type of skin condition). Trexall stops cells from using folic acid to make DNA and may kill cancer cells. It may also lower the body’s immune response. Trexall is a type of antimetabolite and a type of antifolate. Also called amethopterin, methotrexate, MTX, and Rheumatrex.
triacetyluridine listen (try-A-seh-til-YOOR-ih-deen)
A drug used in the emergency treatment of patients who receive too much fluorouracil or capecitabine (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used in the emergency treatment of heart or central nervous system (CNS) toxicity or other serious side effects that occur within 4 days of ending treatment with fluorouracil or capecitabine. Triacetyluridine may help protect healthy cells from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of cytoprotective agent. Also called PN401, uridine triacetate, and Vistogard.
trial sponsor listen (TRY-ul SPON-ser)
A person, company, institution, group, or organization that oversees or pays for a clinical trial and collects and analyzes the data. Also called clinical trial sponsor.
triamcinolone listen (try-am-SIH-noh-lone)
A substance that is being studied for the prevention of nonmelanoma skin cancer. It is an anti-inflammatory drug that is applied to the skin to relieve irritation, rashes, and infections. It belongs to the family of drugs called topical corticosteroids.
Triapine listen (TRY-uh-peen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor. Also called 3-aminopyridine-2-carboxaldehyde thiosemicarbazone and 3-AP.
tributyrin listen (try-BYOO-tuh-rin)
A triglyceride drug that may inhibit cell growth and induce cell differentiation. Differentiating agents may be effective in changing cancer cells back into normal cells.
trichothiodystrophy listen (TRIH-koh-thy-oh-DIS-truh-fee)
A hereditary condition characterized by sparse and brittle hair, short stature, and mental retardation.
TriCor listen (TRY-kor)
A drug used to treat high levels of cholesterol and triglycerides in the blood. TriCor is being studied in the treatment of advanced cancers in young patients and in the treatment of other conditions. It is a type of antilipidemic agent. Also called fenofibrate and Lofibra.
tricyclic antidepressant listen (try-SY-klik AN-tee-dee-PREH-sunt)
A type of drug used to treat depression.
trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride listen (try-FLOOR-ih-deen … ty-PEER-uh-sil HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A combination of the drugs trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride used to treat stomach cancer and gastroesophageal junction cancer that have spread to other parts of the body and have already been treated with at least two other types of anticancer drugs. It is also used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has already been treated with other anticancer drugs and a biological therapy. Trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trifluridine and tipiracil hydrochloride stops cells from making DNA, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Also called Lonsurf.
Trifolium pratense listen (try-FOH-lee-um pray-TEN-see)
A plant whose flowers have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It is being studied in the relief of menopausal symptoms and may have anticancer effects. Also called purple clover, red clover, and wild clover.
trigeminal nerve listen (try-JEH-mih-nul nerv)
The main sensory nerve of the head and face, and the motor nerve of the muscles used in chewing. Also called fifth cranial nerve.
trigger listen (TRIH-ger)
In medicine, a specific event that starts a process or that causes a particular outcome. For example, chemotherapy, painful treatments, or the smells, sounds, and sights that go with them may trigger anxiety and fear in a patient who has cancer. In allergies, exposure to mold, pollen or dust may trigger sneezing, watery eyes, and coughing.
trigger point acupuncture listen (TRIH-ger poynt AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
Use of acupuncture to treat pain by inserting needles into trigger points on the body. Trigger points are places on the body where injury has occurred, but the pain has been sent along nerves and is felt in another place in the body.
triiodothyronine listen (try-I-oh-doh-THY-ruh-neen)
A thyroid hormone. Also called T-3.
Trilisate listen (TRIH-lih-sayt)
A substance used to treat arthritis and relieve pain, inflammation, and fever. It is also being studied in the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia (AML). Trilisate blocks the action of a substance that sends a pain message to the brain. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID). Also called choline magnesium trisalicylate.
trimethoprim-sulfamethoxazole listen (try-MEH-thoh-prim-SUL-fuh-meh-THOK-suh-zole)
An antibiotic drug used to treat infection and prevent pneumocystis carinii pneumonia.
trimetrexate glucuronate listen (TRY-meh-TREK-sayt gloo-KYOO-roh-nayt)
A drug that belongs to the family of drugs called antimetabolites. It is used in the treatment of pneumocystis carinii pneumonia and is being studied in the treatment of cancer.
Triostat listen (TRY-oh-stat)
A drug that is used to treat certain thyroid (a gland located near the voice box) conditions. It is also being studied in the treatment of thyroid cancer. Triostat is made in the laboratory and is a form of the thyroid hormone triiodthyronine (T3). Also called Cytomel and liothyronine sodium.
triple-negative breast cancer listen (TRIH-pul-NEH-guh-tiv brest KAN-ser)
Describes breast cancer cells that do not have estrogen receptors, progesterone receptors, or large amounts of HER2/neu protein. Also called ER-negative PR-negative HER2/neu-negative breast cancer.
triple-positive breast cancer listen (TRIH-pul-PAH-zih-tiv brest KAN-ser)
Describes breast cancer cells that have estrogen receptors, progesterone receptors, and a larger than normal number of HER2 receptors on their surface. Knowing if breast cancer is triple positive may help plan the best treatment, which may include hormone therapy and drugs that target the HER2 receptor.
triptorelin listen (TRIP-toh-REH-lin)
A drug that is used to treat advanced prostate cancer, and is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It belongs to the family of hormonal drugs called gonadotropin-releasing hormone analogs. Also called Trelstar.
Trisenox listen (TRY-seh-nox)
A drug used to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (APL) that has a certain chromosome abnormality or a fusion gene called PML/RAR-alpha. It is used with tretinoin in some newly diagnosed patients. It is used alone in patients whose cancer has not gotten better or has come back after treatment with other anticancer drugs. Trisenox is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trisenox damages a fusion protein made by the PML/RAR-alpha fusion gene. This may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Also called arsenic trioxide.
trisomy 18 listen (TRY-soh-mee …)
A genetic disorder caused by having an extra chromosome 18 in some or all of the body’s cells. Trisomy 18 is marked by a low birth weight and certain abnormal features. These include a small, abnormally shaped head; a small jaw and mouth; clenched fists with overlapping fingers; and heart, lung, kidney, intestine, and stomach defects. Many babies with trisomy 18 die before birth or within the first month of life, but some children live for several years. Having trisomy 18 increases the risk of certain types of cancer, such as hepatoblastoma (a type of liver cancer) and Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer). Also called Edwards syndrome.
Trk inhibitor LOXO-101 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A drug used to treat solid tumors that have spread to other parts of the body or cannot be removed by surgery and that got worse after other treatment or cannot be treated with other therapies. It is used in patients whose disease has the NTRK gene fusion but does not have certain mutations (changes) in the TRK protein. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Trk inhibitor LOXO-101 blocks the TRK protein, which is involved in cell signaling and cell growth. TRK may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Trk inhibitor LOXO-101 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called larotrectinib sulfate, LOXO-101, and Vitrakvi.
TRK protein family listen (… PROH-teen FA-mih-lee)
A family of proteins that are found on nerve cells. They are involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth, cell maturation, and cell survival. The genes that make the TRK proteins may have mutations (changes) that cause abnormal TRK proteins to be made. These abnormal proteins may be too active or found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells, which may cause cancer cells to grow. Drugs that block TRK proteins are being used in the treatment of some types of cancer. TRK proteins are receptor tyrosine kinases. Also called tropomyosin receptor kinase protein family.
trophoblast listen (TROH-foh-BLAST)
A thin layer of cells that helps a developing embryo attach to the wall of the uterus, protects the embryo, and forms a part of the placenta.
tropisetron listen (troh-PIH-seh-tron)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by cancer treatment. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Tropisetron blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. It is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. It is not available in the United States.
tropomyosin receptor kinase protein family listen (TROH-poh-MY-oh-sin reh-SEP-ter KY-nays PROH-teen FA-mih-lee)
A family of proteins that are found on nerve cells. They are involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth, cell maturation, and cell survival. The genes that make the tropomyosin receptor kinase proteins may have mutations (changes) that cause abnormal tropomyosin receptor kinase proteins to be made. These abnormal proteins may be too active or found in higher than normal amounts on some types of cancer cells, which may cause cancer cells to grow. Drugs that block tropomyosin receptor kinase proteins are being used in the treatment of some types of cancer. Tropomyosin receptor kinase proteins are receptor tyrosine kinases. Also called TRK protein family.
troxacitabine listen (TROK-suh-SY-tuh-been)
A drug being studied for use as an anticancer agent.
TRPV6
A protein found in cell membranes that moves calcium into cells. Levels of TRPV6 are lower than normal in patients who don’t have enough vitamin D. High levels of the protein may be found in breast cancer tissue. It is a type of calcium channel protein. Also called transient receptor potential cation channel, subfamily V, member 6.
true histiocytic lymphoma listen (... HIS-tee-oh-SIH-tik lim-FOH-muh)
A rare, very aggressive (fast-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma (cancer that begins in the cells of the immune system). It is marked by large abnormal lymphoid cells that do not look like T cells or B cells.
true lavender listen (...LA-ven-der)
A plant with aromatic leaves and flowers that is a member of the mint family. Oil from the flowers has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems, to keep insects away, and to wash in. It is also used in aromatherapy. Perillyl alcohol, a substance found in true lavender, is being studied in cancer prevention and treatment. The scientific name is Lavandula angustifolia. Also called English lavender and lavender.
trunk listen
The main part of the body that contains the chest, abdomen, pelvis, and back. Most of the body’s organs and the backbone are found in the trunk. Also called torso.
TRUS
A procedure in which a probe that sends out high-energy sound waves is inserted into the rectum. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of body tissue called a sonogram. TRUS is used to look for abnormalities in the rectum and nearby structures, including the prostate. Also called endorectal ultrasound, ERUS, and transrectal ultrasound.
trust listen (trust)
A legal document in which a person states what is to be done with his or her property after death. There are many types of trusts, and a trust may take the place of a will.
Truxima listen (truk-SEE-muh)
A drug used alone or with other drugs to treat certain types of low-grade or follicular B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that are CD20 positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Truxima binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells and some types of cancer cells. This may help the immune system kill cancer cells. Truxima contains the active ingredient rituximab. It is a type of monoclonal antibody.
TSEB radiation therapy listen (... RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy using electrons that is directed at the entire surface of the body. This type of radiation goes into the outer layers of the skin, but does not go deeper into tissues and organs below the skin. Also called total skin electron beam radiation therapy.
TSH
A hormone produced by the pituitary gland. TSH stimulates the release of thyroid hormone from thyroglobulin. It also stimulates the growth of thyroid follicular cells. An abnormal TSH level may mean that the thyroid hormonal regulation system is out of control, usually as a result of a benign condition (hyperthyroidism or hypothyroidism). Also called thyroid-stimulating hormone.
TSNA
A type of harmful, cancer-causing chemical found in tobacco and tobacco smoke. TSNAs are formed when tobacco leaves are grown, cured, aged, and processed. Tobacco products can contain different amounts of TSNAs, depending on how they are made. Also called tobacco-specific nitrosamine.
TTI-237
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors.
TTMB
A procedure being studied in the diagnosis of prostate cancer and in planning prostate cancer treatment. Ultrasound is used to create a map of the prostate so the whole prostate gland can be seen in three dimensions and divided into 24 areas. Needles are then inserted through a template into each of the 24 areas and tissue is removed to be checked under a microscope. Also called transperineal template-guided prostate mapping biopsy.
TTP
The length of time from the date of diagnosis or the start of treatment for a disease until the disease starts to get worse or spread to other parts of the body. In a clinical trial, measuring the TTP is one way to see how well a new treatment works. Also called time to progression.
tubal ligation listen (TOO-bul ly-GAY-shun)
An operation to tie the fallopian tubes closed. This procedure prevents pregnancy by blocking the passage of eggs from the ovaries to the uterus.
tubefeeding listen (toob-FEE-ding)
A way of giving medicines and liquids, including liquid foods, through a small tube placed through the nose or mouth into the stomach or small intestine. Sometimes the tube is placed into the stomach or small intestine through an incision (cut) made on the outside of the abdomen. Tubefeeding may be added to what a person is able to eat and drink, or it may be the only source of nutrition. It is a type of enteral nutrition. Also called gavage.
tuberculosis listen (too-BER-kyoo-LOH-sis)
A disease caused by a specific type of bacteria that spreads from one person to another through the air. Tuberculosis can affect many parts of the body, but most often affects the lungs. A person may not have symptoms of tuberculosis for years, but they may appear when the patient becomes ill with a serious condition like diabetes, AIDS, or cancer. Tuberculosis can usually be treated and cured with antibiotics. Also called TB.
tuberous sclerosis listen (TOO-ber-us skleh-ROH-sis)
A genetic disorder in which benign (not cancer) tumors form in the kidneys, brain, eyes, heart, lungs, and skin. This disease can cause seizures, mental disabilities, and different types of skin lesions.
tubulin listen (TOO-byoo-lin)
One of a group of proteins found in high levels in the cell cytoplasm (fluid inside a cell but outside the cell's nucleus). Tubulins are the building blocks of microtubules (narrow, hollow tubes inside a cell), which are involved in cell division and cell movement. Certain anticancer drugs bind to and block the formation or function of tubulins, which may block cell division.
tubulovillous adenoma listen (TOO-byoo-loh-VIH-lus A-deh-NOH-muh)
A type of polyp that grows in the colon and other places in the gastrointestinal tract and sometimes in other parts of the body. These adenomas may become malignant (cancer).
TUEVAP
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. A ball or special wire loop on the instrument heats the prostate tissue and turns it to vapor. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral electroevaporation of the prostate, transurethral electrovaporization of the prostate, and TUVP.
tufted angioma listen (TUF-ted AN-jee-OH-muh)
A rare, benign (not cancer) blood vessel tumor that usually forms on the skin of the arms and legs, but may also form in deeper tissues, such as muscle and bone. Tufted angiomas grow slowly and can spread to nearby tissue. Signs and symptoms may include firm, painful areas of skin that look bruised; purple or brownish-red areas on the skin; easy bruising; anemia; and abnormal bleeding. Tufted angiomas are most common in infants and young children. They are a type of vascular tumor.
tui na listen (twee-nah)
Chinese massage that uses kneading, pressing, rolling, shaking, and stretching of the body. Tui na is thought to regulate qi (vital energy) and blood flow, and improve the function of tendons, bones, and joints.
TUIP
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra and one or two small cuts are made in the bladder neck and prostate. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral incision of the prostate.
tumescent mastectomy listen (too-MEH-sent ma-STEK-toh-mee)
A type of surgery to remove the breast. The breast is injected with a liquid mixture of salts and small amounts of two drugs. These drugs are lidocaine, to numb the area, and epinephrine, to narrow blood vessels and reduce bleeding. Tumescent mastectomy is usually used to treat breast cancer in elderly patients.
tumor listen (TOO-mer)
An abnormal mass of tissue that results when cells divide more than they should or do not die when they should. Tumors may be benign (not cancer), or malignant (cancer). Also called neoplasm.
tumor antigen vaccine listen (TOO-mer AN-tih-jen vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made of cancer cells, parts of cancer cells, or pure tumor antigens (substances isolated from tumor cells). A tumor antigen vaccine may stimulate the body's immune system to find and kill cancer cells.
tumor board review listen (TOO-mer bord reh-VYOO)
A treatment planning approach in which a number of doctors who are experts in different specialties (disciplines) review and discuss the medical condition and treatment options of a patient. In cancer treatment, a tumor board review may include that of a medical oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with drugs), a surgical oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with surgery), and a radiation oncologist (who provides cancer treatment with radiation). Also called multidisciplinary opinion.
tumor burden listen (TOO-mer BUR-den)
Refers to the number of cancer cells, the size of a tumor, or the amount of cancer in the body. Also called tumor load.
tumor debulking listen (TOO-mer dee-BUL-king)
Surgical removal of as much of a tumor as possible. Tumor debulking may increase the chance that chemotherapy or radiation therapy will kill all the tumor cells. It may also be done to relieve symptoms or help the patient live longer. Also called debulking.
tumor DNA sequencing listen (TOO-mer ... SEE-kwen-sing)
A laboratory method used to learn the exact order (sequence) of the chemical building blocks that make up tumor DNA. Errors in the sequence of the building blocks can cause cancer cells to grow and spread. Knowing the DNA sequence of a person’s tumor may help plan treatment that targets the specific error in the tumor.
tumor grade listen (TOO-mer grayd)
A description of a tumor based on how abnormal the cancer cells and tissue look under a microscope and how quickly the cancer cells are likely to grow and spread. Low-grade cancer cells look more like normal cells and tend to grow and spread more slowly than high-grade cancer cells. Grading systems are different for each type of cancer. They are used to help plan treatment and determine prognosis. Also called grade and histologic grade.
tumor initiation listen (TOO-mer ih-NIH-shee-AY-shun)
A process in which normal cells are changed so that they are able to form tumors. Substances that cause cancer can be tumor initiators.
tumor load listen (TOO-mer lode)
Refers to the number of cancer cells, the size of a tumor, or the amount of cancer in the body. Also called tumor burden.
tumor lysis syndrome listen (TOO-mer LY-sis SIN-drome)
A condition that can occur after treatment of a fast-growing cancer, especially certain leukemias and lymphomas (cancers of the blood). As tumor cells die, they break apart and release their contents into the blood. This causes a change in certain chemicals in the blood, which may cause damage to organs, including the kidneys, heart, and liver.
tumor marker listen (TOO-mer MAR-ker)
A substance found in tissue or blood or other body fluids that may be a sign of cancer or certain benign (noncancer) conditions. Most tumor markers are made by both normal cells and cancer cells, but they are made in larger amounts by cancer cells. A tumor marker may help to diagnose cancer, plan treatment, or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back. Examples of tumor markers include CA-125 (in ovarian cancer), CA 15-3 (in breast cancer), CEA (in colon cancer), and PSA (in prostate cancer).
tumor marker test listen (TOO-mer MAR-ker ...)
A test that measures the amount of substances called tumor markers in tissue, blood, urine, or other body fluids. Most tumor markers are made by both normal cells and cancer cells, but they are made in higher amounts by cancer cells. A high level of a tumor marker may be a sign of cancer or certain benign (noncancerous) conditions. A tumor marker test is usually done with other tests, such as biopsies, to help diagnose some types of cancer. It may also be used to help plan treatment or find out how well treatment is working or if cancer has come back.
tumor microenvironment listen (TOO-mer MY-kroh-en-VY-run-ment)
The normal cells, molecules, and blood vessels that surround and feed a tumor cell. A tumor can change its microenvironment, and the microenvironment can affect how a tumor grows and spreads.
tumor model listen (TOO-mer MAH-dul)
Cells, tissues, or animals used to study the development and progression of cancer, and to test new treatments before they are given to humans. Animals with transplanted human tumors or other tissues are called xenograft models.
tumor mutational burden listen (TOO-mer myoo-TAY-shuh-nul BUR-den)
The total number of mutations (changes) found in the DNA of cancer cells. Knowing the tumor mutational burden may help plan the best treatment. For example, tumors that have a high number of mutations appear to be more likely to respond to certain types of immunotherapy. Tumor mutational burden is being used as a type of biomarker. Also called TMB.
tumor necrosis factor listen (TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter)
A protein made by white blood cells in response to an antigen (substance that causes the immune system to make a specific immune response) or infection. Tumor necrosis factor can also be made in the laboratory. It may boost a person’s immune response, and also may cause necrosis (cell death) of some types of tumor cells. Tumor necrosis factor is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of cytokine. Also called TNF.
tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A listen (TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter SOO-per FA-mih-lee …)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10A on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 4, DR4, TRAIL receptor 1, and TRAIL-R1.
tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B listen (TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter SOO-per FA-mih-lee …)
A protein on the surface of certain cells that binds another protein called TRAIL, which may kill some cancer cells. An increase in the amount or activity of tumor necrosis factor receptor superfamily member 10B on cancer cells may kill more cells. Also called death receptor 5, DR5, TRAIL receptor 2, and TRAIL-R2.
tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand listen (TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter-ree-LAY-ted A-pop-TOH-sis-in-DOO-sing LIH-gund)
A cell protein that can attach to certain molecules in some cancer cells and may kill the cells. Tumor necrosis factor-related apoptosis-inducing ligand is being studied in the treatment of cancer. Also called Apo-2L, TNF-related apoptosis-inducing ligand, and TRAIL.
tumor profiling listen (TOO-mer PROH-fy-ling)
A laboratory test to check for certain genes or gene mutations (changes), proteins, or other biomarkers in a sample of tumor tissue. Tumor profiling may be used to help plan treatment and predict whether cancer will come back or spread to other parts of the body.
tumor promotion listen (TOO-mer proh-MOH-shun)
A process in which existing tumors are stimulated to grow. Tumor promoters are not able to cause tumors to form.
tumor protein p53 gene listen (TOO-mer PROH-teen ... jeen)
A gene that makes a protein called tumor protein p53. This protein is found inside the nucleus of cells and plays a key role in controlling cell division and cell death. It helps keep abnormal cells, including cancer cells, from growing. Mutations (changes) in the tumor protein p53 gene may cause cancer cells to grow and spread in the body. These changes have been found in a genetic condition called Li-Fraumeni syndrome and in many types of cancer. The tumor protein p53 gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called p53 gene and TP53 gene.
tumor suppressor gene listen (TOO-mer suh-PREH-ser jeen)
A type of gene that makes a protein called a tumor suppressor protein that helps control cell growth. Mutations (changes in DNA) in tumor suppressor genes may lead to cancer. Also called antioncogene.
tumor vasculature–targeted tumor necrosis factor alpha listen (TOO-mer VAS-kyoo-luh-cher-TAR-geh-ted TOO-mer neh-KROH-sis FAK-ter AL-fuh)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by linking tumor necrosis factor (TNF) to a peptide. The peptide binds to tumor blood vessels, and TNF damages them. It is a type of biological response modifier. Also called NGR-TNF.
tumor volume listen (TOO-mer VOL-yoom)
The size of a cancer measured by the amount of space taken up by the tumor. For example, the tumor volume of prostate cancer is the percentage of the prostate taken up by the tumor.
tumor-agnostic therapy listen (TOO-mer-ag-NAH-stik THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of therapy that uses drugs or other substances to treat cancer based on the cancer’s genetic and molecular features without regard to the cancer type or where the cancer started in the body. Tumor-agnostic therapy uses the same drug to treat all cancer types that have the genetic mutation (change) or biomarker that is targeted by the drug. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called tissue-agnostic therapy.
tumor-derived listen (TOO-mer-deh-RIVED)
Taken from an individual's own tumor tissue; may be used in the development of a vaccine that enhances the body's ability to build an immune response to the tumor.
tumor-infiltrating lymphocyte listen (TOO-mer-IN-fil-TRAY-ting LIM-foh-site)
A type of immune cell that has moved from the blood into a tumor to try and attack the cancer. In cancer therapy, tumor-infiltrating lymphocytes are removed from a patient’s tumor and are then treated in the laboratory with substances that activate the lymphocytes to help them better kill the patient’s cancer cells. Large numbers of these activated lymphocytes are then given back to the patient to help the immune system fight cancer. Also called TIL.
tumor-specific antigen listen (TOO-mer-speh-SIH-fik AN-tih-jen)
A protein or other molecule that is found only on cancer cells and not on normal cells. Tumor-specific antigens can help the body make an immune response against cancer cells. They may be used as possible targets for targeted therapy or for immunotherapy to help boost the body’s immune system to kill more cancer cells. Tumor-specific antigens may also be used in laboratory tests to help diagnose some types of cancer.
TUMT
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the bladder. A small microwave antenna on the instrument heats nearby prostate tissue and destroys it. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral microwave thermotherapy.
TUNA
A procedure that is used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument with a small probe that gives off low-level radiofrequency energy is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. The energy from the probe heats nearby prostate tissue and destroys it. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral needle ablation and transurethral radiofrequency ablation.
TUR
Surgery performed with a special instrument inserted through the urethra. Also called transurethral resection.
Turcot syndrome listen (ter-KOH SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder in which polyps (abnormal growths of tissue) form on the inside walls of the colon and rectum, and tumors form in the brain. There are two types of Turcot syndrome, which are caused by mutations (changes) in different genes. People with Turcot syndrome have a higher-than-normal risk of colorectal cancer and brain cancer, especially glioblastoma and medulloblastoma.
Turkish rhubarb listen (... ROO-barb)
The root of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anti-inflammatory and anticancer effects. The scientific name is Rheum palmatum or Rheum officinale. Also called Chinese rhubarb, da-huang, Indian rhubarb, and rhubarb.
turmeric listen (TER-mayr-ik)
An East Indian plant that is a member of the ginger family and is used as a spice and food color. The underground stems are used in some cultures to treat certain stomach problems. The substance in turmeric that gives it a yellow color (curcumin) is being studied in the treatment of cancer, Alzheimer disease, cystic fibrosis, and psoriasis. The scientific name is Curcuma longa. Also called Indian saffron and jiang huang.
Turner syndrome listen (TER-ner SIN-drome)
A genetic condition that occurs in females who have a missing or abnormal X chromosome (sex chromosome). Turner syndrome is marked by a shorter-than-average height, ovaries that do not function normally, and infertility. Other signs and symptoms may include extra folds of skin on the neck, a low hairline at the back of the neck, swelling of the hands and feet, and heart, kidney, bone, and hearing problems. Turner syndrome is present at birth but its signs and symptoms may occur slowly over time. Having Turner syndrome increases the risk of germ cell tumors in the ovaries.
TURP listen
Surgery to remove tissue from the prostate using an instrument inserted through the urethra. Also called transurethral resection of the prostate.
TUVP
A procedure used to treat benign prostatic hypertrophy (BPH). An instrument is inserted through the urethra into the prostate. A ball or special wire loop on the instrument heats the prostate tissue and turns it to vapor. This relieves pressure and improves urine flow. Also called transurethral electroevaporation of the prostate, transurethral electrovaporization of the prostate, and TUEVAP.
T-VEC
A drug used to treat melanoma that has recurred (come back) after surgery. It is used in patients whose cancer is in the skin and lymph nodes and cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. T-VEC is made with a form of the herpesvirus that has been changed in the laboratory to infect and break down cancer cells without harming normal cells. It may also help the immune system kill cancer cells. T-VEC is injected directly into tumors in the skin and lymph nodes. It is a type of oncolytic virus therapy. Also called Imlygic and talimogene laherparepvec.
TVS
A procedure used to examine the vagina, uterus, fallopian tubes, ovaries, and bladder. An instrument is inserted into the vagina that causes sound waves to bounce off organs inside the pelvis. These sound waves create echoes that are sent to a computer, which creates a picture called a sonogram. Also called transvaginal sonography and transvaginal ultrasound.
twelve-step program listen (... PROH-gram)
A program to help people recover from substance abuse, emotional disorders, or addictions. The twelve steps come from an organization called Alcoholics Anonymous (AA) and are changed for each specific condition.
Tykerb listen (TY-kerb)
A drug used to treat HER2 positive (HER2+) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with capecitabine in patients whose cancer has not gotten better with other anticancer drugs. It is used with letrozole in postmenopausal women whose cancer is hormone receptor positive (HR+) and who need hormone therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Tykerb blocks epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR) and other proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. Tykerb is a type of ErbB2 and EGFR dual tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called GW572016, lapatinib, and lapatinib ditosylate.
tympanites listen (TIM-puh-NY-teez)
Swelling of the abdomen caused by gas in the intestines or peritoneal cavity. Also called meteorism.
type 3 serotonin receptor antagonist listen (tipe 3 SAYR-uh-TOH-nin reh-SEP-ter an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug used to treat certain types of irritable bowel syndrome and relieve nausea and vomiting. It is a type of antiemetic. Also called 5-HT3 receptor antagonist and 5-hydroxytryptamine 3 receptor antagonist.
type C thymoma listen (tipe C thy-MOH-muh)
A rare type of thymus gland cancer. It usually spreads, has a high risk of recurrence, and has a poor survival rate. Thymic carcinoma is divided into subtypes, depending on the types of cells in which the cancer began. Also called thymic carcinoma.
tyrosinase peptide listen (ty-RAH-sih-NAYS PEP-tide)
A protein that is made from tumor cells and is used in a vaccine against melanoma. A tyrosinase peptide vaccine may stimulate the body's immune system to find and kill melanoma cells.
tyrosine kinase inhibitor listen (TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks the action of enzymes called tyrosine kinases. Tyrosine kinases are a part of many cell functions, including cell signaling, growth, and division. These enzymes may be too active or found at high levels in some types of cancer cells, and blocking them may help keep cancer cells from growing. Some tyrosine kinase inhibitors are used to treat cancer. They are a type of targeted therapy.
tyrosine kinase inhibitor BIBF 1120 listen (TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Tyrosine kinase inhibitor BIBF 1120 blocks enzymes needed for cells to grow, and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called BIBF 1120.
tyrosinemia listen (TY-roh-sih-NEE-mee-uh)
A rare, inherited disorder marked by high blood levels of a protein building block called tyrosine. This can cause a harmful buildup of tyrosine and other substances in the body’s tissues and organs, especially in the liver, kidney, and nervous system. This can lead to serious medical problems and may increase the risk of liver cancer. Tyrosinemia is caused by mutations (changes) in certain genes that make enzymes needed to break down tyrosine.
TZT-1027
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of tubulin inhibitor. Also called soblidotin.
ubiquinone listen (yoo-BIH-kwih-NONE)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Ubiquinone helps mitochondria (small structures in the cell) make energy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Ubiquinone is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, beef, soybeans, peanuts, and spinach. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and heart disease and in the relief of side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Also called coenzyme Q10, CoQ10, Q10, and vitamin Q10.
UCN-01
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of drugs called staurosporine analogs.
UFT
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It is a combination of tegafur and uracil. The tegafur is taken up by the cancer cells and breaks down into 5-FU, a substance that kills tumor cells. The uracil causes higher amounts of 5-FU to stay inside the cells and kill them. UFT is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Ftorafur and tegafur-uracil.
UGT1A1
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It is an enzyme produced by the liver and intestine.
ulcer listen (UL-ser)
A break on the skin, in the lining of an organ, or on the surface of a tissue. An ulcer forms when the surface cells become inflamed, die, and are shed. Ulcers may be linked to cancer and other diseases.
ulceration listen (UL-seh-RAY-shun)
The formation of a break on the skin or on the surface of an organ. An ulcer forms when the surface cells die and are cast off. Ulcers may be associated with cancer and other diseases.
ulcerative colitis listen (UL-seh-RUH-tiv koh-LY-tis)
Chronic inflammation of the colon that produces ulcers in its lining. This condition is marked by abdominal pain, cramps, and loose discharges of pus, blood, and mucus from the bowel.
Ulmus fulva listen (UL-mus FUL-vuh)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, Indian elm, red elm, slippery elm, sweet elm, and Ulmus rubra.
Ulmus rubra listen (UL-mus ROO-bruh)
The inner bark of this plant has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have antioxidant effects. Also called gray elm, Indian elm, red elm, slippery elm, sweet elm, and Ulmus fulva.
Ultomiris listen (UL-toh-MEER-is)
A drug used to treat a rare red blood cell disorder called paroxysmal nocturnal hemoglobinuria (PNH). It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions. Ultomiris binds to an immune system protein called C5. This may help keep red blood cells from breaking down. Ultomiris is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called ravulizumab.
ultra light cigarette listen (UL-truh lite SIH-guh-ret)
A type of cigarette that is claimed to give off less tobacco tar than a regular or light (“low-tar”) cigarette when smoked. Ultra light cigarettes have been shown to be no safer than regular cigarettes, and smoking them does not lower the risk of cancer or other diseases. A person smoking an ultra light cigarette can inhale the same amount of tobacco tar, nicotine, and harmful, cancer-causing chemicals as in a regular cigarette, depending on how the cigarette is smoked. Cigarettes are no longer allowed to be labeled or advertised as ultra light cigarettes.
Ultram listen (UL-tram)
A drug used to treat moderate to severe pain in adults. It binds to opioid receptors in the central nervous system. Ultram is a type of analgesic agent and a type of opioid. Also called tramadol hydrochloride.
ultrasonogram listen (UL-truh-SAH-noh-gram)
A computer picture of areas inside the body created by high-energy sound waves. The sound waves are bounced off internal tissues or organs and make echoes. The echoes form a picture of the body tissues on a computer screen. An ultrasonogram may be used to help diagnose disease, such as cancer. It may also be used during pregnancy to check the fetus (unborn baby) and during medical procedures, such as biopsies. Also called sonogram.
ultrasonography listen (UL-truh-soh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses high-energy sound waves to look at tissues and organs inside the body. The sound waves make echoes that form pictures of the tissues and organs on a computer screen (sonogram). Ultrasonography may be used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer. It may also be used during pregnancy to check the fetus (unborn baby) and during medical procedures, such as biopsies. Also called ultrasound.
ultrasound listen (UL-truh-sownd)
A procedure that uses high-energy sound waves to look at tissues and organs inside the body. The sound waves make echoes that form pictures of the tissues and organs on a computer screen (sonogram). Ultrasound may be used to help diagnose diseases, such as cancer. It may also be used during pregnancy to check the fetus (unborn baby) and during medical procedures, such as biopsies. Also called ultrasonography.
ultrasound biomicroscopy listen (UL-truh-sownd BY-oh-my-KROS-koh-pee)
A type of ultrasound eye exam that makes a more detailed image than regular ultrasound. High-energy sound waves are bounced off the inside of the eye and the echo patterns are shown on the screen of an ultrasound machine. This makes a picture called a sonogram.
ultrasound energy listen (UL-truh-sownd EH-ner-jee)
A form of therapy being studied as an anticancer treatment. Intensified ultrasound energy can be directed at cancer cells to heat them and kill them.
ultrasound transducer listen (UL-truh-sownd tranz-DOO-ser)
A device that produces sound waves that bounce off body tissues and make echoes. The transducer also receives the echoes and sends them to a computer that uses them to create a picture called a sonogram. Transducers (probes) come in different shapes and sizes for use in making pictures of different parts of the body. The transducer may be passed over the surface of the body or inserted into an opening such as the rectum or vagina.
ultrasound-guided biopsy listen (UL-truh-sownd-GY-ded BY-op-see)
A biopsy procedure that uses an ultrasound imaging device to find an abnormal area of tissue and guide its removal for examination under a microscope.
ultraviolet A radiation listen (UL-truh-VY-oh-let A RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. Ultraviolet A radiation also comes from sun lamps and tanning beds. Ultraviolet A radiation may cause premature aging of the skin and skin cancer. It may also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from ultraviolet radiation. In medicine, ultraviolet A radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called UVA radiation.
ultraviolet B radiation listen (UL-truh-VY-oh-let B RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. Ultraviolet B radiation causes sunburn, darkening and thickening of the outer layer of the skin, and melanoma and other types of skin cancer. It may also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from ultraviolet radiation. In medicine, ultraviolet B radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called UVB radiation.
ultraviolet C radiation listen (UL-truh-VY-oh-let C RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. Most ultraviolet C radiation from the sun is blocked from the Earth’s surface by the ozone layer. In medicine, ultraviolet C radiation may also come from special lamps or a laser and is used to kill germs or to help heal wounds. It is also used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma Also called UVC radiation.
ultraviolet radiation listen (UL-truh-VY-oh-let RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. Ultraviolet radiation that reaches the Earth's surface is made up of two types of rays, called UVA and UVB. Ultraviolet radiation also comes from sun lamps and tanning beds. It can cause skin damage, premature aging, melanoma, and other types of skin cancer. It can also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from both kinds of ultraviolet radiation. In medicine, ultraviolet radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called UV radiation.
ultraviolet radiation therapy listen (UL-truh-VY-oh-let RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A form of radiation used in the treatment of cancer.
umbilical cord blood listen (um-BIH-lih-kul KORD blud)
Blood from the umbilical cord of a newborn baby. This blood contains high concentrations of stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop).
umbilical cord blood transplantation listen (um-BIH-lih-kul kord blud tranz-plan-TAY-shun)
The injection of umbilical cord blood to restore an individual's own blood production system suppressed by anticancer drugs, radiation therapy, or both. It is being studied in the treatment of cancer and severe blood disorders such as aplastic anemia. Cord blood contains high concentrations of stem cells (cells from which all blood cells develop).
umbrella trial (um-BREH-luh TRY-ul)
A type of clinical trial that tests how well new drugs or other substances work in patients who have the same type of cancer but different gene mutations (changes) or biomarkers. In umbrella trials, patients receive treatment based on the specific mutation or biomarker found in their cancer. The drugs being tested may change during the trial, as new targets and drugs are found. Umbrella trials may allow new drugs to be tested and approved more quickly than traditional clinical trials.
unclassified sarcoma listen (un-KLA-sih-fide sar-KOH-muh)
A group of rare cancers that do not look like other types of sarcomas under a microscope and may be hard to diagnose. They usually form in the muscles that are attached to bones and that help the body move. Unclassified sarcomas tend to grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Some types of unclassified sarcomas may form in a part of the body where a patient had radiation therapy in the past. An unclassified sarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called undifferentiated sarcoma.
unclassified variant listen (un-KLA-sih-fide VAYR-ee-unt)
A change in a gene’s DNA sequence that has an unknown effect on a person’s health. There is usually not enough information about an unclassified variant to know whether it increases a person’s risk of developing a disease, such as cancer. Also called variant of uncertain significance, variant of unknown significance, and VUS.
uncontrolled study listen (UN-kun-TROLD STUH-dee)
A clinical study that lacks a comparison (i.e., a control) group.
unconventional cancer treatments listen (UN-kun-VEN-shuh-nul KAN-ser TREET-ments)
Approaches that use substances or methods of treating cancer that have not been shown to be effective by accepted scientific methods, such as carefully designed clinical trials.
underactive thyroid listen (... THY-royd)
Too little thyroid hormone. Symptoms include weight gain, constipation, dry skin, and sensitivity to the cold. Also called hypothyroidism.
undescended testicles listen (UN-deh-SEN-ded TES-tih-kuls)
A condition in which one or both testicles fail to move from the abdomen, where they develop before birth, into the scrotum. Undescended testicles may increase the risk for development of testicular cancer. Also called cryptorchidism.
undifferentiated listen (un-DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ted)
A term used to describe cells or tissues that do not have specialized ("mature") structures or functions. Undifferentiated cancer cells often grow and spread quickly.
undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcoma listen (un-DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ted PLEE-oh-MOR-fik sar-KOH-muh)
A type of cancer that usually forms in the soft tissue, but it may also form in bone. It can occur anywhere in the body, but it usually occurs in the legs (especially the thighs), arms, or back of the abdomen. It may also occur in a part of the body where a patient received radiation therapy in the past. Undifferentiated pleomorphic sarcomas often grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body, including the lungs. They usually occur in older adults, and they may sometimes occur as a second cancer in patients who had retinoblastoma. Also called malignant fibrous cytoma and malignant fibrous histiocytoma.
undifferentiated sarcoma listen (un-DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ted sar-KOH-muh)
A group of rare cancers that do not look like other types of sarcomas under a microscope and may be hard to diagnose. They usually form in the muscles that are attached to bones and that help the body move. Undifferentiated sarcomas tend to grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body. Some types of undifferentiated sarcomas may form in a part of the body where a patient had radiation therapy in the past. An undifferentiated sarcoma is a type of soft tissue sarcoma. Also called unclassified sarcoma.
unguent listen (UNG-gwent)
A substance used on the skin to soothe or heal wounds, burns, rashes, scrapes, or other skin problems. Also called ointment.
unilateral listen (YOO-nih-LA-teh-rul)
Having to do with one side of the body.
unilateral salpingo-oophorectomy listen (YOO-nih-LA-teh-rul sal-PIN-goh-oh-oh-foh-REK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove the ovary and fallopian tube on one side of the body.
United States Preventive Services Task Force listen (yoo-NY-ted stayts pree-VEN-tiv SER-vih-ses …)
A volunteer group of health experts who review published research and make recommendations about prevention health care methods such as screening tests, counseling, immunizations, and medicines. Before making a recommendation, the United States Preventive Services Task Force looks at the strength (scientific quality and correctness) of the evidence found in the research and the benefits and harms of each method being reviewed. Recommendations are made to help healthcare providers and patients decide whether a specific method is right for a patient’s needs. The recommendations may change as new research studies are published. Also called USPSTF.
Unituxin listen (yoo-nih-TUK-sin)
A drug used with granulocyte-macrophage colony-stimulating factor (GM-CSF), aldesleukin (IL-2), and 13-cis-retinoic acid to treat high-risk neuroblastoma. It is used in children whose disease has improved with other anticancer treatment. Unituxin binds to a substance called GD2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Unituxin may block GD2 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called Ch14.18, dinutuximab, MOAB Ch14.18, and monoclonal antibody Ch14.18.
unresectable listen (UN-ree-SEK-tuh-bul)
Unable to be removed with surgery.
unresectable gallbladder cancer listen (UN-ree-SEK-tuh-bul GAWL-bla-der KAN-ser)
Cancer that has spread to the tissues around the gallbladder (such as the liver, stomach, pancreas, intestine, or lymph nodes in the area) and cannot be surgically removed.
unresected listen (UN-ree-SEK-ted)
Describes an organ, tissue, or cancer that has not been either partly or completely removed by surgery.
unsealed internal radiation therapy listen (...RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
Radiation therapy given by injecting a radioactive substance into the bloodstream or a body cavity, or by swallowing it. This substance is not sealed in a container.
uPA
An enzyme that is made in the kidney and found in the urine. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory and used to dissolve blood clots or to prevent them from forming. Also called u-plasminogen activator, urokinase, and urokinase-plasminogen activator.
u-plasminogen activator listen (u-plaz-MIH-noh-jen AK-tih-vay-ter)
An enzyme that is made in the kidney and found in the urine. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory and used to dissolve blood clots or to prevent them from forming. Also called uPA, urokinase, and urokinase-plasminogen activator.
upper endoscopy listen (UH-per en-DOS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the stomach using an endoscope, passed through the mouth and esophagus. An endoscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. Also called gastroscopy.
upper extremity listen (UH-per ek-STREH-mih-tee)
The part of the body that includes the arm, wrist, and hand.
upper gastrointestinal series listen (UH-per GAS-troh-in-TES-tih-nul SEER-eez)
A series of x-ray pictures of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum (the first part of the small intestine). The x-ray pictures are taken after the patient drinks a liquid containing barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). The barium sulfate coats and outlines the inner walls of the upper gastrointestinal tract so that they can be seen on the x-ray pictures. Also called upper GI series.
upper GI series listen (UH-per ... SEER-eez)
A series of x-ray pictures of the esophagus, stomach, and duodenum (the first part of the small intestine). The x-ray pictures are taken after the patient drinks a liquid containing barium sulfate (a form of the silver-white metallic element barium). The barium sulfate coats and outlines the inner walls of the upper gastrointestinal tract so that they can be seen on the x-ray pictures. Also called upper gastrointestinal series.
upstaging listen (up-STAY-jing)
In cancer, changing the stage used to describe a patient’s cancer from a lower stage (less extensive) to a higher stage (more extensive). Upstaging is based on the results of additional staging tests. It is important to know the stage of the disease in order to plan the best treatment.
urachus listen (YOO-rah-kus)
A fibrous cord that connects the urinary bladder to the umbilicus (navel). The urachus is formed as the allantoic stalk during fetal development and lasts through life. Also called median umbilical ligament.
uracil listen (YOOR-uh-sil)
A chemical compound that is used to make one of the building blocks of RNA. It is a type of pyrimidine.
urea listen (yoo-REE-uh)
A substance formed by the breakdown of protein in the liver. The kidneys filter urea out of the blood and into the urine. Urea can also be made in the laboratory. A topical form of urea is being studied in the treatment of hand-foot syndrome (pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet that may occur as a side effect of certain anticancer drugs). Also called carbamide.
urea nitrogen listen (yoo-REE-uh NY-troh-jen)
Nitrogen in the blood that comes from urea (a substance formed by the breakdown of protein in the liver). The kidneys filter urea out of the blood and into the urine. A high level of urea nitrogen in the blood may be a sign of a kidney problem. Also called blood urea nitrogen and BUN.
urea/lactic acid-based cream listen (yoo-REE-uh LAK-tik A-sid …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of hand-foot syndrome (a condition caused by chemotherapy and marked by tingling, numbness, and red, peeling skin). Urea/lactic acid-based cream is a moisturizer that may help break down the hardened protein in dry, scaly skin and relieve these symptoms.
ureter listen (YER-eh-ter)
The tube that carries urine from the kidney to the bladder.
ureteronephrectomy listen (YER-eh-ter-oh-neh-FREK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove a kidney and its ureter. Also called nephroureterectomy.
ureteroscopy listen (YER-eh-ter-OS-koh-pee)
Examination of the inside of the kidney and ureter, using a ureteroscope. A ureteroscope is a thin, tube-like instrument with a light and a lens for viewing. It may also have a tool to remove tissue to be checked under a microscope for signs of disease. The ureteroscope is passed through the urethra into the bladder, ureter, and renal pelvis (part of the kidney that collects, holds, and drains urine).
urethra listen (yoo-REE-thruh)
The tube through which urine leaves the body. It empties urine from the bladder.
urethral cancer listen (yoo-REE-thrul KAN-ser)
A rare cancer that forms in tissues of the urethra (the tube through which urine empties the bladder and leaves the body). Types of urethral cancer include transitional cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in cells that can change shape and stretch without breaking apart), squamous cell carcinoma (cancer that begins in flat cells lining the urethra), and adenocarcinoma (cancer that begins in cells that make and release mucus and other fluids).
uric acid listen (YOO-rik A-sid)
A waste product left over from normal chemical processes in the body and found in the urine and blood. Abnormal buildup of uric acid in the body may cause a condition called gout. Increased levels of uric acid in the blood and urine can be a side effect of chemotherapy or radiation therapy.
uridine triacetate listen (YOOR-ih-deen try-A-seh-tayt)
A drug used in the emergency treatment of patients who receive too much fluorouracil or capecitabine (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used in the emergency treatment of heart or central nervous system (CNS) toxicity or other serious side effects that occur within 4 days of ending treatment with fluorouracil or capecitabine. Uridine triacetate may help protect healthy cells from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of cytoprotective agent. Also called PN401, triacetyluridine, and Vistogard.
urinalysis listen (YOOR-ih-NA-lih-sis)
A test that determines the content of the urine.
urinary listen (YOOR-ih-NAYR-ee)
Having to do with urine or the organs of the body that produce and get rid of urine.
urinary diversion listen (YOOR-ih-NAYR-ee dih-VER-zhun)
A surgical procedure to make a new way for urine to leave the body. It may involve redirecting urine into the colon, using catheters to drain the bladder, or making an opening in the abdomen and collecting urine in a bag outside the body.
urinary incontinence listen (YOOR-ih-NAYR-ee in-KON-tih-nents)
Inability to hold urine in the bladder.
urinary tract listen (YOOR-ih-NAYR-ee trakt)
The organs of the body that produce and discharge urine. These include the kidneys, ureters, bladder, and urethra.
urine listen (YOOR-in)
Fluid containing water and waste products. Urine is made by the kidneys, stored in the bladder, and leaves the body through the urethra.
urine culture listen (YOOR-in KUL-cher)
A laboratory test to check for bacteria, yeast, or other microorganisms in the urine. Urine cultures can help identify the type of microorganism that is causing an infection. This helps determine the best treatment. They may be used to help diagnose urinary tract infections, such as bladder infections. They may also be done after treatment for a urinary tract infection to make sure the microorganism that caused the infection is gone.
urine cytology listen (YOOR-in sy-TAH-loh-jee)
Tests performed on cells in urine to detect disease.
urokinase listen (YOOR-oh-KY-nays)
An enzyme that is made in the kidney and found in the urine. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory and used to dissolve blood clots or to prevent them from forming. Also called u-plasminogen activator, uPA, and urokinase-plasminogen activator.
urokinase plasminogen activator (uPA)-derived peptide A6 listen (YOOR-oh-KY-nays plaz-MIH-noh-jen AK-tih-vay-ter … deh-RIVED PEP-tide …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Urokinase plasminogen activator (uPA)-derived peptide A6 is a small piece of a protein called urokinase (an enzyme that dissolves blood clots or prevents them from forming). It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of antimetastatic agent. Also called A6.
urokinase-plasminogen activator listen (YOOR-oh-KY-nays-plaz-MIH-noh-jen AK-tih-vay-ter)
An enzyme that is made in the kidney and found in the urine. A form of this enzyme is made in the laboratory and used to dissolve blood clots or to prevent them from forming. Also called u-plasminogen activator, uPA, and urokinase.
urologic oncologist listen (YOOR-uh-LAH-jik on-KAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating cancers of the male and female urinary tract and the male reproductive organs.
urologist listen (yoo-RAH-loh-jist)
A doctor who has special training in diagnosing and treating diseases of the urinary organs in females and the urinary and reproductive organs in males.
urostomy listen (yoo-ROS-toh-mee)
An operation to create an opening from inside the body to the outside, making a new way to pass urine.
urothelial cancer listen (YOOR-oh-THEE-lee-ul KAN-ser)
Cancer that begins in cells called urothelial cells that line the urethra, bladder, ureters, renal pelvis, and some other organs. Urothelial cells are also called transitional cells. These cells can change shape and stretch without breaking apart. Also called transitional cell cancer.
urothelium listen (yoo-roh-THEE-lee-um)
The lining of the urinary tract, including the renal pelvis, ureters, bladder, and urethra.
ursodiol listen (ur-soh-DY-ol)
A drug that is used to dissolve gallstones in people who can’t have surgery to remove them. It is also being studied in the prevention of colorectal cancer. Ursodiol belongs to the family of drugs called anticholelithics.
urticaria listen (ER-tih-KAYR-ee-uh)
Itchy, raised red areas on the skin. Urticaria are caused by a reaction to certain foods, drugs, infections, or emotional stress. Also called hives.
USPSTF
A volunteer group of health experts who review published research and make recommendations about prevention health care methods such as screening tests, counseling, immunizations, and medicines. Before making a recommendation, the USPSTF looks at the strength (scientific quality and correctness) of the evidence found in the research and the benefits and harms of each method being reviewed. Recommendations are made to help healthcare providers and patients decide whether a specific method is right for a patient’s needs. The recommendations may change as new research studies are published. Also called United States Preventive Services Task Force.
uterine cancer listen (YOO-teh-rin KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in tissues of the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman's pelvis in which a fetus develops). Two types of uterine cancer are endometrial cancer (cancer that begins in cells lining the uterus) and uterine sarcoma (a rare cancer that begins in muscle or other tissues in the uterus).
uterine sarcoma listen (YOO-teh-rin sar-KOH-muh)
A rare type of uterine cancer that forms in muscle or other tissues of the uterus (the small, hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman's pelvis in which a fetus develops). It usually occurs after menopause. The two main types are leiomyosarcoma (cancer that begins in smooth muscle cells) and endometrial stromal sarcoma (cancer that begins in connective tissue cells).
uterus listen (YOO-teh-rus)
The hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman's pelvis. The uterus is where a fetus (unborn baby) develops and grows. Also called womb.
UV radiation listen (… RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. UV radiation that reaches the Earth's surface is made up of two types of rays, called UVA and UVB. UV radiation also comes from sun lamps and tanning beds. It can cause skin damage, premature aging, melanoma, and other types of skin cancer. It can also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from both kinds of UV radiation. In medicine, UV radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called ultraviolet radiation.
UVA radiation listen (… RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. UVA radiation also comes from sun lamps and tanning beds. UVA radiation may cause premature aging of the skin and skin cancer. It may also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from ultraviolet radiation. In medicine, UVA radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called ultraviolet A radiation.
UVB radiation listen (… RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. UVB radiation causes sunburn, darkening and thickening of the outer layer of the skin, and melanoma and other types of skin cancer. It may also cause problems with the eyes and the immune system. Skin specialists recommend that people use sunscreens that protect the skin from ultraviolet radiation. In medicine, UVB radiation also comes from special lamps or a laser and is used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin tumors of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma. Also called ultraviolet B radiation.
UVC radiation listen (… RAY-dee-AY-shun)
Invisible rays that are part of the energy that comes from the sun. Most UVC radiation from the sun is blocked from the Earth’s surface by the ozone layer. In medicine, UVC radiation may also come from special lamps or a laser and is used to kill germs or to help heal wounds. It is also used to treat certain skin conditions such as psoriasis, vitiligo, and skin nodules of cutaneous T-cell lymphoma Also called ultraviolet C radiation.
uvea listen (YOO-vee-uh)
The middle layer of the wall of the eye. The uvea has 3 main parts: (1) the choroid (the tissue layer filled with blood vessels); (2) the ciliary body (the ring of muscle tissue that changes the size of the pupil and the shape of the lens); and (3) the iris (the colored part of the eye). Also called uveal tract.
uveal tract listen (YOO-vee-ul trakt)
The middle layer of the wall of the eye. The uveal tract has 3 main parts: (1) the choroid (the tissue layer filled with blood vessels); (2) the ciliary body (the ring of muscle tissue that changes the size of the pupil and the shape of the lens); and (3) the iris (the colored part of the eye). Also called uvea.
uvula listen (YOO-vyoo-luh)
The soft flap of tissue that hangs down at the back of the mouth (at the edge of the soft palate). Also called palatine uvula.
VAC
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat rhabdomyosarcoma in children. It is also used to treat certain types of ovarian germ cell tumors. VAC includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, dactinomycin (actinomycin-D), and cyclophosphamide. Also called VAC regimen.
VAC regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat rhabdomyosarcoma in children. It is also used to treat certain types of ovarian germ cell tumors. VAC regimen includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, dactinomycin (actinomycin-D), and cyclophosphamide. Also called VAC.
VACB
A procedure in which a small sample of tissue is removed from the breast. An imaging device is used to guide a hollow probe connected to a vacuum device. The probe is inserted through a tiny cut made in numbed skin on the breast. The tissue sample is removed using gentle vacuum suction and a small rotating knife within the probe. Then the tissue sample is studied under a microscope to check for signs of disease. This procedure causes very little scarring and no stitches are needed. Also called vacuum-assisted biopsy and vacuum-assisted core biopsy.
vaccinated listen (VAK-sih-NAY-ted)
Treated with a vaccine.
vaccination listen (VAK-sih-NAY-shun)
Treatment with a vaccine.
vaccine listen (vak-SEEN)
A substance or group of substances meant to cause the immune system to respond to a tumor or to microorganisms, such as bacteria or viruses. A vaccine can help the body recognize and destroy cancer cells or microorganisms.
vaccine adjuvant listen (vak-SEEN A-juh-vunt)
A substance added to a vaccine to improve the immune response so that less vaccine is needed.
vaccine therapy listen (vak-SEEN THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of treatment that uses a substance or group of substances to stimulate the immune system to destroy a tumor or infectious microorganisms such as bacteria or viruses.
vaccinia CEA vaccine listen (vak-SIH-nee-uh … vak-SEEN)
A vaccine made by putting the gene for carcinoembryonic antigen (CEA) into the vaccinia virus. The vaccinia virus is related to the virus used to make the smallpox vaccine. CEA is a tumor marker. The vaccinia CEA vaccine may help the immune system recognize and kill cancer cells that make CEA.
vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine listen (vak-SIH-nee-uh … vak-SEEN)
A cancer vaccine made with a form of a vaccinia virus that does not cause disease in humans. It is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. The virus is changed in the laboratory to make human proteins that may help immune cells in the body kill tumor cells. Also called recombinant vaccinia-TRICOM vaccine and rV-TRICOM.
VAC-IE (VAK …)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide, followed by ifosfamide and etoposide phosphate. Also called VAC-IE regimen, VAdriaC-IE, and VAdriaC-IE regimen.
VAC-IE regimen (VAK … REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide, followed by ifosfamide and etoposide phosphate. Also called VAC-IE, VAdriaC-IE, and VAdriaC-IE regimen.
vacuum aspiration listen (VAK-yoom AS-pih-RAY-shun)
A surgical procedure in which the cervix is dilated (opened) and vacuum is used to remove tissue from the uterus. Also called suction aspiration and suction evacuation.
vacuum-assisted biopsy listen (VA-kyoom-uh-SIS-ted BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a small sample of tissue is removed from the breast. An imaging device is used to guide a hollow probe connected to a vacuum device. The probe is inserted through a tiny cut made in numbed skin on the breast. The tissue sample is removed using gentle vacuum suction and a small rotating knife within the probe. Then the tissue sample is studied under a microscope to check for signs of disease. This procedure causes very little scarring and no stitches are needed. Also called VACB and vacuum-assisted core biopsy.
vacuum-assisted core biopsy listen (VA-kyoom-uh-SIS-ted … BY-op-see)
A procedure in which a small sample of tissue is removed from the breast. An imaging device is used to guide a hollow probe connected to a vacuum device. The probe is inserted through a tiny cut made in numbed skin on the breast. The tissue sample is removed using gentle vacuum suction and a small rotating knife within the probe. Then the tissue sample is studied under a microscope to check for signs of disease. This procedure causes very little scarring and no stitches are needed. Also called VACB and vacuum-assisted biopsy.
VAdriaC (VAY-dree-ak)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide. Also called VAdriaC regimen.
VAdriaC regimen (VAY-dree-ak REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide. Also called VAdriaC.
VAdriaC-IE (VAY-dree-ak …)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide, followed by ifosfamide and etoposide phosphate. Also called VAC-IE, VAC-IE regimen, and VAdriaC-IE regimen.
VAdriaC-IE regimen (VAY-dree-ak … REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat Ewing sarcoma and other sarcomas, such as mesenchymal chondrosarcoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), and cyclophosphamide, followed by ifosfamide and etoposide phosphate. Also called VAC-IE, VAC-IE regimen, and VAdriaC-IE.
vagina listen (vuh-JY-nuh)
The muscular canal that goes from the uterus to the outside of the body. During birth, the baby passes through the vagina. Also called birth canal.
vaginal listen (VA-jih-nul)
Having to do with the vagina (the birth canal).
vaginal atrophy listen (VA-jih-nul A-troh-fee)
A condition in which the tissues lining the inside of the vagina (birth canal) become thin, dry, and inflamed. This is caused by a decrease in the amount of estrogen (a female hormone) made by the body. Symptoms of vaginal atrophy include vaginal dryness, itching, and burning, and pain during sexual intercourse. Other symptoms include a burning feeling while urinating, feeling a need to urinate often or right away, and being unable to control the flow of urine. Vaginal atrophy most commonly occurs in women who have gone through menopause naturally or who have early menopause caused by certain types of cancer treatment (such as radiation therapy to the pelvis or chemotherapy) or by having their ovaries removed by surgery. Also called atrophic vaginitis.
vaginal cancer listen (VA-jih-nul KAN-ser)
Cancer that forms in the tissues of the vagina (birth canal). The vagina leads from the cervix (the opening of the uterus) to the outside of the body. The most common type of vaginal cancer is squamous cell carcinoma, which starts in the thin, flat cells lining the vagina. Another type of vaginal cancer is adenocarcinoma, cancer that begins in glandular cells in the lining of the vagina.
vaginal dilation therapy listen (VA-jih-nul DY-LAY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A method used to prevent the closing of the vagina (the birth canal) after radiation therapy to the pelvis. The patient puts a dilator (tube-like device) coated with an oily or slippery substance into her vagina.
vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia listen (VA-jih-nul IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal cells are found in tissue lining the vagina (birth canal). These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into the vaginal wall. Also called VAIN.
vaginal stenosis listen (VA-jih-nul steh-NOH-sis)
A condition in which the vagina (birth canal) becomes narrower and shorter. The lining of the vagina may also be thinner and drier and contain scar tissue. This can cause pain during sexual intercourse or a pelvic exam. Vaginal stenosis is often caused by radiation therapy to the pelvis or some types of surgery.
vaginectomy listen (va-jih-NEK-toh-mee)
Surgery to remove part or all of the vagina (the birth canal).
VAIN listen
Abnormal cells are found in tissue lining the vagina (birth canal). These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into the vaginal wall. Also called vaginal intraepithelial neoplasia.
valacyclovir listen (VAL-uh-SY-kloh-veer)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention of fungal, bacterial, and viral infections in patients undergoing donor stem cell transplantation with cells that are infected with cytomegalovirus. It belongs to the family of drugs called antivirals.
valdecoxib listen (VAL-deh-KOK-sib)
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for pain and other side effects of cancer therapy. It belongs to the family of drugs called COX-2 inhibitors.
valerian listen (vuh-LEER-ee-un)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, Valeriana officinalis, and Valerianae radix.
Valeriana officinalis listen (vuh-LEER-ee-a-nuh uh-FIH-sih-NUH-lis)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, and Valerianae radix.
Valerianae radix listen (vuh-LEER-ee-un-i RAY-dix)
A plant whose roots are used as a sedative and to treat certain medical conditions. It is being studied as a way to improve sleep in cancer patients undergoing treatment. Also called garden heliotrope, garden valerian, Indian valerian, Mexican valerian, Pacific valerian, valerian, and Valeriana officinalis.
valganciclovir listen (VAL-gan-SY-kloh-veer)
An antiviral agent that is being studied as a treatment for AIDS-related cytomegalovirus. It is changed in the body to ganciclovir.
Valium listen (VAL-ee-um)
A drug used to treat mild to moderate anxiety and tension and to relax muscles. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called diazepam.
valproic acid listen (val-PROH-ik A-sid)
A drug used to treat epileptic seizures and bipolar disorder and to prevent migraine headaches. It is also being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme that cells need to grow and may cause cancer cells to die. It also blocks the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of anticonvulsant, histone deacetylase (HDAC) inhibitor, antimaniacal, migraine headache prophylactic, and antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Depakene and Stavzor.
valrubicin listen (val-ROO-bih-sin)
A drug used to treat bladder carcinoma in situ that did not get better after treatment with bacillus Calmette-Guerin (BCG). It is used in patients who cannot have surgery right away to remove all or part of the bladder. Valrubicin is given as a solution through a catheter that is placed into the bladder. It blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. Valrubicin is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called AD 32 and Valstar.
Valstar listen (VAL-star)
A drug used to treat bladder carcinoma in situ that did not get better after treatment with bacillus Calmette-Guerin (BCG). It is used in patients who cannot have surgery right away to remove all or part of the bladder. Valstar is given as a solution through a catheter that is placed into the bladder. It blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. Valstar is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called AD 32 and valrubicin.
value-based pricing listen (VAL-yoo-bayst PRY-sing)
A system of setting the cost for a healthcare service in which healthcare providers are paid based on the quality of care they provide rather than the number of healthcare services they give or the number of patients they treat. Value-based pricing may give patients access to better treatments for lower costs. This may help reduce financial stress or hardship on patients receiving medical care.
VAMP listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat low-risk childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), methotrexate, and prednisone. Also called VAMP regimen.
VAMP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used with radiation therapy to treat low-risk childhood Hodgkin lymphoma. It includes the drugs vincristine sulfate, doxorubicin hydrochloride (Adriamycin), methotrexate, and prednisone. Also called VAMP.
vancomycin listen (VAN-koh-MY-sin)
An antibiotic drug used to fight resistant bacterial infections.
vandetanib listen (van-DEH-tuh-nib)
A drug used to treat medullary thyroid cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vandetanib prevents the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It also blocks enzymes needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. Vandetanib is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Caprelsa and ZD6474.
vaporized listen (VAY-per-ized)
In chemistry, describes the change of a solid or liquid substance into a gas or vapor (mist). This usually occurs when the substance is heated above normal room temperature without burning it.
vapreotide listen (vah-PREE-oh-tide)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called somatostatin analogs.
varenicline tartrate listen (vuh-REH-nih-klin TAR-trayt)
A drug used to help people stop smoking by acting the same way nicotine acts in the brain. It is a type of nicotine receptor partial agonist. Also called Chantix.
variable expression listen (VAYR-ee-uh-bul ek-SPREH-shun)
Refers to the difference in the way that signs and symptoms of a genetic condition can show up in individual patients who have that condition. For example, some patients with neurofibromatosis type 1 may have only mild symptoms, such as brown spots and freckling on the skin, and others may have more severe symptoms, such as brain tumors and tumors on the nerves.
variant of uncertain significance listen (VAYR-ee-unt … un-SER-tin sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A change in a gene’s DNA sequence that has an unknown effect on a person’s health. There is usually not enough information about a variant of uncertain significance to know whether it increases a person’s risk of developing a disease, such as cancer. Also called unclassified variant, variant of unknown significance, and VUS.
variant of unknown significance listen (VAYR-ee-unt … UN-none sig-NIH-fih-kunts)
A change in a gene’s DNA sequence that has an unknown effect on a person’s health. There is usually not enough information about a variant of unknown significance to know whether it increases a person’s risk of developing a disease, such as cancer. Also called unclassified variant, variant of uncertain significance, and VUS.
varicose vein listen (VAYR-ih-kose vayn)
A condition in which a vein, most often in the legs, becomes permanently enlarged, twisted, and painful. This may be caused by valves in the vein that don’t work properly or by weakness in the vein walls.
Varubi listen (vuh-ROO-bee)
A drug used with other drugs to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy. Varubi blocks the action of chemicals in the central nervous system (CNS) that may trigger nausea and vomiting. It is a type of antiemetic. Also called rolapitant hydrochloride.
VAS
A tool used to help a person rate the intensity of certain sensations and feelings, such as pain. The visual analog scale for pain is a straight line with one end meaning no pain and the other end meaning the worst pain imaginable. A patient marks a point on the line that matches the amount of pain he or she feels. It may be used to help choose the right dose of pain medicine. Also called visual analog scale.
vas deferens listen (VAS DEH-feh-RENZ)
A coiled tube that carries the sperm out of the testes.
vascular endothelial growth factor listen (VAS-kyoo-ler EN-doh-THEE-lee-ul grothe FAK-ter)
A substance made by cells that stimulates new blood vessel formation. Also called VEGF.
vascular endothelial growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor listen (VAS-kyoo-ler EN-doh-THEE-lee-ul grothe FAK-ter reh-SEP-ter TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme needed to form blood vessels. Also called VEGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
vascular endothelial growth factor trap listen (VAS-kyoo-ler EN-doh-THEE-lee-ul grothe FAK-ter ...)
A drug used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vascular endothelial growth factor trap blocks the action of a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called VEGF Trap, Zaltrap, and ziv-aflibercept.
vascular endothelial growth factor-antisense oligonucleotide listen (VAS-kyoo-ler EN-doh-THEE-lee-ul grothe FAK-ter-AN-tee-sents AH-lih-goh-NOO-klee-oh-tide)
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to the RNA for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) that stimulates the growth of new blood vessels. Vascular endothelial growth factor-antisense oligonucleotide blocks the cell’s ability to make VEGF, which may kill tumors that need new blood vessels to grow. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide and a type of gene expression inhibitor. Also called VEGF-AS.
vascular tumor listen (VAS-kyoo-ler TOO-mer)
A type of tumor that forms from cells that make blood vessels or lymph vessels. Vascular tumors may be benign (not cancer) or malignant (cancer) and can occur anywhere in the body. They may form on the skin, in the tissues below the skin, and/or in an organ. There are many types of vascular tumors. The most common type of vascular tumor is hemangioma, which is a benign tumor that usually occurs in infants and goes away on its own.
vascularized autologous bone graft listen (VAS-kyoo-luh-RIZED aw-TAH-luh-gus ...)
Bone tissue that contains blood vessels, taken from one part of the body and used to replace diseased or injured bone in another part of the body of the same person.
vasectomy listen (va-SEK-toh-mee)
An operation to cut or tie off the two tubes that carry sperm out of the testicles.
vasoactive listen (VAY-zoh-AK-tiv)
Describes something that causes the blood vessels to constrict (get narrower) or dilate (get wider).
vasoactive intestinal peptide listen (VAY-zoh-AK-tiv in-TES-tih-nul PEP-tide)
A hormone found in the pancreas, intestine, and central nervous system. It has many actions in the body, such as helping to control the secretion of water, salts, enzymes, and gastric acid during digestion. It also causes smooth muscles in the digestive tract, the heart, and the blood vessels to relax. It also has effects on the immune system and the central nervous system. Certain tumors in the pancreas make large amounts of vasoactive intestinal peptide. Also called VIP hormone.
vasomotor listen (VAY-zoh-MOH-ter)
Affecting the narrowing and widening of the blood vessels.
vatalanib listen (va-TAH-la-nib)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the families of drugs called protein tyrosine kinase inhibitors and VEGF receptor kinase inhibitors. Also called PTK787/ZK 222584.
VB4-845
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of head and neck cancer. VB4-845 is made by linking a monoclonal antibody fragment to a toxic protein that may kill cancer cells. It binds to EpCAM (a protein on the surface of epithelial cells and some types of cancer cells). Also called anti-EpCAM-Pseudomonas-exotoxin fusion protein and Proxinium.
Vectibix listen (VEK-tih-bix)
A drug used alone or with other anticancer drugs to treat certain types of colorectal cancer that have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer has not already been treated or whose cancer got worse after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vectibix binds to a protein called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR), which is found on some normal cells and some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing. Vectibix is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called ABX-EGF and panitumumab.
vegan listen (VEE-gun)
A person who does not eat any foods that come from animals, including meat, eggs, and dairy products. A vegan diet is being studied in the prevention and treatment of prostate cancer and other medical conditions.
VEGF
A substance made by cells that stimulates new blood vessel formation. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor.
VEGF Trap listen (... trap)
A drug used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. VEGF Trap blocks the action of a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor trap, Zaltrap, and ziv-aflibercept.
VEGF-AS
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of cancer. It binds to the RNA for a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) that stimulates the growth of new blood vessels. VEGF-AS blocks the cell’s ability to make VEGF, which may kill tumors that need new blood vessels to grow. It is a type of antisense oligonucleotide and a type of gene expression inhibitor. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor-antisense oligonucleotide.
VEGFR tyrosine kinase inhibitor listen (VEGFR TY-ruh-seen KY-nays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme needed to form blood vessels. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor receptor tyrosine kinase inhibitor.
VEGFR-2 inhibitor CT-322 listen (... in-HIH-bih-ter ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. VEGFR-2 inhibitor CT-322 may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of vascular endothelial growth factor receptor-2 (VEGFR-2) inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called Angiocept and CT-322.
vein listen (vayn)
A blood vessel that carries blood to the heart from tissues and organs in the body.
VeIP
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced ovarian and testicular germ cell cancers. It includes the drugs vinblastine sulfate (Velban), ifosfamide (Ifex), and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called VeIP regimen.
VeIP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced ovarian and testicular germ cell cancers. It includes the drugs vinblastine sulfate (Velban), ifosfamide (Ifex), and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called VeIP.
velafermin listen (veh-luh-FER-min)
A substance that is being studied in the prevention and treatment of oral mucositis (sores in the mouth) in patients receiving high-dose chemotherapy. Velafermin belongs to the family of drugs called recombinant human fibroblast growth factors (rhFGF).
Velban listen (VEL-bun)
A brand name for vinblastine sulfate, which is used to treat many types of cancer. Velban brand has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
Velcade listen (VEL-kayd)
A drug used to treat multiple myeloma. It is also used to treat mantle cell lymphoma in patients who have already received at least one other type of treatment and is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Velcade blocks several molecular pathways in a cell and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of proteasome inhibitor and a type of dipeptidyl boronic acid. Also called bortezomib and PS-341.
veliparib listen (veh-lih-PAR-ib)
A substance being studied in the treatment of breast cancers caused by mutations (changes) in the BRCA1 and BRCA2 genes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It blocks an enzyme involved in many functions of the cell, including the repair of DNA damage. DNA damage may be caused by normal cell actions, UV light, some anticancer drugs, and radiation used to treat cancer. Veliparib may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of poly(ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called ABT-888 and PARP-1 inhibitor ABT-888.
veltuzumab listen (vel-TOO-zoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of lymphoma. It binds to the protein CD20, which is found on B cells (a type of immune system cell) and some types of lymphoma cells. This causes the immune system to kill the cancer cells. Veltuzumab is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called hA20, HCD20, and IMMU-106.
vemurafenib listen (VEH-myoo-RA-feh-nib)
A drug used to treat Erdheim-Chester disease (a very rare type of histiocytosis) and advanced melanoma. It is used in patients whose disease has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vemurafenib blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426, PLX4032, RG7204, and Zelboraf.
vena cava listen (VEE-nuh KAY-vuh)
A large vein that carries blood to the heart from other areas of the body. The vena cava has two parts: the superior vena cava and the inferior vena cava. The superior vena cava carries blood from the head, neck, arms, and chest. The inferior vena cava carries blood from the legs, feet, and organs in the abdomen and pelvis. The vena cava is the largest vein in the body.
Venclexta listen (ven-KLEK-stuh)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myeloid leukemia that is newly diagnosed. It is used in adults who are 75 years and older or in adults who cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. Venclexta is also used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia and small lymphocytic lymphoma in adults. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Venclexta binds to a protein called BCL2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help kill cancer cells and may make them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. Venclexta is a type of BCL2 inhibitor. Also called venetoclax.
venetoclax listen (veh-NEH-toh-klax)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myeloid leukemia that is newly diagnosed. It is used in adults who are 75 years and older or in adults who cannot be treated with other anticancer drugs. Venetoclax is also used to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia and small lymphocytic lymphoma in adults. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Venetoclax binds to a protein called BCL2, which is found on some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help kill cancer cells and may make them more sensitive to anticancer drugs. Venetoclax is a type of BCL2 inhibitor. Also called Venclexta.
venipuncture listen (VEE-nih-PUNK-cher)
A procedure in which a needle is used to take blood from a vein, usually for laboratory testing. Venipuncture may also be done to remove extra red blood cells from the blood, to treat certain blood disorders. Also called blood draw and phlebotomy.
venlafaxine listen (ven-luh-FAK-seen)
A drug used to treat depression and certain anxiety disorders. It may also be used to treat hot flashes in women who are in menopause or are being treated for breast cancer. Venlafaxine increases the levels of the chemicals serotonin and norepinephrine in the brain, which helps improve mood. It is a type of antidepressant and a type of serotonin-norepinephrine reuptake inhibitor. Also called Effexor.
venography listen (veh-NAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure in which an x-ray of the veins is taken after a special dye is injected into the bone marrow or veins.
venous catheter listen (VEE-nus KA-theh-ter)
A thin, flexible tube that is inserted into a large vein, usually in the arm, chest, or leg. It is used to give intravenous fluids, blood transfusions, and chemotherapy and other drugs, and for taking blood samples. It avoids the need for repeated needle sticks.
venous sampling listen (VEE-nus...)
A procedure in which a sample of blood is taken from a certain vein and checked for specific substances released by nearby organs and tissues. A higher than normal amount of a substance can be a sign of disease in the organ or tissue that makes it.
ventilator listen (VEN-tih-LAY-ter)
In medicine, a machine used to help a patient breathe. Also called respirator.
ventricle listen (VEN-trih-kul)
A fluid-filled cavity in the heart or brain.
Versed listen (ver-SED)
A drug used to treat anxiety and tension and to relax muscles. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called midazolam hydrochloride.
vertebral column listen (ver-TEE-brul KAH-lum)
The bones, muscles, tendons, and other tissues that reach from the base of the skull to the tailbone. The vertebral column encloses the spinal cord and the fluid surrounding the spinal cord. Also called backbone, spinal column, and spine.
vertebroplasty listen (VER-teh-broh-PLAS-tee)
A procedure used to repair a bone in the spine that has a break caused by cancer, osteoporosis (a decrease in bone mass and density), or trauma. Bone cement is injected into the broken bone to make it stronger.
verum acupuncture listen (VEER-um AK-yoo-PUNK-cher)
Refers to traditional acupuncture, which is the technique of inserting thin needles through the skin to certain depths and at certain points on the body to control pain and other symptoms. The term verum acupuncture may be used when comparing traditional acupuncture to sham (placebo) acupuncture. In sham acupuncture, needles do not go as deep and are not used at the same points on the body.
Verzenio listen (ver-ZEH-nee-oh)
A drug used to treat hormone-receptor positive (HR+), HER2-negative (HER2-) breast cancer that is advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used with an aromatase inhibitor in postmenopausal women who have not been treated with hormone therapy. It is used with fulvestrant in women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy. Verzenio is also used alone in men and women whose disease got worse after treatment with hormone therapy and previous chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Verzenio blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of cyclin-dependent kinase inhibitor. Also called abemaciclib.
Vesanoid listen (VEH-suh-noyd)
An oral preparation of tretinoin that is used to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia, usually together with other drugs. It is being studied in the treatment and prevention of other types of cancer. Tretinoin is a form of vitamin A.
vesicant extravasation listen (VEH-sih-kunt ek-STRA-vuh-SAY-shun)
The leakage of certain drugs called vesicants out of a vein into the tissue around it. Vesicants cause blistering and other tissue injury that may be severe and can lead to tissue necrosis (tissue death).
vesicle listen (VEH-sih-kul)
A small sac formed by a membrane and filled with liquid. Vesicles inside cells move substances into or out of the cell. Vesicles made in the laboratory can be used to carry drugs to cells in the body.
VHL disease listen (... dih-ZEEZ)
A rare, inherited disorder that causes tumors and cysts to grow in certain parts of the body, including the brain, spinal cord, eyes, inner ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, kidney, and reproductive tract. The tumors are usually benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer). Patients with VHL disease have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, especially kidney cancer and pancreatic cancer. The signs and symptoms of VHL disease usually do not appear until young adulthood. It is caused by a mutation (change) in the VHL gene. Also called VHL syndrome, von Hippel-Lindau disease, and von Hippel-Lindau syndrome.
VHL gene listen (… jeen)
A gene that makes the von Hippel-Lindau (VHL) protein, which helps control cell growth, cell division, and other important cell functions. Changed forms of the VHL gene may increase the growth of cells, including abnormal cells. This mutated gene has been found in nearly all patients with an inherited condition called VHL syndrome. VHL syndrome can cause kidney cancer and tumors of the brain, spinal cord, eye, ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, or other parts of the body. The VHL gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called von Hippel-Lindau gene.
VHL syndrome listen (… SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that causes tumors and cysts to grow in certain parts of the body, including the brain, spinal cord, eyes, inner ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, kidney, and reproductive tract. The tumors are usually benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer). Patients with VHL syndrome have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, especially kidney cancer and pancreatic cancer. The signs and symptoms of VHL syndrome usually do not appear until young adulthood. It is caused by a mutation (change) in the VHL gene. Also called VHL disease, von Hippel-Lindau disease, and von Hippel-Lindau syndrome.
Viagra listen (vy-A-gruh)
A drug used to treat erectile dysfunction. Viagra relaxes the smooth muscle of the penis to allow increased blood flow and erection. It is a type of phosphodiesterase inhibitor. Also called sildenafil.
vibro-acoustography imaging listen (VY-broh-uh-koos-TAH-gruh-fee IH-muh-jing)
A technique being studied in the diagnosis of breast cancer and other types of cancer. Vibro-acoustography imaging uses ultrasound (high-energy sound waves) to cause tissues to vibrate. The sound made by the vibrating tissues is picked up by a microphone and is used to make an image of the object on a computer. Cancer tissue can be seen because it is denser and vibrates at a different rate than normal tissue.
Vidaza listen (vih-DAY-zuh)
A drug used to treat myelodysplastic syndromes. It is also being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. Vidaza stops cells from making DNA and may kill abnormal blood cells or cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called azacitidine.
video-assisted resection listen (VIH-dee-oh-uh-SIS-ted ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery that is aided by the use of a video camera that projects and enlarges the image on a television screen. Also called video-assisted surgery.
video-assisted surgery listen (VIH-dee-oh-uh-SIS-ted SER-juh-ree)
Surgery that is aided by the use of a video camera that projects and enlarges the image on a television screen. Also called video-assisted resection.
villous adenoma listen (VIH-lus A-deh-NOH-muh)
A type of polyp that grows in the colon and other places in the gastrointestinal tract and sometimes in other parts of the body. These adenomas may become malignant (cancer).
villus listen (VIH-lus)
A tiny hair-like projection, often on the surface of mucous membranes. The plural is villi.
VIN listen
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the vulvar skin. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby tissue. Also called vulvar carcinoma in situ and vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia.
vinblastine sulfate listen (vin-BLAS-teen SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat breast cancer and choriocarcinoma (a type of gestational trophoblastic tumor) that have not gotten better with other treatment. It is also used to treat Hodgkin lymphoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, Kaposi sarcoma, mycosis fungoides, and testicular cancer. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vinblastine sulfate blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. The brand name Velban has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
vinca alkaloid listen (VIN-kuh AL-kuh-LOYD)
A type of drug that blocks cell growth by stopping mitosis (cell division). Vinca alkaloids interfere with microtubules (cellular structures that help move chromosomes during mitosis). They are used to treat cancer. A vinca alkaloid is a type of mitotic inhibitor and a type of antimicrotubule agent.
vincristine listen (vin-KRIS-teen)
The active ingredient in a drug used to treat acute leukemia. It is sometimes used with other drugs to treat Hodgkin lymphoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, neuroblastoma, and Wilms tumor. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vincristine blocks cell growth by stopping cell division. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent.
vincristine sulfate listen (vin-KRIS-teen SUL-fayt)
A drug used to treat acute leukemia. It is sometimes used with other drugs to treat Hodgkin lymphoma, non-Hodgkin lymphoma, rhabdomyosarcoma, neuroblastoma, and Wilms tumor. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vincristine sulfate blocks cell growth by stopping cell division. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. The brand name Oncovin has been taken off the market and is no longer available.
vincristine sulfate liposome listen (vin-KRIS-teen SUL-fayt LY-poh-some)
A form of the anticancer drug vincristine sulfate that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than vincristine. Vincristine sulfate liposome is used to treat adults with acute lymphoblastic leukemia that is Philadelphia chromosome negative and has come back or has not gotten better with other treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. Also called liposomal vincristine sulfate and Marqibo.
vindesine listen (VIN-deh-seen)
An anticancer drug that belongs to the family of plant drugs called vinca alkaloids.
vinflunine listen (VIN-floo-neen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of bladder cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. Also called Javlor.
vinorelbine tartrate listen (vih-NOR-el-been TAR-trayt)
A drug used alone or with cisplatin to treat non-small cell lung cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vinorelbine tartrate blocks cell growth by stopping cell division and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of vinca alkaloid and a type of antimitotic agent. Also called Navelbine.
vinyl chloride listen (VY-nil KLOR-ide)
A substance used to make plastics. Exposure to vinyl chloride may increase the risk of developing liver, brain, and lung cancers; lymphoma; and leukemia.
Vioxx listen (VY-ox)
A drug that was being used for pain relief and was being studied for its ability to prevent cancer and to prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Vioxx was taken off the market in the U.S. because of safety concerns. Also called rofecoxib.
VIP
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced testicular cancer. It is often used in patients who cannot receive bleomycin. It includes the drugs etoposide (VePesid), ifosfamide, and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called VIP regimen.
VIP hormone listen (... HOR-mone)
A hormone found in the pancreas, intestine, and central nervous system. It has many actions in the body, such as helping to control the secretion of water, salts, enzymes, and gastric acid during digestion. It also causes smooth muscles in the digestive tract, the heart, and the blood vessels to relax. It also has effects on the immune system and the central nervous system. Certain tumors in the pancreas make large amounts of VIP hormone. Also called vasoactive intestinal peptide.
VIP regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat advanced testicular cancer. It is often used in patients who cannot receive bleomycin. It includes the drugs etoposide (VePesid), ifosfamide, and cisplatin (Platinol). Also called VIP.
viral listen (VY-rul)
Having to do with a virus.
viral oncolysate listen (VY-rul on-KAH-lih-sayt)
An extract made from cancer cells that are infected with a strain of virus that can lyse (break down) cancer cells. The extract contains both cancer cell proteins and virus proteins. Viral oncolysates are being studied as cancer vaccines.
viral therapy listen (VY-rul THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using a virus that has been changed in the laboratory to find and destroy cancer cells without harming healthy cells. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called oncolytic virotherapy, oncolytic virus therapy, and virotherapy.
viral vector listen (VY-rul VEK-ter)
A type of virus used in cancer therapy. The virus is changed in the laboratory and cannot cause disease. Viral vectors may produce tumor antigens (proteins found on a tumor cell) to stimulate an antitumor immune response in the body. Viral vectors may also be used to carry genes that can change cancer cells back to normal cells.
virotherapy listen (VY-roh-THAYR-uh-pee)
Treatment using a virus that has been changed in the laboratory to find and destroy cancer cells without harming healthy cells. It is a type of targeted therapy. Also called oncolytic virotherapy, oncolytic virus therapy, and viral therapy.
virtual colonoscopy listen (VER-chuh-wul KOH-luh-NOS-koh-pee)
A method to examine the inside of the colon by taking a series of x-rays. A computer is used to make 2-dimensional (2-D) and 3-D pictures of the colon from these x-rays. The pictures can be saved, changed to give better viewing angles, and reviewed after the procedure, even years later. Also called computed tomographic colonography, computed tomography colonography, CT colonography, and CTC.
virulence listen (VEER-uh-lents)
The ability of a microorganism to cause damage to its host.
virulent listen (VEER-uh-lent)
Refers to the ability of a virus or a bacterium to cause damage to its host.
Virulizin listen (VEER-yoo-LY-zin)
A substance that activates some types of immune system cells, and is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called biological therapy agents.
virus listen (VY-rus)
In medicine, a very simple microorganism that infects cells and may cause disease. Because viruses can multiply only inside infected cells, they are not considered to be alive.
virus replication cycle listen (VY-rus reh-plih-KAY-shun...)
The reproduction cycle of viruses. A replication cycle begins with the infection of a host cell and ends with the release of mature progeny virus particles.
virus-like particle listen (VY-rus-like PAR-tih-kul)
A small particle that contains certain proteins from the outer coat of a virus. Virus-like particles do not contain any genetic material from the virus and cannot cause an infection. They are used to make vaccines that can help the body’s immune system kill microorganisms and certain cancer cells. Virus-like particles were used to make vaccines that prevent cervical cancer caused by human papilloma viruses (HPV). They were also used to make vaccines that prevent liver cancer caused by infection with the hepatitis B virus.
virus-neutralizing antibody listen (VY-rus-NOO-truh-LY-zing AN-tee-BAH-dee)
An antibody that binds to a virus and interferes with its ability to infect a cell.
viscera listen (VIH-seh-ruh)
The soft internal organs of the body, including the lungs, the heart, and the organs of the digestive, excretory, and reproductive systems.
visceral listen (VIH-seh-rul)
Having to do with the viscera, which are the soft internal organs of the body, including the lungs, the heart, and the organs of the digestive, excretory, reproductive, and circulatory systems.
visceral peritoneum listen (VIH-seh-rul PAYR-ih-toh-NEE-um)
The layers of tissue that cover the outer surface of most organs in the abdomen, including the intestines.
viscotoxin listen (VIS-koh-TOK-sin)
A member of a group of small proteins produced by mistletoe plants that are able to kill cells and may stimulate the immune system.
visilizumab listen (vih-sih-LIZ-yoo-mab)
A substance being studied in the treatment of an immune system reaction called graft-versus-host disease (GVHD), which may occur after a donor stem cell transplant. It is also being studied in the treatment of some autoimmune diseases. Visilizumab binds to a protein called CD3, which is found on some T cells (a type of white blood cell). This may help suppress the body’s immune response. Visilizumab is a type of monoclonal antibody.
vismodegib listen (VIS-moh-DEH-gib)
A drug used to treat advanced basal cell carcinoma that has spread to other parts of the body or has come back after surgery. It is also used in patients who cannot be treated with surgery or radiation therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vismodegib blocks a type of protein involved in tissue growth and repair and may block the growth of cancer cells. It is a type of Hedgehog signaling pathway antagonist. Also called Erivedge and GDC-0449.
Vistogard listen (VIS-toh-gard)
A drug used in the emergency treatment of patients who receive too much fluorouracil or capecitabine (types of anticancer drugs). It is also used in the emergency treatment of heart or central nervous system (CNS) toxicity or other serious side effects that occur within 4 days of ending treatment with fluorouracil or capecitabine. Vistogard may help protect healthy cells from some of the side effects caused by certain anticancer drugs. It is a type of cytoprotective agent. Also called PN401, triacetyluridine, and uridine triacetate.
visual analog scale listen (VIH-zhoo-ul A-nuh-log skayl)
A tool used to help a person rate the intensity of certain sensations and feelings, such as pain. The visual analog scale for pain is a straight line with one end meaning no pain and the other end meaning the worst pain imaginable. A patient marks a point on the line that matches the amount of pain he or she feels. It may be used to help choose the right dose of pain medicine. Also called VAS.
visual pathway glioma listen (VIH-zhoo-ul ... glee-OH-muh)
A rare, slow-growing tumor that usually forms in the optic nerve, optic chiasm, or optic tract. These are parts of the nervous system that carry messages from the eye to the brain. Also called optic pathway glioma.
vital listen (VY-tul)
Necessary to maintain life. Breathing is a vital function.
vitality listen (vy-TA-lih-tee)
A term used to describe a person’s ability to live, grow, and develop. Vitality also refers to having energy and being vigorous and active. Being ill or being treated for a disease, such as cancer, may lessen a person’s vitality.
vitamin listen (VY-tuh-min)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Sources of vitamins are plant and animal food products and dietary supplements. Some vitamins are made in the human body from food products. Vitamins are either fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) or water-soluble (can dissolve in water). Excess fat-soluble vitamins are stored in the body’s fatty tissue, but excess water-soluble vitamins are removed in the urine. Examples are vitamin A, vitamin C, and vitamin E.
vitamin A listen (VY-tuh-min …)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin A helps in vision, bone growth, reproduction, growth of epithelium (cells that line the internal and external surfaces of the body), and fighting infections. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils). Vitamin A is found in liver, egg yolks, and whole milk dairy products from animals and in fish oils. It can also be made in the body from a substance found in some fruits and vegetables, such as cantaloupes, carrots, spinach, and sweet potatoes. Vitamin A is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called retinol.
vitamin A acid listen (VY-tuh-min...A-sid)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin A acid is made in the body from vitamin A and helps cells to grow and develop, especially in the embryo. A form of vitamin A acid made in the laboratory is put on the skin to treat conditions such as acne and is taken by mouth to treat acute promyelocytic leukemia (a fast-growing cancer in which there are too many immature blood-forming cells in the blood and bone marrow). Vitamin A acid is being studied in the prevention and treatment of other types of cancer. Also called all-trans retinoic acid, ATRA, retinoic acid, and tretinoin.
vitamin B complex listen (VY-tuh-min ... KOM-plex)
A compound containing several or all of a group of vitamins and nutrients that the body needs in very small amounts to function and stay healthy. The B vitamins in the vitamin B complex include thiamine, riboflavin, niacin (nicotinic acid), niacinamide (nicotinamide), the vitamin B6 group (including pyridoxine, pyridoxal, pyridoxamine), biotin, pantothenic acid, folic acid, and vitamin B12. Aminobenzoic acid, inositol, and choline are sometimes included as part of the vitamin B complex. The vitamin B complex is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and is found in yeast, seeds, eggs, liver, meat, and vegetables. Members of the vitamin B complex are being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer.
vitamin B1 listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B1 helps some enzymes work properly, helps break down sugars in the diet, and keeps nerves and the heart healthy. It is found in pork, organ meats, peas, beans, nuts, and whole grains. Vitamin B1 is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in daily. Not enough vitamin B1 can cause a disease called beriberi (a condition marked by heart, nerve, and digestive disorders). Too much vitamin B1 may help cancer cells grow faster. Also called thiamine.
vitamin B12 listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B12 helps make red blood cells, DNA, RNA, energy, and tissues, and keeps nerve cells healthy. It is found in liver, meat, eggs, poultry, shellfish, milk, and milk products. Vitamin B12 is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough vitamin B12 can cause certain types of anemia (a condition in which the number of red blood cells is below normal) and neurologic disorders. It is being studied with folate in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called cobalamin and cyanocobalamin.
vitamin B2 listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B2 helps make red blood cells, helps some enzymes work properly, and keeps skin, nails, and hair healthy. It is found in milk, eggs, malted barley, organ meats, yeast, and leafy vegetables. Vitamin B2 is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough vitamin B2 can cause anemia (a low number of red blood cells), mouth sores, and skin problems. Amounts of vitamin B2 may be higher in the blood of patients with some types of cancer. Also called riboflavin.
vitamin B3 listen (VY-tuh-min …)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B3 helps some enzymes work properly and helps skin, nerves, and the digestive tract stay healthy. Vitamin B3 is found in many plant and animal products. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough vitamin B3 can cause a disease called pellagra (a condition marked by skin, nerve, and digestive disorders). A form of vitamin B3 is being studied in the prevention of skin and other types of cancer. Vitamin B3 may help to lower blood cholesterol. Also called niacin and nicotinic acid.
vitamin B5 listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B5 helps some enzymes use foods and make many substances used in the body and protects cells against damage from peroxides. It is found in almost all plant and animal foods. Vitamin B5 is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Also called pantothenic acid.
vitamin B6 listen (VY-tuh-min…)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin B6 helps keep nerves and skin healthy, fight infections, keep blood sugar levels normal, produce red blood cells, and some enzymes work properly. Vitamin B6 is a group of related compounds (pyridoxine, pyridoxal, and pyridoxamine) found in cereals, beans, peas, nuts, meat, poultry, fish, eggs, and bananas. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water). Not enough vitamin B6 can cause mouth and tongue sores and nervous disorders. Vitamin B6 is being studied in the prevention of hand-foot syndrome (a disorder caused by certain anticancer drugs and marked by pain, swelling, numbness, tingling, or redness of the hands or feet). Also called pyridoxine.
vitamin C listen (VY-tuh-min…)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin C helps fight infections, heal wounds, and keep tissues healthy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Vitamin C is found in all fruits and vegetables, especially citrus fruits, strawberries, cantaloupe, green peppers, tomatoes, broccoli, leafy greens, and potatoes. It is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Vitamin C is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called ascorbic acid.
vitamin D listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin D helps the body use calcium and phosphorus to make strong bones and teeth. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, egg yolks, and dairy products. Skin exposed to sunshine can also make vitamin D. Not enough vitamin D can cause a bone disease called rickets. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. Also called cholecalciferol.
vitamin D2 listen (VY-tuh-min …)
A form of vitamin D that helps the body use calcium and phosphorus to make strong bones and teeth. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in plants and yeast. It can be made in the body from another form of vitamin D when the body is exposed to the sun. Vitamin D2 is also made in the laboratory. It is used to prevent and to treat vitamin D deficiency. It is a type of dietary supplement. Also called ergocalciferol.
vitamin E listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to stay healthy and work the way it should. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in seeds, nuts, leafy green vegetables, and vegetable oils. Vitamin E boosts the immune system and helps keep blood clots from forming. It also helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Vitamin E is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer. It is a type of antioxidant. Also called alpha-tocopherol.
vitamin H listen (VY-tuh-min …)
A nutrient in the vitamin B complex that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin H helps some enzymes break down substances in the body for energy and helps tissues develop. It is found in yeast, whole milk, egg yolks, and organ meats. Vitamin H is water-soluble (can dissolve in water) and must be taken in every day. Not enough vitamin H can cause skin, nerve, and eye disorders. Vitamin H is present in larger amounts in some cancer tissue than in normal tissue. Attaching vitamin H to substances used to treat some types of cancer helps them find cancer cells. Also called biotin.
vitamin K listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin K helps to form blood clots (a mass that forms when blood platelets, proteins, and cells stick together) and maintain strong bones. It is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in green leafy vegetables, broccoli, liver, and vegetable oils. Vitamin K is also made by bacteria that live in the large intestine. Not enough vitamin K can lead to bleeding and bruising. It is a type of phylloquinone.
vitamin Q10 listen (VY-tuh-min ...)
A nutrient that the body needs in small amounts to function and stay healthy. Vitamin Q10 helps mitochondria (small structures in the cell) make energy. It is an antioxidant that helps prevent cell damage caused by free radicals (highly reactive chemicals). Vitamin Q10 is fat-soluble (can dissolve in fats and oils) and is found in fatty fish, beef, soybeans, peanuts, and spinach. It is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of cancer and heart disease and in the relief of side effects caused by some cancer treatments. Also called coenzyme Q10, CoQ10, Q10, and ubiquinone.
vitespen listen (vy-TEH-spen)
A vaccine made from a patient’s tumor cells that may help the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. This vaccine is used to treat kidney cancer, a type of brain cancer called glioma, and metastatic melanoma (a type of skin cancer that has spread). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Also called gp96 heat shock protein-peptide complex vaccine, gp96 HSP-peptide complex, and Oncophage.
Vitex listen (VY-tex)
An extract made from the fruit of the chaste tree (Vitex agnus-castus) found in parts of Asia and Europe. It is claimed to treat infertility and to lessen symptoms that may occur before or during a woman’s menstrual period, such as headaches and irregular bleeding. Vitex may affect levels of reproductive hormones in the blood. It is a type of phytomedicine. Also called chaste tree berry and monk’s pepper.
Vitrakvi listen (vih-TRAK-vee)
A drug used to treat solid tumors that have spread to other parts of the body or cannot be removed by surgery and that got worse after other treatment or cannot be treated with other therapies. It is used in patients whose disease has the NTRK gene fusion but does not have certain mutations (changes) in the TRK protein. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vitrakvi blocks the TRK protein, which is involved in cell signaling and cell growth. TRK may be found in a mutated (changed) form or at high levels in some types of cancer cells. Blocking this protein may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. Vitrakvi is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy. Also called larotrectinib sulfate, LOXO-101, and Trk inhibitor LOXO-101.
vitreous humor listen (VIH-tree-us HYOO-mer)
The clear jelly-like substance that fills the inside of the eyeball. As a person ages, the vitreous humor becomes more liquid.
Vivitrol listen (VIH-vih-trol)
A drug that blocks the action of opiates (drugs used to treat pain). It may be used in the treatment of intravenous opiate addiction or alcohol dependence. Vivitrol is also being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It may block the effects of the hormone estrogen, which causes some breast cancer cells to grow, or block the blood flow to tumors. It is a type of opiate antagonist. Also called naltrexone hydrochloride and ReVia.
Vizimpro listen (vih-ZIM-proh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vizimpro blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called dacomitinib and PF-00299804.
VNP20009
A genetically modified Salmonella bacterium that is injected into the tumor. It is being studied for its ability to shrink solid tumors.
VNP40101M
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called alkylating agents.
vocal cord listen (VOH-kul kord)
One of two small bands of muscle within the larynx that vibrates to produce the voice.
voice box listen (voys …)
The area of the throat containing the vocal cords and used for breathing, swallowing, and talking. Also called larynx.
volociximab listen (voh-loh-SIK-sih-mab)
A monoclonal antibody that is being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Monoclonal antibodies are made in the laboratory and can locate and bind to substances in the body, including cancer cells. Volociximab binds to a protein that is found on cells that line some tumor blood vessels. It is a type of angiogenesis inhibitor. Also called M200.
Voltaren listen (vol-TAYR-en)
A drug that is used to treat the symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of skin cancer. It blocks substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor, a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called diclofenac sodium.
Voltaren gel listen (vol-TAYR-en jel)
The gel form of a drug that is used to treat the symptoms of rheumatoid arthritis and is being studied in the prevention and treatment of some types of skin cancer. It blocks substances that cause inflammation and pain. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of cyclooxygenase inhibitor, a type of nonsteroidal anti-inflammatory drug (NSAID), and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called diclofenac sodium gel.
vomit listen (VAH-mit)
To eject some or all of the contents of the stomach through the mouth.
von Hippel-Lindau disease listen (von HIH-pul-LIN-dow dih-ZEEZ)
A rare, inherited disorder that causes tumors and cysts to grow in certain parts of the body, including the brain, spinal cord, eyes, inner ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, kidney, and reproductive tract. The tumors are usually benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer). Patients with von Hippel-Lindau disease have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, especially kidney cancer and pancreatic cancer. The signs and symptoms of von Hippel-Lindau disease usually do not appear until young adulthood. It is caused by a mutation (change) in the VHL gene. Also called VHL disease, VHL syndrome, and von Hippel-Lindau syndrome.
von Hippel-Lindau gene listen (von HIH-pul-LIN-dow jeen)
A gene that makes the von Hippel-Lindau (VHL) protein, which helps control cell growth, cell division, and other important cell functions. Changed forms of the von Hippel-Lindau gene may increase the growth of cells, including abnormal cells. This mutated gene has been found in nearly all patients with an inherited condition called VHL syndrome. VHL syndrome can cause kidney cancer and tumors of the brain, spinal cord, eye, ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, or other parts of the body. The von Hippel-Lindau gene is a type of tumor suppressor gene. Also called VHL gene.
von Hippel-Lindau syndrome listen (von HIH-pul-LIN-dow SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that causes tumors and cysts to grow in certain parts of the body, including the brain, spinal cord, eyes, inner ear, adrenal glands, pancreas, kidney, and reproductive tract. The tumors are usually benign (not cancer), but some may be malignant (cancer). Patients with von Hippel-Lindau syndrome have an increased risk of certain types of cancer, especially kidney cancer and pancreatic cancer. The signs and symptoms of von Hippel-Lindau syndrome usually do not appear until young adulthood. It is caused by a mutation (change) in the VHL gene. Also called VHL disease, VHL syndrome, and von Hippel-Lindau disease.
Voraxaze listen (vor-AK-sayz)
A drug used to treat toxic levels of methotrexate (an anticancer drug) in the blood of patients with kidney problems. It is a bacterial enzyme that breaks down proteins and other substances, such as methotrexate. Voraxaze may also help certain drugs kill cancer cells. It is a type of chemoprotective agent and a type of prodrug activator. Also called carboxypeptidase-G2 and glucarpidase.
voriconazole listen (VOR-ih-KAH-nuh-zole)
A drug that treats infections caused by fungi.
vorinostat listen (vor-IN-oh-stat)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that recurred (came back) or did not get better during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vorinostat blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called SAHA, suberoylanilide hydroxamic acid, and Zolinza.
vorozole listen (VOR-uh-zole)
A hormone therapy drug used to decrease the production of estrogen.
Votrient listen (VOH-tree-ent)
A drug used to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma, which is the most common type of kidney cancer. It is also used to treat advanced soft tissue sarcoma that has been treated with other anticancer drugs. It is being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Votrient may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of protein tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called GW786034 and pazopanib hydrochloride.
VP-16
The active ingredient in a drug used with other drugs to treat small cell lung cancer. It is also used with other drugs to treat testicular cancer that has not gotten better after other anticancer treatment. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. VP-16 blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of podophyllotoxin derivative and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called etoposide.
vulva listen (VUL-vuh)
The external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina.
vulvar cancer listen (VUL-ver KAN-ser)
Cancer of the vulva (the external female genital organs, including the clitoris, vaginal lips, and the opening to the vagina).
vulvar carcinoma in situ listen (VUL-ver KAR-sih-NOH-muh in SY-too)
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the vulvar skin. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby tissue. Also called VIN and vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia.
vulvar intraepithelial neoplasia listen (VUL-ver IN-truh-eh-pih-THEE-lee-ul NEE-oh-PLAY-zhuh)
Abnormal cells are found on the surface of the vulvar skin. These abnormal cells may become cancer and spread into nearby tissue. Also called VIN and vulvar carcinoma in situ.
VUS
A change in a gene’s DNA sequence that has an unknown effect on a person’s health. There is usually not enough information about a VUS to know whether it increases a person’s risk of developing a disease, such as cancer. Also called unclassified variant, variant of uncertain significance, and variant of unknown significance.
VX 853
A drug being studied to make cancer cells less resistant to the effects of chemotherapy.
VX-710
A drug being studied to make cancer cells less resistant to the effects of chemotherapy.
Vyxeos listen (VIK-see-os)
A form of the anticancer drugs daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine that is contained inside very tiny, fat-like particles. It may have fewer side effects and work better than other forms of daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine. Vyxeos is used to treat certain types of newly diagnosed acute myeloid leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Vyxeos is a type of topoisomerase inhibitor and a type of antimetabolite. Also called daunorubicin hydrochloride and cytarabine liposome.
WAGR syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that is present at birth and has two or more of the following symptoms: Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer); little or no iris (the colored part of the eye); defects in the sexual organs and urinary tract (the organs that make urine and pass it from the body); and below average mental ability. This syndrome occurs when part of chromosome 11 is missing. Also called Wilms tumor-aniridia-genitourinary anomalies-mental retardation syndrome.
Waldenström macroglobulinemia listen (VAHL-den-strum MA-kroh-GLAH-byoo-lih-NEE-mee-uh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of non-Hodgkin lymphoma marked by abnormal levels of IgM antibodies in the blood and an enlarged liver, spleen, or lymph nodes. Also called lymphoplasmacytic lymphoma.
Waldeyer’s ring listen (VAL-dy-erz …)
A ring of lymphoid tissue found in the throat. The Waldeyer’s ring is made up of the tonsils, adenoids, and other lymphoid tissue. It contains lymphocytes (a type of immune cell) that help the body fight infection and disease.
warfarin listen (WOR-fuh-rin)
A drug that prevents blood from clotting. It belongs to the family of drugs called anticoagulants (blood thinners).
warm ischemia listen (… is-KEE-mee-uh)
In surgery, keeping a tissue, organ, or body part at body temperature after its blood suppy has been reduced or cut off.
warm ischemia time listen (… is-KEE-mee-uh …)
In surgery, the time a tissue, organ, or body part remains at body temperature after its blood supply has been reduced or cut off but before it is cooled or reconnected to a blood supply.
wart listen (wort)
A raised growth on the surface of the skin or other organ.
watchful waiting listen (WACH-ful WAY-ting)
Closely watching a patient’s condition but not giving treatment unless symptoms appear or change. Watchful waiting is sometimes used in conditions that progress slowly. It is also used when the risks of treatment are greater than the possible benefits. During watchful waiting, patients may be given certain tests and exams. Watchful waiting is sometimes used in prostate cancer. It is a type of expectant management.
water deprivation test listen (WAH-ter DEH-prih-VAY-shun …)
A test to measure how much urine is made and how concentrated it becomes when no water is given to a patient for a certain amount of time. This test is used to see how well the kidneys work and to help diagnose diabetes insipidus (a condition in which a person is very thirsty and makes large amounts of urine). Also called fluid deprivation test.
water pipe listen (WAH-ter …)
A device used to smoke a special type of tobacco that comes in different flavors. In a water pipe, charcoal is used to heat the tobacco. The smoke from the heated tobacco is cooled by passing it through a water-filled bowl. It is then inhaled through a flexible tube with a mouthpiece. Water pipe tobacco smoke contains nicotine and many cancer-causing chemicals that are harmful to both smokers and nonsmokers. Water pipe smoking can lead to nicotine addiction and can cause many of the same health problems as cigarette smoking. Water pipe smoking is not safer than cigarette smoking. Also called hookah.
watercress listen (WAH-ter-kres)
Parts of the flowering plant have been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It may have anticancer effects. The scientific name is Nasturtium officinale. Also called Indian cress.
water-soluble vitamin listen (… SOL-yoo-bul VY-tuh-min)
A vitamin that can dissolve in water. Water-soluble vitamins are carried to the body's tissues but are not stored in the body. They are found in plant and animal foods or dietary supplements and must be taken in daily. Vitamin C and members of the vitamin B complex are water-soluble.
WBC
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood and lymph tissue. WBCs are part of the body’s immune system. They help the body fight infection and other diseases. Types of WBCs are granulocytes (neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils), monocytes, and lymphocytes (T cells and B cells). Checking the number of WBCs in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as infection, inflammation, allergies, and leukemia. Also called leukocyte and white blood cell.
WBRT
A type of external radiation therapy used to treat patients who have cancer in the brain. It is often used to treat patients whose cancer has spread to the brain, or who have more than one tumor or tumors that cannot be removed by surgery. Radiation is given to the whole brain over a period of many weeks. Also called whole-brain radiation therapy and whole-brain radiotherapy.
wedge resection listen (wej ree-SEK-shun)
Surgery to remove a triangle-shaped slice of tissue. It may be used to remove a tumor and a small amount of normal tissue around it.
Wellbutrin listen (wel-BYOO-trin)
A drug used to treat depression and certain other disorders. It is also used to help people stop smoking. Wellbutrin increases the levels of the chemicals dopamine, serotonin, and norepinephrine in the brain. This helps improve mood and can lessen cravings for nicotine. It is a type of antidepressant and a type of nicotine receptor antagonist. Also called bupropion hydrochloride and Zyban.
well-differentiated listen (... DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ted)
A term used to describe cells and tissue that have mature (specialized) structures and functions. In cancer, well-differentiated cancer cells look more like normal cells under a microscope and tend to grow and spread more slowly than poorly differentiated or undifferentiated cancer cells.
well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma listen (... DIH-feh-REN-shee-AY-ted LIM-foh-SIH-tik lim-FOH-muh)
An indolent (slow-growing) type of lymphoma in which too many immature lymphocytes (white blood cells) are found mostly in the lymph nodes. This causes the lymph nodes to become larger than normal. Sometimes cancer cells are found in the blood and bone marrow, and the disease is called chronic lymphocytic leukemia. The disease is most often seen in people older than 50 years. Well-differentiated lymphocytic lymphoma is a type of non-Hodgkin Lymphoma. Also called SLL and small lymphocytic lymphoma.
Wermer syndrome listen (WER-mer SIN-drome)
A rare, inherited disorder that affects the endocrine glands and can cause tumors in the parathyroid and pituitary glands and the pancreas. These tumors are usually benign (not cancer). They cause the glands to secrete high levels of hormones, which can lead to other medical problems, such as kidney stones, fertility problems, and severe ulcers. In some cases, tumors inside the pancreas can become malignant (cancer). Also called MEN1 syndrome, multiple endocrine adenomatosis, and multiple endocrine neoplasia type 1 syndrome.
Werner syndrome listen (VER-ner SIN-drome)
An inherited disorder marked by rapid aging that begins in early adolescence. Patients may be shorter than average, and have health problems such as loss and graying of hair, hardening of the arteries, thinning of the bones, diabetes, and thin, hardened skin. They also have an increased risk of cancer, especially osteosarcoma (a type of bone cancer). Werner syndrome is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene involved in cell division. It is a type of autosomal recessive gene disease. Also called adult progeria and WS.
Western medicine listen (WES-tern MEH-dih-sin)
A system in which medical doctors and other healthcare professionals (such as nurses, pharmacists, and therapists) treat symptoms and diseases using drugs, radiation, or surgery. Also called allopathic medicine, biomedicine, conventional medicine, mainstream medicine, and orthodox medicine.
whey protein powder listen (way PROH-teen …)
A powdered form of proteins taken from whey, which is the liquid left over when cheese is made from cow’s milk. Whey protein powder is used to increase protein in the diet and is being studied for possible health benefits.
Whipple procedure listen (HWIH-pul proh-SEE-jer)
A type of surgery used to treat pancreatic cancer. The head of the pancreas, the duodenum, a portion of the stomach, and other nearby tissues are removed. Also called pancreatoduodenectomy.
white blood cell listen (hwite blud sel)
A type of blood cell that is made in the bone marrow and found in the blood and lymph tissue. White blood cells are part of the body’s immune system. They help the body fight infection and other diseases. Types of white blood cells are granulocytes (neutrophils, eosinophils, and basophils), monocytes, and lymphocytes (T cells and B cells). Checking the number of white blood cells in the blood is usually part of a complete blood cell (CBC) test. It may be used to look for conditions such as infection, inflammation, allergies, and leukemia. Also called leukocyte and WBC.
Whitmore-Jewett staging system listen (WIT-mor-JOO-et STAY-jing SIS-tem)
A staging system for prostate cancer that uses ABCD. “A” and “B” refer to cancer that is confined to the prostate. “C” refers to cancer that has grown out of the prostate but has not spread to lymph nodes or other places in the body. “D” refers to cancer that has spread to lymph nodes or to other places in the body. Also called ABCD rating and Jewett staging system.
WHO listen
A part of the United Nations that deals with major health issues around the world. The WHO sets standards for disease control, health care, and medicines; conducts education and research programs; and publishes scientific papers and reports. A major goal is to improve access to health care for people in developing countries and in groups who do not get good health care. The headquarters are located in Geneva, Switzerland. Also called World Health Organization.
whole cell vaccine listen (hole sel vak-SEEN)
Vaccine made from whole tumor cells that have been changed in the laboratory.
whole-brain radiation therapy listen (hole-brayn RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy used to treat patients who have cancer in the brain. It is often used to treat patients whose cancer has spread to the brain, or who have more than one tumor or tumors that cannot be removed by surgery. Radiation is given to the whole brain over a period of many weeks. Also called WBRT and whole-brain radiotherapy.
whole-brain radiotherapy listen (hole-brayn RAY-dee-oh-THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of external radiation therapy used to treat patients who have cancer in the brain. It is often used to treat patients whose cancer has spread to the brain, or who have more than one tumor or tumors that cannot be removed by surgery. Radiation is given to the whole brain over a period of many weeks. Also called WBRT and whole-brain radiation therapy.
whooping cough listen (HWOOP-ing kof)
A serious bacterial infection of the lungs and breathing tubes that spreads easily. Whooping cough begins like a cold, but develops into severe coughing and gasping for air. Long spells of coughing may cause vomiting, and broken blood vessels in the eyes and on the skin. Also called pertussis.
wide local excision listen (…LOH-kul ek-SIH-zhun)
Surgery to cut out the cancer and some healthy tissue around it.
wild clover listen (wilde KLOH-ver)
Trifolium pratense. A plant with flowers that has been used in some cultures to treat certain medical problems. It is being studied in the relief of menopausal symptoms and may have anticancer effects. Also called purple clover, red clover, and Trifolium pratense.
wild-type gene listen (... jeen)
A term used to describe a gene when it is found in its natural, non-mutated (unchanged) form. Mutated (changed) forms of certain genes have been found in some types of cancer. Knowing whether a patient’s tumor has a wild-type or mutated gene may help plan cancer treatment.
wild-type KRAS gene listen (… KAY-ras jeen)
A term used to describe a gene called KRAS when it is found in its natural, non-mutated (unchanged) form. The KRAS gene makes a protein called KRAS, which is involved in cell signaling pathways that control cell growth, cell maturation, and cell death (apoptosis). Mutated (changed) forms of the KRAS gene have been found in some types of cancer, including non-small cell lung cancer (NSCLC), colorectal cancer, and pancreatic cancer. Knowing whether a patient’s tumor has a wild-type or mutated KRAS gene may help plan cancer treatment.
will listen (wil)
A legal document in which a person states what is to be done with his or her property after death, who is to carry out the terms of the will, and who is to care for any minor children.
Wilms tumor listen (wilmz TOO-mer)
A disease in which malignant (cancer) cells are found in the kidney, and may spread to the lungs, liver, or nearby lymph nodes. Wilms tumor usually occurs in children younger than 5 years old.
Wilms tumor-aniridia-genitourinary anomalies-mental retardation syndrome listen (wilmz TOO-mer-a-nih-RIH-dee-uh-JEH-nih-toh-YOOR-ih-nayr-ee uh-NAH-muh-leez-MEN-tul ree-tar-DAY-shun SIN-drome)
A rare, genetic disorder that is present at birth and has two or more of the following symptoms: Wilms tumor (a type of kidney cancer); little or no iris (the colored part of the eye); defects in the sexual organs and urinary tract (the organs that make urine and pass it from the body); and below average mental ability. This syndrome occurs when part of chromosome 11 is missing. Also called WAGR syndrome.
Wilson disease (WIL-sun dih-ZEEZ)
A rare, inherited disorder in which too much copper builds up in the body. The extra copper is stored in the body’s tissues and organs, especially in the liver, brain, and eyes. This can cause liver disease, central nervous system (brain and spinal cord) problems, and mental problems. Signs and symptoms of Wilson disease include yellowing of the skin and the whites of the eyes, a gold or brown ring around the colored part of the eyes, swelling in the abdomen and legs, fatigue, loss of appetite, problems with speech and swallowing, uncontrolled movements or muscle stiffness, anxiety, depression, and mood swings. Wilson disease is caused by mutations (changes) in the ATP7B gene. It is a genetic disorder that is inherited in an autosomal recessive manner and is usually diagnosed in teens and young adults. It is a type of copper storage disease. Also called hepatolenticular degeneration.
windpipe listen (WIND-pipe)
The airway that leads from the larynx (voice box) to the bronchi (large airways that lead to the lungs). Also called trachea.
wire localization listen (... LOH-kuh-lih-ZAY-shun)
A procedure used to mark a small area of abnormal tissue so it can be removed by surgery. An imaging device is used to guide a thin wire with a hook at the end through a hollow needle to place the wire in or around the abnormal area. Once the wire is in the right place, the needle is removed and the wire is left in place so the doctor will know where the abnormal tissue is. The wire is removed when a biopsy is done. Also called needle localization and needle/wire localization.
wireless capsule endoscope listen (WY-er-les KAP-sul EN-doh-SKOPE)
A device used to look at the inside of the intestines and other parts of the digestive tract. It is a capsule that is about the size of a large pill, with a lens, a light, a camera, a radio transmitter, and a battery inside. The patient swallows the capsule and it takes pictures as it travels through the digestive tract. The pictures are sent to a small recorder that is worn on the patient’s waist or shoulder. The pictures are then viewed on a computer by the doctor to check for signs of disease. The wireless capsule endoscope passes out of the body during a bowel movement. Also called capsule endoscope.
wisdom tooth listen (WIZ-dum tooth)
The last tooth to come in at the back of each side of the upper and lower jaws. These teeth usually come in between 17 and 23 years of age, but not everyone has them. Also called third molar.
Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome listen (WIS-kot-ALL-drich SIN-drome)
An inherited immune disorder that occurs in young boys. It causes eczema (a type of skin inflammation), a decrease in the number of platelets (blood cells that help prevent bleeding), and frequent bacterial infections. People with Wiskott-Aldrich syndrome are at increased risk of developing leukemia and lymphoma. Also called Aldrich syndrome.
withdrawal listen (with-DRAWL)
In medicine, symptoms that occur when a person quits smoking or stops using an addictive substance, such as drugs or alcohol. Common withdrawal symptoms after quitting smoking include nicotine cravings, anger, irritability, anxiety, depression, and weight gain. These symptoms usually get better over time.
Wobe-Mugos E listen (wobe-myoo-gos …)
A mixture made from an extract of the calf thymus gland and enzymes (proteins that speed up chemical reactions in the body) from the papaya plant, the pancreas of cows, and the pancreas of pigs. It has been used in Europe as a treatment for a variety of cancers and for herpes virus infections.
WOC nurse listen (… nurs)
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to care for people who have a wound, an ostomy (an opening made by surgery, from an area inside the body to the outside), or problems with continence (ability to control the flow of urine or the passage of stool). Also called wound, ostomy, and continence nurse.
womb listen (woom)
The hollow, pear-shaped organ in a woman's pelvis. The womb is where a fetus (unborn baby) develops and grows. Also called uterus.
wood alcohol listen (… AL-kuh-hol)
A type of alcohol used to make antifreeze, pesticides, windshield wiper fluid, paint thinner, certain types of fuel, and other substances. Wood alcohol catches fire easily and is very poisonous. It is one of many harmful chemicals found in tobacco smoke. Also called methanol and methyl alcohol.
World Health Organization listen (wurld helth OR-guh-nih-ZAY-shun)
A part of the United Nations that deals with major health issues around the world. The World Health Organization sets standards for disease control, health care, and medicines; conducts education and research programs; and publishes scientific papers and reports. A major goal is to improve access to health care for people in developing countries and in groups who do not get good health care. The headquarters are located in Geneva, Switzerland. Also called WHO.
wound listen (woond)
A break in the skin or other body tissues caused by injury or surgical incision (cut).
wound, ostomy, and continence nurse listen (woond OS-toh-mee ... KON-tih-nents ...)
A registered nurse who has additional education and training in how to care for people who have a wound, an ostomy (an opening made by surgery, from an area inside the body to the outside), or problems with continence (ability to control the flow of urine or the passage of stool). Also called WOC nurse.
WS
An inherited disorder marked by rapid aging that begins in early adolescence. Patients may be shorter than average, and have health problems such as loss and graying of hair, hardening of the arteries, thinning of the bones, diabetes, and thin, hardened skin. They also have an increased risk of cancer, especially osteosarcoma (a type of bone cancer). WS is caused by a mutation (change) in a gene involved in cell division. It is a type of autosomal recessive gene disease. Also called adult progeria and Werner syndrome.
WX-671
A substance being studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. It blocks the action of certain enzymes, and it may help keep cancer cells from growing and spreading. It is a type of serine protease inhibitor.
Xalkori listen (ZAL-kor-ee)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive or ROS1 positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Xalkori blocks the proteins made by the ALK and ROS1 genes. Blocking these proteins may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Xalkori may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called crizotinib.
Xanax listen (ZAN-ax)
A drug used to treat anxiety disorders and panic attacks. It is being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of benzodiazepine. Also called alprazolam.
XELIRI
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called CAPIRI, CAPIRI regimen, and XELIRI regimen.
XELIRI regimen listen (... REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer that are advanced or have spread to other parts of the body. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and irinotecan hydrochloride. Also called CAPIRI, CAPIRI regimen, and XELIRI.
Xeloda listen (zeh-LOH-duh)
A drug used to treat stage III colorectal cancer that was removed by surgery and colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used to treat breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Xeloda is taken up by cancer cells and breaks down into 5-fluorouracil, a substance that kills cancer cells. Xeloda is a type of antimetabolite. Also called capecitabine.
XELOX listen
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and oxaliplatin. Also called XELOX regimen.
XELOX regimen listen (… REH-jih-men)
An abbreviation for a chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer that has spread. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. It includes the drugs capecitabine (Xeloda) and oxaliplatin. Also called XELOX.
xenograft listen (ZEE-noh-graft)
The transplant of an organ, tissue, or cells to an individual of another species.
xeroderma pigmentosum listen (ZEER-oh-DER-ma pig-men-TOH-sum)
A genetic condition marked by an extreme sensitivity to ultraviolet radiation, including sunlight. People with xeroderma pigmentosum are not able to repair skin damage from the sun and other sources of ultraviolet radiation, and have a very high risk of skin cancer.
xerogram listen (ZEER-oh-gram)
A picture of the body recorded on paper rather than on film. Also called xeroradiograph.
xeroradiograph listen (ZEER-oh-RAY-dee-oh-graf)
A picture of the body recorded on paper rather than on film. Also called xerogram.
xeroradiography listen (ZEER-oh-RAY-dee-AH-gruh-fee)
A type of x-ray in which a picture of the body is recorded on paper rather than on film.
xerostomia listen (ZEER-oh-STOH-mee-uh)
Dry mouth. It occurs when the body is not able to make enough saliva.
Xgeva listen (ex-JEE-vuh)
A drug used to prevent bone problems caused by multiple myeloma or by solid tumors that have spread to the bone. It is also used in certain patients to treat giant cell tumor of the bone that cannot be removed by surgery. Xgeva is also used to treat hypercalcemia that is caused by cancer and did not get better after treatment with bisphosphonates. Xgeva binds to a protein called RANKL, which keeps RANKL from binding to another protein called RANK on the surface of certain bone cells, including bone cancer cells. This may help keep bone from breaking down and cancer cells from growing. Xgeva may also prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It contains the active ingredient denosumab. Xgeva is a type of monoclonal antibody.
XK469R
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of leukemia. It belongs to the family of drugs called topoisomerase inhibitors.
XL880
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. XL880 blocks enzymes involved in the growth and spread of tumor cells. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called foretinib and MET/VEGFR-2 inhibitor GSK1363089.
Xofigo listen (SOH-fee-goh)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that has spread to the bone and is causing symptoms but has not spread to other organs. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Xofigo contains a radioactive substance called radium Ra 223. It collects in bone and gives off radiation that may kill cancer cells. Also called radium Ra 223-dichloride.
Xospata listen (zoh-SPAH-tuh)
A drug used to treat acute myeloid leukemia that came back or did not get better with other treatment. It is used in adults whose cancer has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called FLT3. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Xospata blocks certain proteins made by the mutated FLT3 gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called gilteritinib fumarate.
XR9576
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It may help tumor cells respond again to drugs they have become resistant (unable to respond) to. XR9576 is a type of multidrug resistance inhibitor and a type of P-glycoprotein antagonist. Also called tariquidar.
x-ray listen (EX-ray)
A type of radiation used in the diagnosis and treatment of cancer and other diseases. In low doses, x-rays are used to diagnose diseases by making pictures of the inside of the body. In high doses, x-rays are used to treat cancer.
x-ray therapy listen (...THAYR-uh-pee)
A type of radiation therapy that uses high-energy radiation from x-rays to kill cancer cells and shrink tumors.
XRP9881
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called taxane derivatives.
Xtandi listen (ek-STAN-dee)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer that is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). Xtandi binds to proteins called androgen receptors, which are found in some prostate cancer cells. These proteins bind to androgens (male hormones) and may cause cancer cells to grow. Xtandi blocks these proteins and may keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of antiandrogen. Also called enzalutamide.
Xyotax listen (ZY-oh-tax)
A form of the anticancer drug paclitaxel combined with a protein called poliglumex that may have fewer side effects and work better than paclitaxel. It is being studied in the treatment of breast cancer, ovarian cancer, lung cancer, and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called mitotic inhibitors. Also called CT-2103, paclitaxel poliglumex, and paclitaxel polyglutamate.
yangona listen (yan-GOH-nuh)
An herb native to islands in the South Pacific. Substances taken from the root have been used in some cultures to relieve stress, anxiety, tension, sleeplessness, and problems of menopause. Yangona may increase the effect of alcohol and of certain drugs used to treat anxiety and depression. The U.S. Food and Drug Administration advises users that yangona may cause severe liver damage. The scientific name is Piper methysticum. Also called intoxicating pepper, kava kava, rauschpfeffer, and tonga.
yeast listen (yeest)
A type of microorganism that is found almost everywhere, including inside the body. There are many different types of yeast. Some types are used to make foods, such as bread, cheese, and alcoholic drinks. Small amounts of a certain type of yeast normally live on the skin and in some parts of the body, such as the mouth, throat, and vagina. Yeast are a type of fungus.
yeast infection listen (yeest in-FEK-shun)
A condition in which too much yeast grows in certain areas of the body and causes symptoms and disease. Small amounts of yeast normally live on the skin and in other parts of the body, such as the mouth, throat, and vagina. Sometimes, too much yeast can grow in these areas and cause infection. Yeast infections may also occur in the blood and spread throughout the body, but this is rare. Certain conditions, such as a weakened immune system, diabetes, pregnancy, hormone changes, and stress, and use of certain medicines may increase the risk of yeast infection.
yellow fever listen (YEH-loh FEE-ver)
A disease caused by infection with the yellow fever virus, which is carried by mosquitos. Symptoms include body aches, chills, fever, severe headache, weakness, and a yellow skin color. Bleeding, vomiting, and failure of the liver and other organs may occur in late stages of the disease.
Yervoy listen (YER-voy)
A drug used with nivolumab to treat a certain type of colorectal cancer that has mutations (changes) in genes involved in DNA repair. It is also used with nivolumab in some patients to treat advanced renal cell carcinoma that has not already been treated. Yervoy is also used alone to treat melanoma that cannot be removed by surgery or has spread to other parts of the body. It is also used as adjuvant therapy to treat melanoma in the skin and lymph nodes in patients who have already had surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Yervoy binds to a substance called CTLA-4, which is found on T cells (a type of white blood cell). Yervoy may block CTLA-4 and help the immune system kill cancer cells. It is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immune checkpoint inhibitor. Also called ipilimumab and MDX-010.
Yescarta listen (yes-KAR-tuh)
A drug used to treat certain types of large B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma that relapsed (came back) or did not get better after treatment with at least two other types of anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Yescarta is made using a patient’s T cells (a type of immune system cell). A gene for a special receptor called chimeric antigen receptor (CAR) is added to the T cells in the laboratory. These changed T cells called CAR T cells are grown in large numbers in the laboratory and given to the patient by infusion. Yescarta binds to a protein called CD19, which is found on most B cell lymphoma cells. This helps the body’s immune system kill cancer cells. Yescarta is a type of CAR T-cell therapy. Also called axicabtagene ciloleucel.
yin and yang listen (yin ... yang)
In Chinese philosophy, yin and yang are opposite forces that form a whole. Everything contains both yin and yang in a balance that is always changing, such as hot and cold, day and night, and health and disease. In traditional Chinese medicine, disease is diagnosed and treated based on the balance of yin and yang.
YKL-40
A substance that may be found in higher-than-normal amounts in the blood of patients with certain types of cancer and inflammatory diseases. It is a type of glycoprotein.
YM598
A substance that is being studied as a treatment for advanced prostate cancer and for pain caused by prostate cancer that has spread to the bone. It belongs to the family of drugs called endothelin ETA receptor antagonists.
yoga listen (YOH-guh)
An ancient system of practices used to balance the mind and body through exercise, meditation (focusing thoughts), and control of breathing and emotions. Yoga is being studied as a way to relieve stress and treat sleep problems in cancer patients.
yohimbe listen (yoh-HIM-bay)
A tree native to West Africa. The bark is used as a supplement for bodybuilding and to enhance male sexual performance. It contains the chemical yohimbine, which is being studied in the treatment of sexual dysfunction. It may interact with certain drugs used to treat depression, high blood pressure, and high blood sugar. The scientific name is Pausinystalia yohimbe. Also called johimbe.
yolk sac tumor listen (yok sak TOO-mer)
A rare type of cancer that begins in germ cells (cells that form sperm or eggs). Yolk sac tumors occur most often in the ovary or testicle, but they may also occur in other areas of the body, such as the chest, abdomen, or brain. They tend to grow quickly and spread to other parts of the body if not treated. Yolk sac tumors are the most common malignant germ cell tumor in children. Also called endodermal sinus tumor.
Yondelis listen (yon-DEH-lis)
A drug used to treat liposarcoma and leiomyosarcoma (types of soft tissue sarcoma) that cannot be removed by surgery or have spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients who were treated with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Yondelis may kill cancer cells by damaging their DNA and stopping them from dividing. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called ecteinascidin 743, ET-743, and trabectedin.
yttrium listen (IH-tree-um)
A metal of the rare earth group of elements. A radioactive form of yttrium may be attached to a monoclonal antibody or other molecule that can locate and bind to cancer cells and be used to diagnose or treat some types of cancer.
yttrium Y 90 listen (IH-tree-um …)
A radioactive form of the rare metal yttrium that is used in radiation therapy to treat some types of tumors. Yttrium Y 90 can be linked to a molecule, such as a monoclonal antibody, to help it locate and bind to certain substances in the body, including cancer cells. The radiation may kill the cancer cells.
yttrium Y 90-clivatuzumab tetraxetan listen (IH-tree-um … KLY-vuh-TOO-zoo-mab teh-TRAK-seh-tan)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced pancreatic cancer. Yttrium Y 90-clivatuzumab tetraxetan contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called MUC-1, which is found on some pancreatic cancer cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-clivatuzumab tetraxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuPAM4.
yttrium Y 90-DOTA anti-CEA monoclonal antibody M5A listen (IH-tree-um … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. M5A is a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CEA, which is found on some cancer cells. It is linked to a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA anti-CEA monoclonal antibody M5A is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuAFP31 listen (IH-tree-um … MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of liver cancer. HuAFP31 is a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called alpha fetoprotein (AFP), which is found on some cancer cells. It is linked to a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuAFP31 is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuPAM4 listen (IH-tree-um ... MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee ...)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced pancreatic cancer. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuPAM4 contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called MUC-1, which is found on some pancreatic cancer cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA monoclonal antibody HuPAM4 is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called yttrium Y 90-clivatuzumab tetraxetan.
yttrium Y 90-DOTA-biotin listen (IH-tree-um ... BY-oh-tin)
A compound that contains the radioisotope yttrium Y 90 linked to the chemical biotin. Biotin is a molecule that binds strongly to the chemical streptavidin. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA-biotin will find tumor cells in the body that have been targeted by an antibody linked to streptavidin and kill them. It is being studied together with CC49-streptavidin in the treatment of cancer. Also called 90Y-DOTA-biotin.
yttrium Y 90-DOTA-tyr3-octreotide listen (IH-tree-um ... ok-TREE-oh-tide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA-tyr3-octreotide contains a molecule that binds to a protein found on certain types of neuroendocrine tumors (tumors that form from cells that release hormones). It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-DOTA-tyr3-octreotide is a type of radioconjugate. Also called yttrium Y 90-edotreotide and yttrium Y 90-SMT 487.
yttrium Y 90-edotreotide listen (IH-tree-um ... eh-doh-TREE-oh-tide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Yttrium Y 90-edotreotide contains a molecule that binds to a protein found on certain types of neuroendocrine tumors (tumors that form from cells that release hormones). It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-edotreotide is a type of radioconjugate. Also called yttrium Y 90-DOTA-tyr3-octreotide and yttrium Y 90-SMT 487.
yttrium Y 90-epratuzumab tetraxetan listen (IH-tree-um … eh-pruh-TOO-zoo-mab teh-TRAK-seh-tan)
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain types of B-cell cancer. Epratuzumab is a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD22, which is found on the surface of B cells. It is linked to a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-epratuzumab tetraxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate.
yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan listen (IH-tree-um ... ih-brih-TOO-moh-mab ty-UK-seh-tan)
A drug used with the drug rituximab to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of B-cell tumors. Yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan, 90Y-Zevalin, and IDEC-Y2B8.
yttrium Y 90-SMT 487 listen (IH-tree-um …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Yttrium Y 90-SMT 487 contains a molecule that binds to a protein found on certain types of neuroendocrine tumors (tumors that form from cells that release hormones). It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. Yttrium Y 90-SMT 487 is a type of radioconjugate. Also called yttrium Y 90-DOTA-tyr3-octreotide and yttrium Y 90-edotreotide.
zafirlukast listen (zuh-FER-loo-kast)
A drug used to prevent and treat symptoms of asthma. It blocks substances that cause inflammation in the lungs. It is a type of antiasthmatic agent and a leukotriene receptor antagonist. Also called Accolate.
Zaltrap listen (ZAL-trap)
A drug used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zaltrap blocks the action of a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor trap, VEGF Trap, and ziv-aflibercept.
zanamivir listen (zuh-NA-mih-veer)
A drug used to prevent and to treat influenza virus infections. It blocks the release of the virus from infected cells. It is a type of antiviral agent. Also called Relenza.
Zarnestra listen (zar-NESS-truh)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and other types of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called farnesyltransferase inhibitors. Also called R115777 and tipifarnib.
Zarxio listen (ZAR-zee-oh)
A drug used to treat neutropenia (a condition in which there is a lower-than-normal number of white blood cells) caused by some types of chemotherapy. It is used to help prevent infection in patients with certain types of cancer. Zarxio is also used to treat severe chronic neutropenia and to prepare the blood for the collection of certain types of blood cells. It helps the bone marrow make more white blood cells. Zarxio contains the active ingredient filgrastim. It is a type of colony-stimulating factor.
ZD0473
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called platinum analogs.
ZD1839
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not already been treated with other anticancer therapy. It is used in patients whose cancer has certain mutations (changes) in a gene called epidermal growth factor receptor (EGFR). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ZD1839 blocks certain proteins made by the mutated EGFR gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It may also prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. ZD1839 is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor and a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called gefitinib and Iressa.
ZD4054
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of prostate cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called endothelin-receptor antagonists.
ZD6126
A substance that has been studied in the treatment of several types of cancer. ZD6126 destroys blood vessels in tumors and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of vascular targeting agent and a type of antiangiogenesis agent.
ZD6474
A drug used to treat medullary thyroid cancer that is locally advanced or has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer cannot be removed by surgery. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. ZD6474 prevents the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It also blocks enzymes needed for cell growth and may kill cancer cells. ZD6474 is a type of antiangiogenesis agent and a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called Caprelsa and vandetanib.
ZDX
A drug used to treat prostate cancer and to relieve the symptoms of advanced breast cancer. It is also used to treat problems with the endometrium (lining of the uterus). ZDX keeps the body from making the hormones luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone (LHRH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). This causes the testicles to stop making testosterone (a male hormone) in men, and the ovaries to stop making estradiol (a form of the hormone estrogen) in women. ZDX may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone or estrogen to grow. It is a type of LHRH agonist. Also called goserelin acetate and Zoladex.
Zejula listen (zeh-JOO-luh)
A drug used to treat recurrent ovarian epithelial, fallopian tube, or primary peritoneal cancers that have gotten better after treatment with anticancer drugs that included platinum. Zejula is used to help keep the cancer from coming back again. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zejula blocks an enzyme involved in many cell functions, including the repair of DNA damage. Blocking this enzyme may help keep cancer cells from repairing their damaged DNA, causing them to die. Zejula is a type of poly (ADP-ribose) polymerase inhibitor. Also called niraparib tosylate monohydrate.
Zelboraf listen (ZEL-boh-raf)
A drug used to treat Erdheim-Chester disease (a very rare type of histiocytosis) and advanced melanoma. It is used in patients whose disease has a mutated (changed) form of a gene called BRAF. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zelboraf blocks certain proteins made by the mutated BRAF gene, which may help keep cancer cells from growing. It is a type of kinase inhibitor and a type of targeted therapy agent. Also called BRAF (V600E) kinase inhibitor RO5185426, PLX4032, RG7204, and vemurafenib.
Zenapax listen (ZEH-nuh-pax)
A drug used to keep the body from rejecting kidney transplants. It is also being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer and other conditions. Zenapax binds to receptors for a protein called interleukin-2 (IL-2), which are found on some types of immune cells and cancer cells. This may help suppress the body’s immune response and it may help kill cancer cells. Zenapax is a type of monoclonal antibody. Also called dacliximab and daclizumab.
Zestril listen (ZEH-stril)
A drug used to treat high blood pressure and certain heart conditions. It is also being studied in the prevention and treatment of side effects caused by some anticancer drugs. It blocks certain enzymes that cause blood vessels to constrict (narrow). It is a type of angiotensin-converting enzyme (ACE) inhibitor. Also called lisinopril and Prinivil.
Zevalin listen (ZEH-vuh-lin)
A drug used to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zevalin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells and some types of lymphoma cells. It also contains the compound tiuxetan, which allows certain radioactive substances to be attached to the monoclonal antibody. This may help kill cancer cells. Zevalin is a type of monoclonal antibody and a type of immunoconjugate. Also called ibritumomab tiuxetan.
Zheng listen (jung)
In traditional Chinese medicine, a way of diagnosing disease based on observing a set of signs and symptoms. A practitioner checks Zheng by looking at the patient; asking questions; feeling the pulse, organs, and tissues; listening to body sounds; and smelling the body.
zibotentan listen (zy-boh-TEN-tan)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. Zibotentan may block cancer cell growth. It is a type of endothelin-A receptor antagonist.
ziconotide listen (zih-KAH-noh-tide)
A drug used in the treatment of chronic pain. Also called Prialt and SNX 111.
zidovudine listen (zy-DOH-vyoo-DEEN)
A drug that inhibits the human immunodeficiency virus (HIV) that causes AIDS. It is a type of systemic antiviral. Also called AZT.
zileuton listen (zy-LOO-tin)
A substance that is used to prevent asthma symptoms and that is being studied in the prevention of lung cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called leukotriene blockers.
zinc oxide listen (zink OK-side)
A compound that may enhance immune function, especially when administered by inhalation.
zinc sulfate listen (zink SUL-fayt)
A substance required for cell growth and tissue repair. It is being studied as a way to prevent or decrease mucositis caused by radiation therapy.
Zinecard listen (ZIH-neh-kard)
A drug used to reduce heart damage in women given doxorubicin for breast cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. Zinecard contains the active ingredient dexrazoxane. It is a type of cardioprotective agent, a type of chemoprotective agent, and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor.
ziv-aflibercept listen (ziv-a-FLIH-ber-sept)
A drug used with other drugs to treat colorectal cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and has not gotten better with chemotherapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Ziv-aflibercept blocks the action of a protein called vascular endothelial growth factor (VEGF) and may prevent the growth of new blood vessels that tumors need to grow. It is a type of antiangiogenesis agent. Also called vascular endothelial growth factor trap, VEGF Trap, and Zaltrap.
Zocor listen (ZOH-kor)
A drug used to lower the amount of cholesterol and other harmful substances in the blood, such as triglycerides. It is also being studied in the treatment of cancer and other conditions. Zocor blocks an enzyme that helps make cholesterol in the body. It is a type of HMG-CoA reductase inhibitor and a type of statin. Also called simvastatin.
Zofran listen (ZOH-fran)
A drug used to prevent nausea and vomiting caused by chemotherapy and radiation therapy. It is also used to prevent nausea and vomiting after surgery. Zofran blocks the action of the chemical serotonin, which binds to certain nerves and may trigger nausea and vomiting. Blocking serotonin may help lessen nausea and vomiting. It is a type of serotonin receptor antagonist and a type of antiemetic. Also called ondansetron hydrochloride.
Zoladex listen (ZOLE-uh-dex)
A drug used to treat prostate cancer and to relieve the symptoms of advanced breast cancer. It is also used to treat problems with the endometrium (lining of the uterus). Zoladex keeps the body from making the hormones luteinizing hormone-releasing hormone (LHRH) and luteinizing hormone (LH). This causes the testicles to stop making testosterone (a male hormone) in men, and the ovaries to stop making estradiol (a form of the hormone estrogen) in women. Zoladex may stop the growth of cancer cells that need testosterone or estrogen to grow. It is a type of LHRH agonist. Also called goserelin acetate and ZDX.
zoledronate listen (zoh-LEH-droh-nayt)
A drug used to treat hypercalcemia (high blood levels of calcium) caused by cancer. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat multiple myeloma and cancers that have spread to the bone. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zoledronate may help keep bone from breaking down and prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called zoledronic acid and Zometa.
zoledronic acid listen (ZOH-leh-DRAH-nik A-sid)
A drug used to treat hypercalcemia (high blood levels of calcium) caused by cancer. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat multiple myeloma and cancers that have spread to the bone. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zoledronic acid may help keep bone from breaking down and prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called zoledronate and Zometa.
Zolinza listen (zoh-LIN-zah)
A drug used to treat cutaneous T-cell lymphoma that recurred (came back) or did not get better during or after treatment with other anticancer drugs. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zolinza blocks certain enzymes needed for cell division and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of histone deacetylase inhibitor. Also called SAHA, suberoylanilide hydroxamic acid, and vorinostat.
Zollinger-Ellison syndrome listen (ZOLE-lin-jer-EH-lih-sun SIN-drome)
A disorder in which tumors of the pancreatic islet cells produce large amounts of gastrin (a hormone), leading to excess acid in the stomach and, possibly, a peptic ulcer (ulcer of the stomach or the upper part of the small intestine).
Zoloft listen (ZOH-loft)
A drug used to treat depression. It is a type of selective serotonin reuptake inhibitor (SSRI). Also called sertraline.
zolpidem listen (zole-PIH-dem)
A drug used to treat insomnia (inability to sleep), and anxiety. It is a type of imidazopyridine (sedative hypnotic). Also called Ambien.
Zometa listen (ZOH-meh-tuh)
A drug used to treat hypercalcemia (high blood levels of calcium) caused by cancer. It is also used with other anticancer drugs to treat multiple myeloma and cancers that have spread to the bone. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zometa may help keep bone from breaking down and prevent the loss of calcium from the bones. It is a type of bisphosphonate. Also called zoledronate and zoledronic acid.
Zortress listen (ZOR-tres)
A drug used with other drugs to keep the body from rejecting a kidney or liver transplant. It lowers the body’s immune response. Zortress contains the active ingredient everolimus. It is a type of immunosuppressant and a type of kinase inhibitor.
zosuquidar trihydrochloride listen (ZOH-soo-KWIH-dar try-HY-droh-KLOR-ide)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. Zosuquidar trihydrochloride may help kill cancer cells that are resistant to anticancer drugs. Also called LY335979.
Zyban listen (ZY-ban)
A drug used to treat depression and certain other disorders. It is also used to help people stop smoking. Zyban increases the levels of the chemicals dopamine, serotonin, and norepinephrine in the brain. This helps improve mood and can lessen cravings for nicotine. It is a type of antidepressant and a type of nicotine receptor antagonist. Also called bupropion hydrochloride and Wellbutrin.
Zydelig listen (zy-DEH-lig)
A drug used with rituximab to treat chronic lymphocytic leukemia (CLL) that has come back. It is also used to treat follicular B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma (NHL) and small lymphocytic lymphoma (SLL) that have come back after treatment with other anticancer therapy. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zydelig blocks certain proteins, which may help keep cancer cells from growing and may kill them. It is a type of kinase inhibitor. Also called idelalisib.
Zykadia listen (zy-KAY-dee-uh)
A drug used to treat non-small cell lung cancer that has spread to other parts of the body and is anaplastic lymphoma kinase (ALK) positive. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zykadia blocks the protein made by the ALK gene. Blocking this protein may stop the growth and spread of cancer cells. Zykadia is a type of tyrosine kinase inhibitor. Also called ceritinib.
Zyprexa listen (zy-PREK-suh)
A drug used to treat certain mental disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of antipsychotic and a type of monoamine antagonist. Also called olanzapine and Zyprexa Zydis.
Zyprexa Zydis listen (zy-PREK-suh ZY-dis)
A drug used to treat certain mental disorders. It is also being studied in the treatment of nausea and vomiting caused by some cancer treatments. It is a type of antipsychotic and a type of monoamine antagonist. Also called olanzapine and Zyprexa.
Zytiga listen (zy-TEE-guh)
A drug used with prednisone to treat prostate cancer that has spread to other parts of the body. It is used in patients whose cancer is castration resistant (has not responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels) or whose cancer is high risk and castration sensitive (has responded to treatments that lower testosterone levels). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. Zytiga lowers the amount of androgens (male hormones), such as testosterone, made by the body. This may stop the growth of cancer cells that need androgens to grow. Zytiga is a type of antiandrogen. Also called abiraterone acetate.
1-(2’-deoxy-2’-fluoro-β-D-arabinofuranosyl) uracil listen (1-(2'-dee-OK-see-2'-FLOOR-oh-BAY-tuh-D-uh-RA-bih-noh-fyoor-A-noh-sil) YOOR-uh-sil)
A substance being studied in the treatment of advanced solid tumors and lymphomas. It blocks the growth of cells and may cause cancer cells to die. It is a type of uracil analog. Also called FAU.
10-propargyl-10-deazaaminopterin listen (10-proh-PAR-jil-10-dee-AY-zuh-a-mih-NOP-teh-rin)
A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called folate analogs.
111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan listen (... ih-brih-TOO-moh-mab ty-UK-seh-tan)
A radiolabeled monoclonal antibody used to find certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the diagnosis of other types of B-cell tumors. 111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan is made up of the monoclonal antibody ibritumomab plus the radioisotope indium In 111. It binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. A machine is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan. 111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 111In-Zevalin and indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan.
111In-Zevalin listen (... ZEH-vuh-lin)
A radiolabeled monoclonal antibody used to find certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the diagnosis of other types of B-cell tumors. 111In-Zevalin is made up of the monoclonal antibody ibritumomab plus the radioisotope indium In 111. It binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. A machine is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 111In-Zevalin. 111In-Zevalin is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 111In-ibritumomab tiuxetan and indium In 111-ibritumomab tiuxetan.
11C-acetate listen (… A-seh-tayt)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging. 11C-acetate gets taken up by cells in the body, and a PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken it up. Since more 11C-acetate is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells, it can be used to help find cancer in the body and diagnose disease. Also called carbon C 11-acetate.
11C-choline listen (… KOH-leen)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. 11C-choline gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 11C-choline. Also called carbon C 11-choline.
11C-choline PET-CT scan listen (… KOH-leen … skan)
A procedure in which a small amount of 11C-choline (a radioactive form of the vitamin choline) is injected into a vein. A scanner and a computer are used to make detailed pictures of areas inside the body where the 11C-choline collects. Cancer cells take up more 11C-choline than normal cells, so the pictures can be used to find cancer cells in the body. Also called carbon C 11-choline PET-CT scan.
123I-MIBG
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 123 that is used to find certain types of tumors, including pheochromocytomas and neuroblastomas. Radiation from I 123 may help show where cancer cells are in the body. 123I-MIBG is a type of radioconjugate. Also called AdreView, iobenguane I 123, and iodine I 123-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
126–F
A liquid that has been promoted as a treatment for a wide range of diseases, including cancer. The ingredients thought to be in 126–F have been tested, and none of them have been shown to be effective in treating any form of cancer. 126–F is not available in the United States. Also called Cancell, Cantron, Jim’s Juice, JS–101, JS–114, Protocel, and Sheridan’s Formula.
12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate listen (12-O-TEH-truh-DEH-kuh-noyl-FOR-bol-13-A-seh-tayt)
A substance being studied in the treatment of leukemias and lymphomas. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. 12-O-tetradecanoylphorbol-13-acetate affects many cell actions and may cause tumor cells to die. It is a type of phorbol ester. Also called tetradecanoylphorbol acetate and TPA.
131I-MIBG
A drug containing a form of radioactive iodine called I 131 that is used to treat malignant pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma. It is used in patients who need treatment with systemic anticancer therapy and whose tumor cells take up radioactive iobenguane and are detected by a scanner. 131I-MIBG is used to treat pheochromocytoma and paraganglioma that cannot be removed by surgery, are locally advanced, or have spread to other parts of the body. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. 131I-MIBG builds up in tumor cells and gives off radiation that may kill the tumor cells. It is a type of radioconjugate. Also called Azedra, iobenguane I 131, and iodine I 131-metaiodobenzylguanidine.
13-cis retinoic acid listen (... REH-tih-NOH-ik A-sid)
A drug that is used in the treatment of acne and psoriasis and is being studied in cancer prevention. It is a type of retinoid. Also called isotretinoin.
1572 form listen (… form)
A form that must be filed by an investigator running a clinical trial to study a new drug or agent. The investigator agrees to follow the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) Code of Federal Regulations for the clinical trial. The investigator verifies that he or she has the experience and background needed to conduct the trial and that it will be done in a way that is ethical and scientifically sound. Also called Form FDA 1572-Statement of Investigator.
17-AAG
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made from an antibiotic called geldanamycin. 17-AAG helps cause the breakdown of certain proteins in the cell, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic and a type of HSP90 inhibitor. Also called 17-N-allylamino-17-demethoxygeldanamycin and tanespimycin.
17-dimethylaminoethylamino-17-demethoxygeldanamycin listen (17-dy-MEH-thul-uh-MEE-noh-EH-thul-uh-MEE-noh-17-dee-meh-THOK-see-gel-DA-nuh-MY-sin)
17-DMAG. A substance that is being studied in the treatment of cancer. It belongs to the family of drugs called geldanamycin analogs.
17-N-allylamino-17-demethoxygeldanamycin listen (17-N-A-lul-uh-MEE-noh-17-DEE-meh-THOK-see-gel-DA-nuh-MY-sin)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made from an antibiotic called geldanamycin. 17-N-allylamino-17-demethoxygeldanamycin helps cause the breakdown of certain proteins in the cell, and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antineoplastic antibiotic and a type of HSP90 inhibitor. Also called 17-AAG and tanespimycin.
18F-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol listen (… AL-fuh-FLOOR-oh-es-truh-DY-ol)
A radiolabeled substance being studied as an imaging agent in breast cancer. 18F-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol binds to estrogen receptors and gives off radiation that can be detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. The PET scan forms an image that shows where cancer cells with estrogen receptors can be found in the body. Also called 18F-FES and fluorine F 18-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol.
18F-choline listen (... KOH-leen)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. 18F-choline gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 18F-choline. Also called 18F-fluoromethylcholine, 18F-FMCH, and fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine.
18F-EF5
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. This may help predict how well the cancer will respond to treatment. Also called fluorine F 18-EF5.
18F-FES
A radiolabeled substance being studied as an imaging agent in breast cancer. 18F-FES binds to estrogen receptors and gives off radiation that can be detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. The PET scan forms an image that shows where cancer cells with estrogen receptors can be found in the body. Also called 18F-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol and fluorine F 18-16 alpha-fluoroestradiol.
18F-FLT
A radioactive substance being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. 18F-FLT is injected into the blood and builds up in cells that are dividing, including cancer cells. The radiation that it gives off as it decays (breaks down) helps make clear pictures of tumors during a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Also called 18F-fluorothymidine, 3’-deoxy-3’-(18F) fluorothymidine, and fluorine F 18-fluorothymidine.
18F-fludeoxyglucose listen (... FLOO-dee-OK-see-GLOO-kose)
A radioactive form of glucose used in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging. 18F-fludeoxyglucose gets taken up by cells in the body, and a PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken it up. Since more 18F-fludeoxyglucose is taken up by abnormal cells, including cancer cells, than by normal cells, it can be used to find cancer cells in the body and to diagnose cancer and other conditions. Also called fluorine F 18-fludeoxyglucose.
18F-fluoromethylcholine listen (… FLOOR-oh-MEH-thul-KOH-leen)
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. 18F-fluoromethylcholine gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 18F-fluoromethylcholine. Also called 18F-choline, 18F-FMCH, and fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine.
18F-fluoromisonidazole listen (… FLOOR-oh-MY-soh-NIH-duh-zole)
A radioactive substance being studied as an imaging agent in head and neck cancer and other types of cancer. It binds to large molecules in cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. Radiation given off by 18F-fluoromisonidazole is detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Knowing the amount of 18F-fluoromisonidazole in the cancer cells may help plan the best treatment and help predict whether the cancer will come back after treatment. Also called 18F-MISO, fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole, and FMISO.
18F-fluorothymidine listen (... FLOOR-oh-THY-mih-deen)
A radioactive substance being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. 18F-fluorothymidine is injected into the blood and builds up in cells that are dividing, including cancer cells. The radiation that it gives off as it decays (breaks down) helps make clear pictures of tumors during a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Also called 18F-FLT, 3’-deoxy-3’-(18F) fluorothymidine, and fluorine F 18-fluorothymidine.
18F-FMCH
A radioactive substance being studied in positron emission tomography (PET) imaging to find certain types of cancer. 18F-FMCH gets taken up by cells in the body and more of it is taken up by cancer cells than by normal cells. A PET scanner is used to find which cells in the body have taken up 18F-FMCH. Also called 18F-choline, 18F-fluoromethylcholine, and fluorine F 18-fluoromethylcholine.
18F-MISO
A radioactive substance being studied as an imaging agent in head and neck cancer and other types of cancer. It binds to large molecules in cancer cells that have a low level of oxygen. Radiation given off by 18F-MISO is detected by a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Knowing the amount of 18F-MISO in the cancer cells may help plan the best treatment and help predict whether the cancer will come back after treatment. Also called 18F-fluoromisonidazole, fluorine F 18-fluoromisonidazole, and FMISO.
18F-NaF PET
A procedure used to find out if cancer has spread to the bone. A small amount of a radioactive substance called 18F-NaF is injected into a vein. A PET scan is then used to make detailed pictures of the bones. Bones with cancer in them take up more 18F-NaF than normal bones do. Also called 18F-sodium fluoride positron emission tomography and fluorine F 18-sodium fluoride PET.
18F-sodium fluoride positron emission tomography listen (… SOH-dee-um FLOOR-ide PAH-zih-tron ee-MIH-shun toh-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure used to find out if cancer has spread to the bone. A small amount of a radioactive substance called 18F-sodium fluoride is injected into a vein. A PET scan is then used to make detailed pictures of the bones. Bones with cancer in them take up more 18F-sodium fluoride than normal bones do. Also called 18F-NaF PET and fluorine F 18-sodium fluoride PET.
1H-nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging listen (... NOO-klee-er mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts SPEK-troh-SKAH-pik IH-muh-jing)
A noninvasive imaging method that provides information about cellular activity (metabolic information). It is used along with magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) which provides information about the shape and size of the tumor (spatial information). Also called magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging, MRSI, and proton magnetic resonance spectroscopic imaging.
1-methyl-d-tryptophan listen (1-MEH-thul-d-TRIP-toh-fan)
A substance being studied in the treatment of melanoma and many other types of cancer. 1-methyl-d-tryptophan blocks the breakdown of the amino acid tryptophan, which is needed for T cells (a type of immune system cell) to kill tumor cells. Giving 1-methyl-d-tryptophan to patients who have received chemotherapy for cancer may help kill more tumor cells. It is a type of enzyme inhibitor and immunosuppressant. Also called D-1MT.
21-gene signature listen (… jeen SIG-nuh-cher)
A test that is used to help predict whether breast cancer will spread to other parts of the body or come back. The test looks at the activity of 21 different genes in breast cancer tissue of women who have early-stage breast cancer that is estrogen receptor positive and has not spread to the lymph nodes. If there is a high risk that the cancer will spread or come back, it may be used to help plan treatment with anticancer drugs. Also called Oncotype DX breast cancer assay.
2-D mammography listen (… ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take pictures of the inside of the breast. The pictures are usually taken from two different angles, and a computer or x-ray film is used to make 2-D pictures of the breast. 2-D mammography is used to check for breast cancer and other changes in the breast, such as abnormal lumps, cysts, or calcifications (calcium deposits). Also called 2-dimensional mammography.
2-dimensional mammography listen (2-dih-MEN-shuh-nul ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take pictures of the inside of the breast. The pictures are usually taken from two different angles, and a computer or x-ray film is used to make 2-D pictures of the breast. 2-dimensional mammography is used to check for breast cancer and other changes in the breast, such as abnormal lumps, cysts, or calcifications (calcium deposits). Also called 2-D mammography.
2IT-BAD monoclonal antibody 170 listen (… MAH-noh-KLOH-nul AN-tee-BAH-dee …)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is made by linking a monoclonal antibody called 170, which binds to a protein called MUC-1, to a substance called 2IT-BAD, which binds radioactive substances. 2IT-BAD monoclonal antibody 170 may be used to detect cancer cells and kill them. It is a type of immunoconjugate.
2-methoxyestradiol listen (2-meh-THOK-see-es-truh-DY-ol)
2ME2. A drug that prevents the formation of new blood vessels that tumors need in order to grow. It is derived from estrogen and belongs to the family of drugs called angiogenesis inhibitors.
3 Tesla magnetic resonance imaging listen (3 TES-luh mag-NEH-tik REH-zuh-nunts IH-muh-jing)
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to make detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. 3 Tesla magnetic resonance imaging has a stronger magnet and makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other types of MRI do. It is used to make images of the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones and blood vessels. Also called 3 Tesla MRI and 3T MRI.
3 Tesla MRI listen (3 TES-luh …)
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to make detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. 3 Tesla MRI has a stronger magnet and makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other types of MRI do. It is used to make images of the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones and blood vessels. Also called 3 Tesla magnetic resonance imaging and 3T MRI.
3,4-benzpyrene listen (... benz-PY-reen)
A chemical that comes from certain substances when they are not burned completely. It is found in car exhaust, smoke from wood fires, tobacco, oil and gas products, charred or grilled foods, and other sources. It may also be found in water and soil. 3,4-Benzpyrene can cause a skin rash, a burning feeling, skin color changes, warts, and bronchitis. It may also cause cancer. It is a type of polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbon. Also called benzo(a)pyrene.
3’-deoxy-3’-(18F) fluorothymidine listen (… dee-OK-see … FLOOR-oh-THY-mih-deen)
A radioactive substance being studied in the diagnosis of cancer. 3’-deoxy-3’-(18F) fluorothymidine is injected into the blood and builds up in cells that are dividing, including cancer cells. The radiation that it gives off as it decays (breaks down) helps make clear pictures of tumors during a positron emission tomography (PET) scan. Also called 18F-FLT, 18F-fluorothymidine, and fluorine F 18-fluorothymidine.
3-aminopyridine-2-carboxaldehyde thiosemicarbazone listen (3-uh-MEE-noh-PEER-ih-deen-2-KAR-bok-SAL-deh-hide THY-oh-SEH-mee KAR-buh-ZONE)
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor. Also called 3-AP and Triapine.
3-AP
A substance being studied in the treatment of cancer. It is a type of ribonucleotide reductase inhibitor. Also called 3-aminopyridine-2-carboxaldehyde thiosemicarbazone and Triapine.
3-D
A graphic display of depth, width, and height. Also called 3-dimensional.
3-D mammography listen (… ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take a series of pictures of the inside of the breast from many different angles. A computer is used to make 3-D pictures of the breast from these x-rays. 3-D mammography is used to check for breast cancer and other changes in the breast, such as abnormal lumps, cysts, or calcifications (calcium deposits). It may allow doctors to see breast tissue, including dense breast tissue, more clearly than with 2-D mammography. This may make breast tumors or other changes in the breast easier to find. Also called 3-dimensional mammography and breast tomosynthesis.
3D-CRT
A procedure that uses a computer to create a 3-dimensional picture of the tumor. This allows doctors to give the highest possible dose of radiation to the tumor, while sparing the normal tissue as much as possible. Also called 3-dimensional conformal radiation therapy and 3-dimensional radiation therapy.
3-dimensional listen (3-dih-MEN-shuh-nul)
A graphic display of depth, width, and height. Also called 3-D.
3-dimensional conformal radiation therapy listen (3-dih-MEN-shuh-nul kun-FOR-mul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses a computer to create a 3-dimensional picture of the tumor. This allows doctors to give the highest possible dose of radiation to the tumor, while sparing the normal tissue as much as possible. Also called 3-dimensional radiation therapy and 3D-CRT.
3-dimensional mammography listen (3-dih-MEN-shuh-nul ma-MAH-gruh-fee)
A procedure that uses x-rays to take a series of pictures of the inside of the breast from many different angles. A computer is used to make 3-D pictures of the breast from these x-rays. 3-dimensional mammography is used to check for breast cancer and other changes in the breast, such as abnormal lumps, cysts, or calcifications (calcium deposits). It may allow doctors to see breast tissue, including dense breast tissue, more clearly than with 2-D mammography. This may make breast tumors or other changes in the breast easier to find. Also called 3-D mammography and breast tomosynthesis.
3-dimensional radiation therapy listen (3-dih-MEN-shuh-nul RAY-dee-AY-shun THAYR-uh-pee)
A procedure that uses a computer to create a 3-dimensional picture of the tumor. This allows doctors to give the highest possible dose of radiation to the tumor, while sparing the normal tissue as much as possible. Also called 3-dimensional conformal radiation therapy and 3D-CRT.
3F8
A type of monoclonal antibody used in cancer detection or therapy. Monoclonal antibodies are laboratory-produced substances that can locate and bind to cancer cells.
3T MRI
A procedure in which radio waves and a powerful magnet linked to a computer are used to make detailed pictures of areas inside the body. These pictures can show the difference between normal and abnormal tissue. 3T MRI has a stronger magnet and makes better images of organs and soft tissue than other types of MRI do. It is used to make images of the brain, the spine, the soft tissue of joints, and the inside of bones and blood vessels. Also called 3 Tesla magnetic resonance imaging and 3 Tesla MRI.
45 CFR 46
Laws set by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) to protect a person from risks in research studies that any federal agency or department has a part in. Also called 45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 46, human participant protection regulations, and Protection of Human Subjects.
45 Code of Federal Regulations Part 46 listen (... FEH-drul REH-gyoo-LAY-shunz ...)
Laws set by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services (DHHS) to protect a person from risks in research studies that any federal agency or department has a part in. Also called 45 CFR 46, human participant protection regulations, and Protection of Human Subjects.
4-demethoxydaunorubicin listen (4-DEE-meh-THOK-see-DAW-noh-ROO-bih-sin)
A drug used with other drugs to treat acute myelogenous leukemia (AML). It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of cancer. 4-demethoxydaunorubicin blocks a certain enzyme needed for cell division and DNA repair, and it may kill cancer cells. It is a type of anthracycline antibiotic and a type of topoisomerase inhibitor. Also called Idamycin PFS and idarubicin hydrochloride.
4-hydroxytamoxifen listen (4-hy-DROK-see-tuh-MOK-sih-FEN)
A form of the drug tamoxifen that is made by the body after taking tamoxifen. It can also be made in the laboratory, and may help decrease breast density. A topical form of 4-hydroxytamoxifen is being studied in breast cancer screening.
4-nitroquinoline 1-oxide listen (4-NY-troh-KWIH-noh-leen 1-OK-side)
A substance that is used in cancer research to cause tumors in laboratory animals. This is done to test new diets, drugs, and procedures for use in cancer prevention and treatment. Also called 4-NQO.
4-NQO
A substance that is used in cancer research to cause tumors in laboratory animals. This is done to test new diets, drugs, and procedures for use in cancer prevention and treatment. Also called 4-nitroquinoline 1-oxide.
504 plan listen (… plan)
An education plan for students with disabilities or certain health conditions, such as cancer. By law, these students must have the same access to school programs and activities as students without disabilities. A 504 plan may include extra help in the classroom, such as allowing the student more time to take a test or finish an assignment, or to use a computer or tape recorder. It may also include tutoring and other services, such as speech therapy and physical therapy. It is covered under the U.S. law, Rehabilitation Act of 1973.
506U78
A drug used to treat T-cell acute lymphoblastic leukemia and T-cell lymphoblastic lymphoma. It is used in patients whose cancer has not gotten better or has recurred (come back) after treatment with other anticancer drugs. 506U78 stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called Arranon and nelarabine.
5-alpha reductase inhibitor listen (5-AL-fuh ree-DUK-tays in-HIH-bih-ter)
A substance that blocks an enzyme needed by the body to make dihydrotestosterone (a male sex hormone made from testosterone). Dihydrotestosterone can cause the prostate to grow. 5-alpha reductase inhibitors are used to shrink an enlarged prostate gland and to improve the flow of urine in a condition called benign prostatic hyperplasia (BPH). A 5-alpha reductase inhibitor is a type of enzyme inhibitor.
5-fluoro-2-deoxycytidine listen (5-FLOOR-oh-2-dee-OK-see-SY-tih-deen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. It may prevent the growth of tumors by stopping cancer cells from dividing and by killing them. It is a type of antimetabolite. Also called FdCyd.
5-fluorouracil listen (5-FLOOR-oh-YOOR-uh-sil)
A drug used to treat cancers of the breast, colon, rectum, stomach, and pancreas. It is used under the brand names Carac, Tolak, Efudex, and Fluoroplex as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). It is also used under the brand name Efudex as a cream to treat basal cell skin cancer that is superficial (not invasive) and cannot be treated with other therapy. 5-fluorouracil is being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. 5-fluorouracil is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 5-FU and fluorouracil.
5-FU
A drug used to treat cancers of the breast, colon, rectum, stomach, and pancreas. It is used under the brand names Carac, Tolak, Efudex, and Fluoroplex as a cream to treat actinic keratosis (a skin condition that may become cancer). It is also used under the brand name Efudex as a cream to treat basal cell skin cancer that is superficial (not invasive) and cannot be treated with other therapy. 5-FU is being studied in the treatment of other conditions and types of cancer. It stops cells from making DNA and may kill cancer cells. 5-FU is a type of antimetabolite. Also called 5-fluorouracil and fluorouracil.
5-FU-leucovorin calcium listen (… LOO-koh-VOR-in KAL-see-um)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer. It is also used with radiation therapy to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs fluorouracil and leucovorin calcium. Also called 5-FU-leucovorin calcium regimen.
5-FU-leucovorin calcium regimen listen (… LOO-koh-VOR-in KAL-see-um REH-jih-men)
A chemotherapy combination used to treat colorectal cancer. It is also used with radiation therapy to treat esophageal cancer and stomach cancer. It includes the drugs fluorouracil and leucovorin calcium. Also called 5-FU-leucovorin calcium.
5-HT3 receptor antagonist listen (… reh-SEP-ter an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug used to treat certain types of irritable bowel syndrome and relieve nausea and vomiting. It is a type of antiemetic. Also called 5-hydroxytryptamine 3 receptor antagonist and type 3 serotonin receptor antagonist.
5-hydroxyindoleacetic acid listen (5-hy-DROK-see-IN-dole-uh-SEE-tik A-sid)
5HIAA. A breakdown product of serotonin that is excreted in the urine. Serotonin is a hormone found at high levels in many body tissues. Serotonin and 5HIAA are produced in excess amounts by carcinoid tumors, and levels of these substances may be measured in the urine to test for carcinoid tumors.
5-hydroxytryptamine listen (5-hy-DROK-see-TRIP-tuh-meen)
A hormone found in the brain, platelets, digestive tract, and pineal gland. It acts both as a neurotransmitter (a substance that nerves use to send messages to one another) and a vasoconstrictor (a substance that causes blood vessels to narrow). A lack of 5-hydroxytryptamine in the brain is thought to be a cause of depression. Also called serotonin.
5-hydroxytryptamine 3 receptor antagonist listen (5-hy-DROK-see-TRIP-tuh-meen 3 reh-SEP-ter an-TA-guh-nist)
A type of drug used to treat certain types of irritable bowel syndrome and relieve nausea and vomiting. It is a type of antiemetic. Also called 5-HT3 receptor antagonist and type 3 serotonin receptor antagonist.
5q minus syndrome listen (... MY-nus SIN-drome)
A rare disorder caused by loss of part of the long arm (q arm) of human chromosome 5. This syndrome affects myeloid (bone marrow) cells, causing treatment-resistant anemia and myelodysplastic syndromes that may lead to acute myelogenous leukemia. Also called 5q- syndrome.
5q- syndrome listen (... SIN-drome)
A rare disorder caused by loss of part of the long arm (q arm) of human chromosome 5. This syndrome affects myeloid (bone marrow) cells, causing treatment-resistant anemia and myelodysplastic syndromes that may lead to acute myelogenous leukemia. Also called 5q minus syndrome.
6-hydroxymethylacylfulvene listen (6-hy-DROK-see-MEH-thul-AY-sel-FUL-veen)
A substance being studied in the treatment of some types of cancer. 6-hydroxymethylacylfulvene attaches to the cell's DNA and may block cancer cell growth. It is a type of alkylating agent. Also called irofulven.
70-gene signature listen (… jeen SIG-nuh-cher)
A test that is used to help predict whether breast cancer has spread to other parts of the body or come back. The test looks at the activity of 70 different genes in breast cancer tissue of women who have early-stage breast cancer that has not spread to the lymph nodes. If there is a high risk that the cancer will spread or come back, it may be used to help plan treatment with anticancer drugs. Also called MammaPrint.
852A
A substance being studied in the treatment of certain adult and childhood blood cancers and other types of cancer. 852A may help the patient's immune system block tumor growth. It is a type of immune system modulator.
90Y-DOTA-biotin listen (… BY-oh-tin)
A compound that contains the radioisotope yttrium Y 90 linked to the chemical biotin. Biotin is a molecule that binds strongly to the chemical streptavidin. 90Y-DOTA-biotin will find tumor cells in the body that have been targeted by an antibody linked to streptavidin and kill them. It is being studied together with CC49-streptavidin in the treatment of cancer. Also called yttrium Y 90-DOTA-biotin.
90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan listen (... ih-brih-TOO-moh-mab ty-UK-seh-tan)
A drug used with the drug rituximab to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of B-cell tumors. 90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. 90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 90Y-Zevalin, IDEC-Y2B8, and yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan.
90Y-Zevalin listen (... ZEH-vuh-lin)
A drug used with the drug rituximab to treat certain types of B-cell non-Hodgkin lymphoma. It is also being studied in the treatment of other types of B-cell tumors. 90Y-Zevalin contains a monoclonal antibody that binds to a protein called CD20, which is found on B cells. It also contains a radioactive substance called yttrium Y 90, which may help kill cancer cells. 90Y-Zevalin is a type of radioimmunoconjugate. Also called 90Y-ibritumomab tiuxetan, IDEC-Y2B8, and yttrium Y 90-ibritumomab tiuxetan.
99m-Tc-Dx
A substance being studied as a way to find sentinel lymph nodes in some types of skin cancer and breast cancer. It contains a radioactive substance called technetium linked to a substance called dextran. Dextran helps technetium stay in blood and lymph vessels after it is injected. A machine or probe that detects radioactivity shows which lymph nodes near the tumor have 99m-Tc-Dx in them. Also called Tc-99m Dextran and technetium Tc 99m-dextran.
9-cis retinoic acid listen (... REH-tih-NOH-ik A-sid)
A substance being studied in the prevention of cancer. It is a type of retinoid.
9cUAB30
A substance being studied in the treatment and prevention of cancer. It blocks an enzyme that keeps cells alive by adding material to the ends of chromosomes. Blocking this enzyme may cause the cancer cells to die. 9cUAB30 is a type of retinoic acid and a type of telomerase inhibitor.
9p21
A specific part of chromosome 9 called p21, which has a gene that may be involved in stopping tumor cell growth. In some types of cancer cells, including bladder cancer cells, this small part of chromosome 9 may be missing. This may cause cancer cell growth. Checking for 9p21 may help diagnose cancer or find out if cancer has come back. 9p21 is a type of tumor marker.
